Charlie is the best treadmill repair guy I have ever seen or met. He was really good and courteous. He also offered me a 10 discount for being late. He was very polite and had a good humor. He took care of my treadmill issue and fixed it and lubricated it too. He offered me few tips on maintaining it really well. I would blindly recommend him for any fitness equipment repair or assembly.
Truly good Mediterranean food with consistent friendly customer service. Been here many times and nothing but a good experience.
Butcher never disappoints! I went for my fourth time and it had been a year so I wanted to see if it was still as good definitely was. I had the scallops and my friend had the fillet. Pig candy appetizer was just as good as the first time I had it years ago. Do not change anything and stay delicious!
The BEST mead I have ever had!! The owner Cody azmeadco is extremely knowledgeable about mead and is very willing to answer any questions. The atmosphere is very inviting. A must have on a Saturday night!
Omg service here is superior to every other place in town!!!! I am so glad we came here!!! I plan to be back several times over! Food tasted great too!
A Vegas MUST SEE. Love this show!!! So beautiful! Seen it twice. Use a online discount code or hit up the Coke bottle special tickets.
Heather Heather Heather. Wow thanks for selling me that purple thingy. I absolutely love it and told a few friends too. So hopefully they found their way to you and that purple thingy. LOL
I received excellent customer service was reminded several times that I can try any flavor I wish. Order the Baby 8oz shaved ice with vanilla ice cream and it was amazing!!!!! They also have a rack of fun games to play if you dine in like Jenga and Chutes and Ladders just to name a fun. Best shaved ice in Las Vegas
Why am i giving a nightclub 4 stars?! Cause they have seating!!!! You can actually sit outside at this place! How great is that lol We arrived about 1030p on a night DJ Mustard was DJing. Since we were on a guest list we were taken a different route to get into the club for free. OMG not sure it was worth it. We climbed legit like 9 flights of stairs. Imagine doing this in heels and a dress. It was awful. I felt like we needed to stop for food and water! We finally arrived to the entrance to a packed house. The club is a great size and easily accessible to get a drink. Took me all of 3 min to get one. We hung out outside for a while to enjoy our drinks while listening to music. We SAT. Ca not stress this enough lol We sat drank and enjoyed the view of Las Vegas. Once DJ Mustard hit the floor we made our way onto the dance floor and stayed there for his entire set. Great time ca not wait to go back!
This place is awesome!! The fried chicken bao is actually the best chicken sandwich I ve ever had. It s smallish so one is perfect for a small meal but they are less than 5 so you can buy two if you re really hungry. They also travel well.
Amazing Happy Hour deals!!! Great appetizers and drinks this place is tucked away between a Whataburger and furniture store. Place is small but very well decorated! They even had a guitar player on the second floor who played nice and calming songs during happy hour! Nice!! Not very much to say since we only came here to try out their happy hour and all of the appetizers we ordered were great!! Especially the Queso Fundido that was delicious!!! Yum and the nice long list of drinks!! The bartender that night mixed up some delicious cocktails too!! I definitely will come here again to try out the full menu soon!
Absolutely one of the best dinners ever. Food was prepared perfect. Appetizers were Calimary with marinara sauce and a Caprese Salad stunning. I ordered the Shrimp Linguini Marinara with crisp golden French Fries and the wife had USDA NY Steak with Vegetables. Steak was a beautiful medium rare vegetables were crisp clean and sauted perfectly. On to dessert... Tiramisu Ricotta Cheese Cake Lemon Sorbet and Gelato... wonderful and an absolute symphony of flavor. You know all the ingrediants foods and sauces were prepared fresh and with passion. I would like to compliment the Chef kitchen staff servers and Management for outstanding food and service. I will be back with family for sure.
Hi I want to say this past Friday night was the first time I actually visited the club on a busy weekend. What an amazing time!!! The energy level was amazing! The presence of staff security was great! My friend had lost her cellphone and the security lady by the exit door had it. She was kind enough to answer the phone when we called it and told us where she was so we could get it. Awesome time! Definitely will be back!!
After 4 days of dehydrating my skin which is what ones does in Vegas between Sun and Cocktails I checked out of my room at the Luxor and went to the spa before my flight home. Luckily for me the young lady giving me my facial was Jinny Lee ! She talked to me about my skin did a mapping analysis of my face then proceeded to give me the most amazing relaxing facial I have ever received. This girl knows her stuff ! Besides her amazing gentle touch the products she used on my plumped my dehydrated skin tight back up ! You can tell she is very passionate about her work and it comes thru with each stroke of the skin. Trust me do your self a favor and come to this spa after you check out and get a facial with Jinny Lee...I am ready to go back and face the real world with my new face !
Great food. Found them about 3 months ago and I ve ordered delivery 4 times since.
We stopped in last night for a drink and had a great experience relaxed vibe great bartender amazing happy hour that goes from 4 9pm 4 pints 5 flatbreads and various other food and a lot of TV s to watch sports. Definitely worth a stop while visiting Tempe!
I drove in from Tulsa OK hence the car had numerous bug spatters on the front of the car and the windshield. The team did an excellent job removing them! I would say I will be back but I head out tomorrow so that probably wo not happen. However for all of you Yelp readers it s a sure bet...
This place is amazing! I wanted to make a reservation for a nice steak house for my husbands birthday and after my first choice was booked up I looked around and found this place. I was a bit nervous because the reviews were mixed but decided to at least make a reservation and if something else came up then we could always cancel. I am so glad I did not as this was one of the best places I have ever eaten! My party of five arrived a few minutes late because we had trouble getting a cab from our hotel to the Luxor. It was not a problem and we were seated immediately. Our waiters were attentive and gave us suggestions on the menu. They assisted my table with cocktail and wine choices and were able to answer all our questions on the menu honestly which I appreciate. I ordered the tomahawk steak to split with my husband and our other guests ordered the porterhouse and New York strip. Every steak was cooked to perfection. All of us ordered different sauces to try with the steaks and although they tasted delicious I do not even know why they are offered as every steak was insanely tender and amazing. Our tomahawk steak was probably the best thing I have ever eaten the fat melted like butter and I hardly needed my knife at all to cut it. My table ordered the asparagus gratin potatoes and mushrooms for sides and they were equally flavorful and a great suggestion from our waiters. I made a comment that we were celebrating my husbands birthday and to our surprise the waiters remembered and brought my husband a cake with a candle Very sweet and I did not even know they heard me talking to my table. Overall I would highly recommend Tender and I am honestly very surprised that this steak house has received any review that is other than stellar. I dont see it...it s nothing other than amazing delicious steaks!
It s a cute coffee shop in the Kensington Market area. There s a charm around the random array of tables and chairs. I ordered the chai latte and while I did not fancy it too much I still enjoyed the aura of the establishment.
My two and a half year old son has been attending Global Minds for two months now and we could not be happier. We searched and searched for a Mandarin language immersion preschool and we re so glad to have found one in Scottsdale. The moment we stepped through the school doors we knew in our hearts that we found the right place for our son. The children are happy love their passionate and fun teachers and are eager to express what they are learning. My husband and I do not speak Mandarin but wanted an opportunity where we could all learn it together as a family. Global Minds is the real deal. Learning the language through organized activities play and repetition our son is already using words contextually counting and singing Mandarin songs at home. The school director and teachers go through great efforts in helping parents reinforce language skills at home. Our son loves reviewing his Chinese book filled with his projects and pictures with us. We also appreciate the flexibility of the program where students can embark on multiple language tracks including Mandarin Spanish and French. Most importantly Global Minds is a happy nurturing and culturally diverse community that our son has thrived in.
Crepes are not the best but they are quite good and at a reasonable price. I tried two kinds when I visited the nutella strawberry banana and the peach almond I added condensed milk to the peach almond. You can add extra add ons for 50 cents.
Ca not believe there is a health food restaurant in Arizona. Was very good. Happy we went.
THIS IS THE ONLY WYNN REVIEW YOU NEED TO READ So I wanted to make my 100th review special. And nothing is more special and ass kicking than the Wynn Las Vegas. CHECK IN We came in on a Wednesday night and check in was a breeze. We were upgraded to the Tower Suites. The lady was very nice and answered all of our questions. I imagine check in to be more crowded on the weekend but they do a good job of managing the line. THE ROOM The Tower rooms are so awesome and the staff treats you like royalty. The tower has a private elavator front desk and concierege. Oh yeah do not forget the line pass for the buffet. Upon entering the room we saw a grand spacious entry way and floor to ceiling windows. The rooms were large and clean. The bathrooms had 2 sinks shower and bathtub. And no need to bring ANY tolietries....they ve got everything all the regular stuff plus toothbrush and paste shaving cream razor shoe polish cotton balls and swabs mouthwash and more. I loved that the shower products and lotion were fairly large bottles compared to most hotels...so bring em home in the suitcase! The beds are very comfortable and comes with nightly turndown service. They put out slippers and chocolates out for you. Do not forget the HD 42 in. flat screen that you can rotate. I m a total germaphobe and this is the only hotel rooms that I ll touch the phone or walk barefoot around...and that s saying A LOT! haha POOL The tower suites have their own pool that is above the main pool. I love the pool here because there are not many kids at all. You can rent a cabana for around 300 400 a day. My favorite pool was the European Pool only for 21 . Women can go topless but most do not . We only saw a few...and they should not have been topless in the first place. There are day beds and lilly pads available to rent. We opted for a day bed 150 200 which comes with a round bed that reclines an umbrella and all the bottled water you can drink. Diego the pool boy is so awesome and helpful. The lillypads look cool in theory but do not look too comfortable. How do you rent a cabana daybed? Try to call as early as possible. They take you name 30 days in advance. Call the pool at 9 00 on the day you want the reservation and they will tell you if you got it or not. The Wynn has to reserve a lot of them for the players so you may not get one. But if you do it is SOOOO worth it. CASINO The minums can get pretty high at 50 blackjack and 25 craps. But during the day you can easily find 15 minum BJ and 10 craps. The dealers at the Wynn are the nicest in town. Tip em well....do not be a cheap ass. FOOD Mr. Wynn knows how to do restaurants. Anything is good even the buffet. CLUBS Tryst is the main one and Blush is smaller but still cool. The concierege will put you on the guest list if you ask. Altough pricey starting at 450 I highly recommend bottle service because the club gets crowded. So there ya go. Best service you can get hands down. A billion times better than the Bellagio boooo! .
The Half Caesar Salad with Chicken was really good . The sundried tomatoes really give it a nice taste.
Small restaurant with big flavour! Since moving closer to the downtown core I ve been spoiled with the number of food choices. Fresh Off the Boat would be one of my top choices. I ve seen FOB s menu a few times and passed by them on my way to some other food trek but last night was a seafood kinda night. I decided to get take away from FOB since the bf and I were craving fish and chips. We shared Halibut fish and chips 15 a big hit with the bf. He loves halibut I prefer the simpler cod or haddock. There were 2 huge pieces with a side of fries coleslaw lemon and tartar sauce. Lobster Roll 14 huge chunks of lobster and the flavour is amazing Soft shell crab sandwich 16 OMG! You gotta get this... you just gotta! Crispy and super Good. Service was quick and friendly. The place is small a few bench seats and bar seating. It seems pricey but not for good proper seafood. Great flavour and big portions. 5 stars and I m coming back ferrr sherrr!
Good Pizza. And very innovative! Love the Mac and Cheese and Chicken Penne Alfredo! Great Caesar Salad too!
Dr. Minuskin has been very knowledgeable when it came to issues that previous pediatricians seemed dubious about. I never felt rushed when asking questions and he was extra gentle with my toddler. The office has been organized and the front desk is very courteous and professional. There are separate entrances for sick and well kids. Location is super convenient by Boca Park Tivoli Village. We will definitely be coming here from now on!
Really good pizza and outside seating. Ask for the secret menu. You wo not be disappointed!!
Went for a wax because of a Groupon offer. Rio Wax would not even return my call when I called for an appointment because they were closer. It was my first wax of it s kind and I ll be going back. Amanda was friendly and efficient and the room and sheet and towel was clean and neat.
Usually In N Out Burger is one of the first places I visit when I come to LA and so I m pleasantly surprised that there is location here in Phoenix. As a Houstonian we are unfortunately deprived of such a place. Definitely a must visit for any burger enthusiast and their fries are out of this world.
I do not know which to consider the best part of a Virt Honest Craft dining experience the service or the food. Both are 5 star no doubt. My wife s and my last visit Ivan was our server. Like all the servers he is great. I could go on about all the food items like the Charred Octopus called Polpo on the menu the Buratta or the Pork Rib Chop...but I would be saying much the same as all the other 5 star posters sans the recent east coast moaning which sounded like a difficult to satisfy perpetual pouty puss to me or someone who prefers chain food...do us a favor and stay home . PS Ivan informed us Virt will be expanding enhancing their outside dining area in addition to some new things for their associated bed and breakfast called The Bespoke Inn.
Alchemy is amazing !!! They serve breakfast brunch until 3 00 Pm daily! I worked right across the street at Markham Infiniti so this was my go to lunch spot every day! The service impeccable!! No complaints. The food same thing !!! Druel worthy I recommend their matcha latte as pictured below or their chicken and waffles !!! But what s also good on the menu is their spinach and goat cheese salad the house made dressing is my fave!! Or their Florentine eggs Benny . My only issue with Alchemy was their lack of seating space. The place is small and REALLYYY good so often times they re full and there s no where to sit especially for 2 I would usually go alone so I d find somewhere along the window with a stool but even that was sometimes difficult.
Based on mine and my extended families experience Rick runs a quality and trustworthy shop!
Came here for dinner at 6pm on a Saturday night as it was close by to the Phoenix Concert Theatre. From the outside it is hard to spot as it is on the lower story you have to walk down a flight of stairs and there is a black curtain that covers the door. It s a cozy restaurant with seating for around 25 people but we were seated right away as it was not too packed yet. I ordered the Jerk Chicken Pasta while my friend ordered the Jerk Chicken Dinner and we were so impressed. Generous portions of chicken which tasted amazing and the pasta was a creamy buttery cheesy sauce so delicious. The bill came to around 15 person including tax tip and it was definitely worth it we were so full. The waitress we had was very friendly but she left halfway through our meal and service was slower once she was gone with only 2 servers remaining it took a while to get the bill . Will definitely be back to try out their brunch menu!
Sat at the bar and had a delicious romaine salad and artic char. One of the better meals I ve had in awhile and the service was top notch.
This is a very unique sushi place in Vegas. Traditional Japanese sushi house. Great value for 80 Omakase. Very comfortable environment and friendly service. Fish freshness is good although not above the expectation but I think for 80 it s worth the price. Includes my favorite uni ikura and chu toro.
Everytime I m in town I hit this place for curds beer and brats. I spent a whole Sunday watching football here and had a blast. Crowded times are a little annoying but it is a college place. Love the mustard selections too. Curds are a must!
Closer to 3.5 I visited Pizza Rock for lunch at the recommendation of one of the tour guides at the Mob Museum. There s a discount with admission . Its an incredibly spacious restaurant with lots of different pizza options. I ordered the highly recommended margherita pizza and the 3 meatball appetizer. This was WAY more than enough food for one person. I was really pleased with the meatballs. They were tender meaty and swimming in a great red sauce. The pizza was not my favorite. It edge crust had a nice char but the center was slightly underdone and a bit cold . I will preface this by saying the the mozzarella fresh basil and the bright tomato sauce were all perfect. Also I know that this pizza is not meant to be crisp but the center was distinctly uncooked. Being the slob that I am i just cut off the corner of each slice and enjoyed the rest. My server seemed a bit distracted but was prompt and helpful. Overall a good lunch.
If you are looking for a good quality dive shop in near Charlotte this is your place. Good people and a very nice facility including a great pool built for training. I have shops closer to my home but the drive is worth my time. The prices are in line and staff will get you what you really need not what they need to sell . Highly recommend checking OWA out if looking to get certified get equipment serviced or buy new gear.
For those visiting Las Vegas you ll be pleasantly surprised dining here. I went up for the weekend for a bachelorette party and realized that it s not as cheap to eat here as I thought. It was not until our last day in the city that we stumbled upon Hexx. What a modern open and spacious place! You ll love eating here and being able to watch the fountain show across the street at the Bellagio. As this was the last day in Vegas the thought of endless mimosas almost did me in. I chose iced tea instead. As for brunch entrees collectively we had the classic burger French toast omelette and the prime rib sandwich. Not one person had a complaint. We gobbled up just about everything. These portions are HUGE so do not be turned off by the price. The fries are deliciously seasoned and fresh out the frier. I inhaled my burger it was absolutely delicious. Warning it appears to have a thousand island dressing or mayo kethcup . Make sure to clarify which sauce s you want on your burger. After the meal make sure to take your receipt to the chocolate store next door and get yourself something half off!
I unlike others had a very good experience with this firm. Divorce is not cheap I know it feels like the retainer goes quickly but there is lots of cost that goes with these unfortunate cases. I would have found myself in a whirlwind of debt had it not been for this firm and would recommend them highly. They did help me out tremendously in all the paperwork involved and in preparation for settlements.
Really good food. Had the Bryan sandwich split with a friend and cup of brocolli cheese soup each. Order at the counter food delivered to table. Owner stopped by table to make sure everything was ok. Nice touch as mentioned before prices are a little high but food is very fresh unique and tasty!! Not a lot of seating scones looked wonderful gonna have to make another stop to try these.
I meet a group here every other Sunday night and we love it so much we just keep coming back. The patio is really great with a big fire pit and live music. The music is stopping for the next month or so since it is soooo cold but should be back in the spring. Happy hour specials even on the weekend with discounted apps and drinks. They have a really great craft beer selection including nitro beers. The service for the large party is always great which is a bonus! They have trivia on Wednesday nights and I have not been yet but will by trying it out in January. My favorites so far here are the garlic fries fried pickles Murphys draft and nachos. The risotto balls are also good and the fish tacos are good. I really have not had anything bad! But the garlic fries I actually crave during the week! They are that good. They have 3 different varieties of seasoning for the fries as well but I ca not get past trying the garlic ones! Great spot in Gilber and fun atmosphere.
Absolutely love this place. I live close by to the Gainey location and have taken so many people here when I want to show them a good atmosphere for brunch! The food is amazing you ll have a very hard time deciding what you want because it all looks so good! And the Bloody Mary bar is to DIE for. It is a one time purchase so load up and let them teach you how to get the most out of it by using your celery stalk for a pin board for the rest of your food on toothpicks! Trust me best 11 you ll ever spend and I usually hate bloody Mary s . As a Scottsdale food snob I ve been waiting 23 years for a place like this to come to town and I ca not wait to go back.
Been going to Kim Reichardt and I just love her readings! I feel like she picks up on things about me and my situations 100 . She is full of energy and so very easy to talk to. She is quite amazing! Very very intuitive!! You definitely will not be disappointed in fact you ll wish you had more time!!!
Love going to this place. Service is alway great employees are friendly. Pretty clean floors and tables. Fresh vegetables never any empty containers. Like the sauce options and suggestions that they have listed. Always have enough left over to take home. Evenings are pretty busy. Recommend trying this place out.
George Bartender the best is the business. We sat at the bar and had awesome service and the food incredible! Ribeye and mac and cheese off the charts!
This is my new favourite bubble tea place for sure! I think I ve gotten drinks from here at least 5 times the past month. And I do not even live near this place but it s worth the travel. The bubble tea are always so refreshing and I like how they let you customize the ice and sugar quantity of the drinks! The servers are always so patient and pleasant. They seem very in tune with their surroundings with all the tapioca and sago that they make and the customers they have to serve. The drinks are just so good! I have to start their rewards program because I m obsessed!
Roys is one of my favorite places to eat so when we were in Arizona and there was one at the JW Marriott that I was staying in I had to eat there. As always the food was great started with there famous martini the pineapple that they put on it was not very strong did not taste as if it had been soaking in liquor for a while but the drink was still wonderful... Had the fish sampler for dinner I really like the fish with the lobster sauce so I got two of them and two other flavors..
Very clean and organized new vape shop. I love this place because its right down the street from my house. They have a broad selection of juices to choose from and they are also always running deals that I ve seen on facebook and instagram. My first visit I got me the k 100 vape for the cheapest price in town that I ve seen! I ll definitely be visiting this place more. I bought the heavens nectar for 10 and i m planning to get the pink starburst juice next! Yummm!
We ordered a takeout order ready in time specified and got an Italian hoagie and a cheesesteak steak hoagie. Both were superb. The guy running the joint was friendly. What more could a hungry fella ask for? I d definitely return. I m curious about the pizza but the hoagies are a go !
Had breakfast at the Coffee Shop ordered Baby Got Jack and Caprese breakfast sandwiches with coffee. Super fresh great flavor combos. Excellent coffee too. Waitstaff is friendly and accommodating bringing by orders to outside patio tables w a smile. Beautiful garden setting outside you d never guess you were anywhere near Phoenix. We strolled around the community gardens and Barnone space before most vendors were open. Absolutely LOVE the concept of local food community gardens farming and crafts people together. We drove through the quiet planned neighborhood it was immaculate reminiscent of vintage Craftsman style homes w front porches low fences tidy yards. Refreshing to see a recently developed area in the valley that is not Californicated w cracker box anonymous housing tracts. We ll be back to shop the farmers market and try the other restaurants.
We loved it! The rooms are so bright and elegant. The reception area was dim and inviting. Very elegant bar and sitting area ad you enter . The views from our room were amazing.
Rob with City Wide was fantastic! I woke up the other morning and found a little water around the base of the hot water heater and knew that my 10 year old water heater had finally failed. Luckily I caught it before it made too big of a mess! I initially called one of the big plumbing heating and air companies in the valley and scheduled an appointment. While I was waiting for the appointment a coworker told me about City Wide. So when the other company showed up and gave me a quote that shocked me I called City Wide. Stacy gave me a quote over the phone that was well below what the other company quoted. I scheduled it and Rob arrived in a few hours with my new hot water heater. He installed it quickly and professionally without trying to up sell me on a bunch of stuff that I did not need. He took away my old water heater and I paid exactly what was quoted. Rob was professional and friendly I will call City Wide and ask for Rob the next time I have a plumbing problem. Thank you Rob and City Wide!
Came for a sub but left with a grill bowl instead because everyone else around me was getting it. Yes everyone else there s definitely a steady wait for your food at lunch time but I think it s worth it. 8.50 for the lemongrass chicken shrimp and spring roll. I chose the vermicelli over the rice because I thought it went better with the salad. I ll definitely have to come back for the subs.
Great improvements Enjoy the buffet especially at their promo prices and new hours open overnight 24 hours . Tried their breakfast lunch and dinner. All good. Highly recommend
As a middle eastern woman I give them 5 stars on their food .. clean..customer service .. i dont have to wait too long... my daughter loves their food ...I recommend shawerma king for Mediterranean food
Somehow after we moved to Mississauga this Sarvana Bhawan was just a block from our new place so obviously we had to check it out. Come from Madras the birth place of this chain I would say it s the same flavour and taste as back home. It does not mean that s it s a great place to eat out south Indian food around here. There are better options for sure. But if you are looking for good old Sarvana Bhawan taste this one pretty much nails it bang on.
Great service ambience and food. Pizza was delicious. Pizza taste fresh and had a nice crisp to it. Pizookie chocolate chunk with vanilla bean was average. A lot of seating and excellent bar!
Bonne cuisine vietnamienne proposant aussi quelques plats cantonais classiques. Accueil chaleureux et ambiance sympathique. Prix lgrement plus levs que la moyenne pour ce type de cuisine.
Seriously one of the best taco shops in the Las Vegas area. I usually get Carne Asada Tacos with no tomatos not to mention they have Shrimp Ceviche all for a reasonable price.
When my family insisted on adding the Hoover Dam to our Vegas trip I immediately got to researching where to eat on the way of course . There really was only one place to go... The Coffee Cup. It is Triple D famous. And I ve been to a lot of Guy s places that have not been that great but this one is worth the stop for sure. Yes you will probably wait. I strongly recommend going early. But we were there shortly after opening and still a few minutes wait. Go early! By the time we left on a weekday around 9 am there was a long line. But it s a friendly line and the town of Boulder City is a charming place to be. We ordered French Toast comes in 1 2 or full order and omelets a couple of DIY versions and the Cali Omelet . Everything was delivered quickly by our super efficient server. The food was terrific way above your standard breakfast joint. Coffee was never more than half full. And though the place is busy it did not feel like it you could carry on a normal conversation did not feel uncomfortably squeezed in between too many people and we did not feel at all rushed. You should absolutely bookmark this for your any off the Strip journey. Great food and just the right amount of kitsch and sass.
We go here several times a month and love this bar. Bartenders are friendly and the place is clean. We play volleyball and hangout outside or play darts most of the time. We have never had a problem here. I am giving it 5stars but do wish they had more food other than nachos and basic tacos the tacos are pretty decent after a few drinks . I seriously look forward to nights spent at this bar.
We were here tonight and enjoyed it. It s cute and cozy food was good and the service was very friendly. Small place if it gets busy you will wait. We will return.
I am a fan of Nugateau. My history with Nugateau goes way back when they first started their selection fo eclairs at the Saks Food Hall. I love eclairs but I am also very picky. I do not like creamy fluffy fillings because that is just cream and air. Cream goes on sale and air is free. I much prefer the denser thicker consistency of a filling and these pretty ones are like that! They are filled with different flavours so trying a new flavour is always a surprise. Surprisingly they are not overly sweet. They are boarderline sweet with explosions and waves of flavours whether it is blueberry mocha pistachio or cherry blosson. The design of it is beautiful and each looks like a story. I think it is worth every penny and I love trying their new flavours that they always come out with. Nugateau also always has the nicest Sales Associates ever!
Other Yelpers are really down on this Copps and I have no idea why. It s definitely shinier and bigger than the old Pick N Save ever was. It s got a great selection and I suspect that it ll keep up as best it can with the competition now that the new Woodman s has opened up just down the road. Great liquor department they even once offered to order a wine for me that they did not have in stock. Decent size selection of specialty cheeses which are not super special but are fancier than a lot of Midwesterners go for and a pretty decent bulk foods section for when you want 10 lbs. of raw almonds or somesuch. I ve always had good service here.
A small and cozy shop run by a passionate proprietor. I ve been in here shopping a few times and my husband had a whole bike built there so I ve seen how they treat casual browsers and serious riders. Riders of all kinds will appreciate their relaxed but informed approach to selling. It s a friendly and casual place regardless of how much you ride or how much you want to spend. They seem to get that bikes should be fun. They have two main lines of bikes for riding of all kinds and I really appreciate their carefully curated stock of accessories. With four bikes in my household I can spread my bike love around and I m glad this shop is nearby.
I have been to close to 10 self serve yogurt places in the valley and I am very critical. The reason I give this 5 stars is because A. Most creative and best tasting flavors by far I have tried a bunch of places B. Cheapest prices C. Free Water What else do you need?
My wife and I just celebrated our 15th anniversary here! We loved the place! The ambiance was very stunning with its decor and there was a good balance between background music and speaking volume so you did not have to yell at your party. We loved everything we ordered both from the happy hour menu and the regular one. I recommend the Brussels sprouts and kimchi wings as well as the fish tacos! Their Manhattan was superb and the service was on point!! We had a fantastic time and we will definitely come back again.
Friendly atmosphere. Lots of flavors add ins and toppings to choose from...the possibilities are endless!
Mike is experienced talented and thorough. He is into it and he does not let up until he achieves his original goals. Mike treats his clients as if the ate family.
Went here for the first time and loved it. Great atmosphere service massage and price. Will definitely be going back often.
Found Boka randomly one day and has been one of my favorite pizza places since! The servers and friendly. I ve met the owner a couple times and he is joyfully friendly as well! The Pizza is delicious and there are many choices! There is a little wait because they cook in a brick in an oven but it s well worth the wait! Also they have great prices on beer! So grab a beer while you wait for your pizza to cook and hang out! Love this place!
Happy hour value is exquisite! 5 Moscow mules that were amazing! Great sushi rolls and the baked mussels were fantastic. Overall 5 stars for the food and drinks. Wish I could give ten stars for service... Christy is knowledgeable friendly and very attentive. We could not ask for a better experience!
Delicious dolsot bim bim bap and decent selection of panchan they have most of the standard type you will find at a Korean restaurant kimchee bean sprouts etc . The bim bim bap had a very wide selection of veggies in it neatly and beautifully arranged with the marinated beef and a raw egg in the middle. The hot stone bowl it was served in helped to crisp up the rice along the sides which added a very nice texture to the rest of the dish. I d like to come here again to try out their soups and maybe some bbq.
from scheduling by phone and till checkout the receptionist are very helpful. I used to request for lakisha but since she s not available on monday tuesday the receptionist suggested ebony and both ebony and lakisha are the best therapist i had so far from massage envy.
I ve found the best pizza in Cleveland right here!!! Combining the Neapolitan style of Crostada s with the helpful and passionate staff of Sweet Basil Biga excels in all areas. Most impressive of all being the pizza. There are so many things right with this place. The fact that it is about a 40 minute drive east did not deter these West Siders from getting there within minutes of opening 5pm yesterday. We d called ahead they take phone reservations via voicemail and will call back to confirm highly recommend you do this and they had our cute table of four waiting for us complete with high chair and two Etch a Sketches for the kids to play with. Having read the reviews we started off with the bread sticks. I could have made a meal of these alone. The bread was wonderful like an Italian version of Naan but even better and the parmesan cheese and bright flavorful tomato sauce made it sing. We also shared a salad of local greens I think that was actually the name of the salad too . Very good with fresh lettuce right from their own garden. On the menu by the way an asterisk indicates which ingredients are grown right there in Biga s backyard. For the pizza we tried three the Margherita because it s my favorite the Spicy Pepperoni and a seasonal white pie with bacon and asparagus. Holy hell...this was possibly one of the best selections of pizza I ve ever eaten. The crust was from another planet. Unlike Crostata s which falls a little limp and thin in the middle of the pie Biga s was sturdy yet chewy throughout. It passed the fold test yet you did not really want to fold it because the aromatic flavors and textures more easily wafted to your nose if you left it open. For dessert how could we not? we opted for the donuts which were reminiscent of zeppoles from Italian street fairs yet cut into thick strips served with warm Nutella for dipping. Needless to say we did not leave any of those over although we definitely could have there were enough donuts on that plate to feed the entire restaurant . The funny thing is that even after feasting for an hour on all this delicious food we did not feel sick or stuffed on our way out. Perhaps it was because we boxed a good amount of pizza to go but I ca not help but think it s also due to the light fresh ingredients that do not have added grease or sugar. Knowing it was BYOB we saved a bundle on not buying drinks and instead enjoyed our own beer in the chilled glasses they provided. And the bill came to just under 100 including a generous tip not bad for a family of four yes even the baby ate pizza and breadsticks! . If you re in the Kirtland area or even if you re not pay a visit to Biga. You will not be sorry!!!
I will always like the original one better than this one ..but it is a great Toronto staple and neighborhood spot. Food is consistent. Excellent portions and delicious.
Love this place. Baristas are very friendly and pay attention. They do not roll their eyes when I get pour overs. It s always super busy these days but they re fast and friendly. Pretty much all I ask for.
This was our first nicer dinner when we came to visit. Guess we just got a slow start! Everyone we encountered was very pleasant and accommodating. I was soon mesmerized by the way one of the chefs created the labneh well in the beet and crispy baby artichoke dishes. I eventually worked up the courage to ask his permission to take a Boomerang. He kindly obliged. To start we ordered the beets the steak tartare manti dumplings and Spanish octopus. Though they pretty much put their dukkah on everything it was delicious and I did not mind it one bit. The steak tartare and the octopus were my two favorite starters. The steak tartare was one of the best I ve had. For the mains we ordered the crispy duck confit rice short rib kebab whole branzino along with a side of the seared cauliflower. To be honest we were not HUGE fans of the entrees. The appetizers were to us more impressive. Also our server had mentioned she would course everything out for us so that not everything came at once. But when ALL our entrees came at once and I commented to her all she said was Yep they re all here! The crispy duck confit rice was pretty heavy on what tasted like star anise but I really enjoy the texture. The short rib for whatever reason came lukewarm. I took food photos but I m generally a one and done type photographer not high caliber so it does not explain why the short rib was already lukewarm by the time we dug in. The fish was ok...somewhat on the fishy side...but the saffron sauce which I was apprehensive about ended up saving the dish. Dessert was another highlight of the evening. The pavlova was a foregone conclusion due to the theatrics of cracking it open but it ended up being supremely tasty as well. First meringue I ve had that was tangy and not cloyingly sweet. We also got the baklava which we had totally discounted thinking it was heavy. On recommendation from our server though we decided to give it a go. It was amazingly light and delicious as well. Overall a good meal...and I would probably come back if we were ever in town again hopefully ...but I would probably cobble together dinner from among the appetizer section or try other entrees.
I have never used a personal trainer before I signed up at UGF. I am so happy I did! I always did Group Training classes at my gym. I work out with Chad and Mark and they are both fantastic and so knowledgeable. They push me and encourage me every time I work out with them They have also taught me a lot about nutrition. I am thrilled they opened in the Grayhawk shopping center!
Was a little skeptical paying over 10 for a single pie but ended up loving the Pie Commission. I tried the rib pie and steak cheese pie. Both were amazing and filling. I personally preferred steak and cheese. Unfortunately for the price I ca not eat here often but will be going back one day.
The veggie dream crepe was good for a quick and light lunch. Stuffed with sauteed mushrooms spinach red onions and asparagus with cheddar Swiss and Gruyere cheeses. The savoury crepes are served with a mixed field green salad. Having an appointment near by my order came out quickly and I liked how the vegetables were warm and nicely cooked.
The store is huge with so many beautiful choices of dresses. I provided my budget and Rita really helped me stick to it not just by finding the right dresses but by being open to bargaining I was getting off the rack since my wedding was in a few weeks. I ended up buying my dress here after scouring the GTA. Really great service from Rita make sure you get her to help you The only downside is their in house alterations were atrociously priced. How can you charge 100 just to steam a dress?!
This little Asian sandwich shop was definitely not was I was expecting. I thought the whole concept was very cool. I ordered a chicken sandwich and chicken wings. The sandwich had pretty good flavor and the wings were very fresh and crispy. But the huge star was most certainly the fresh cooked French bread! That was amazing!!! Service was mediocre but otherwise very good visit.
A former coworker wanted to meet up for lunch and he decided on here. Ive worked downtown for 4 years and I ve never even heard of this spot. It was exciting to finally hit up a new place for lunch! This diner reminded me of Tic Toc cafe in Macys only better food and better service . There are booths tables and even a counter to dine at. They also offer takeout. Its your basic soup sandwiches salads and wraps.They had a pretty decent menu and even offered some daily specials. Our server was very kind and took good care of us. My dining partner went with the special which was a turkey club on croisant It came with a side of chips and a side of fruit. I went with a turkey club wrap and added and order of fries. Everything in my wrap tasted fresh and i also enjoyed the steak cut fries. The wrap was grilled and I enjoyed it. Sadly i will no longer be working downtown after Friday. I m upset that I just found out about this place. If you re like me and looking for a new place to grab something stop here. Its nothing fancy but hey its a diner downtown. It s better than eating at Chipotle 4x a week. lol
Pretty good Mucho pretty damn good Mucho! One of the best fast food burrito places I have been to. Trumps that certain place named after a certain smoke dried jalapeno. When you arrive you re welcomed to a stainless steel display case red paint light wood on chairs and walls stainless steel table tops plasma televisions plenty of pot lights and plenty of natural light. What makes this place great is how they grill the burrito after assembly much like the burrito place that is popular with the after club crowd you know the one evvveerryyone talks about located on Adelaide. The chicken tastes slightly smokey but sweet. You pick your own toppings to go in and they are also delicious. The rice has a hint of silantro beans are tender but not mushy vegitables are crispy but flavorful and they offer diced jalapenos! These diced jalapenos elevate the flavors of the burrito to levels unimaginable. Their spicy sauce is actually spicy which is a nice change. Portions here are very big. The medium sized burrito is the same size as larges elsewhere. Combos come with a drink and either chips cookies or a cinnamon roll. Beer is also served of the Corona or Dos Equis brand. Overall this place has great bang for buck and is the best tasting fast food burrito yet. The grilling to finish it off really does the trick and service is quick and friendly.
This was my first visit to this restaurant. Great modern looks and a pleasant atmosphere with plenty of seats. Very clean. I had the spicy sausage and onion sandwich for lunch. The portion was more than I expected. This was a pretty large sandwich with a full sausage sliced up from what I can tell. It was nice and spicy but most importantly delicious! I usually eat more than one sandwich but I was stuffed and happy after this one. I would definitely recommend stopping by if you are in the area.
Dangerously good! These are real milkshakes for sure!!!! My sister told me to get the red velvet with Oreo milkshake and OMG!! And the prices are so reasonable. I only wish there was one closer to where I live
Light is by far the best club to go to! My absolute favorite. At one point I came every week. Unfortunately there s a thing called WORK that I have to tend to. BTW my cell service sucks here so HOPEFULLY you can find your friends! On a busy weekend I can tell you that it becomes hectic and things just get a little messy. But honestly what club does not ? Let me tell you what is the best about this club. First of all by far the most important the performers! The lights on the ceiling and all the performers in the background its just a different experience. The hosts and the promoters for Light have been the best I ve had to deal with. I can say just about every single one that I ve met has always been kind to me and I feel like i m a friend not just a client. MUSIC EDM if you do not like EDM do not come here. Strictly EDM unless there is a specialized DJ playing something else. DANCE FLOOR So since i m only about 5 tall I m often stepped on pushed and trampled on. I m not sure if its the crowd or just how the dance floor has 3 sides of entry making it easy to get in and out of but I have yet to have any problems with the dance floor! Although I do recall that one time a bouncer crushed my toes because he was running after someone... but that did not happen on the dance floor... ANYWAYS JUST GO!
Great food great service recommend the chicken fried steak! Worth the wait. This will be on my to go list next time we re in Vegas
This is truly ono OHANA food. My OHANA and I eat here alot. A true locals establishment. One thing I will warn you about the food portions are huge. Wear your most comfortable clothes cause when you pau eating your tummy is gonna smile. Aloha
I took a group of 10 college students to Ascend this afternoon and they loved it. None of them were experienced climbers but they all had fun. They appreciated the choose your own adventure approach. As someone who has visited other climbing venues in the Pittsburgh area I honestly thought this was one of the better ones. Friendly staff very accommodating. I loved the bright and vibrant feel to Ascend. It s nice big and open. On the first visit everyone gets free climbing shoe rentals and chalk. We also got the 10 college student discount. I love that it feels like a gym. More than just climbing. Ping pong table fitness machines snack bar kitchenette area etc.
I recently rolled away in a 2011 Sonata. No pressure sales excellent customer service and I this car exceeds my expectations. If you re shopping around for a new Hyundai ask for John at the the Hendo location. He ll take good care of you for sure!
The food there was excellent and the staff was great highly recommended if your ever in Las Vegas check them out
Just relocated to the Central Phoenix area and had to find a new eye doctor. As I always do I checked with Yelp and this office got high marks. I saw Dr. Mastores and she was great...very thorough. In fact it s the best eye exam I ve ever had! I was seen immediately and did not have to wait. This is a huge plus in my book. I am very happy I have found a competent eye provider. I always use Yelp to find my doctors dentists etc and so far I have not been disappointed. I highly recommend Dr. Mastores and all the staff at Central Phoenix Eye Care.
The Kalbi short ribs were awesome... Their sweet potato pancake was delicious. The BBQ beef not so exciting. Was sort of dry and tough to chew. Otherwise this is a cool little Hawaiian restaurant in Vegas. Would come again for breakfast or short ribs.
I went to Beckett s Table for my birthday dinner and I m a huge deviled egg fan so when I saw those...deep fried...on their appetizer menu I knew I came to the right place. They were delicious!! Not only is the food divine but the atmosphere is welcoming and the service was great. They use fresh ingredients and have a rotating menu to serve what s in season. The only thing that was not as good as I had hoped was the dessert. It was still good but it did not live up to the tastiness of the appetizers and main dishes.
My boyfriend I saw this place on Markham road and 14th Avenue when we saw this place it was being built and he already had interest in dining there. So we finally did when you go in its a small place with 2 floors. The bottom floor serves as a place where you can order their menu is with chicken and side dishes. I believe the place is Latin anyways we got a combo it s in the picture . For what we ordered service and the taste it was well worth it. The service was quick and the man was super friendly. Usually in restaurants you re supposed to give tips but since you pay first and you go to the second level of the restaurant to wait for your food you do not have to. I really enjoyed my first time dining here it was different from other restaurants and I m looking forward to coming back. Oh yeah the combo was only 25 including tax. It s cheaper than swiss chalet and filled both of us up.
Delicious! Great services! Always a great place to meet up with friends! Food is fabulous! Thanks
A friend of mine who has been living in Vegas for the past several years introduced me to this spot my recent visit here. Had never tried Korean BBQ prior and was pleasantly surprised of how much I like it. We had so much to eat from brisket to ribs to cucumber in some kind of sauce to flank steak to salad to cow tongue which I had never tried before but did here and actually kinda liked. Was a different kind of experience that I enjoyed. Definitely the kind of spot you d have to go to with a date or group of friends to really enjoy it. Might have her take me again next time I m in Vegas.
For a quick stop in between appointments I was pleased to find that it was clean service was friendly and prompt and that the calories were listed on the menu. Pleasantly surprised that the Sante Fe chicken was not too bad and tasted good.
Love this pharmacy and the owners. Honest and good people. Plus they saved me so much money with my Prescription especially for my dogs. Much better than Walmart! They have such great customer service. Highly recommend them.!!
AWESOME! Excellent in every way. We are resident managers for a loa local cal RV storage facility and about a month ago our A C broke. Well June in Arizona is not a place you want to exist in without A C for even a little while. We needed a place close to us that would accomodate us as well as our 3 dogs until it could be fixed. We called a couple of places that were dog friendly but most had outrageous deposits and weight restrictions. Grrr!!! We called Windmill and not only did they not require a deposit for the pooches but they did not care that they were also quite big. Best of all they were reasonably priced. This story got even better when we arrived. The front desk staff was super friendly and helpful. The rooms were great. They are actual suites as the bedroom is a separate room that can be closed off. The beds were SUPER comfy! King sized beds with white down comforters and it came complete wiht extra down pillows right from the get go! To boot the bed was clean you hear horror stories. They have room service for breakfast which is really just muffins and the like but still its enough to get you up and going in the morning. We enjoyed the place so much we are going back just to get away from the house for a night.
Great atmosphere friendly staff and best vanilla latte and iced dirty chai you ll find in town. I also really love their breakfast sandwich with bacon delicious and you get what you pay for! Nice live music on weekends too
Asia has been working with me as a Make up artist for several years on beauty and fashion shoots. She always collaborates well on concept for the shoots. She works well with talent and is not only fun but incredibly professional at the same time. Without a doubt Asia is a master and highly skilled in product knowledge. I have witness her talk about products to myself and talent in my studio on set and also watched her in action during her regular on screen appearances. I am proud to have Asia as part of my creative team and hope to work together again in the future.
Fuk U fuk n amazing. I use to get excited to see the food truck and I would stop every time regardless if I was hungry or not. The food is unique and delicious. If you have not already tried it highly recommend.
We have heard nothing but lovely things about the black big and had not yet had an opportunity to go. So for my husbands birthday we decided to check it out and we were not disappointed. I did the three course tasting menu and my husband did the pasta tasting. Each of our courses were delicious with the highlights being the hangar steak and the gnocchi. We also really enjoyed the cacio e peppe and the butterscotch pudding. Service was casual but efficient. We ordered cocktails from the bar which were delicious beers were a bit pricey for the selection. I would definitely recommend for a casual dinner or a low key celebration meal.
Saigon is one of my favorite little restaurants. First of all the owner is the best part of this place. He s totally personable and really loves getting to know customers. I never feel unwelcome here. Second the food is solid. I ve yet to have anything here that is not properly prepared and promptly served. For this past visit restaurant week the husband and I had the spring rolls so fresh! and beef satay spicy beef cooked to perfection! and ga xao gung sauteed chicken breast fresh scallion strips and ginger . The chicken was kind of plain compared to the beef but still delicious. We each had a glass of wine and shared a piece of cheesecake for dessert. That s a lot of food for 30 bucks but the best part is Saigon is ALWAYS reasonable. This is my go to place for inexpensive fresh somewhat healthy fare. I love Saigon!
There s shockingly a lot of bad reviews on here. Looks like mostly service to which I would reply we rarely see a new face. The staff is not very large it s just not that big of a business yet so I guess in lieu of what other s are saying go on a night you have some spare patience. Or maybe a good conversation to preoccupy you in case you do not get the fabulous service I m always afforded when I go. We regularly frequent this place James the bartender is wonderful food is ALWAYS killer and they have a nice selection of beers. I m not the biggest fan of their brewing but honestly its an over saturated market so I m a fan of any place with something unique on tap And they do not overstock IPAs a near impossibility to find these days . I could rave for days about this place it s by far my favorite brewery in the valley!
Skin issues? Yeah me too. You ll love Liz. She s takes the time to get to know your skin care routine and puts a ton of TLC into her facials. She has all the bells and whistles to give you a primo pampering. Your pores will thank you. I recommend the derma planing. My face feels so smooth and clean I forget to wash my face the following day before bed. It s hard not to keep touching my face. I walk away with my skin feeling 10 years younger too bad it does not work on livers. And I love the hand and scalp massage. I spend all day on a key board so hand massages are a fabulous treat. Have you ever met someone who loves what they do? Liz very clearly loves what she does and it reflects in her work. Go see Liz. It ll be the best decision you ve made since you realized you re old enough for grown up skin care routines.
Pleasantly surprised! The staff here makes you want to keep coming back. They are very friendly and attentive. It s not very busy most days so parking is a breeze. It makes up for all the construction on 19th ave. the red curry and pumpkin dishes are quite the treat and a guilt free option. We also tried crab puffs that have plenty of meat and not just cream cheese. This place is a great hidden little gem!
I come here every week. They consistently make incredible sushi flavor quality of fish the ingredients used. It s clear they re putting an amazing amount of effort. The sushi chefs are attentive open to experimenting with ingredients and variations on the rolls in the menu. The wait staff is very friendly and proactive.
200th review!!!!!!!!!!! Friend and I were headed out to paint the town red and run amuck and we met up with some other friends in north phoenix down at the Whisky River now I have never been and let s just say I m more of an RNB kinda girl but with that said I did find myself having fun no cover charge before 9 and well drinks 50cents till 11 now this place is alright with me! haha People were friendly bartenders and staff were nice and dance floor was wooden and round had folks dancing and having a good time. I m going to be honest I dug the 50cent drinks drank me some whiskey and coke all night long well at least to 11. Had a great group of girlfriends and just a great time! Is not it funny how once you start drinking someone in the group says Hey lets go somewhere else and see what s up! I know the DD s that night got some miles on their car LOL so we went off to our next spot!
Heard this was voted the best Thai in Pittsburgh so I had to come check it out. It definitely lived up to that name! I ended up coming twice in about a month. I got the sweet and sour tofu the first time and the broccoli with tofu the second time. I had a very nice waitress that had a list of everything on the menu that was vegan and she was very helpful. My family that is not vegan also really enjoyed their meals. I ll definitely be coming back to try more items that are vegan on the menu!
Indulgence is such a welcoming salon everyone I have ever met who works there is friendly and fun to talk to. I have been going to Tawyna for over 4 years and not once have I left unsatisfied! She always does her best to make sure that you are comfortable while she does your nails and always has great new ideas for stylish toes. Ask her for the stained glass it s my favorite or the piggies she ll put googly eyes on them! . I have been going to Lindsay M. for waxing for the past year or so and she is the best. Such a nice bubbly girl I never hurt as much when I go to Lindsay because we are always laughing! She does an excellent job on shaping my eyebrows and makes quick work of even the hairiest areas.
Love this place. Not from Arizona and so nice to find a vegan restaurant while on vacay. The orange soy chicken is a must!
It was the lifetime dinning. The atmosphere interior service were just exceptionally amazing. We picked the 11th courses dinning that consider to be the most signature pre fix menu 9 courses and 2 deserts 495 per person . The presentation and the flavor a were killing the same as sommelier assistance. I never had eaten so many delicacy at the same time like foie gras shaved and crispy black truffles black caviar truffled langoustine ravioli lobster in green curry chestnut cream gold leaf etc... The price was reasonable in evaluation of the Joel Robuchon brand food service venue and experience. I d say that this restaurant number 2 after Le Luis XV Monte Carlo Monaco and number one before Le Jules Verne Paris France. However there are other option for the dinning with 7 courses 295 5 courses 195 175 2 courses 150 125 pre fix menus per person. The dinning approximately takes from 2.5 to 3.5 hours.
Showed up without any appointment and less then 30 min I was out the door.!! These guys know what there doing without a doubt!!
Fries and ice cream ... Homemade and great ... Awesome concept
I went to their East Coast Swing dance with a friend today and it was super fun! My first private and group dance lesson here was couple of weeks ago and it went well. The instructors Jonathan Armando and Martin are very knowledgeable personable and make learning to dance pretty fun. The atmosphere is warm and friendly as well. They have everything from Salsa Country Two Step Belly dancing to East Coast Swing. They also have weekly practice dance parties beginner classes everyday regional and nationaldances etc. You do not need a partner to attend. The instructors take a personal interest and work to understand what your goals are so they can customize your schedule. You will feel very welcomed and meet people from all ages and ability.
Do not come to this place until you ve thoroughly slept in that morning. As for the food homemade whipped cream and Nutella is a must followed up with the savory kale lentil bacon fried egg crepe. Also it s vitally important to bring laptops but not use them.
The pork belly is fantastic! Five stars for the food. It s a bit pricey for noodles but the quality is there and I keep coming back especially now they have the air conditioning working again.
I shop here sometimes and it s a very busy market but everything is fresh. My favorite thing to get here is the fresh corn tortillas they make.
Absolutely love this location! I work in the same complex so I I here about 5 times a week. On top of the subs being tasty the staff is super friendly and welcoming. They even greet me by name and have my order memorized! 5 stars all around
Decided to get take out and was very impressed by the presentation. 15 min drive home and the food was still hot. Definitely coming here again. Try the red bean bubble tea....delicious! The food is simply amazing.
Chuppa s is a great place for fresh meat and veggies. They serve up some burgers and dogs in the summer months out on their very own grill. The reason Chuppa s is so good is that they had a booth at the West Side Market for years. They simply branched out into a store in Parma on Pearl Rd. We love their huge fresh seasoned hamburger patties. Best burgers you can buy to toss on the grill in the summertime! They also have a very good selection of produce. This market is located very close to home and is therefore very convenient. They randomly have a large selection of chocolates and candies. Great stuff!
I went on a double date for date night using the groupon we all had purchased. None of us were really sure what to expect but we were excited. We called and made a reservation for 4 at 6 30. When we got there we had our own table set up and it was only us and one other couple for the night. Sandy the owner was super helpful and friendly. She explained how everything worked to us. Over the course of the evening she would come back to refill our water and give us little tips. The BYOB aspect of the evening was great as we were able to enjoy some wine and some cider we had bought around the corner at Arsenal. I found myself feeling great near the end of painting my piece! I picked out a small tray and my boyfriend picked out a dwarf. There were plenty of different pieces to pick in a variety of price ranges. Maybe someday I ll save up for one of those 60 salad bowls! After we left our pottery to fire we were told we d get a call to pick it up within the week. A few days later we learned our pottery was ready. I have not seen mine yet as my friend picked it up for me but I m sure it turned out great!
Nari did an amazing job on my eyebrows. Very sweet and gave me information on what she did with my eyebrows and other things I could do to improve them. Very happy she opened this place super close to home. I will definitely be back even considering the tinting that she offers.
Its my favorite sushi place for the past 4 years. Me and my friends and families go there at least once a week. We love the happy hour the food is excellent fast service polite servers food runners....AAA
Always clean. Good staff. Good selection but the aisles do not make sense with the way it s set up. Certain things should only be on the same aisle with certain things. But at the same time I understand why it s set up that way. Things can be hard to find but the products are great. The fruit section is well maintained and always fresh.
Can I say that the food was good. That was a a different take on traditional foods. It reminded me of a place in Vegas. If you go try the Curd. They stayed open for us too. Customer service. Bam.
Not bad Gyro Bar not bad at all... Full disclosure I have not stepped foot in this place but rather had it brought to my couch courtesy of UberEats. I got a chicken wrap and a pork wrap and they were both stuffed with delicious sauce and french fries. Whaaaaat? Delicious.
Andrea s coconut cream pie is lovely. This is topped with a pillow of whipped cream and a generous heap of toasted shredded coconut folded into the dessert. Such a heavenly flavour. Makes me want to go on a Coconut Cream Pie Quest D
Wine glass in hand and amazing conversation that took us late into the evening I relished the experience of relaxing on their patio with dem Christmas lights strung over a majestic oak tree with the scent of perfectly BBQ d Argentinian steak wafting from their open concept kitchen. Ca not wait to bring back a party size of 4 6 on a hazy summer night or a cozy wintry evening to try their large format family style dining I do not know if this is actually an oak tree but the image of one and the sound of oak tree sounds nice
A while back my wife and I were rear ended at a red light by a texting teen. The damage to the vehicle a brand new car we d had for less than two months was just a tick under irreparable frame damage while the injuries to she and myself obviously took a while to fully reveal themselves. Helping through every step of the process were Shaun Muaina and his assistant Rosie of Henness and Haight. They came highly recommended were well reviewed and extremely helpful from the start. We had questions they found answers and in an appropriate fashion even when the answers bordered on Insurance absurd. I ve heard many a horror story but luckily only had to live part of one as much of the unknown was enlightened for us. Though I hope you never find yourself in need of there services I do recommend them. Thanks again to Shaun and Rosie.
If you re here you re eating healthy. Depending on who s working sometimes the food can take forever to get to you.
Joe Service King was my advisor. He was terrific kept in constant contact with me either my text or a phone call. The work done on my car is exceptional. You ca not even tell my car was rear ended with 4 100 worth of damage. They matched the paint up perfectly. I was pleasantly surprised to find they had even vacuumed the inside of my car and topped off the gas tank. I only wish the repairs could have been done quicker. My car was in the shop for 15 days. However I would much rather they take the time to do the repairs correctly rather than do a rush job and skimp on the quality of their work. I would absolutely recommend Service King the next time some idiot rear ends you while at a complete stop at a red light.
Been here for dinner and really liked the food. Been in now for a few lunch specials and they re great. Quesadilla is so big it s enough for two. Good service polite staff. Lunch specials about 10 bucks.
Brought my scooter into the store for an oil change and some new tires. The service guys hooked me up and had me back on the road in just a few hours! I ve been to other import shops around town and feel like because I m a grown man riding a scooter they have not taken me seriously. From the moment I walked in the staff was welcoming and super funny!!! Talk about a bunch of down to earth humble guys. I recommend everyone looking to have their metric bike quad side by side water craft and scooter serviced check out this dealership!!! Ride safe!!!
Very happy with Sure Guard. Called on Friday received a quote on Saturday and fence was completely installed by the end of the following week. Pricing was very competitive and the owners Owen and Cooper were knowledgeable and helpful. I would highly recommend this company.
Large portions great take out and delivery service. Love the Kung Pao and the S and S Chicken.
If you re having trouble finding this restaurant amid your Fremont Street adventures you ll know you ve arrived if you see a huge Praying Mantis robot spewing flames to the beat of loud music. We found the restaurant and sat outside along the sidewalk where sketchiness seems to reign. I was half expecting to get stabbed or assaulted from behind but thankfully I did not experience that sort of rudeness. I m also thankful for the dishes I tried including the Gobi Manchurian 10 and Butter Chicken Curry Pot 18 . Feel free to check out their menu for details but suffice it to say that both dishes were very delicious nicely spiced at medium and large enough to share. Go for the food people watching and that giant mechanical bug located across the street.
Just went back last week to get some crazy man on chicken love. The recent shout out on Anthony Bourdain s the Layover Montreal episode was well deserved but will likely make it harder to get a seat going forward. Damn.
Definitely deserving of a 5 start rating. This place is beautiful with excellent service and an impressive menu! I m happy. I really wanted to love this place because it s so close to home. I m from Cali and know my Mexican and am located within Asian cuisine. Now if you know me you know my favorite is Asian cuisine so I m not complaining on that part but it lacks for other taste. I m happy to find a full Mexican restaurant near me! The meal was very good! Salas is delicious and chips are freshly made. I love how colorful this place is with beautiful murals everywhere! I had the polo de creme and he ordered burrito Verde. Both are excellent and I recommend both! Our waiter was a doll! Great service and definitely will be returning! Happy hour Monday Thursday 2pm 6pm and 9pm close.
Who knew you could get good nosh in Vegas? The bagels are so soft and lovely on the inside and crispy with fresh toppings on the outside! The super egg and onion looked so good...must get that next time! The homemade corned beef is phenomenal on a Reuben ask for it on marbled rye...you wo not be disappointed . The coleslaw is outstanding and their new pickles are so scrumptious I could ve eaten a dozen. Loved all the videos of how they prepare babka potato latkes knish and bread....I will definitely be back next time I m in town!
I had the best experience with Julie at the Bankers Hall location yesterday! I ve been struggling to find a stylist who understands my fine thin hair. My first impression was the lovely friendly gentleman at the front desk. He greeted me right away and showed me the waiting area and offered me something to drink. They also have free wifi which is awesome! Julie sat me down and chatted about what i wanted for my hair and any concerns or challenges I had with it. She understood exactly what I wanted and made a couple suggestions to make styling easier. The shampoo and head massage were heavenly! The head massage is almost the best part! As she was cutting my hair the conversation was easy and pleasant and she explained as she went. I loved the haircut it s much easier to style and I do not have to rely on a straightener which is amazing. I made sure to book back in to see her as she is a busy girl! I also love that they have online booking and will email to confirm your appointment. I ca not wait to go back!!!
Just tied this place for the first time. I have seen it on my way to Costco several times. Well it is fantastic. It s like subway for pizza. Pick your size and pick you toppings. Nothing to pay extra on for more toppings. Very friendly staff and warm inviting culture. Make plans to stop by this place next time you in the neighborhood.
The cheese crisps veggie tacos and margaritas are awesome all in a cool youngish hip restaurant. I did not really care for the queso but everything else is great. I highly recommend the place for food and atmosphere.
We ve been wanting to get a nice saltwater setup ever since we first moved here. Been to a couple other aquatic specialty shops but none of them were as well maintained as this place. For freshwater they had a decent selection of live plants as well as fish and some amphibians . There were no signs of algae or dead sick fish in any of the tanks. All of the saltwater fish and invertebrates looked healthy too. Best collection of living rock that I ve seen in Vegas. Wayne was pretty helpful in answering questions and reassuring us that a marine setup is not as difficult as most people think. He was pretty knowledgeable in species compatibility as well as group and individual behavior of certain fish. I thought I knew a lot about fish but his knowledge eclipses mine! He even took the time to explain the available biological filtration systems. Once again I m impressed at the cleanliness of the shop. Also they had a beautiful shark stingray tank set up in the back. We left without buying anything this time but at least got some good ideas for future purchases.
I would definitely recommend Ace Law Group to all my friends and family for sure! I got a traffic ticket and they took care of it very efficiently. Stress worry free! Quick and easy. Awesome people to work with. Mr. Kang and Su made everything so easy. I would definitely use their service again. Hopefully not too often tho.
I would give this place 6 stars for the beer and 3 for the food we had thus the 4. BUT my wife and I went back for drinks a second night. The place has a great selection of craft beers. The bartender gave some good suggestions and I ended up with a nice flight the first night . All the flavors I had were wonderful. The cheese and meat plate we ordered was just OK but I felt bad as we left a lot of the toppings on the plate. They needed to add more bread crackers and make it bread that is not so hard. The second night we went back we sat at the bar and split a pulled pork. The sandwich was much better this night. The best was learning about a new brew available Redrum and meeting the brewer himself. In fact I enjoyed it I bought a 6 pack and now have it at home. The beer the staff and the people could easily make this a local hangout for me if I lived in the area. I feel they are just shy of 5 stars due to the food. I would be there nightly having another flavor or two. They have live music too. I wish they did not pipe it in so loud in to the main area so conversations did not have to be yelling matches. If you want the music louder just go upstairs. Leave it as background for the main bar area. If I lived there I would easily say I ll be back soon !
So much fun!!! We had an amazing dinner with our group of 11. The music was great the host and servers were super energetic and fun great for pregaming and starting the night out right I ca not even decide what was my favorite dish the Honey Bread was sweet creamy crunchy and cold the black cod was teriyaki garlic y and perfect! We also had edamame and more rolls than I can tell you about. Great place great food great energy!
Absolutely superb! My husband and I normally go to Flemings on special occasions only. Reason quite frankly is the prices. When we come here its normally 200 and up.Which we do not mind paying for on special occasions! But tonight was different. I had received an email from Flemings advertising their Sunday Prime Rib Dinner Special. I had mentioned it to my husband and even he was skeptical about the price and what you get for it. We decided to try it. I made reservations and when we arrived they were running behind so we sat at the bar and had drinks. My cocktail was amazing just right! It was during happy hour and the bartender did not skimp on quality or taste! She was also very friendly! In fact everyone at Flemings is very friendly and attentive from the hostess to the bust boys! We had an amazing dinner and at 29.95 per person you really ca not beat it! Deals like this will make us go back to Flemings just because and not just for special occasions!
Lewis is the best part about this place!! Talk about a manager that takes pride in his work! I had lunch here today and they were slammed. I have never been to a place and seen such hard work and care for his customers in my life. He went above and beyond today and he deserves a major raise if he has not been given one already! Hats off to you! oh food was delicious as usual!
Delicious gluten free pancakes! One of my favorite brunch places. Friendly courteous staff. Always packed so allow a good amount of time to be seated.
I was looking for something to do on family day and found this place. Its run by the toronto parks . Free entry Free parking. Good for a stroll to enjoy nature while everything outside is covered by snow. Do not forget to say hello to Angel the Aussie cockatoo. If he is of the mood you will be rewarded by a hello back as well as a dance.
I wo not lie I was incredibly nervous about this bakery after reading the online reviews and realizing that the front desk person only spoke Spanish. They were the vendor used by my wedding venue however so I gave them a chance. And I m so happy that I did! My cake turned out better than I could have imagined. I m still getting compliments about it 3 weeks after my wedding. They designed the cake exactly how I wanted and it tasted amazing! I would definitely be willing to use this bakery again. I would give 5 stars but having to have someone come with me to translate was inconvenient. Other than that I highly recommend them!!
This place is awesome! Everything we ate was delicious. The burger was great. The mac n cheese was terrific. And they have fresh cut fries. Add a ton of beer options and you have the making of the best place around Pittsburgh.
We absolutely love My Gym Henderson! We have been coming for almost a year and the coaches are the best. Coach Sabrina and Coach Alex have been with us since day 1 and it s always a fun filled class with them. The classes are different every week. The play sets are changed on a weekly basis so it feels like we are going to a new gym every week! We love the diverse weekly classes and skill sets no two classes are the same. We live in Spring Valley and believe me it s worth the drive!
I got stuck in downtown Calgary for two days after my plane broke. The airline could not get me out on another flight and had to put me up at the Westin. It was a snowy couple of days and how fortuitous it was to have The Keg attached to the hotel. At lunchtime my girl had a delicious cream of mushroom soup and it was full of different hearty mushrooms. I had the iceberg wedge salad and it was good too. We shared a prime rib burger with avocado and the flavor was remarkable. It was our six month anniversary and we mentioned that to our friendly server. He offered us some complimentary champagne but we both politely declined since she had to go to work and I had yet to complete my workout for the day. We ordered the chocolate cake with vanilla ice cream dessert and wow was it ever delicious! How surprised we were when the check came and our server had comped our cake! I went back later in the evening for dinner and had the baseball sirloin. It was a very tasty and tender hunk of cow and perfectly cooked! The sides were just right and not so much that you felt totally stuffed walking out of the place.
Wonderful selection and service. We bought some flowers and then decided to go for lunch a few doors down they let us leave our flowers at the counter while we ate and even wrapped them nicely for us upon our return. There s a lot to choose from and the staff is helpful and very accommodating. We were very happy with the beautiful flowers.
This place has good pad thai and other dishes the portions could be a tad bigger in my opinion but the food is always tasty. We typically call in our order and pick it up to go since we live close by so I ca not speak to the decor or service. All in all a great westside thai option!
We arrived at about 5 30 on a Friday evening without a reservation and were seated promptly as we discovered soon had we arrived any later we definitely would have needed one . The vibe is very retro Vegas inside and out with Greco Roman statues and a fountain outside and a long bar with ample dining space and lots of pictures of classic Vegas icons inside. The menu is extensive but not so large that we could not decide on spicy sauted calamari as an appetizer white clam chowder and caprese salad as a second course eggplant Parmesan and chicken involtini as our entrees and canolis with coffee for desert. Everything from start to finish was amazing! Super fresh and high quality ingredients. The wait staff was prompt and attentive as well they got slammed with a party of about 30 people right around 6 30 so the last course was a bit delayed but completely understandable. Everyone seemed really happy to be there both employees and patrons and the atmosphere was great! Looks like they have events often and people were really piling in for the Friday night offering when we left around 7 30. Wonderful experience we will definitely be back!
Drai s was nice went here with a friend and a guy I was dating on my first trip to Vegas. Ca not remember what kind of music they were playing but the place was pretty big drinks were alright and the rooftop was pretty nice overall.
Honestly some of the best dessert I have ever eaten. Also a great place to go with friends it is a nice and cozy atmosphere plus they stay open pretty late. Portions are huge which is great because you can easily split one order between 2 or 3 people. Highly recommend!
In need of an amazing massage? Have knots the size of baseballs? Do not care about ambience or decor? Want to walk out feeling good and revitalized? Look no further than Tokyo Shiatsu Clinic aka Suzuki Shiatsu at The Beaches The Beach. It s a one room clinic with massage tables. There are no barriers or dividers so when you get a massage it s in full view of everyone else. It s a good thing you keep your clothes on huh? There are several massage therapists mostly Japanese that have differing levels of English fluency but are so OMG amazing at what they do. The only cons are you ll occasionally hear a fellow massagee snoring yes they are that good and the fact that they do not provide insurance receipts. They take reservations and walk ins and if when you call and you get voicemail leave a message and they ll promptly call you back.
Drinks were terrific and I appreciated how well thought out the whole concept was. Even the menu was adorable. Happy hour is legit with a half price menu for some classic drinks but it s only 5 6. Every drink I had was delicious.
Delicious and healthful food interesting menu sleek and contemporary interior and attentive and friendly service at this new upscale but reasonably priced Lebanese restaurant near where Chagrin and Van Aken meet. We ll be returning soon.
Charles was very professional and took time to explain all the different products they offer to me. The place was very clean and I was accommodated with a appointment on short notice. Great job in my book! Keep up the good work!
Union Station is always constantly under construction everyday. The architecture is incredible with high rise ceilings and there is a imitation of New York s famous NYC train station.
We ve been eating at S and W since before we moved to Vegas. I always get the bone in ribeye which is dry aged my preferred method for aging steaks. It always has a nice char to it and is cooked perfectly. Never had to consider sending a steak back at S and W. The crabcakes to start are solid but not overwhelming. My wife is a fan of the heirloom tomatoes. We always get the truffled mac n cheese as a side. The truffle flavor comes through but does not overwhelm the cheese. Everyone I ve spoken to who has had this dish loved it. The wild mushrooms and onion rings have also been successful side dishes in dinners past. They have several ways you can order a filet which is not something a lot of other places offer. Take advantage. The bar is fantastic a great classic bar with excellent service. Good wine list not the best on the strip but certainly not the worst. Do yourself a favor and arrive early to enjoy the bar. We will come back to S and W we always do...
La Sani Grill is a gem in Scarborough! We order dinner from this place at least three times a month. We ve tasted every item on their menu and have not been disappointed. Our favourites include Charcoal grilled lamb shanks served with rice side salad and raita. You get a well seasoned whole lamb shank which has benn slow cooked over charcoal until the meat is absolutely tender. The aroma is just tantalizing and the flavour of the meat definitely lives up to its promise! An order of chicken biryani is VERY generous and comes with a side salad and raita and naan. Two people with healthy appetites would be satisfied with this plus a veggie dish. Each forkful comes up with a nice piece of chicken and a well orchestrated symphony of spices. I would caution you from eating this for lunch if you do not intend to take a nice long nap afterwards. The palak paneer has generous chunks of paneer floating in a thick bright green spinach mush. Every mouthful of the Lahore chikkar cholai is an explosion of flavours which are warm and redolent of spices i can only recognize cumin turmeric ginger and cinnamon. I could go on and on but you would be better off just trying the place out yourself! Other pluses for tis place very clean ample raking great service and and you get 15 off pick up orders if you at with cash.
My GO TO pizza place in north Vegas. The staff have always been friendly whether it was on the phone or in person. The pizza is so good the crust reminds me of sourdough. Which makes the crust the best part their garlic rosemary bread knots are a MUST. Be sure to ask for extra white dipping sauce for them!
Delicious food. Guinness BBQ sauce is amazing on the wings! Great nachos and quesadilla. Will definitely come back.
Wow! I switched to this location based on hours and location but boy am I glad I did! I ve filled with them a few times now twice while sick so the personalized care is even more appreciated . A gentleman named Niko helped me the first time via phone and he was so kind and helpful. Today I went to the doc and have the need for another antibiotic because the first type did not work. They accidentally called my RX into my previous store. Dawn went above and beyond and called the other store worked out an arrangement since their system was down and had my RX transferred to this location. AND she said she d call me afterwards and she did! Dawn was very be kind helpful and you could tell she loves helping people. I work in healthcare and I continue to fill at Walgreens because of amazing customer service like this! Thank you Dawn and thank you Walgreens on McClintock and Southern.
Super fast and the lady is really nice. It was my first time there and I appreciate that she takes walk ins. The lady I normally go to raised her price and does not take walk ins and I needed to get my brows done today. Will be coming back again.
OH.... MY...... GOD These donuts are ridiculously good. Definitely worth driving a few miles away from the strip to indulge. The whole top two levels of donuts as already mentioned in other reviews are vegan so this destination for us was heaven. We visited early in our trip to gorge and then picked up a box to bring home for friends to enjoy. Cheap. Vegan. Yummy. What more do I need to say? I do not know how these are so luscious and vegan but the word on the street is that they are..... they re so good that it is impossible to differentiate from normal donuts.
OMFG!! we just had the best quiche in the world....it was so eye rolling in the back of your head excellent....i love this place so much!!!!! U will find me there every Saturday or Sunday...or both days....LOL!!
So we got seated and then got forgotten about. It took about 15 minutes before someone the hostess as it turns out noticed and apologized profusely. We ordered the grilled artichoke appetizer and it was AH MAZING!! When we received our appetizer and drinks and the gal told us the appetizer was on the house and again appologized for the delay in not getting to us sooner. I do not have a problem with people making mistakes we all do... what I care about as a customer is how you handle dealing with the mistske. The staff was EXEMPLARY appologized appropriately made no BS excuses offered the free appetizer and extremely attentive service after that. I ordered the prime rib sandwhich and my wife ordered the fish and chips. Borh were very good!! We were both delighted with the food and service. Pleasantly pleased!
Love the location of this place to grab a snack around 10 11pm otw home. Good easy parking not too busy but not dead either. I stick to the chocolate and add either peanut butter or oatmeal cookie. In another cup i get the fruity stuff which they always seem to have something new and delicious. What s not to like about froyo right??
Amazing.. amazing staff amazing tea.. very knowledgeable.. I ve been too other Teavanas and people are rude and mean.. but Town Square Teavana I ll travel just to get my tea from them..
I was a little bit wary about going into a restaurant owned by Zeppe s since all I associated the name with was pizza I was pleasantly surprised. Walking in it looked like a typical sports bar but was clean and nicely lit. My boyfriend and I started out with the zepperoni rolls which were hot and filled to bursting with melted cheese and pepperoni yum! . I ordered the buffalo chicken Alfredo for my entree which was an interesting combination but it made my taste buds happy. The sauce was creamy and there was a little kick to the chicken that nicely rounded out the flavors. Our waitress brought fresh baked garlic sticks to go with the pasta which I could tell literally just came out of the oven... The portions were huge that I got to take 1 2 of my meal home in addition to the garlic twists and some of the pepperoni rolls. Bill took home half of his chicken teriyaki too. I definitely will be coming back here
Ordered beef tartare hangar sandwich angel hair and juice. They were a bit slow in serving the angel hair. Was not a huge deal. Turns out they took it off our bill took the drink off our bill and gave us a complimentary belle flatbread and a complimenary torte cake. The food was pretty great too for that matter.
I had my first experience with the Matthews Motor Company today and I was impressed. I had called them this morning because my car had a tire that would not stay inflated. Needed a patch really soon before it caused an accident. They invited me right over but I was a bit worried because it seemed like they were really busy. I dropped the car with them and sat down in the lobby. No more than 15 minutes later I was driving off with my car and the tire was all patched up. Best of all they would not charge me for the outstanding service. I m sure that the next time I have a need for a mechanic I ll check out these guys first. Class A establishment.
2AM and I having been stood up by another cab co I called Green Cab 10 Minutes later my ride was complete with no waiting no hassle Nothing fancy here just a ride. Often a ride is all I need............... Let s hear it for the smaller guys Sometimes they come through in a pinch
Our family has taken numerous cars to Kenny and the folks Jack and Sons over the past 15 20 years. We have always found them to be honest courteous and they do great work!
The technicians were very knowledgeable and professional. They were very personable and friendly. yes I will keep doing business with you guys. Thank you one more time
First time going here very nice people as soon as you walk in the door they greet you very clean and beautiful decoration. I will definitely be coming back !
This is the Original Brazilian hair treatment and Denise has the years of experience and product knowledge that gets you The Look. It gives your hair shine style no frizz. In the mornings I can just brush and go. In humid climates and in Portland OR no frizz! One treatment lasts 14 weeks for me. I have frizzy fine hair that can damage easily and I also take otc inexpensive Biotin supplements which helps me all around. There are not many reviews here which surprises me. Denise and her Brazilian Blow Dry treatments are the secret that people pass by not knowing they lost out on the hair they wanted to have.
Very good.. great if you are staying at the Hilton Garden Inn as it is across the street.
professional on time friendly more than helpful and complete gentleman. will never move myself again!
I ve had a bad experience here too but today I had the best pedicure experience!!! Glad I gave the place a second chance!
Comparable to Kamana Wana! I love it! Although he forgot to add the sweet condensed milk! A small which is huge is 2.50. Soft ice and great flavors!
It s the first time I ve Yelped anything other than a restaurant. However after spending the better part of a day enjoying the Art Natural History Museums I m branching out...guess I m way overdue! Undoubtedly there are plenty of bores who cannot imagine a quality museum anywhere west of Bilbao. Pay them no mind. The range and quality of exhibits at the Carnegie are rightly rich sources of pride and accomplishment to the organization and Pittsburgh. And each and every staff member I spoke with was courteous helpful and obviously well trained...something that s not always the case in many exalted European settings. If you re traveling with children you ll appreciate the numerous interactive areas created for the kids. Pittsburgh is so much more than football hockey and salads with hidden french fries tell me again why they do that? . You ll completely understand when you visit the Carnegie Museums.
My boyfriend and I just purchased our first home and we can happily say it was a great experience because of Steve Jones. He was very professional knowledgable and responsive. We met him randomly at a home viewing and immediately liked how friendly and low key he was so a couple days later we asked him to help us in our search and we re glad that we did. The process went really smoothly and we would highly recommend working with Steve.
Love love love the food and smoothies customer service is not too bad either but it seems like the prices have gone up since they opened. I totally get organic produce is more expensive and I m a huge believer in it but when I pay 12 bucks for a salad and it s in a small bowl and mostly kale I am hesitant. I will continue to come back for juice and smoothies though
The service was amazing. Our server Felicia was very informative and helpful! John the chef was incredibly friendly as was Constance. The food well it was delicious. I m a foodie and seek out the best places. We had bacon jam the cauliflower and the trout special. All incredible. Ca not wait to go back next time I m in Vegas! So many more things I want to try!
I always make sure to stop by for a drink whenever I m in the area! Located right across from CoCo s this shop is spacey and has a good amount of seating. I love the different kinds of tapioca they offer. They have a variety of unique drinks and you even have the option to customize the amount of milk in your drink. Their tea is very rich and authentic not the powder drinks that many bubble tea chains serve. Their drinks are also made with fresh milk making the drinks even tastier! I recommend trying the dragon fruit tapioca milk tea. The tapioca has a unique flavor and it s also one of their best sellers. Service is great as well. The staff are very patient and helpful if you have trouble deciding on what to get. I am literally the most indecisive person on earth and I m glad that the worker did not get annoyed at me for taking a long time! They are all very knowledgeable of the different types of teas they serve so do not be shy to ask questions. Prices do seem a bit higher than other bbt places but the quality is definitely up to par. They serve high quality and authentic tea and it s definitely worth the price! I would for sure be coming back to try their other drinks when I have the chance!
This place is great. it s busy but the atmosphere while more modern has a similar feel to the Arcadia location. Tonight we had quite slow service to start and the apologetic server comped our first round of drinks even though we were not angry about it. I really appreciate that level of customer service...it s a lost art. the food was wonderful and the beer prices were extremely reasonable.
After being turned away by Right Toyota I wobbled on down to Discount Tire with a fast leaking tire. I went inside and all of the service reps were busy. One of the reps made an effort to acknowledge me and let me know that he would be right with me once he finished assisting his current customer. Another employee also acknowledged me as soon as he was free and he offered to assist. They inspected my damaged tire and informed me that it was unrepairable. They gave me a quote for 4 new tires which I did need put on my spare tire and charged me not one red cent. I ended up not using them for my new tires but only because I found a much better deal elsewhere. In an age of greed an dishonesty I seriously thank the men at Discount Tire Scottsdale for fixing my immediate need and doing it for free! I will certainly consider them for any future tire needs.
Not bad for food quality vs price. Simple restaurant with 10 tables or so. Quiet environment. Could be more attentive in terms of service but they are quick to respond if you flag down the waitress.
I love this place! The food is really good the service is quick and the prices are pretty cheap! The barbeque is definitely what sets it apart from the other Korean restaurants on campus but they also have a lot of other great dishes like the dolsat bibimbap. Mmm. I definitely come here probably too much for it to be normal haha.
This club is awesome! Hands down the best service I ve ever received at a club. We had a comped bottle and table for one of my girlfriend s birthday.. We did not have to wait in line at all and the cocktail servers were so sweet and nice! They never let your glass go empty and they were always somewhere close by. Even the porters were on their A Game constantly refilling everything!!! The bad thing about this place is that it s kind of small and we actually had to share our table area with another group of people we did not know.. But their service is on point!!! Good job 1Oak Another annoying thing was that there were promoters EVERYWHERE! We we were probably asked by 20 different promoters while walking to the venue inside the Mirage and I am not over exaggerating even in the restroom some promoter chick stayed posted asking ladies if they were going to the club tonight.. Weird!!!
Amazing potato tacos! My daughter likes the strips which are just tortilla chips with unmelted cheese on top but the chips are great. The mini burritos are perfect for lunch my favorite is the red chile beefthey also have Pepsi products
Came in based off of our previous visit last year. We did not have an appointment so we figured there would be a wait. They said they would call when we could come back and they called within the time quoted. At little short staffed for a nice Saturday and 2 of the guys seemed to be pretty green. A few steps forgotten or just done different than should ve been done. My friend ended up with 3 layers of nail polish so it took forever to dry. I m still rating a 4 because I do really like this salon and will go back.
I ve been to this location twice with my honey and I have no complaints. On our second visit I ordered the chicken gnocchi soup as usual however this bowl was lacking the dumplings main reason for ordering my husband informed the waiter and they came right out with another bowl full of dumplings! and it was Sooo good. There prices are great for the amount of food you get we always need take home bags!
Presentation was awesome food was great service excellent and priced well! Hubby ordered the California chicken enchilada with artichokes and smoked gouda tasty rice and yummy black bean salad on a fried tortilla. I ordered the fried calamari with mixed green salad and balsamic dressing. Must try!
Welp if you love Pizzeria Bianco which anyone with half a taste bud should then HEY! You ve come to a similarly named place! All joking aside let s talk about what makes anything Bianco great. It s a no fuss menu with simple homegrown ingredients in each dish. Nothing is complicated. It s fresh it s delicious and it s everything you want in a pizza or a sandwich. Pane stands up to this testament. When I first went here with my boyfriend because he was adamant about having a sandwich and exclaimed this was the best sandwich in town I have to admit I was neither impressed nor enthusiastic about the selection of sammies. I was like why does each sandwich only have like three ingredients including the bread? I wanted some mayo lined cheese filled meat tower with a pillowy outer layer of white bread. What an idiot. Why does each sandwich only have 3 ingredients including the bread? Because that s all they need! My sandwich had roasted red peppers roasted in house and some kind of salame I think sopressata but I ca not remember for sure. Oh and bread. Fresh baked bread. Made that morning. It was heaven in my mouth. So if you know what s good for you you will go to Pane and order a flippin sandwich. Do not get your hopes up for mayo you wo not get. But you also wo not want it or need it once have a single bite. My boyfriend was right I HATE it when he s right! This is the best sandwich in town.
I found Alpha Air in Yelp. Quick respond professional service and fair prices. They fixed my furnace in an hour. Really appreciate your service. Highly recommend Alpha Air. Thanks again.
Stepping out of my comfort zone has never tasted so good!!! Who knew orange juice mixed with basil carrots and Apple would taste SO GOOD Liquid Defense ! Well worth the few extra bucks you ll gladly pay to have your taste buds awoken! Have not been disappointed yet!
One of the best fastfood chains in the US! I always go to In N Out when I m on the West Coast and this location did not dissapoint. The location is nice and clean and of course with heavy duty air condition. The burgers are absolutely glorious.
Good Area Sushi Great Atmosphere 1 Sushi Sunday Ko Fusion offers decent sushi for Champaign Urbana area. Set conveniently downtown Champaign the restaurant s atmosphere is very modern and chic almost like a restaurant out of Chicago and offers fusion entrees outside of their sushi menu. Ko Fusion offers a large bar area and outdoor seating. 1 Sushi Sunday is their best deal which allows diners to sample 1 pieces of sushi from their menu.
Think I found my new favourite ramen place. I had the shoyu ramen and the ikura bowl combo. For about 20 it is on the expensive side but I think for the amount of food and ikura given it was fairly priced for toronto standards. The broth was delicious. The bamboo shoots which are normally a little lack luster at other places were so flavorful wish I got an extra order of just those . My only complaint would be I though the pork was sliced a little bit thickly for my liking but delicious none the less. I also liked the doneness of the noodles just a bit of bite and not too soft. The ikura bowl I would order again just on its own. The salty and fishy eggs go perfectly with the fresh rice. Mmm wish I had room for the gyoza but sadly I was not that hungry even though on Monday s you get 3 for free with any ramen order. No waiting when I went but I did go around 5 30 6 so I likely missed the dinner rush.
Stopped by the shop today and ordered probably the best Mocha frapuccino I think I ve ever had. Not only was the coffee and the spot good but the staff was awesome the lead girl Kim was super helpful and super friendly. I will definitely be going back again.
Great meal EVERY time. We had Marianne as our server and she was fantastic! Chile relleno omelet is amazing and not to be missed. They do half sizes as well. A must try in Las Vegas!
My family ate at Totties Saturday evening. We ordered 4 entrees and 2 appetizers. Food was fresh well prepared and delicious. Service was highly attentive. Waiter was knowledgeable providing info to ensure we would enjoy our meals. Atmosphere was cool clean tranquil and most enjoyable.
Scott Moyes has customized many of our vehicles and always does an outstanding job. He is a man of integrity and can be trusted with any of you vehicle needs. He will help you make the best decisions for your particular vehicle and the results will exceed your expectations!
I just had a fabulous brunch at Hexx. I had the streak and eggs which was cooked to perfection! My bartender Shena was A . Very attentive and cared that I had a great time! Bravo Hexx. Ca not want to come back!!!!
I love redline pizza. I have ordered pizza and wings twice. I also have picked up pizza multiple times. First lets start with the delivery. Both times was told 20 minutes and I was sceptical. Pizza hut always tells me any where between 30 to a hour. My last experience with them they told me a hour and 30 minutes. I could read a book teaching me to make pizza and still make a pizza in 90 minutes. Redline from the time I hung up was at my door in just under 19 minutes. Every time pick it up its ready just as fast. The are fast serve a good product and have great prices.
This was a good service visit. The work was completed quickly accurately and at a fair price. Michael Southern is a wonderful service director he does his job very well. I wish this dealership would come work it s magic in Maryland where I spend the other 6 months of the year. We really need customer service like this out there too!
This is a great spot and as others have mentioned it blends in very well to the building making it almost unnoticeable. We very much enjoyed the octopus beet salad and the fish mains. Great presentation well cooked absolutely nothing to complain about. Only thing I would mention is that we felt a bit rushed by the server who other than that was great even though the restaurant was not busy. For instance there was no timing between appetizer and mains and she went to remove a plate plate whilst one was still eating.
I m not going to lie to you and say that I did not have my reservations about visiting this store. My wife wanted to find a certain hard to find item and after doing a quick yelp search we decided to try The Bag Lady. Upon entering we were greeted by the staff and told that if we had any questions they d be happy to help. Help they did. We had quite a bit of questions and they were very eager to assist us. I had a lot of fun looking at the various items they had for sale here and getting the chance to learn what many of them do. I felt myself drawn to a particular obsidian stone and when I touched it I knew this is what I was going to get. I know it sounds a bit outlandish but I felt some sort of energy when I touched it. I loved how personable the staff was. They were awesome and very knowledgeable about the objects they sold. I really appreciated their help and hospitality. They made a fan out of me today and I will definitely be returning in the near future!
Had never eaten here before but we had made a big to go order of a picnic pack for a pool party on Father s Day . It was a pretty guide size and fed everyone we had. The ribs were really yummy. Brisket melted in your mouth but was a tad dry . But they have extra BBQ sauce for all the meats. Loved the green beans they had a very nice Cajun flavor. Mac and cheese was the same as most places. And the rolls were vey good as well!
Delicious! Based on reviews checked it out and happened to be 2 crabs Tuesday and 2 beers happy hour! Had oysters in the half shell super fresh. Blue crab was just as good as in Maryland and service was quick and friendly. I would be a regular for sure if I lived here!
Went to dinner with my husband after purchasing their Groupon deal. I ended up only drinking 1 mimosa and hubby no alcohol so we did not take advantage of the free alcohol drinks included in the deal. But anyway the food was really good. A lot of protein choices like carving table sausages and chicken cooked different ways. Great salad bar you can make your own or they had some made like Greek salad and spinach bacon salad which I tried both And were really good. Other food options were pastas and breads To be completely honest not a lot of options but everything I tried was really good!! I would definitely go back.
Stopped by this restaurant on a whim because I had a craving for Mexican food and was in the area. The Happy Hour menu made our meal tasty and affordable the service was fast and friendly and the music was loud enough to hear but not so loud that conversation was difficult. Overall I had a wonderful experience and would eat here again.
Love this place. Their pig pizza is very delicious. Red sangria is not your usual sangria a very tasty one. Finally I had their hazelnut torta. If you love Nutella salted caramel gelato... you ll love it. Overall it s a great place. Shout out to Rob an awesome waiter.
If you live in Westlake or North Olmsted you probably drive by here on a pretty regular basis. Bet you did not know they have great shawarmas. Well they do. For the same price of Taco Bell or McDonald s you get get actual food made specifically because you ordered it. This is definitely a great place to throw into your takeout repertoire.
Place I go as a local because of the excellent service and food bar staff is awesome and makes me come back weekly.
i m writing this review for my dog Dora.. she loves this place.. i love that this is a one stop shop for your pet.. from grooming to doggie day camp.. to just shopping.. the staff is very friendly.. always gives her free treats for visiting.
The food was delicious try the garlic fries! Great service and good love music. Very chill environment will definitely go back!
I am finally glad there is another phone repair shop around my area. The person that helped me was named Vince. He is very well knowledge with my iPhone 7 plus. He fixed it like brand new. He resolves any other issue that I had that I could not figure it out on my own. Now I will only go to Vince for phone repair. I will highly recommend to go there and only ask for Vince. I believe he told me that he fixes computer too! Vince if you ever get to read this review I hope for you many success in your achievements!
Brittany did my lashes and I was so happy with how they turned out! She did such a good job and the place was super cute! Great environment and love my lashes!
I wish I could give Dr. Joe and Chris more stars. They have gone above and beyond for our two dogs who love them very much. Dr. Joe is calm and patient and takes his time assessing our dogs and answering questions. Prices are reasonable. Dr. Joe has performed tail docking surgery on our elderly dog after she had a happy tail injury that made her tail unsalvageable. Recovery was not easy with a large energetic dog and Chris and Dr. Joe made time to squeeze us in whenever we had any setbacks. A . Bring your pets here.
I ve ordered for delivery twice now and the fried chicken comes piping hot and super crunchy so delicious! I ve also had the beef samosas curly fries seasoned fries and fried corn on cob all of which were so good! Pleasantly impressed by the quality considering the establishment s slightly questionable
I can not speak highly enough about Heliocol we have had them so several years and they have always been terrific to deal with. Today Ray came out to give me an estimate he was prompt professional and cordial he made some suggestions for our system but there was no hard sell very easy to deal with. I have recommended them to friends in the past and everyone has thanked me. Highly recommend Heliocol.
What a wonderful nail place! GREAT customer service! It s not close to my home but will be coming back!!
I was more than impressed with not only this business but J.J.! He was professional on time energetic and very enthused to help out. I do not remember the last time I had customer service this great. I would recommend this specific location to anyone. Even the office ladies were very helpful!! Thank you to a wonderful stress free experience.
3.5 4 stars I stayed here one evening based on the number of good reviews on Yelp. I m kind of torn about the star rating for this hotel for me it s about the lack of dining options close to the hotel. After traveling all day I was not interested in having to venture out very far for some food. Most of the places close to the hotel are only open during the day and most close around 5 00pm ish. I did end up finding Winks a few blocks down which was fine it closes at 9 00 pm. The hotel itself was fine. Pros Hotel staff were professional Room was clean and comfortable Lots of HD channels available on the HD TV AC worked well mine was not loud and noisy as others have reported Valet parking was prompt Phoenix Coffee is located very close by! There is a CVS one block down if you forgot something or need other supplies Cons Wireless internet was kind of slow Lack of a real in hotel restaurant Limited evening dining options close to the hotel The pantry lacked bottled tomato or V 8 juice
Today marked our third visit here and honestly it get better and better! Our server today Jim was amazing! Made the afternoon tea so enjoyable. They are always accommodating and welcoming. And the atmosphere..... reminds me of home.
I come here between classes and on my lunch break. They are always quick have good happy hour deals and great customer service. I m basically addicted to the southwest chicken salad. Pool tables bar separate restaurants and right by a college so a good crowd.
Recently purchased a new Acura from Acura of Tempe. From the minute I spoke with the salesman to signing my paperwork and driving the car home the experience was extraordinary. Never felt pressured by the sales staff or manager. The manager Joel is absolutely fantastic and will work with you 100 . Was never pressured for a credit app immediately and was given real numbers on what I can expect to actually pay. Dealership is also very clean and they have quite a selection of snacks and beverages. Grew up with family in car business and have purchased a few myself and without a doubt this was the most pleasant experience I ve had.
Unexpectedly delightful. We ordered corn bread with butter which was good but not as good as the grits holy . Pimento cheese who knew? Order the grits. Also ordered octopus as appetizer which was excellent. Mains were pasta sublime and complex. The beef was excellent. Dessert Acadia s version of a grown up Reese s PB Cup was plate licking good. I do not know how often I will return as the menu is small but the grits were tasty enought that there is a strong chance.
Fresh breads at the bakery a train ride exhibits about living and travelling during Old West times a ferry and numerous shops. There s always something to do. The only issue I have is the high cost of entry. Over 26 per person. Next time I ll dress up as a cowboy and pretend I work there so I can avoid the pricey entrance fee.
The drinks here are not the best but I love the fact that I can do homework or play boardgames with friends here
I m absolutely in love with this cute little bookstore. I wanted to buy one of everything the sheer number of feminist graphic novels in the shop was amazing and I want them to open an outpost in Philly so I can go there whenever I want.
This place is a hidden gem. We live in way West Phoenix and we re in the area. A car full of kids we eventually got hungry and looking for a quick burger place. We were actually going to whataburger in the same plaza but we saw Giant Burgers look at some reviews and yep as everyone said they are really big burgers the fries are crispy and delicious. It taste like real burgers homemade. My family ate all their food we left very happy full and will definitely come back. The guy there is very nice. He really takes pride in his work. Now to make the looooonnngg drive home full and sleepy Everyone needs a giant burger in their life. Lol
after getting to vegas at 8 am and sweating like crazy from the moment we got out of our air conditioned car i knew exactly where i wanted to go to cool off... fat tuesday for one of the half yard drinks. unfortunately we had to check into our room at the venetian first. after we settled in i decided to down a few vodka gimlets 3 to be exact . in my drunken stupor we walked from venetian to caesar s forum shops and ordered my boyfriend and i a couple half yards of 190 octane... each. fabulous idea at the moment. i was wasted after those 3 gimlets but after that half yard i was done. if i do remember correctly they were tasty and deceiving! i felt that i was the never ending drink. an hour later my boyfriend and i were stumbling into the venetian for dinner than stumbling back out to our room shortly after we ate. i completely passed out once i hit the bed and i blame that on fat tuesday. hey i needed my sleep and this was probably the best sleep i ve had in a while! thanks fat tuesday!
Loved my blow out. I ve been looking for a dryBar like replacement since I moved from NYC. This spot so far is ahead of the others I ve tried. Will def go back.
Who even knew such a good authentic place existed way out here in the East Valley. The place has been around for like 20 years. The decor inside makes you feel like you re in Germany. The wait staff was very nice and I thought the food was VERY good. I had the sausage loaf with gravy cabbage and these unreal home fried potatoes fried with bacon OMG. So good. My date had the bratwurst with sauerkraut and potatoes. I thought the brats were excellent as well. They have a nice bar with a lot of German beers. The price was not bad 2 dinners 1 beer was about 24.00. Also note their gravy is gluten free! Whoot.
They always do a great job and take your Groupon no questions asked. No attitude. Jimbo is the newish manager since the last time I was here and he s personable and trustworthy. Place is clean and offers a restroom and drinks while you wait. They always get me right in w an appointment which is usually a pain anywhere else including a dealer. I come here over the dealer bc of the service bonuses tire rotation inspection product and price. Thanks guys. Best place in this area for sure.
I very rarely write reviews... It takes an experience on either end of the spectrum to get me to take the time. That being said this place was AWESOME! I felt like I was in my Greek Friends Kitchen! And in truth by the end of the meal.. I WAS! And the FOOD...OMG the food..... I will probably be dreaming about that octopus for a long time.... the lamb ribs ROCKED. Actually everything down to the scrumptious Tripolois Tomato Salad and simple fried potatoes was to die for. After the meal our waiter Nick suggested Greek Honey Balls being Italian myself I thought they were similar to struffoli NOPE! They were more like round balls of Zeppoli hot from the fryer and dipped in honey. WOW! We thought we were full when this heaping plate was placed in front of us... I learned there is always room for jello and HONEY BALLS! Dont miss this wonderful Greek Gem!
Bernard s gets high score in my book. Our dinner was delicious! We had the chicken and mushroom crepe with a side salad and the lamb chops with potatoes and asparagus. The side salad had just the right amount of dressing the crepe was hearty like comfort food. Did I mention the piping hot sourdough baguette with butter? Service was attentive and professional. A wonderful pairing of white and red wines were suggested with our meals. The live music wad delightful. We were thoroughly satisfied so why stop there? We ended on a sweet note of creme brle and chocolate ganache cake. Fabulous! Now if they can just get the lighting right they would be perfect.
Today my family and I went here for breakfast there was 11 of us total the service started was great ! Brenda was our server she got all of our food out just the way we ordered it refills were always brought back . Food was delicious! Their was just a small mistake on our checks not a big deal but THE MANAGER ON DUTY WAS SO UNPROFESSIONAL!!! RUDE!! Totally humiliating Brenda on the floor in front of us and other guests people make mistakes we had no problem what so ever waiting for it to be resolved but this douchebag manager was just making a scene making himself look like an Ass! Because of a small mixup on our checks he blew up and was yelling at the cashier to find Brenda!! And told another guest that she does not no anything he s smarter than her! What the hell! Shame on you! You are no better than anyone else your attitude sucks! You obviously hate your job douchebag! But for Brenda keep up the good job you were amazing!! Karma will come his way. Mean people suck.
My boyfriend recently brought home an assortment of the mini cupcakes for my birthday and they were delicious! They were the perfect 2 bite serving to get a fix of a tasty cupcake without having to commit to a whole one. Out of the assortment he got the red velvet was my favorite with the white chocolate and raspberry maybe strawberry as a close second.The others were tasty as well. We will definitely return.
Irish Nachos are yummy! I really enjoyed this place. I went to lunch with a coworker. They had a pretty good menu with lots of options. I decided to order the Irish Nachos and the special Open Face Cajun Prime Rib Sandwich The Irish Nachos were potato waffle fries tomatoes onions etc... they were surprisingly good. The sandwich was good as well. I replaced the fries with Irish red potatoes which offered a better compliment for me. I will include this in my happy hour rotation because they appear to have a good beer selection. This place is close to work so I am sure I will be a regular Price Lunch 5 10 per meal. Food Very tasty and good portions. Atmosphere This place feels and acts like a pub. I will be back.
Best place ever. Just when you did not think these places exists but when you find it it s a holy grail! You ll never go wrong with anything on the menu. Our favorite go to is the bison burger chocolate pb shake and green beast muscle freak. Everything is freshly made and perfect for after workout meal. The shakes are perfect size taste and enough to satisfy your hunger. Not too sweet either. Bison burger is the best. Awakens your taste buds! Not just a bland or fatty burger. ProteinHouse is definitely in the forefront of what most places should take after healthy good quality food with flavor and made fresh on the spot. Like I said definitely a holy grail place to many athletes and anyone trying to lose weight but still want good healthy food. Definitely will be a regular! Do not stop stop what you are doing ProteinHouse we need more places like this in LV.
Nothing negative to say about Pops. You get what you pay for so if you want toppings beyond what your sandwich comes with you need to speak and pay up. It can get busy depending on the time and day of the week so be prepared. Its pretty much a Vegas landmark.
The burgers were soooo good! But the milkshake left a lot to be desired! It tasted artificial and was not good at all. We had the mushroom cheddar and Southwest burger and both were excellent. If you like burgers check this place out!
I ordered my pump yesterday and it was delivered to my door today! Everything was taken care of for me and easy. Would definitely recommend!
My boyfriend has a timeshare here so we stayed in a one bedroom suite. It was my first time in Vegas and I liked that this hotel was off the strip. They do not have a casino but I do not gamble. I know what you are thinking...why come to Vegas and not gamble? I decided to visit Vegas for the ambiance. This hotel was perfect for that. Our one bedroom suite was comfortable and it had a living room area with a large flat screen TV a large kitchen with a microwave and refrigerator and a huge bathroom. We also had a nice view of Las Vegas. I recommend this hotel if you are not a party animal and just want to take in the sights.
I ve worked with Brian for years. He even came to my work for me to sign papers because my schedule was super tight at one point. He was always helpful and great at answering any questions until I understood everything. Even though I could not find a rate with State Farm for my car insurance because my driving record went a little sideways I still connected with Brian for Homeowners Insurance and Personal Articles Policy.
I ate here a few Saturday nights ago with my girlfriend for dinner. I have been coming here for the past five years or so more often than not for their bubble tea and have only ever eaten here once before. The inside of the restaurant is fairly small but not overly crowded which is nice. On one side of the restaurant is an enclosed counter where you can order food to go or watch them make the bubble tea and the rest of the restaurant is made up of tables and chairs. For my dinner entre I decided to have something a little different than my normal selections and went with the chicken and broccoli in a black pepper sauce. Whenever the dish came out it looked exactly as I would have expected with some broccoli and chicken in a dark brown sauce that had visible pepper in it and side of rice. The sauce was good but not nearly as spicy as I was expecting based upon the little chili pepper that was next to it on the menu. It paired well with the chicken and broccoli and I ended up thoroughly enjoying my meal. I especially enjoyed that my broccoli was cooked just right and was crispy instead of being overcooked and mushy. My girlfriend also enjoyed her meal which was the eggplant in garlic sauce. Her eggplant was also cooked nicely and the sauce was very similar to the one that I had except instead of the pepper it seemed to have a nice garlic flavor. Before we left I also ordered a Large Green Lemon Bubble tea which I enjoyed on the way home. They always seem to make it perfectly with a not too sweet flavor that goes well with the citrus and ample amounts of tapioca pearls at the bottom which get you through the entire drink. The bottom line for me is that I will definitely head back here in the future. With how good my food tasted I can see myself coming here more often and not just because I love the bubble tea.
Absolutely love this place! Food as big as my head and it tastes so so good! Thank you all so much for awesome service and great eats! Coming back asap!
Wonderful staff that is very welcoming knowledgeable and helpful. The atmosphere is peaceful and the rooms are clean. I have this place on rotation for my wellness practice.
My partner and I came here for a mid week brunch after the first day in summer school. It was busy but we were seated soon as we arrived. All of the staff was very pleasant. The waitress did not over bother us which is always a big plus for someone like me who does not like people watching them eat or bother them while I am eating lol. The portion sizes are not gigantic but much larger than a bistro style caf. We try the Irish Benny the Irish Hash the cheese grapes which were extremely creamy! And we also tried a stack of the Oreo cookie pancakes we added peanut butter and syrup and it was simply delightful! We will definitely be coming back!
This walking trail is located in close proximity to the Goett Family Park. It is very well maintained and in a great area! They have a great variety of sights along the way.
Whisk your date away into old colonial Spain where Mediterranean breezes and flavors waft into your nostrils. The mood is set with dim lighting siena and sunburnt vaulted ceilings cozy fireplaces and an elegant ambiance. Start your evening off in the lounge with its posh leather couches mahogany bar antique lamps and baby grand piano to set the mood. The menu of specialty cocktails will make any discerning carouser dance with delight. From the Sweetheart with chambord vodka champagne and chambord to the Rose Petal Infusion with grey goose strawberries st. germaine elderflower and a rose petal your lovely lady will be swooning with ardour or from the strong martinis. The mixologists here know their libations. Drinks are poured with the finest spirits and crafted with love and you pay accordingly for an average of 14. However do not let this dampen your spirits as Happy Hour is from 5p 7p and reverse Happy Hour from 10p midnight Sunday through Thursday. Appetizers are half price featured drinks and wines by the glass for 6. So after your palate has been readied for the culinary splendour that is about to meet your lips try one of the lounge s appetizers or wait until you are seated in the restaurant to be impressed. The lounge has an eclectic menu which features Fruit De Mar tempura fried calamari shrimp and scallops the very popular Belgian snack of Mussels and Frites mussels dish served with a side of french fries Adana Kebabs served with pita and yogurt and even an American favorite the short rib sandwhich. Average price is 12. Want to impress your date? Order the Chilled shellfish and bubbles entree right at the bar as the piano man croons in the background. This delectable entree comes with maine lobster king crab legs jumbo shrimp and oysters on the half shell and is served with two glasses of house champagne for a mere 55. Now if that is not the perfect aphrodisiac... If dining solely in the restaurant you will not be disappointed by the first class service attention to detail and the fine food that is so lovingly prepared by its chef. The meals are split up into courses and I strongly suggest you do all three to fully explore the tempting Mediterranean treats that this restaurant has to offer. Start off with the Burgundian Escargot with mushroom raviolis roasted beets watercress salad and vegetable beurre rouge or the phenomenal Crab Cakes with house made chorizo clams and roasted clam puree . Not in the mood for seafood but still enjoy good belly timber? Then try the duet of roasted bonemarrow and sauteed sweetbreads served with their housemade brioche and a horseradish infused orange marmelade. Now you are ready to clear your palate for your main course something light to pique those tastebuds...the lobster fennel bisque or the unbelievably ambrosial Pear Salad with its gorgeous blending of spiced pecans and blue cheese on organic greens. If you are a devotee to food then you have saved room for the main course. Choose from Chef Lee s Carbonara my personal favorite with garlic cream pancetta prosciutto and egg yolk. For Spanish fare there is T. Cook s signature Paella straight from the fireplace or a sinful slow roasted lamb stuffed with feta. Many more seafoods and steaks grace this menu for an average cost of 32. You will definitely expect to pay accordingly for the quality flavor and love that is put into these amazing dishes. A dining experience fit for the gods sure to impress your date and your palate.
Very good car wash! Service people do a good job scrubbing bugs of the front of your car before you go through the wash the track that pulls you through does not have a raised bar like most washes do that can scratch your wheels and knock your alignment out! Brushes are thick and through will come back again!
Super cute and modern ambiance reasonably priced beautiful delicious food and helpful friendly staff. I ve been here for dinner and brunch it has impressed me both times. It seems like they accommodate for large groups as well. I would definitely continue to go here.
Food was pretty good. We had a bunch of appetizers. I loved their seasoned rice along with the flank steak! As far as the appetizers the Chorizo Cheddar Pierogis were the best! They are so cheesy inside and then topped off with cheese sauce!
Sister business to another dry cleaner I think the Fantastic Cleaners at 7865 W Sahara Ave I used them on 17 Nov. I paid for dry cleaning Full suit jacket pants 5.50 Suit jacket 3.25 Pair of pants 2.75 Tie 2.75 Long coat 15.00 This seems expensive. I m not sure what other dry cleaners would charge to clean my overcoat . Also I paid 2 for them to repair sew on a button to my pant s back pocket I guess my butt s expanding faster than I thought . 5 stars because They offer same day service sign says in by 9 am out by 5 pm . Offers dry cleaning and tailoring service that seem cheap eg 3.99 to have pants hemmed . Friendly employees. Drive thru under shade even which allows me to pull my car up next to their front door and the employee loaded my items in to my backseat on to the handle hanger thing. All items are of course returned in that plastic cellophane protector bag and for suits they add this cardboard paper origami ish thing to the metal coat hanger so that the jacket s shoulder width are properly supported.
I wish I could remember my servers name but overall my experience was phenomenal. We had tacos and wings and both came out way better than expected. The atmosphere was super cool and the food even better. I am not sure if I can even say I ve ever had better wings than theirs! Will definitely be back!
Ditto to everything else written. We came here because we ve passed it enough so why not? Wish I had read reviews first for the only reason that after the 4th course we were stuff!!! So took home course 5 for next day. Before it was wrapped we sampled. Also coming home were half of course 3. So yummy but could not finish. We especially did not mind the price knowing we are getting multiple meals from it. And I was starving before we got here!! In addition there is an awesome belly dancer. She allows audience participation so fun to stand up and try to shake off some of those calories.
Jeff was an amazing driver. We had him pick us up for the airport with two small kids and two small dogs but this was no small job! One dog chewed a hole in her carrier on the way to the airport. Jeff stopped at a Circle K so my husband could buy duct tape at 6am and tape the carrier back together. It saved the trip. He was on time extremely helpful with luggage very polite and the car was clean and cold. Ca not recommend him and the company enough. Thank you!
Getting my car detailed. I love this place. Always remember me and they give specials if you are a repeat customer! Not to mention they play great old school music in the waiting area. Relaxing outside on a nice day while my car gets washed!
This is definitely a hole in the wall type Mexican restaurant. Located on the strip between the MGM and Polo Casino. Surprising great tasting and fresh ingredients. Try the carne asada taco! Cubes of soft seasoned steak on 2 flour disks. Great salsa bar. Taco Tuesdays Almost all tacos are 2! Always open this is great hangover food!
This is a wonderful restaurant!!!! The food is absolutely amazing and the portions are awesome as well!! We came for dinner one night and we had an appetizer two main courses and one dessert with a few drinks and our total bill came to 120 CAD dollars before tip. Which is awesome especially for this area. The service is fast and friendly accommodating for both French and English speakers. Both of our waiters and waitresses were more than helpful with our questions of the menu and helped us decide what to get. All around Reubens is a fantastic restaurant that is not just a deli. If I could rate this more than five stars I would. Sincerely Kevin
I go in on a routine between Fridays and Saturdays hands down they have the best employees in the afternoon. They are full of energy and have a smile when I walk in EVEN WHEN IT S SCORCHING HOT IN THERE . Plus the prices are affordable for an organic and on site cleaners.
A very lovely and serene hotel sitting atop the Mandalay Bay. It s so hidden away the entrances can be somewhat complicated to find... Which is actually a good thing once you see the insanity of MB. If insanity happens to be your thing then this is also the ideal hotel for you since unlike say the Mandarin Oriental it s just steps away from the buzz of a top Vegas casino with higher stakes games premiere clubs and top notch restaurants... no walking really required. The drawbacks are really only slight ones rooms can be a little inconsistent since some seem to have better layouts than others even though they re different price points a strip view room can technically have a less spacious layout than a pool facing room and the furniture is slightly dated and mismatched American corporate meets French country meets Asian fusion meets some imperial Southern Plantation style . But what are you gona do? Service on all levels is impeccable down to the last detail timing promtpness little flowers that come with room service their intent to spoil you and is also very friendly but that s to be expected of any high end hotel. The thing that sets The Four Seasons hotels apart is their attention to the individual and how they handle any complications that arise... And they handle everything with grace and style. All in all we ll be back to this beautiful green oasis in a sea of neon.
The food was excellent but think this place should be a tapas restaurant instead of a taco shop. To me 4 of the 6 taco options we had did not seem to have to be in a tortilla. The fillings were great but the taco aspect just seems forced since the restaurant is called tko. Also I did not like the chorizo. So mushy...
Atmosphere 5 5 Service 4 5 Food value 4 5 Have tried the taquitos fried chicken smokey grilled chicken and the vegetarian chili. When ordering the 2 piece chicken I always choose the potato bravas as the side. The value is definitely there. The portions are filling and the cost is actually pretty reasonable for a downtown restaurant. Recommend the grilled chicken over the fried chicken. The fried chicken has very thin skin and lacks seasoning. This may be on purpose though because you get to choose a dipping sauce. I ve tried the mango chutney and BBQ. Pick the BBQ. I would personally season the chicken though. Dipping the chicken into the sauce is like eating a chicken nugget. Atmosphere is great to relax and chill. The outside patio faces the water. Try the ice cream bar I ve heard great things about the offerings.
Great quality. I ordered from their Breaking Bad menu which I thought was kind of cool. You can tell they know their coffee beans. I have not seen a place similar to them and their quality in the LV market. 4 stars only because it s not the BEST I ve had EVER but to be fair its probably the best in Vegas.
This review is long overdue. I came in February 2014. My hair was long and damaged from years of at home coloring. I was pregnant as hell and just wanted the endless cycle of dying to stop because I knew once the baby came I would not have time for such things. I threw myself at Amanda s feet and begged her to fix my hair. I wanted her to bring it back to it s original color. 5 hours and 460 dollars later my hair was back to it s natural color with no damage...I could not believe it. Amanda single handedly restored my faith in hair salons.
Great service all thanks to Michael he was an outstanding friendly waiter. Made my wife and I feel like we were at home and not just guests. I highly recommend you ask for him next time you go in what a wonderful experience!
Best Thai I ve ever had. Prices are fantastic. The young Thai waitresses are believe it or not attentive fast and chatty if you want to have a conversation. In between serving tables they sat playing cards at a table next to my party and we had a great conversation while we ate. Everyone who says it s not a nice atmosphere I have no idea what you re talking about. I guess you like overdesigned interiors with fancy silverware and waterfalls and impersonal mood lighting and stuff. Forget all that. This place is FRIENDLY which in my book makes for the nicest atmosphere I ve ever encountered in a Thai restaurant. The guy complaining about the rice had a good point but whatever. Not enough to drop a star in my book with everything else being perfect.
The school is awesome. Love his two teachers. He likes Art class and music the best! Literally the best preschool in LV!!!
Reserving final review for now but so far the traditional pie with ketchup was divine. I suppose it could have used more filling. The sausage roll? Ummm...I like a traditional SR and this was not it. Pass. Verdict? I ca not wait to go back at lunchtime for more meaty pies!
The only place I ever have and ever will go for a spray tan! Always the perfect shade and NEVER orange which is hard for me to find because I am as white as they come. The place is super clean and they always make me feel super comfortable and at home. Thank you!! MissArizonaLove
The Meat and Potatoes on Smash Burger in Las Vegas NV Potatoes are right the Smash Fries are tasty! Olive oil and Rosemary come on! Is this fast food or fine dining? This is my first time having a Smash Burger My children have had it with their mom and this is why our son picked this for his birthday dinner with his Teammates Friends. I was looking at menu board and having a difficult time deciding on what to order. The way the descriptions of the burgers are worded make them all sound so yummy! This location would be closing shortly but the workers were so nice and accommodating. Girl that took orders even took a group picture for my son of our party. She also gave my son a free shake for his birthday! Good for my son but now my other son wants one too... I would have to say our visit to Smash Burger was a Smash Hit! Ambiance 4 5 Food 4 5 Drink 4 5 Service 5 5 Overall Experience 4 5 Till next time Drink Eat and Enjoy this life you live Groux
Well we you are stuck over night at an airport my first thought was well lets have a few drinks and hope to pass out in the corner somewhere! Unfortunately I walked up to the bar around 11pm and that also happened to be closing time! So I got a brew and hope the bartenders would keep the fun going for a bit! They did saying last call then last last call then last last last ps last call.. But all good things do come to an end and the Coors Light only flowed so far and now you are on your own as the cleaning crews come out and the airplanes say good night!
great great place to eat in the village. One of my favourites French food restaurants. Nice menu affordable and bring your own wine.
I really loved eating here. The poutine was incredible. Best I ve had. Then I got the blackened chicken sandwich special which was also spectacular very spicy but very good. Also the sustain a burger a burger with all local ingredients was great. On top of all of this they have the friendliest staff of anywhere in Madison and some great beer. Would highly recommend
I was very impressed with CareNow facility staff nurses and physician assistant . The facility was clean and the wait was not bad. They took very good care of me and explained everything to me in medical terms I could understand. I gave them a five star because they definitely earned it with their professionalism.
Great place! And very professional. I was worried since we re from out of town but both stylists were nice people and competent. Morgan did the best beard trim ever. Recommend highly
Really good stuff. Lots of noodles and BBQ items.
AMAZING! All I did was pay through PayPal and got an email that my ticket was reduced to a moving violation! No phone calls.. No office visit.. I m so happy to have found him! I work A LOT so court and traffic school were not options. LV Traffic Ticket Guy worked everything out perfectly!
When my friend told me about this show it sounded boring . I just came to accompany her . However I was surprised to find that I really really enjoyed the show . The show was really funny . The music was good the lights were nice the dancing was cool and entertaining to watch . The atmosphere of the show was great . I would really recommend watching this show . You wo not regret it .
Always interesting always trying to do interesting provocative art. If you are looking to see yet another production of Oklahoma! this is not for you. If you are looking for a show that will still have you thinking days later this is a great theatre to check out.
There was nothing for me to distinguish my first experience at Galito s from any experience at Nando s. That s a good thing. The chicken is flavourful at any of the spice levels and the Peri sauce will always make anything taste good fries especially. Great restaurant. There needs to be more of these.
One of the best sandwich places on the strip. Sandwiches are hot and fresh delicious
We had Jon as a sales rep and he was incredible. A vet of the car biz for 15 years it definitely showed and we made the best decision possible.
A very tasty lunch or dinner option. The portions are filling and the meat and toppings are fresh and flavorful. The French Fries are a perfect accompaniment. Service is quick selection is vast and there are thousands of interesting soda choices as well as fresh brewed iced tea.
I have been going to this salon to get my nails done for years and I absolutely love it. It is very clean they give FANTASTIC leg and foot massages with the pedicures and Trina does a wonderful job on my nails. And if they have enough people they will do my fingers and toes at the same time so I can get out of there in about an hour! Love this place!
Meena did a great job.... she s very nice and listened to what I wanted!!! It s been months since I got my brows threaded because needed to let them grow out bc of that last person who did them.....and usually it s quite painful but Meena did such a great job without all the excessive pain I usually get... so I had her do my lip too!! THaNK You!!!
Got my nails done here recently and absolutely loved how it turned out! The gentlemen that did my gel application was very concise and really made sure my manicure came out as perfect as it can be! They did not have the original colour that I chose but he made sure to show me many options that was similar and made sure that I really enjoyed the colour! They were able to take me in the same day I called for my reservation as I expected them to be busy with the holidays which was really nice! They also have TV s around the salon which is great because I was also able to enjoy some MNF! The inside of the salon was very chic and stylish. Will definietly go back since my gel application was only about 46 with tip! Very reasonable since that I am in love with my nails! Thank you Polished!
The MGM is my go to comfort place and wanted to thank the staff for such a wonderful stay and making me forget about the real world for awhile and put the brain on fantasy island. I was so impressed with all of the changes that have occurred here and the new restaurant experiences that they are offering now. I am especially grateful for the new check in technology for ones room with your phone. Absolutely amazing.
Love this store. The employees are always so helpful. I even had one stick with me for over 30 minutes while i asked a variety of questions about their selection of essential oils. I come here a few times a week and always seem to find something new
I d give them 10 stars if I could. They are such a favorite that that I go once a week. And that is with me limiting myself so I do not go overboard. The staff are always friendly and food is delicious.
I ve been to so many furniture stores in the valley both one of a kind and chain stores. Hands down my favorite furniture store. Unique quality items you wo not see everywhere. They also can get items that other stores have as well at a much lower cost. Just ordered a sectional with custom fabrics to make it a one of a kind. Same item at another large chain store was the same price with no customization.
My fianc and I had dinner here during their opening month. The decor of the restaurant is not particularly impressive but I m sure that it s a work in progress. The food and the staff however were wonderful. My fianc had the wonton soup and green curry while I had the Tom Kha Ga soup with the lobster pad thai house special! . I wish that I had taken pictures of our food because the presentation was lovely. And the flavor of the food was incredible it s certainly some of the best Thai food I ve ever had. My soup was rich and creamy while the pad thai was spicy by request and flavorful. The servers were very kind and able to recommend particular items from the menu. We will certainly be returning here sometime soon and we look forward to watching this restaurant grow.
We had two night stands one of which my husband tried putting together. He got about 3 4 done in 5 hours! Finally we called Jerry after reading the great 5 Star reviews on Yelp. Jerry was able to put both together in 1.5 hours! He even offered to have my husband look over his shoulder saying I m a good teacher ! If you want a friendly smart handyman Jerry is the guy. Thank you again Jerry. You made our day. Patricia and Joe
Their beef and broccoli is superb along with the lo mein and hibachi seseme chicken. The restaurant is clean and buffet has a variety to choose from.
Great place to eat. I have lived in Vegas 14 years without ever even knowing this place existed. My sister and I found ourselves looking for a place to have lunch after my nephew s baseball game. We saw the reviews and that the restaurant was five minutes away so we stopped in to lunch at Jamms! The place was packed. We waited about 15 minutes for a table and another 15 for service but the waiter kept the coffee coming so the wait was not horrible. My favorite sandwich in the world is the Reuben and can I just say yum! Freakin AWESOMENESS! I will definitely be bringing my husband with me for round numero dos!
I really like this place. Service is good and food is great. We ve been for dinner and brunch. What a unique place for brunch! Excellent selection. We will definitely be back.
I m going to admit it I m not a huge Vegas fan though with Fix the Bellagio fountains Star Trek Experience and a few other things I would definitely go again. This hotel is the place to be. It s got fun and whimsical theming and they constantly are e mailing me with specials for 79 night Sunday Thursday. Works for me. The interior is lots of fun and I really truly enjoyed the experience. I do not think I ll stay at anything older than this place because now I m spoiled!
Hilarious. Went with my husband and in laws and we all laughed our heads off. Great length and lots of fun. Carrot Top has a good sense of humor about himself.
Proper sports bar. Proper food and maybe even a bit of a Cheers atmosphere. When you walk in it s almost as if you feel the urge to start singing Where everybody knows your name ... Just one thing asking me if I m ok is fine with me but please do not do it so often that I m beginning to doubt my beer drinking skills.
The food was amazing our server Lee was just fun. And for a group of 50 people I d highly recommend it. When you can get the food right for a group that large you know they re doing something right. I asked for a specialty cocktail menu they sent the bartender over...umm can I take this menu to go hello hotty! All the staff knew the menu backwards and forwards. The decor is beautiful. Our drinks never went empty nothing was taken without us being asked. Great place for large groups!
Besides a taxi and your own feet this is one of the best ways to get up and down the strip. The train is very safe as when I was there I always saw Transit Police at the stations and on the trains. I even saw them with bomb dogs checking the stations and train cars. The stations and trains are very clean!
This place Is awesome! They did a wonderful job on my car. The paint was perfectly matched. They work for you. Customer Service was perfect. Hopefully I will never get into another accident. But if so Las Vegas Auto Body would be my go to.
Absolutely love this place and learning more of about Middle Eastern cuisine. Manakeesh has become one of my new favorite foods they make it so fresh and tasty here. I took my mother her and she loved it as well.
I ve been very happy with my last two Vegas trips. Back in February Chris hooked us 6 girls up with free entrance drinks and got us to the front of the line at the Ghostbar day club. It was one of my favorite Vegas experiences for sure. Me 6 of my girls and 2 guy friends just came back from Vegas after 5 days and 4 nights. I used the website and Chris hooked us up the entire time. As required we started at Palms nightclubs Thursday. Loved dancing on the patio overlooking VegasFriday we pretty much walked right in to the pool party at the Palms and had an amazing time. We went to The Bank Friday and Pure Saturday. We were on the guest list for XS last night but were too partied out. Everything was perfect and Chris text me everyday with basic info for the night. At one point we were running late and he text me some advice and got us on a second list just in case. He also modified my online reservation when two other guy friends decided they wanted in. Very good overall experience now time to detox!
I have a highly complicated ductwork setup on a flat roof i.e. spiderweb of ducting under foam . After having another company spend nearly a month butchering my 15 year old Goettl heat pump long story but they did make it right we came to the conclusion that 1800 to replace the reversing valve in the old battle tank was too much to spend on such an old unit. I decided to replace the unit. I had 3 people come out to do quotes 2 Fridays ago including the ones who spent nearly a month working on it. After a week only 1 responded with a quote of 9 600 for the bottom end 5 Ton Trane heat pump. The two others never bothered to follow up. I found that odd as I live way out in the sticks so it s a haul out here. Anyway I decided I needed another quote and called Cooling for Less last Friday. Their quote for a Carrier 5 ton heat pump with heat strips also the bottom line unit was over 4 000 less than my other quote. They asked when we could get started and I responded yesterday! . We agreed on Monday if the weather would permit but they had to push back due to high winds and rain. They called to let me know Monday morning. They started the install on Tuesday. By the end of the day Wednesday we had heat again for the first time in 5 weeks! The only reason it took two days was because they had to have a new transition piece fabricated to go from the over under config to the side by side config which happen to be on the wrong sides. Remember I have a spider web of foamed in ductwork that can not be moved without risking major roof leaks! They actually made a comment that this was a fun install due to having to figure out how to get the unit in the space provided and do the transition to the existing ductwork. It gets about 14 degrees colder here than downtown Phoenix so we ve been using a lot of space heaters for the last 5 weeks to keep this 1 2 of the house warm. It got down to 26 degrees Wed night and the unit performed like a champ and actually shuts off rather than running constantly all night long going in and out of defrost mode while barely keeping the house at 68. Airflow is better than it ever was with the old battle tank. I m considering closing the vent in the master bath toilet room as it s actually getting unbearably hot in there whit the unit running! As an added bonus we can hear each other talk when in the courtyard the old Goettl was NOT a quiet unit that s why we call it the battle tank! Great job honest no BS prices and gave me a lot of free advice on what is probably the most arcane A C configuration ever. There are a lot of ripoff artists in this valley when it comes to HVAC. There are also a lot of techs who do not know their condenser from a hole in the ground! These guys are knowledgable professional straightforward and have won me over for all my future HVAC needs.
Of course I would find a dying need to write my first review a day before my test on fungal agents vaccinations immunosuppressants. Typical. This is an upgrade from my last procrastination activity though online shoe browsing. Everyone has already commented on how this is located in some obscure dark corner of a strip mall so i ll skip onto the juicy stuff. So the first negative thing I have to note is that my body went through an MSG overload after we left the restaurant. My bf and I must have been on the brink of dehydration for hours after the meal no thanks to the casinos there are ZERO water fountains on the strip but judging from the volume of food we had and the inescapable dashi seasoning in japanese food that sounds about right. We had a FEAST. And all for 60 for 2. Highlights Agedashi tofu fried on the outside for some bite and texture so buttery soft on the inside sitting in dashi broth. Kobe beef tendon a thousand times yes! this was our favorite. the tendon was fresh and just melts in your mouth. Kurobuta pork cheek Chicken breast wrapped with chicken skin salted crispy skin juicy morsel of chicken. Fluffy cheesecake ok the description is really lacking here. its really a mousse of cheesecake sitting on top of a thin layer of very finely cubed fruit! and on top of a dark chocolate? cookie crust garnished with some raspberries a little raspberry sauce and green tea powder. it was so light and refreshing i savored every single bite. Skip Poached egg w sea urchin and salmon roe the description fails to say it basically sits in a mucous y okra broth. Potato corn i get the novelty but once you get over wondering how this came to be you realize youre getting ripped for a small morsel of bland veggies. Butter sauted scallop with soy sauce salty small a smidgen overcooked 7.00. i mean with that price you could buy TWO orders of the beef tendon... Tips Call for reservations. A party of 4 was turned away in the beginning of the night and was told that it was completely booked for the night. It was a TUESDAY so yeah plan ahead. The bathroom s cute. It s got a cute forest theme going on. Very very memorable meal. I have tons of pictures not sure how to upload but I m already moving on to my next procrastination activity Dexter.
Love the thin crust pizza. Friendly staff and fast delivery. One of my favorite pizza delivery joints in Scottsdale.
The new owners are nice. They remodeled a bit and added a few things to the menu. I liked the place before and that has not changed. It s the same basic menu. Price look similar. There are a few additional menu choices like smoothies and chicken wings. The salad is really good. Everything is cooked to order.
Amy was so helpful and knowledgeable! Great customer service and care. She kept me updated about every step of the process and my ring turned out beautiful!
Came here on a Saturday morning for dimsum with a group of 11. At first we were given a table in one of the shared rooms in the back of the restaurant but they moved us to the VIP rooms with the motorized lazy susan note the lazy susan has a button to stop it if you ca not grab all your food in time This place is really nice and looks upscale. Their dimsum is not ridiculously overpriced but still definitely a bit more than other places so I would only save this place for special occasions. Some of the dishes will have more creative plating than others probably check the Yelp photos for ideas . One of the ones that stood out to me was the glutinous rice with chicken! They re usually wrapped in bamboo leaves but they plated them like little finger sandwiches! The bill came out to about 200 after tax and tip for 11 people which is okay. I would want to come back to try their lunch lobster sets which they are most known for!
Wide diversity of things to do here! Hiking running biking canoeing kayaking even riding the train! Free parking and free entry. Scenic no matter what time of year.
This place is TRULY 5 stars!! When my girl Tammy left I tried yet another salon down the road. What a big mistake. With all the competition on Eastern do not waste your time going to any other salon GO TO THIS SALON! The owners must really know what they re doing when they hire their girls because they really provide a great service. I went to Vanessa. She is usually busy with other appointments which is a great sign in my eyes but she s worth the wait. She fixed my eye bows after a month of growing out. There s still a few spots that need to grow out but so far she has been very consistent and patient. I even tipped her extra this time just as a thank you! for saving the hairy things on my face. Lol. As always the salon was clean and well kept and everyone was very friendly. DEFINITELY Recommend!
good food at a reasonable price can be very busy on the weekend with a line up of people waiting.
I came here because of a recommendation from my boyfriend. Excellent food excellent service. As soon as we walked in we were politely greeted by the hostess. Although we were told the wait would be 20 minutes it only ended up being 10! Our waitress was attentive and was helpful in menu decisions. I settled with the Carolina Pork BBQ small plate. It was delicious! The portion was a lot larger than I would have expected. I will definitely come here again.
I accidentally came across this place when I was in search of the Guinness Store and as fate would have it...IT S NEXT TO THE GUINNESS STORE! Um...AWESOME! Do not let the tiny entrance fool you! This place has 3 rooms! They sold me with the prime rib and i must add THIS IS THE BEST PRIME RIB I HAVE EVER HAD. And also...It s enough to put two people into a food coma! THAT BIG! But seriously you cannot come here and not have a drink! I had my first do not laugh white Russian here. Not really sure if they re suppose to taste that good everywhere else too but omg yum! So if you want your monies worth really good food and live music in a super cool atmosphere...GO HERE! Worth the price worth the foot traffic JUST DO IT!
my only complaint about the henry was that it was hard to find for us. we came from the aria and there were no signs for the cosmopolitan from the aria. and once inside the cosmopolitan there were no signs were the henry. there was one sign that said restaurants but it pointed to an all saints store! we had brunch here and i thought it was good! the service wasnt bad but it wasnt stellar either. i had the soup of the day which was a prime rib soup with seasonal veggies. when it came it was bright red so i was skeptical. it was actually more like a beet and prime rib soup. it was actually pretty good. i had the henry which is just a normal breakfast of 3 eggs a meat and potatoes which i subbed for fruit. i asked for sausage links but im 50 sure they gave me chicken sausage instead. i wasnt too picky so i ate it anyways.
Great little neighborhood hole in the wall. The food is the real deal and prepared to perfection. We had the fresh Spring Rolls Pho Soup and Thai Iced tea. Would highly recommend and will return!
I had a wonderful experience there. The owner was very friendly and the prices were reasonable. Raul the owner was very patient and explained in detail what he was doing and how everything worked. I felt like he cared about me my car and the attention to detail. Im going to recommend my friends and family to choose Lobo Auto Accessories and i WILL be coming back!
A group of us went here for the first time today and we were all impressed! That Schnitzel Place has a great selection of schnitzelly good sandwiches. The sandwiches are all priced the same and you choose the type of meat or portobello mushroom for veggie loving folks and then select a topping theme . Each topping theme has a combination of fresh veggies and sauces which are paired perfectly. Portions are good. I think we tried just about every sandwich type and everyone had great things to say about their choice. The schnitzel itself was beautifully fresh and crispy and not greasy at all which was nice. They also have soup and other sides like potato salad. The soup comes in a meal size or a perfectly portioned side size a great addition to the sandwich. The counter staff were friendly and prompt. One of our party members had a small mistake with her sandwich. Not only were they quick to fix it they also came by later with a voucher for her next meal. Great to see good customer service. I will definitely be going back there!
Great times with friends last night. Wish it would have lasted longer. Ca not wait till next time.
Delicious food healthy and tasty. The owners are very sweet and work very hard. The only reason I did not give this 5 stars is they have raised their prices and a 14 souvlaki plate is no longer an affordable option for me. Great food!!
Great comfort food! I had heard about the Nook Kitchen from a co worker who raved about it. It s a great space which I could see being very busy for happy hour and on Friday nights. The food was excellent. We tried a few of the bruschetta fig and chicken artichoke . My friend had the pizza which was excellent thin crust . I had to try a piece. I had the bolognese pasta which was yummy. The pasta is made in house and you can tell. The sauce was amazing and I almost felt like licking the plate but I know that s not appropriate . Nick our waiter was very friendly and provided us with good service. I look forward to going back again.
I ve heard about this place for a while and finally my girlfriend and I went there to get some sushi grade fish. We were both very pleased with the quality of the fish as well and the friendly service we received. We ended up going back there again and we saw some people ordering fish and chips. It looked amazing! We ended up trying it and it was delicious. A week later we went back again since it was THAT good. Wonderful little gem!
LOVE THIS PLACE. I wished I lived close by to shop at this place for fruits vegetables and MEAT. It s a must stop if you re visiting Cleveland. Started my self tour with a coffee from City Roast good coffee walked all the aisles and kept debating if we should purchase any meat even though we had a long drive ahead. Found rambutans at the fruit section which brought homeland memories for me. I m from Malaysia originally and my grandma had this fruit tree in her backyard. All in all a great market. Hoping Indy would have this at some point.
I highly recommend this company. Employees go above And beyond for people he s caring and generous. Support small business!
The grub is better than most other bar food I have encountered and Casey Jones is a regular place to visit for me. The honey hot wings order extra crispy are OUTSTANDING! I will order them that way from now on. I mixed it up on a dozen. Half were honey hot the other half medium. Honey Hot wins out. The burgers and salads are great ranch dressing . Very expansive menu that offers a variety for the most discriminating pallet. ha ha 2.25 bud light draft. 3.00 craft beers on Thursday I think. Anyway it is a great place to chill and watch a football game meet clients for lunch or just swing by for a beer and some wings.
Really delicious. We tried different pastries and they were all wonderful!
This place was recommended by a friend several years ago and we finally made it there for dinner this trip. The place has plenty of character and the staff and service was fantastic. The pasta and garlic bread was great and a bonus is the all you can drink wine that comes with your meal. Be prepared to wait an hour or so for a table but it is well worth it.
We used DANG! Fine Rentals for a lounge area at our wedding and they were fantastic to work with. I had a pretty specific idea of what I wanted and their pieces 100 matched my vision I love their unique style! . I planned my entire wedding while living on the east coast but Matiana was super accommodating to my schedule and sending design boards and whatnot via email. They were up front about all of the costs involved and everything went off without a hitch on the big day. Thanks again for everything! The guests loved the lounge especially our little flower girl in the photo!
Just left from their monthly or daily half off everything sale. Honestly found lots of nice clothes and pants especially pants! I m from CA so comparing Goodwill s this Goodwill it s much more organized nicer and has much more to offer! Checking out the cashier David was the sweetest and most social employee I ve ever encountered! He greets and asks how the day has been and so on! For a first visit this Goodwill is a place to go!
This place is awesome I came here at least once a week and the food and service always has been exelent my favorite item in the menu is the pho beef soup it is delicious. The only bad thing about this place is they close every tuesday.
My neighborhood Froyo... Golden spoon got it good! Love it here! My mom was craving for Froyo and we decided to stop in with all the good yelp reviews. I love the texture of their Froyo... Very thick and flavorful. Love the waffle cone options and free topping with check in. Love the punch card touch as well! I ll be back! Mint Froyo with Oreos... Yummy!!! I m a fan. miss yelp 2015
A different type of sandwich as it is heated meat. They do come fully involved with mayo cheese and everything else so not terrific if you are watching what you eat. But you can eat healthy if you remove the fully involvement. The bread is really good and a pickle spear comes on the side. Their chili is super good too but has enough calories to be a full meal by itself. One unique feature is the computerized drink machine. You can combine so many drink combos that you could come back everyday and not have the same one.
Une belle dcouverte! Nous sommes arrts ce petit restaurant par hasard et nous avons t trs surpris ! Les dumpling etait incroyables et les ailes de poulet sont divines ! C est un bon spot pour essayer du coren pour la premire fois !
me 10 other girls went to Spacco to celebrate my friends birthday on saturday 20th of december. It s a small restaurant bar and they have pool tables on one side. This was by far the best experience I ve had at a place such as this. I think what set our experience apart was the fact that all the staff was smiling including the bouncers everyone was sooo happy and soo nice. Our waitress cant remember her name but she had a blond bob was super friendly and sweet. I never once felt that we were an inconvenience to her and she took the time to make it a wonderful experience for us. Great night and highly recommend this place!!
Been here countless times! Love the service! Best Prices in town! Brought in so many family and friends! They throw in a Free screen protector and take care of you like I like! You ca not go anywhere else! Thanks guys! You know I ll be back!
Small coffee shop tucked in the corner close ti spadina and king intersection. Getting my coffee from here is my everyday morning ritual. Definitely the best coffee in town. The other things I love at this place is their super buttery croissant I have it whenever I can of course not as often as their coffee because of the CALORIES! Love their coffee flavoured Gelato. If you are around do visit once I am sure you will love it!!
I came for a visit to my hometown last fall. I decided to stay close to downtown for the sake of convenience. My mom suggested I try The Clifford House and I m glad I did. Located a short walk from the West Side Market it s close to a lot of attractions and cool bars restaurants. My room was comfortable and roomy for two and very clean. I even had my own bathroom. Parking was no problem at all. The owner is personable and fun and full of information on what to do and cooked up a decadent Sunday breakfast. I will stay here again!!
The building itself is a work of art. The staircase and the view from the roof are two of our favorite things about all of Madison. Those alone deserve 5 stars Add in the modern art collections and always inspiring exhibits... we love it here!
Great looking spot for a casual bite to eat in the Linq. As with all YH the beer list is impressive and they offer little taster sized beers if you want to sample. If you ever wanted to become a beer snob start here. Try them all. Beyond the brews the menu is LARGE and covers salads snacks sammies steaks desserts gluten free etc.. It s like the menu at a NYC diner only with some class and fresh er food . There s a sweet patio a 2nd floor and even a take out drink spot in case the shite beers at O Sheas are not your cup of tea. With big TV s around and a HUGE center bar it s a comfy spot to hang and watch a game. Two thumbs up from this guy for YH!
Good food nice service. No line today. Lucky me. This is my first time here. My first stop in Las Vegas. Everything goes well. I m happy. Going to walk on the strip after this.
Simple reservation system simple check in nice clean slips water sewer and electric hookups and a good price. Excellent value for the money overall I give them. 95 if the fire pit and table was a bit closer to the actual campsite I would give them a 100.
Simply the best pho in town. The broth is tasty without the MSG. Toppings and meat are of high quality with little fat and gristle. It is my go to place for visitors who want great Viet food esp the pho.
BSG is our go to bike shop for repairs and accessories. Knowledgeable honest and all around great guys are there to help you! Their prices on accessories beat Amazon things we compared anyway . The shop is super cool and easy to get to. They have used bikes at good prices along with new. The only reason I did not buy my bike here is that my brother gave one to me as a gift and lives elsewhere! If you are in the market for a road or mountain bike or just have questions visit BSG!
There is a Taco Tuesday for every preference in Charlotte and the Burrito Factory fills the niche of takeout flour tortilla especially in the middle section of South Blvd. 0.99 tacos with chicken beef or pork plus a smattering of other fillings like cheese shredded lettuce pico cilantro and others. Sour cream and guacamole are extra. Queso dip with chips and the slightly spicy special orange sauce are a must. The service here is much friendlier than it necessary for such a solid deal on tacos. I ve enjoyed a hearty burrito here in the past but find that I do not veer to far from my spicy chicken tacos these days. Only thing I would change would be to use a different serving utensil for the meats so that you would not have any residual liquid poured into the taco as it makes it a bit messy. Really though this place has it dialed in for a good Tuesday lunch or dinner.
Thank you for a wonderful dining experience. We were sincerely greeted upon entering. The staff was so nice and answered all questions. Everything sounded so delicious it was difficult to make a choice. The food was amazing. Will most definitely be returning. Thanks for not overpricing the entrees.
Full service salon downstairs with a boutique selling L Oreal Professional products as well as brushes and curling flat irons and dryers. Upstairs a school offering same service at greatly reduced prices.I ve been coming here for years now for my colour and have always been happy with the results. One caveat this establishment is predominantly Francophone so be sure you re comfortable with expressing yourself and what you want in the French language.
Trying the beer can Rippin chicken. You get chicken a side and a biscuit for 3.99 ! Ca not beat the price and the chicken is fantastic .. On our first trip here I had the catfish .. It was disappointing at best . So glad I gave it a 2nd chance chance because the chicken is fantastic and the mashed potatoes and gravy are the prefect side .
Wow their gelato is so good! The ladies there were very helpful and let me sample many of their favors. Bought some macaroons from them too! Highly recommend!
This is my first time trying the place after reading many positive reviews. Inwent there on a Wednesday lunch time. Managed to find a parking spot on the street. I was there early so we were the only customer. This place is small but not tight. We ordered the trufflenfried rice and sesame pancake. The order arrived in relatively fast consider they made everything from scratch. They have open kitchen so you can hear and smell what they are cooking. The fried rice is a good portion. Do not expect any Chinatown side dish even the owner is Chinese. The rice was very tasty and aromatic. The sesame pancack has four big pieces strawberry preserve and whipped cream. The preserve is very delicious. The only thing I like to suggest is the amount of sesame paste inside the pancake can be reduced. The pancake can be a bit softer but I think that was due to too much sesame paste. Overall the food experience is very positive. Another suggestion is the ventilation can be improved in the restaurant. Being a small capacity with open kitchen can be a challenge to the customers clothings. I will definitely go back to try the other menu items.
Big burgers VERY friendly service manager came around and asked everyone if they were satisfied. I m impressed
The food at this restaurant is awesome. Along with awesomeness comes a huge bill at the end. When I say huge if you are a normal person it s huge. Maybe pocket change to some of the tech crowd and super rich but the normal person be prepared huge for final bill. I went to this place fully expecting I had the bone in ribeye and my wife had the filet mignon. The steaks were cooked to perfection. We shared the salted baked potato and the Mac and cheese. We also had the house Cesar salad. We also had a bottle of wine with dinner. The Cesar salad is a standard salad and there was nothing really special about it. The mac and cheese was awesome! Probably the best I ve ever had at an expensive restaurant. The salted baked potato was equality awesome. The steaks were cooked just as we liked it. The meat was tender and tasty. I had the special the 12oz bone in ribeye for 69. The 20oz porterhouse is 157 and the 15oz strip is 82. I m sure they are great but I will never know. To top it off we shared a piece of lemon cheesecake. Again awesome. So rich and tasty. It s a must share. The wine! The lower priced bottles start at 140 and go up to about 1500 a bottle. The average price for a bottle is around 400 to 800. You can buy some wines by the glass but a ball park price is about 40 a glass. Although I probably will never go back if I struck it rich I d be there tomorrow. I m not one who believes places that are expensive are great. And I have reviewed some places that were not worth their hype. This place is down right EXCELLENT! The staff was friendly and helpful.
Went to Becketts s on Saturday night in a group of 6 of us it was absolutely excellent as usual we were helped by J.C a wonderful knowledgeable guy along with the rest of the staff if your coming in from out of town you wo not be disappointed.
I m so happy I found her on yelp! She was so sweet and accomodating to my schedule. She actually talked me OUT of hemming something and saved me money! unbeatable prices too. I had her hem and steam a chiffon bridesmaid dress.
We used Alan s Air when our A C needed to be replaced and we could not be happier. When our rental house A C had a problem in mid summer they were there to repair it the same day. The owner Alan is honest and very easy to work with. We wo not call anyone else if we need a A C company.
Ordered take out a couple weeks ago.. I was SO impressed with the huge portions moderate prices and super delicious food. We tried the crab rangoon the drunken noodles and the pad thai. All were delicious but I liked the pad thai the best. Keep in mind the food here runs pretty spicy so order mindfully! I went a little too hot on the drunken noodles and was having some trouble finishing them. Overall really delicious and I am looking forward to coming back!
Everything here is supersized from their drinks to their burgers fish tacos and small salads. Everything I have had there has been good. I really like the grilled cheese. You can get a ton of stuff on them with 3 different cheeses. Fish tacos are HUGE and have an awesome cilantro sauce. The small salads are like 5 and piled high on a 12 inch i think plate more than enough food for me . I have not tried any of the meat stuffs veg here but Mom says the french dip is amazing and I have heard good things about the burgers. They also have a 10 bottle of wine thing and pretty diverse selection of beers. I think they have brunch Sunday too.
It shames me to admit this but I only just recently discovered Short Leash dogs but I am thrilled that they now have a permanent spot in downtown. These guys truly represent what local business is all about they serve up a unique high quality product and it is obvious that they love what they do. The unique high quality product to which I refer is of course hot dogs. But not just hot dogs. They have brats and a choice of different wieners. I prefer to build my own so I went with the all beef wiener with sauteed onions mushrooms bacon tomato bleu cheese and chipotle mayo served on flat bread. SO good. They also have their own creations which are pretty unique and creative. What s nice about Sit....Stay is that they have a nice little bar with draft beer and wine. They also have an expanded menu that includes appetizers and salads as well as some entrees like Polka Dot casserole and Pig in a Blanket which both sound awesome. The people that work here are all super nice as well and that is what makes me happy to spend my money here and support this business. Definitely worth checking out and supporting. They are close to where I work so I see myself in here often for lunch.
Thank you Hopdoddy for being you! Get the Turkey Burger! It s my new favorite! Yum to the last bite! Fries compliment nicely. Shakes are out of this world. Dining experience is cool. It always seems like it might take long but it never does. Staff are super friendly and laid back. Visit if you need a juicy burger in your life.
Probably the best meal I have ever had. Came on a weekday evening and they had a chef tasting menu available. With 9 courses we were definitely full. One of our friends did not eat raw fish and they were able to accommodate that. Service was great always had bread on our plates as well as the water was also refilled. Servers were passionate to serve us and entertained us. Be prepared to be here for 3 hours. 1st course mini oyster with miso custard and caviar our friend had lobster salad 2nd sushi course with raw salmon 3rd white asparagus salad 4th sweet pea puree 5th truffle risotto 6th halibut with shrimp and sweet peas 7th colorado lamb with duck. the duck was my favorite 8th mashed blackberries with lemon sherbet 9th Deconstructed Strawberry Shortcake. We will be back next time we are in Vegas. Hopefully they have the tasting menu available.
LOVE the kaluha pig wit cabbage. My fav!! I also got the garlic chicken and that miso mayo sauce is so delish!! Their macaroni salad is one of my favorites compared to other restaurants.
The best pizza I have had in a long time. I give it 4 stars because the area it is in is hard to find and somewhat shady. We ordered a pineapple bacon feta pizza. Even though it took me a while to find this place my fault. Forgot phone and had to return home to Mapquest the crust was crisp and the pizza was perfect! 5 stars if you open a location further north or expand ur delivery area.
I ve been going to Dr. Rob for years and he has always gone out of his way to make sure my needs are met. He is always sweet and takes his time to explain everything while making you feel comfortable. The staff is professional and always helpful. My experience has been amazing and I definitely recommend this place!
Everyone seems to have a problem with this place but I enjoyed some of the best fried rice of my life here. And my friend got some sort of popular Asian chicken dish and loved it. Did not think it was overpriced and our server was great.
A caveat my review is solely based off the customer service I received as I was setting up the cleaning for a friend. They have wonderful customer service. I was setting up service buying a gift card for a friend and they were so easy to work with. I talked to them on the phone at first to see if it was even possible and then completed the gift card transaction online. They even emailed me after completing the purchase of the gift card to confirm when I wanted to gift card emailed. For setting something up from afar they made it easy. I just wish I could tell you how the cleaning went!
I need the preface the five star rating with he fact I am totally unfamiliar with this style of Mediterranean Food outside of ordering lamb or a Gyro at other places this was a new adventure. Was looking for a bakery sweet tooth was acting up and found this deli for dinner instead. I had a combo plate with beef and chicken shawarma humid salad olives relish plate and pita bread included....I also ordered these little football looking things that o wo not even try to remember how to spell filled with meat and delicious. The great server behind the counter was wonderful with answering my questions and the myriad of spice flavors have my mouth an adventure I wo not soon forget. Think I m gonna stop by for some baklava from the dessert case before I leave town. You gotta stop here
This would definitely be a 5 star place if they had more help to keep up with drink orders. The bartenders were both friendly and did their best but what a difference a few more employees would make. Our bartender made suggestions for my beer flight and was very knowledgeable. Wish I would have caught her name but she was great.
This place rocks. I love all their beer options and funky decor. I always like to come here after I eat my favorite arancini ball at Corrado s across the street. The staff are very knowledgeable and offer great recommendations when you are on the fence. The prices are also reasonable and the mugs glasses they use are always different and cool. If you like beer come here! They have over 20 I think....
Last night we celebrated My birthday and Mother s day at Roy s. This is our second experience and it almost matched our first. The food was wonderful and our server Timothy was great even though the restaurant was totally crowded because of Mom s day. Our one problem was that they sat us next to a water station and I had a wait person running behind me all the time. I finally moved around the table but was now looking at the water station. I believe they should have moved us when it was brought to their attention. The food was wonderful as before.
I came across this location by accident but I m glad I found it. I m always hesitant when it comes to the first time I have my haircut but Emily put me at ease when I sat down. We made casual conversation and she knew what she was doing. I had given her a picture to go by since my sides are what always gets messed up. She did it perfectly that time so I have gone back numerous times now. All the staff are friendly and go above and beyond. I highly recommend this location whether you want something standard or avant garde they can do it.
My friend and I went to Le Cirque last October and had an amazing dinner and experience. We enjoyed the truffle tasting menu and it was phenomenal. There s nothing that I can say about the food that Michelin has not already. We also had a very knowledgeable sommelier who put together a wine flight to accompany our meal. We were very impressed with each wine that he brought us. What set Le Cirque apart from other restaurants was the fantastic staff. For background I had just turned 24 and my friend was 23. We were the only people under 30 and the only platonic friends. Usually in a restaurant like this I expect to be talked down to and ignored. This was not at all the case. Our servers were very respectful and treated us like any other clients and even matched our whimsy at times. It made us feel much more comfortable and less out of place.
Great mexican resturant in middle if nowhere! I like their fajitas! Also their lingua is really good.
This great airport is wasted on tired hungover people just wanting to get back home to their normal life. The airport has many stores slot machines and restaurants to choose from but by this point the last thing you want to see are stores food booze or a ding ding slot machine. Port of Subs is good for bringing a sandwich of your choice on board. I recently found the Baja Fresh...not as good as the normal chains but it definately hit the spot. There is a Brookstone which is fun to look at...the gadgets are always cool and it is a great place to kill an hour. Or you could just ride back and forth on the monorail and pretend you are at DisneyWorld. The lines are always long at security...this is never fun...I am sure that this not normal but I am usually here during a convention and I never know what I am going to get when I hit the TSA check point. TSA definately has some funny videos playing while you are waiting to be felt up...nothing like a little comedy before getting inimate with a TSA agent...they should just play every Julia Robert or John Cusak Romantic Comedy to get me in the mood. Not a bad airport to be stuck in...there is plenty of food and plenty of places to sit too...I have never had to search for a seat.
I regularly visit this Pizzaiolo location which is just around the corner from Spadina Station. This chain has the best ready to eat selection of any pizza place I ve ever been to including nine vegetarian and three vegan options which you wo not find anywhere else. I have had slices of the Casino Primavera Whole Wheat Spinotta Whole Wheat Veggie and Fredo pizzas all vegetarian and described on Pizzaiolo s website . All of them are consistently good. The Primavera and Veggie are sort of standard vegetarian pizzas similar to what you would find elsewhere. The Casino and Spinotta are my favourites though sometimes the Spinotta can be a bit dry. The Fredo is good but because it is one of the vegan options and made with just dough Yukon Gold potatoes olive oil rosemary and oregano it seems more suited to be a nice side bread than a full meal to me. The dough for all of the pizzas is good I like the tomato sauce on those that have it and the rest of the ingredients are always fresh and good quality. All slices are the same price. I get the slice and drink deal which comes to 5.99 with tax. A slice is really two slices and is enough for a satisfying meal. My only complaint is that the drinks that are available with the deal are all Coke products and the other options cost extra. There is a counter along the wall with four or five chairs where you can sit and eat. My main motivation for writing this review is that I really like the staff at this location. Everyone is always very friendly and every once in a while I get a free drink because I am a regular. I have also seen the owners provide homeless people with free food on more than one occasion.
Stopped in the mall for a quick drink while waiting to meet my wife it s an oasis in a busy mall. The staff is friendly was able to catch a few minutes of college football on TV. Took a look at the menu a few simple food choices which look great. Will definitely stop by again.
I always get Oil Change here. They are always professional and friendly. Today I came to top of my fluids free of course and found out that coolant was leaking. Julio and Michael were trying to help me find out where it actually leaks. Julio was very knowledgeable and patient. I was so worried but Julio tried to help me go through what s going on with the car Thank you! Highly recommended this location!!!
I went here on a whim my goodness Margareta pizza chicken Alfredo pizza and few places offer gluten free pizza but 24th pizza and gyros does. Few places offer Alfredo and Margherita pizzas the hints of spice make me eat the end crust so does the flavor of the bread and thickness as well. I ve never had a more perfect pizza. This is the absolute best tasting pizza I ve ever had by far. The sides are awesome if I m low on cash I ll just take one of the many specials they have for lunch. I do not like to spend more than 6 for lunch although Friday s I ll go ahead and get 20 with leftovers lunches there and have a carb loading lunch for preparation for bulking and excercises over the weekend leftovers from Friday. So a 20 dollar bill will get you enough bang meal protein carb for 2 days. I like flavor at a very reasonable price they have that. This place deserves much more attention than it s getting. In fact there needs to be a verification system in yelp to make sure you ve actually been there or are not another owner of a pizza joint nearby trying to give bad reviews to sway opinions so people spend at your pizza place. Chicken Alfredo add broccoli is a carb loading meal that tastes very good. By the way I m a cat person and everybody knows cat people are discerning as well as smarter than the average angry crab.
I ve been seeing Dr. Bhuyan for over a year now. She is very sensitive to my concerns with mainstream medicine and using prescription meds as band aids. But she has recommended things for the benefit of my health when eating exercise programs and natural herbs are not working. I appreciate her flexibility. I love the way they treat you during appointments starting with the close reserved parking spaces in the Camelback location with the no wait policy no long waiting in the reception area followed by an ever longer wait in the physician room . And it s really great having my blood results electronically delivered so I can pull them up any time I m asked by different physicians.
I was here last week during a convention and took a group of clients here for dinner. They had been here before but I had not. They selected this place and I was confident they knew what they were doing in choosing where to go. From the moment we sat down it was top notch. The atmosphere is nice and quiet and the menu is excellent. The steaks were cooked perfectly and the drinks and desserts rounded the night out. I would come back and recommend this to anyone headed to Vegas. All thinks considered in LV the price was not too bad either.
I could go on for hours talking about the marvellous and powerful car or about the ease of use of the service or even about the incredibly good deal I got but what really set this experience apart was the human touch. Nick the Silvercar representative was an absolute delight he was so enthusiastic about his job very informative about the car and the service and incredibly flexible regarding my needs. This is not something you d get from Enterprise or Hertz for sure. This is probably the best car rental experience I have ever had and I really have to thank Nick for it.
Busy location during prime time hours but you re stupid if you come here or anywhere on 83rd ave. on Friday or Saturday night and expect it to not be busy. Weekday lunch is great here with the extensive menu especially appetizers and of course the dessert. What I like the most is the good service because they seem to have a good corporate model for training their employees. I want to see the perma smile even if the server is having a sucky day and you ca not over service me or ask if I want another beer too many times. I drink a lot I tip well so I m not the person that you want to have an empty glass with on the table. This place gets it.
I gave this resto a 5 star rating because the service was good and the food is delicious I ve eaten Brazilian food but not Portuguese food. I like that the meat is grilled with so much flavour. I plan on going back in the near future it was yummy. The waitress advised us to take the strawberry daiquiri which was good I liked my overall experience ..
This bakery is bad news for me... I m trying to be skinny and a yummy bakery opening near by does not go along with the plan! May be tsp can make some protein cupcakes so I do not feel as bad when I do a post gym drive by... I got half a dozen of their mini cupcakes and two cookies. I was able to talk myself out of getting icecream they have Leppert s icecream!!!! This is amazing and bad at the same time.. May be Leppert s can start making protein icecream...? I really enjoyed my red velvet cookie and my honey loved the chocolate love chocolate cookie with M and M s if I ca not be skinny no one can! The cupcakes we got beanie monkey bite cheesecake brownie batter tuxedo cookie dough I think that was the name . The first three were mine all delicious with monkey bite being the favorite. The honey liked cookie dough the most. The cupcakes are amazingly moist and fluffy. The frosting is a little too sweet for me so I do not eat all of it. The mister inhaled his cupcakes so I do not think he had that problem. All in all having this bakery near by will be a problem for my waistline.
I almost always stop by this place when I m in Toronto for some Colombian empanadas or feijoada brasileira. It s relatively cheap and inexpensive South American food looks like mostly Chilean Peruvian Colombian and Brazilian . They also have meats as well.
Serious sandwiches! I d seen this a few times and never tried it and in so glad I finally did. Crazy awesome selection and top quality ingredients. The service was fast and friendly ca not wait to go back and try something else!
The dill Chicken salad is good not as silly as I would like it. However the broccoli salad side is outstanding. The wife got the bacon one with cheese how I missed that on the menu is beyond me. That is an amazing salad highly recommend it to all who visit.
In town for business meeting and got recommendation from hotel staff for good local place. They were serious as I saw they ordered from Isa s for delivery later that afternoon. I ordered over the phone and was told 30 35 minutes for pick up. It was right smack in the middle of the dinner hour. Pizza was ready and waiting when I arrived. The counterman was friendly and prompt to get me out the door. The pizza was hot and great tasting. I was more than pleasantly surprised to find such a taste of NY in Phoenix. The ambiance was perfect pizza joint.
I had to come here to update my review after visiting Whisky Warehouse multiple times this year for brunch and other weekend day drinking activities. My visits as of late have been awesome! The food was always good to me it was the service that needed improving to make this place awesome and it did! I always sit at the bar when visiting and the bartenders are always attentive and sweet. Inside and at the outside patio upstairs it s been great. This is now added to my rotation of favorite brunches. Plus that amazing view...
Review is for HAPPY HOUR! We decided to do a happy hour after researching we picked The Black Pig. We are very pleased that we did! 3 4 5 menu is awesome! We ordered the Frittes Pate Melt Cuban and Pork Belly. The best things were definitely the sandwiches. Both were 3 for a half...and i would easily eat 2 whole Pate Melts. They were utterly delicious. The pork belly was a little too fatty but still very tasty is really enjoyed the hash that accompanied it. The frittes were well frittes ca not say they were anything special if compared to neighbors. All in all with several drinks we walked out of there under 40. and we were very satisfied with everything. We will be back for sure maybe try some entrees but they Happy Hour one of the best Ive seen.
Lots of fun. Good value. Inexpensive family entertainment. Ok. More info. Batting cage did throw one high n tight. Do not dig in! Still not enough? Root beer floats were good too. Still too short?
Hands down my favorite Starbucks to go to!!! Not only do they make our drinks right and quick the staff is amazing. They re so friendly and nice there. Yes there s been a time or two that my food order got messed up but their kindness really makes up for that. Whenever I go in they greet me. Even when I m sitting at the drive thru window a few will walk by and say hi. Yes I am a regular but as you can see why I continue to go to this location verses any other.
My uncle has been coming here for 58 years and has never had a bad meal. He always says coming here is like coming home! I was real pleased with my experience. Had the BEST chicken chimi EVER!!!!
This was the easiest car I have ever brought. The dealer staff was great to deal with. My sales associate Bruce Emens was a real pleasure to work with made the buying experience a positive one. The car is outstanding drives like a dream.
The service was great but the food was even better. My boys and I enjoyed everything here. The pizza was the best and the wings were pretty good too. This place has a very classic feel to it. Overall a good spot to hit for cheap eats and drinks.
I ordered the big texan. The texan was basically a hamburger and bacon on toast. But dont get me wrong it was still delicious ! The food was falling out from the toast seeing as how they cut the sandwich in half. Overall my girlfriend and i enjoyed the food and service! I would reccomend this to my family and will more than likely become a regular here !
Today I went to get two piercing on my upper ear and it was fantastic! Damien aka Brown Bear did both piercings and he was so nice even though I was super nervous and did such an amazing job and it hardly even hurt! I would recommend him to anyone.
The moment you step in you smell chlorine from the pool. The lady at the front desk was courteous and prompt. The room I had on the 4th floor was awesome! A little hallway for me to do lunges nice sized flat screen and it was clean. Breakfast was bland but it was offered unlike many of the other hotels in the area. I ll definitely stay again if I go back to Akron!
Me and two friends went there last night. One of my friends had been there before. I went with his suggestion and got the Fettucine Capriciana. It was a fettucini with a lot of small shrimp the tail shells already off mushrooms vodka a creamy tomato sauce. Sooooooo good! It was 17.95. My friend that had been there before also recommended the Chicken Alfredo. So my other buddy got that. It was a very good alfredo sauce yes I tried it! and the best part was that unlike most alfredo sauces it did not get thick and clumpy as it cooled. It stayed very well. It was not priced bad at 16.95. Now the not so good My friend that had been there several times and loves the food.... He wanted to try something new. He got the Cappalini with shrimp and rapini broccoli rab . Do not get this. He said it was bland and had no extra sauce. Granted the menu says that it is made with olive oil. But it was not juicy. Had a very dry look. I tried it and I could not taste the garlic even. If that was first time for all three of us and we all had that we would never come back. That must be their one bad meal. Just say no to it! Oh! and it is 19.95! So the cheaper the better at this place. A couple quick tips Oh and get the cheesy bread! it is about 6.95 but VERY worth it! Do not get a soup or salad to start your meal. It costs extra and it is not necessary. I m 6 1 220 and I was full after eating some of the cheesy bread and the meal. I saw a guy get a pizza. It looked delicious! I did not go over and try it but it looked great. There are no windows in the place it is in the corner behind the poker room but nicely decorated. The male server was nothing special. Not bad not good. The Spaghetti Bolognese is priced only at I think 16. Spaghetti and meatballs I think 14. Lasagna sounds good there and it was in the mid teens I believe. I will definitely be back. Most likely getting the same Fettucine Capriciana again. It is great!
My husband and I both had the Walleye special tonight. It was excellent with a light but crispy coating. I was able to substitute crisp and tender asparagus for the French Fries. The peach crisp was a great ending for the meal. We will be back next weekend for the special again!
Soooo good we just got couple pieces of chocolate and one macaroon which was delicious yummm Macaroon was the best one. I loved it!!! I would say that the price is little high but it worth to try Godiva chocolates. Workers are nice and helpful.
Really good Korean Really quite quick service and delicious Bim Um Bap
I had an issue with my folding bed cover. I called in and talked with someone they told me to come down so they can get pictures and warranty it. It was that easy I pulled up he took pictures said he had to order a new one. Called me a week later and said the new cover was in just stop by and they will put it on. Stopped by one day after work and they had me in and out in under 15 minutes. Great people to work with. I sent my neighbor here for the same cover a bed rug and side steps he was very pleased as well. I highly recommend this place. We come here from surprise it s worth the drive
This place is really something special. Barrels of unique coffee along with all the favorites fill the back of the store. I love going there and smelling the coffees and picking out something fresh and delicious. Most recently I purchased the Espresso roast which I cannot wait to try. They also have a large selection of teas although I have never tried any of them yet . Their nitro coffee is really incredible and I highly recommend trying it if you never have before! The staff is incredibly friendly and will let you try some samples. Last time I came here I ordered an iced caramel latte which was made perfectly. If you re in the strip and you re a coffee lover checking out this place is a must!
Hands down the best taco shop I ve encountered here in the Phoenix area. Fast and friendly service reasonably priced good size portions and food was extremely fresh and seasoned well! The chipotle chicken was my favorite since I like a lot of spice. Excellent!!
This buffet is on another level than the other competing hotels buffets. The Decour is marble and looks fabulous. Everything is tall ceilings and beautiful. The food stations and items were all top notch and all the food was and prepared with a lot of care. I was very much impressed and I just went for breakfast. I would definitely look forward to coming back here and eating out this buffet again. I tried the mirage buffet and was very disappointed
The lunch special was 6.99. The food came quick the employees were friendly the restaurant was also decent looking. The portions of the food were huge that I had to take it home and boom I had dinner lol. I love it will def come back. Best hakka place that I know of.
We had an awesome experience! Visited the 15th floor at sunset on a Sunday evening for our anniversary. The views ambiance food and service were all exceptional. We ca not wait to return and it made my lovely bride very very happy! Mike P. Fountain Hills Az.
I had a really amazing stay here. I really enjoyed the pool and it s Saturday party. We stayed in the lower level of one of the buildings and I absolutely loved coming outside in the morning and sitting on the little outside area and watching hummingbirds fly around and listening to the relaxing sounds of the pools. Would definitely stay here again!
Plumbers in this area should have the Skull and Crossbones on their trucks. These guys are the first honest contractors we have had in 3 years. Showed up on time and did a good job for the quoted price. Definitely will use them again!
Love this place. Food quality is excellent. My favorites are the WSOP roll yellowtail jalapeno and udon. Fish is fresh. Gave them 4 stars for good food. they lost one star due to the fact that it took them 25 mins to bring me my to go box and my check. Restaurant was not busy at that time. They just need to check on their guests at least 3 times one for order two when food comes out and if we need anything else three if anything else we want or are we ready for check. Checking on us every 6 mins was annoying while we eat and completely ignored us after we were done eating was not cool. So everytime i come there i always ask for check when I get my food cuz I know they ignore me after that.
I love this Home Depot. As a supervisor here transferring in from another store all the associates are friendly and very welcoming. This team is great. I m glad to be part of the team... As for any of you shoppers.. Please feel free to seek me out here if you need any assistance!!!
Overall great experience here. Only complaint the gluten free crust is not vegan!!! They put milk in it??? Got the gluten free crust anyway and it was just okay. It was very flat and brittle. However the vegan pesto and veggie pizza options were pretty good. The meat eaters in our group really enjoyed their pizzas. The menu has good variety and the service was quick. Would recommend! Unless you want gluten free and vegan
Finally! A decent Mexican restaurant in northeast Ohio. All I want from a Mexican meal a large margarita chips and salsa and a good entree that can be scooped up into tortillas. The service is friendly the food comes out quick. Nothing to complain about. We ll be back. P.S. When they say spicy they actually mean it. Anything with diablo in the title wo not disappoint. Enjoy!
This place is amazing! My husband and I have been looking for delicious Chinese food around the University Harrisburg area. I am so glad we finally found it. Both times we went this week it was nearly empty but I noticed that in the 30 minutes we were there they had around 15 take out orders. I have tried the crab rangoons General Tso chicken honey sesame chicken and sweet and sour chicken. Everything was great. The portions were huge meat was good quality and the prices were cheap. Service was awesome as well. We will be adding this in our rotation of dinner spots.
Fantastic establishment! Crew is friendly knowledgeable and happy to answer all questions. Straight razor shave is truly a treat! I ll be going back you should too.
Great greasy spoon type place! HUGE portions at a reasonable price. Really enjoyed it. Everyone recommended it to us and we were not disappointed.
This place is amazing! I love the Kung pao chicken and the Cajun fish. Neither is actually made from meat but the flavor and texture is pretty close to the real thing. I came with a 13 year old who protested the idea of vegan and he thought I had ordered him a real meat dish.
For going to get a nail job done off the cuff in Vegas this place was great! She was used to dealing with tourists and did a great job on my nails. One girl did my hands and feet. She did the pedicure in a pedicure chair then switched me to a table for the nails. I had the gel polish and the LED lights were imbedded into the nail table. What a great idea! Every salon should have those!
Waitress asked if we ve been there before. We told her NO. She pointed out they are known for their burgers showed us the menu and mentioned the build your own burger. She never mentioned happy hour which what was going on while we were there! Almost ordered off the menu when we spotted the happy hour menu. Selected ice cold beer and All American burger. I ordered Prime rib sliders 13.95 which were not on that menu. No sides. Food was good. Noise level high difficult for conversation but will return. Hope we do not get that waitress again! Burgers range from 12 to 19. They come with home made chips and not fries.
We always shop at costco summerlin especially on precription drugs. Here s another story my wife bought some groceries the other day after paying she accidentaly left her coctco card at the counter.This lady from costco upon seeing the card went out of her way to look for my wife thinking that we were still within the vicinity. And luckily she found us at the food court enjoying our beef brisket and pizza. HER NAME IS BONNIE. Thank you very much for the kind gesture. That s what I call customer service at its best.
Panera is my go to spot when i dont fee like cooking ! i love this place so much the pick 2 menu option is the best. soup and salad for 7.99 cant beat it. The menu selection is amazing endless combination choices the soup choices are scrumptious my only gripe is this specific location always seems to be out of chicken and wild rice soup. Bummer.I usually get the half Caesar salad with a bacon turkey bravo or if i want soup i usually go the french onion route with the soup in a bread bowl.Its neat and clean inside this location has a drive thru if youre in a rush. Also be sure to join panera rewards because you can earn free food and drinks for every time you visit.
It was starting to feel like all ice cream shops were the same with the difference being just the location atmosphere and service. Typically you do not get truly unique flavors but this place has really changed that. With flavors like fruity pebbles made with real fruity pebble cereal and horchata it really did taste like homemade horchata this place went beyond what I expected.
This place is awesome. It is a sports bar so the atmosphere is sporty. Staff is awesome and friendly. Food is delicious and extremely affordable. I d recommend this place to anyone.
Always impressed with this company and the friendly staff working there. keep up the great work! clientforlife
This ramen restaurant is fantastic!! They have your traditional and so many other kinds. The gentleman was so helpful with any questions we had about the menu. This place is great!
Okay so I am not a huge fan of their tacky instructions for furniture and the items they sell really do not amuse me much but their food is pretty darn good! Whether it s fried or healthy the options are pretty yummy! Yes I said yummy...weird! LOL! Plenty of parking as is the norm with IKEA some really nice setup ideas by the people that handle their staging and good food. I m not complaining about that.
There is an AYCE Sushi place on 215 Durango I used to patronize religiously until certain rolls became dinner only. Based on the Yelp reviews decided to give Jjanga a try. The other reviewers were right about the wait but it was well worth it. We also grabbed another couple we had no idea whom they were and table shared which I think startled the staff but made wait times shorter since a lot of us were just tables for two. As a result we got amazing service. The Red Bull roll is amazing just the right amount of hot with a touch of sour bitter. Also great was the garlic tuna nigiri the poki salad and the cowboy special. I was not impressed with the Arizona Roll and that was the only downer of the night without the ginger sauce it s very bland. The fish was fresh the service was as fast as it could be for a packed restaurant the servers were attentive and it has a really pleasant atmosphere. We re new fans!
Slowly but surely this location is my favorite place to go unlike their sister store winners across the street which is a madhouse in there this place gives more of a calm and shop how you like feel its very spacious they need more racks along the lines so much space and no inventory needs to be filled. I always find something to purchase here everything is so newt and tidy. The staff here are very welcoming and do greet you upon entry which is a nice touch. I like how everything is in order and you can find things with ease. My areas to shop are the pets area very extensive stuff and lots of bedding you can buy the furniture section is like a mini IKEA which is nice also the foods and snacks area has some healthy hearty snacks at good value and in stock!! There is free WiFi here and washrooms if you need to go. The line up cash goes so super fast and one more thing if you need help do ask an associate for help they are more than willing to ...
I had a fish and shrimp dish for lunch. The fish was very fresh and tender shrimp was very well flavored. The service is also good! Highly recommended!
ok.here we go.im a 4 peaks man.so that being said....i like good food and beer hence thats why im on here duh.there ipa was good but to bitter for my taste there devils ale was good.not sold on there whole selection yet.i had 4 othere firends with me.and we all got burgers.and i was quiet impressed i got the black bean burger.they put a southwest twist on it with quacamole that over poered the overall taste.it had a bit to much garlic and pepper in it.the patty it self was mooshier than i like and not sweet bold like normal.the others had stuffed burgers.and man they were huge and all cooked just as requested.i had a side of slaw crap.dont get it to much mayo.no flavor.i.m going back to venture further in the menu so stayed tuned yelpers.stay classy
So happily surprised they have a Sarku here! I love this mall food place! It s fast and delicious. I wish they spoke clearer English tho. I found it rather rude that they just yell out your order to you in a demanding tone and then shuffling you thru the line like cattle to the slaughterhouse rather than offering up more hospitality. We are giving you our hard earned money here after all...
I stopped in on a Monday evening after work for the first time. My usual salon was closed due to observance of the Easter holiday. I spent quite a bit of time reviewing other salons around the area and was very impressed with Apple. I enjoyed a spa pedi and gel mani and it was one of the first places I have went in Charlotte that offered this special. I was also able to wind down with a glass of wine. I will definitely be back.
Vision and Love was seriously the best! We hired them somewhat late because my parents were not sold on the fact that videography was worth the money let me tell you they completely disagree with their original thoughts after working with Vision and Love. We have watched my video about 100 times and love it more and more everytime. I would recommend Vision and Love to anyone and everyone looking for a wedding videographer! They were amazing and completely captured our day and now we get to relive it all the time! Thank you!
Busy little neighborhood bar. good food and great drinks from Chris
Second time I ve been to this place for a facial and here are a few Do s and Do not s DO check out the website for spa services pretty low prices DO come in for eyebrow threading owner does an amazing job here DO check out the boutique for unique clothing DON T expect a lavish Spa Salon DON T expect the spa room where facial is being done to be closed off from the main room supposedly under renovation so there is not a closed off ceiling Do not expect soothing music all the time first time I had a facial trance type music was playing in the main room while soothing music was being played in my facial room. However since there was not a closed off ceiling I could hear the party music that was blaring in the main room. Second time was quiet So if you are wondering why I went back well after the first facial I had to let the owner how I felt about it. I had many facial before and that was a very below par experience. He apologized and asked me to come back and he will personally do my facial. I came back 1.5 months later to learn that he had let that one aesthetician go since she did not perform the facial correctly. He did an amazing job and I can see pass that he does try to offer the best service to his customer. If you can see pass the DON Ts you should give this place a try. I will definitely come back every month for the eyebrow threading.
Love this place. Healthy fresh and homemade goodness. The conservative meatball sandwich and granny s hot date are both great. Chili is fantastic. So nice to have real reasonable and creative gluten free options. Portions are very generous. The coffee is excellent. We also ordered a birthday cake and look forward to trying the breakfast menu soon.
Mainly for the music I was able to enjoy on a Friday night. They even have a dancer who delights you with her talent. Tapas are not my thing but gladly I have already been fed so I just tasted a bit of the Albondigas my friend ordered. GREAT taste. The salsa where they came had a fresh roasted flavor that I still remember. Their wine selection is interesting as my friend wanted a red but similar to oporto one of their tempranillos did the trick to satisfy her. I could not resist the temptation and ended up ordering a crema Catalana the Spanish version of creme brulee......YUM!!! it passed my requirements with an excellent. Service could improve a little bit...but I m biased being south american hahahah.
Oh my!!!! Just had the privilege of devouring the most amazing calzone. Design your own with ricotta and mozzarella cheese. Perfect proportions. Friendly service clean relaxed atmosphere. Hubbys tortellini just as amazing!!! Chef also came out and introduced himself! Love this place!
There s actually surprisingly not many Japanese style bbq joints in town. Korean bbq is everywhere but apparently Japanese bbq never got off the ground. But then there s Gyu Kaku. Pretty terrific place. The food is fairly priced and the Happy Hour beginning at 9pm offers great food and drink specials taking off a few dollars on some of their better dishes. I tried a chicken and a pork bbq dish to cook and then some mushrooms for the veggie side. And of course some sake to knock it all down. Really nothing to say but offer my compliments to the restaurant. Wait staff was good food was good prices were good. I am a fan.
Mes amis saoudiens tiennent cette enseigne depuis de nombreuses annes et dans le genre c est un des meilleurs du quartier peut tre mme de Toronto. Le propritaire toujours enthousiaste et sympathique vous prparera votre falafel prfr ou un plat au poisson votre got. Les prix sont trs abordables et le style de la maison est assez imaginatif avec ses dcors rococo en contreplaqu. Sans hsiter !
Been here a couple times and this is hands down One of my favorite new boba tea spots in town!!! The honey boba is made fresh every few hours. Their service is great if you need any modification to your drink then it can be done. Ordered the taro slush chamango and winter melon milk tea. All three drinks were very delicious! It was not too sweet at all. Will definitely try to come back to try other drinks on their menu !
My tire pressure light came on and I stopped by Discount Tire. They told me I needed new tires and gave me a couple of options to choose from. I knew they were going to be a pretty penny since these tires are huge compared to my other car. I called around other places doing my research and Discount Tires was the best deal for the tire quality and rating. Frank was the one who helped me out and instead of having to wait 4 5 days to get them in he got them in 2 days. He was very helpful and friendly. I will be back to get my tires checked and rotated. Their service was fast and efficient so that I did not have to wait long.
Not much to really write. They are consistent. My kids love eating there. I love the chicken crispers. The waitress there remembers us and our orders which is funny considering most waiters at restaurants ca not even get an order right. I love the self check out on the tables so i never have to ask for the check. Glad that technology is coming to phx finally. They also have games to keep the kids busy. Never have had bad service. Sorry but there is not anything bad to write about this place.
Great job fair price on time.
Very welcoming group of young professionals. Impressed with knowledge of equipment and programs that they have to offer. Answered all my questions without hesitation and had extra information and advice during tour. Facility is very clean and maintained. I was a customer many years ago and glad I have returned.
I attended a charity event at this hotel last night. I found the staff to be incredibly pleasant helpful accommodating and very willing to try to make every attendants experience positive one. The hotel is very luxurious and beautiful. I found the food and drinks were delicious and the service spot on. I would definitely return to this hotel again.
UPDATE 6 23 Again GREAT pink tacos chicken etc. . Tried the app platter this time..split between 4 ladies. YUMMY! Had the guac...also yummy! Great service SUPER FAST...server did not mind us walking to the bar in order to take advantage of two for one margarita happy hour until 7pm. Left incredibly stuffed. Found out that for parties of ten or more reservations are not usually allowed unless the whole party wants to eat from a set menu for a minimum price of 30 per person not including drinks. We happened to speak to a great gal who was able to help us out a bit after a few days. Happy hour margaritas are the best....friday until around 6 I think. Tacos are yummy. All food is yummy actually. Fun crowd.
I used to spend a lot of time here. Sometimes I d just wander the aisles and look in wonder or fantasize about what it would be like to work here. The store is well organized and clean and if you ve been here a few times usually you do not need to ask for help to find what you need. Checkout associates have always been great as well as the roaming department associates. The one major beef I have are the home services associate model. If you ve ever been asked have you heard what Home Depot is doing for home owners today? you know what I m talking about. If im in a Home Depot it s because something is broken or needs to be amended and there is usually a spouse imposed deadline. This also means that every second counts! I do not need window coverings new A C units new windows new floor covering or new kitchen cabinets. Someone would approach me on average twice a store visit. I eventually got more and more creative with my no thank you. I d say I rent or no they have not but I do not have time now or I m only interested in services you can personally provide before they can even open their mouths. The last one gets mixed responses but still an effective repellent. I ve thought about making a shirt that looks just like theirs and wearing it when I go then I do not even have to open my mouth. Anyway... Came here the other day to purchase something from the nursery. I asked for something trailing that does well in full sun. The associate responds you want a vine? Oh boy.
Emilie was awesome. I kept having to push my time back due to coming out of town with some last minute changes. She was very patient and kind and got to the hotel at the same time as me even a few mins earlier . She did my makeup exactly how I wanted it!!! I forgot to take good pictures of my makeup itself because I was in such a rush. But it lasted all night and even the next day. My curls did not move what so ever and curls in my hair usually go down within a couple hours. 10 10 recommend!!!
i now live 1300 miles away but always make a point to visit at least once when i m in town. they are all so friendly and hospitable the food is creative with a large selection my favorite is the christmas roll! and it is a comfortable place to meet with a group of friends.
They did en excellent job! This was my first time here and I needed my car detailed in a bad way they did the wash and a wax and cleaned the car inside and out very well. They had people doing quality checks and told me to point out anything I may not be happy about. I own 3 cars so this is going to be my go to place. They do a 100 hand wash and you get to pick out you little tree air freshener of your choice! A very cool! place thanks for all your hard work.
The only place you can go in Tempe for great service and phenomenal craft beer selections. Kyle is the man!
Pizza is pretty good and the price is very reasonable. It s sure to please those who like their own kind of pizza. The price ca not be beat and everyone can get what they want. I do wish they used better quality pepperoni. The ones they use are reminiscent of the mini pepperoni you can find in the grocery store. Other than that no complaints.
Outstanding fact based example filled classroom and range safety training from an experienced highly trained instructor. Fast paced and engaging four hour CCW training program. I took the program on 4.30.16 the instructor was Ken a Phoenix police officer with 27 years of experience and plenty of real life situational examples. It helps that he has a Master s degree in education. We got info about Arizona law and ramifications of our actions. For me I appreciate receiving the simple statements to always remember like this one from Ken We are responsible for every bullet that leaves our gun. Our class was held in a comfortable new classroom at Ben Avery range. Apparently I ve heard from people that the previous owner before 11 2015 was good...but he got a little cranky toward the end. With the new guys police officers with 3 decades of experience you get real world examples and lots of thought provoking what would you do scenarios. I saw the instructors taking time with a couple of novices providing info and confidence. ADFT offers more advanced courses and training. I think I ll sign up for them. I really feel like these guys not only deliver a strong product but also provide a good service to the community.
Great food! Delivery took a little over an hour but the items I ordered were awesome... lasagna and Greek Salad. I will be a repeat customer.
Incredible ambiance and service. We sat inside this time but will definitely plan to relax on patio in the beautiful southwestern setting! We just moved nearby and will make this a special occasion destination for our family.
I thought the name was witty and funny so I suggested that we go there for lunch while we were out car shopping. The food far exceeded my expectations. The staff was nice and answered all of our questions. The menu is not a typical burger and wing place but the flavors were great! My husband ordered the salmon teriyaki burger and said it was the best sandwich he s ever had! I had the shrimp tacos and the Thai chilli wings and the were beyond delicious. There was a great amount of shrimp in the tacos and the slaw was perfect! The sauce in the wings were yummy too! Even though this place is definitely out of the way I can see us coming back time and time again for the great food.
I am reviewing Tree City as a coffee shop. The fact that they offer so much food and wine takes away from the coffee effect to me. It suggests that they are not as dedicated to coffee as they should be. Design at Tree City is a somewhat modern polished theme with a bit of an unrefined twist. Pretty cool I guess. 7 of 10 Quality of coffee Better than 2nd wave by a good little ways but not quite up to 3rd wave yet. From what I hear they use mostly local organic products. 14 out of 20 Price For what you re getting I d give it a 8 out of 10. Baristas I have not noticed anything outstanding in either a good or bad way although some of the other reviews make it sound like there can be some fairly rude staff. I guess figure that out for yourself. 7 out of 10 Total 36 out of 50
Had a great experience here. I showed up at 2 50pm and did not realize they closed at 3pm until seeing the hours on the door. I opened the door and asked the owner if it was too late and he was like nah come on in we re still open! After sitting down he then introduced me to some of their cuisine and best dishes. I opted in for the Venezuelan Creole Breakfast which had slow roasted beef eggs shredded cheese and black beans. I also added rice to the order. He said he would not charge me for the rice since I was a newcomer and wanted to try some new things out. After the order was placed the owner popped back out and surprised me with some fried cakes as an appetizer for free! They were very good! My meal came shortly after and I chowed down on the deliciousness. It was all very tasty and I really enjoyed the rice and beans mixed together. The owner also kept popping back out of the kitchen to make sure I was pleased with the food. Overall I was very happy with the service and how welcoming the owner was. I will definitely be back!
Not only is the facility always clean the staff is always welcoming provide feedback on how our dog did and is always willing to accept our dog regardless of reservations being made or not.
Excellent selection of food for lunch and dinner! Plenty of vegetarian and vegan options. Great seafood too! Superb quantity and quality! Favorites were shrimp sumai pasta with clams crab legs mashed potatoes and sweet potatoes with marshmallows. For dessert we recommend the warm chocolate chip cookie and the peanut butter pretzel dessert.
I ve been coming here for about a year now. It took me way too long to write a review! I found the center through Groupon and was hooked ever since. I enjoy the concept of community acupuncture as it makes it more affordable to get consistent treatments. Mayo is very personable. You can tell she cares about her clients. I ve been getting acupuncture for many years now but something abt Mayo s needling gets me into the parasympathetic state so quickly and deeply. I ve recommended quite a few people here and will continue to do so!
I ve been here twice now and this is definitely my go to salon now! Lauren was my spray tan artist both times and she was very meticulous with my tan. It looked great both times. She was really thorough with her aftercare instructions. The prices are super fair too. Give the Bronze Bar a try!
Went to Placebo Space for an early morning coffee. They have Fair Trade coffee beans and incredible customer service. Love the paintings and the setup. I ll be there pretty often for morning coffee s! Waiting for the WIFI and will end up spending hours on end there.
Red rock is great for concerts dinner or just hanging out! It s more of a lcoals hang out but is really nice for everyone!
We had our dream wedding thanks to Maverick. Our coordinator Nicole worked hard to plan our day even with the tragic events going on in Vegas at the time. She made sure our flight plans were safe while being respectful and sensitive of the tragedy that unfolded just days before. They provided us with round trip limo service picking us up at our hotel and delivering us to the heliport where their friendly and professional pilots Matt and Logan flew us to the Valley of Fire. They had a lovely bouquet for me and a boutineer for my husband. The flight was perfect the sights were breathtaking and they landed on top of a mountain where we had an intimate romantic ceremony overlooking the gorgeous valley. They provided a professional photographer who really worked hard to get all the good shots. The minister who performed the ceremony asked us exactly how we wanted things to go and followed our wishes perfectly. After the ceremony they provided hors d oeuvres wedding cake and champagne. The limo ride back to the hotel was excellent as well. We would recommend a Maverick Platinum Painted Dreams Sunset Wedding package to anyone looking for an extra special wedding in Vegas.
Just make sure to go past the incompetent hostess at the front with communication problems who will make you wait for a table for 30 minutes for absolutely no reason tell you to go take a walk when there are tables available and go straight to Eric at the bar. He will take care of you. Thanks Eric! And by the way after we were already at the bar for 10 minutes and ordered apps she tried to come get us for a table.
Joe s is a great place! The menu has healthy options local ingredients and is very tasty! The history of the building at one time a house residence is cool too. There is indoor and outdoor seating which is really nice during the cooler months in AZ. The set up is different than many restaurants. It seems to me to be a hybrid of a cafeteria and a restaurant definitely casual. Patrons wait in line snakes around and out the door like an amusement park to place their order at the window. Laminated menus are provided for perusal while in line. Once the order at the window is placed and paid for then seats and drinks are next. Seating inside is limited to a side room that seats approx 40 50 and a long pub height table near the line to order. Additional seating is located outside in a back yard with shade trees picnic tables and some tables with chairs. Soda fountains are also located outside. The ordering and pick up area for the food tends to get congested. There seems to always be a line...which is a testament to the food! It s a local favorite. Family friendly. Healthy and flavorful options. Price range is 10 15 per person including beverage . On your birthday bring your ID and they ll give 10 toward your meal for your birthday!! That s always nice right? I ve enjoyed everything I ve ordered here ever. So despite the congestion I will come back. The quality and consistency make it worth it.
Now they have a restaurant in Commercial Center. Opening next week. We went for a mock service today and the food was awesome. Chorizo fries and the chorizo quesadilla was so good. Should definitely check them out.
So grateful to have found him! I accidentally broke my old phone while on vacation and had tons of pictures on it. I got my new phone under my cell phone insurance plan and he was able to get the data pictures etc . from my old broken phone and transfer it to my new phone. Even the Sprint store would not do it. It was so cheap to! I am so grateful! Great data recovery very affordable this guy knows what he is doing. Super happy girl!
I love Phoenix Chi Yoga! I practiced Bikram yoga a few years ago and was out of it for a long time. I found Phoenix Chi Yoga Studio about 2 months ago and I am back into the Yoga Morning Routine! I practice with Daniel on the Monday Wednesday and Friday 6 15am class. Daniel is a great instructor. He is patient with the class as everyone is on a different and personal journey and also at different levels. But he is encouraging to guide you further in your practice. He is whitty and fun and keeps the vibe in the room the same way. And at 6 15am that s the kind of attitude I need haha! I highly recommend anyone of any fitness level to try it out.. I guarantee there is a time that fits your schedule and an instructor that matches your needs and lesson!
This is a great little find in a stretch of Eastern that has a ton of restaurants. You can tell they put a lot of thought and caring into their meals. The fries are fresh cut the bread on the sandwiches is great and the value is exceptional. It will be well worth your time to stop in this little gem. I had the Philly Cheesesteak with no peppers . It was exceptional.
This pizza is so consistently GOOD! For specialty pizza I go to Edisons in Tremont. But when I want a good pizza without the extra bells and whistles this is easily my favorite spot in CLE. They never fail!!
I went there at 10 a.m. on Easter eve and the place was packed! They are a well oiled machine. There were two people behind the chocolate display and another employee working the register. There was a guy ordering sheesh..200 worth of assorted chocolates??? Maybe more? and the person helping him was a total pro! He offered suggestions while another lady quickly packaged the items. Anyway my family had been visiting this location for about 25 years for ribbon candy stocking stuffers etc. I ve never had a bad experience. Lastly the candy is incredible. From the sour gummies to the truffles... it s ridiculously fresh and incredibly balanced never too sweet sour salty . I love that they are still popular and clean and friendly as they ve ever been.
Came here on a double date for Phoenix restaurant week. While expensive you truly get excellent quality and amazingly fresh sushi. I ca not say that I would recommend anything on the menu since what u got was price fixed but I can say that it was incredibly delicious and left me craving more. This is located right next to the science museum downtown and across the way from the children s museum. Along with the very famous pizzeria bianco in the same plaza. It s a very small establishment in a repurposed house giving it a very private and intimate feel. I would definitely recommend this place for a special occasion or date.
I have been working out with James for 7 8 years now and he has always talked about creating his own gym! SNJ Fitness is a very clean and professional gym in fact the nicest gym I have ever had the opportunity to work out inside. I would highly recommend checking SNJ Fitness out if you are a personal trainer as your clients will appreciate it!
Ben Barnes and this Salon are THE BEST! Ihave been using Ben for the past 5 years and he has brought me through short short kinky hair to longer beautiful locks! I get so excited to go because I know that I will bounce away feeling ultra sassy! I never have any anxiety about how it might come out ...I love Ben! Awesome guy too!
I wanted to leave kind words for Jamie Rankin. I recently found this salon when looking for organic hair coloring and was pleased to find out Bangz had some for a great price that I could afford. I was a little nervous going in but since my old hairstylist was retiring I had to explore new options. The visit Jamie is a kind intelligent sharing caring woman. I have since gone back for a second hair appointment 5 months after the first and was even more pleased. She did my hair at hours of the night when most people would turn their nose and lock the door. But not Jamie she did my long hair and she did another amazing job! She is a hair goddess hair guru hair whisperer and chemist. She understands how to make colors how to apply them and cut your damn hair amazingly. I can compare Jamie s service at Bangz Art to Rolf s Dolce Salon both in Scottsdale and at Arrowhead Ulta Beauty Brands and JCPenny s. Yet no person man or woman has ever accomplished what Jamie the hair whisperer can. Jamie took her scissors and did this thing where you roll the hair in your fingers and trim up the dead ends. Tell me why at other high priced salons I have never experienced such a thing? Some of those other salons I mentioned seriously charge you to blow dry your hair when they are done super ridiculous and a poor business model. Anyways this made my hair so soft without chopping off the length. And again to reiterate if you are looking for colors she is extremely proficient in this area as well. She is a truly a hair artist and I would not recommend anyone else. Additionally she is a genuine person at heart and shares her delicious creations with you. Logan her assistant is very helpful and genuine and I enjoyed the green masks we did while I sat in Jamie s chair as she did my hair. They make it seem like they are your friend and you feel special when you leave. They are both happy and excited to share with you whatever they have. It is great to find authentic people in this world and I am glad I did. If you choose to go here I hope you are pleased with the experience and results.
This place is awesome! They have a very unique selection of drinks and a lot of Star Wars decor. I ordered my usual white chocolate mocha and there is an option to have your drink less sweet which I was a lil surprised. So I ordered it as normal and it was a perfect balance of sweet and coffee. I think I found my coffee haven Starbucks has been disappointing me lately every time I order my white chocolate mocha they forget to put the simply syrup and I am left with a bitter mess or a frothy milk drink. At least at Grouchy Johns I do not have to ever worry about my drink tasting gross. Not only is there drink selection great but also there food selection as well. They re really hitting it out the ball park with this establishment. I ordered there sesame bagel and it was yummy nice and plump and priced accordingly So if your in search of a new coffee joint or a place to hangout read write homework head on over and enjoy the atmosphere and the workers are nice as well. They also have a painting and coffee thing going on Caffeine N Canvas 35 which I plan on signing up whenever I have time. They have a lot of there previous session on the wall and you can even purchase it. Talk about awesomeness. support your locals
Meant to take pictures but could not stop eating long enough. The service was decent the prices a little bit higher than standard dim sum which is why the star loss but over all I really enjoyed this place. Some of the stuff looked a bit super sized such as the Baked buns were about half a size bigger as well as the shumai. Everything else was standard size but had excellent flavor and the food was brought out very quickly. I would absolutely come back here and pick up a few things to go. The leftovers were great up to 2 days later which is how long it took me to get to them .
Second time I ve requested service from Pure Plumbing and service is excellent. Scott and Jeff came out same day to fix a water heater issue it was old dripping water on the flame and about ready to start leaking. They took the time to find the most cost effective replacement to work with my house and set me up with a new water heater in about 1.5 hours. Highly recommend this company!
Food was good... Service was good... But if you need spicy food.. ask them to make it spicy.. or else it will be mild food... Over all 4 star
Working with this company was a great experience I was really glad that a friend referred me. Very professional and knowledgeable. My carpet looks amazing! If you need your carpets cleaned give them a call. This is now my go to company. Thank you!
This place is nothing short of incredible. The value you get for your money is really unparalleled. I ca not believe the amount of fish they put on the tacos for 5. Everything on their menu is extremely good so it s hard to choose what I want every time I go in. Although this place is small there is not much seating and there is not really decor these factors quickly become irrelevant when you eat any of their tacos. I ve tried almost every restaurant in Kensington Market by now and this is definitely in the top 3.
Ahhhh Las Vegas. The city that quite literally never sleeps with it s bright lights endless entertainment and adventurous culinary finds. Each time I go I find something I missed the time before and create new and fun memories. If you find yourself bored here you re either under the age of 21 or there s seriously something wrong with you. Vegas stay classy. Until we meet again...
A restaurant with an overall 2.5 star review is not my usual go to. I trust the basic judgement of my fellow helpers and as a rule I stick to 3 stars. That being said people are grumpy and yelping while hangry is a no no in my book. This location is BEAUTIFUL. The bar is large and elegant! The building is historic and the way they updated it fits their uses but feels cozy and luxurious. Our server was wonderful she was very busy but attentive. Her timing was perfecta do she touched base with us thoughout our meal. We used our city tin coupon without a hitch. Our bill was 27 dollars for two entrees one margarita chips and salsa after the coupon which is very reasonable. They have a tequila menu that is 6 pages long! Come on guys you can be a little more generous with your stars! I m looking forward to checking out their patio in the summer and taking advantage of their happy hour specials
Dariana is a wonderful and amazing person. She suggested the vet Nd knew what a customer wanted.
We brought our dog here to use the self serve bath and it was GREAT! For 10 I got to bathe her with yummy smelling shampoos and conditioners. It was safe and easy for me! Will definitely bring her back! And great selection of treats and toys for afterwards!
We had breakfast at Bucca inside Ballys...the food was delicious. Great service by Ramon who suggested we try the bloody mary s. Tammy was friendly and kept our coffees hot.
After having eyelid surgery by Dr. Emilio Justo at the Arizona Eye Institute I brought my parents in to see Dr. Shifrin for their eye exams. We were greeted warmly and with a smile at the front desk. Check in process was a breeze. The technician and Dr. Shifrin were both very thorough and we felt that was the best exams that my parents have had! Highly recommend recommend Dr. Justo and his entire team at the Arizona Eye Institute!
My boyfriend and I had decided to get a system for our new truck. Here Edder was very helpful by answering all of our questions and gave us exactly what we were looking for in our price rang we had set. The team Edder Jason Jordan Aaron and Vern had outstanding customer service. The completion of the job was amazing and met our expectations. The sound is perfect with just the right amount of base with not rattle thanks to Edder for taking the time to go over all the pros and cons of each product. It was worth it and I HIGHLY recommend going to this location! Thank you guys.
Bellagio buffet used to be my favorite until I tried Wicked Spoon last week. The price is 50 pp but worth every penny.
I wandered into this lovely boutique while visiting the South Side Flats neighborhood for the first time. I met the owner Fatima who was most helpful not only on her store wares but in giving me tips about other places to visit. Such a warm inviting merchant! Her store is filled with look and see treasures from around the world it would appear inluding women s clothing and jewelry and gifts. On this particular visit I settled for some sensory pampering and got some handmade soap that I ca not wait to try out. I did have my eye on some jewelry as well but that will have to wait until another visit. She also mentioned the store holds special events and that a belly dancying event was coming up.
A good cheap alternative to pricey Las Vegas meals. Thanks to Earl of Sandwich you are still able to find an affordable meal in Sin City. I had their Holiday sandwich and my husband had their BLT. Both of us were more than satisfied. My husband s only complaint was that the sandwich was not big enough for his appetite but for me it was PERFECT! We wish we had ordered a sandwich to go for the ride home.
Best bloody mary bar in the city!
This Giant Eagle is a very nice one. It was opened about a year or a year and a half ago so it looks very new on the inside. It is very clean and just looks above what other grocery stores look like. They have their own brand of upscale food called Market District that provides great food. At this location there is an Iggle Video and a child care facility for when the parents are shopping and want something for their little ones to do. There are also self checkout lines which I can t stand. They are way too hard to use. Just go to the normal checkout lines. The fuelperks at Giant Eagle are great. You get 10 cents off a gallon for every 50 you spend and when you want to redeem the collected fuelperks you go to a GetGo station of which there is one two minutes from this store. There is also a huge collection of gift cards for various businesses which you can buy and get fuelperks for. Overall Giant Eagle is a great store and I recommend shopping at one if you are somewhat near one.
Delicioso for certain! Me gusta! Okay so that is about the limit of my Spanish my taste buds speak it quite well and they really enjoyed dinner with Frank and Fina. Plus service was friendly and prices were super reasonable. The salsa had a good taste but it was not spicy. The guacamole was a ok not spectacular but again good taste and good price. I had chicken enchiladas and the chicken is white meat which always warms my heart. The flavors were simple comforting Mexican. My husband was particularly impressed that you can order roasted chicken by the pieces served with flour or corn tortillas. I agree that is a unique option. Overall for the value I think this will become our new go to for a sit down Mexican joint. Plus I want to go back to try those sweet potato enchiladas!
My family went here tonight for the first time. I have two young children one is three and the other one is six months. I found it to be very family friendly. When we entered a very nice host seated us at a very nice table. He was all smiles and very friendly. He gave us a booth with lots of room for the car seat. We sat down and we were greeted immediately by the waitress. She was very helpful with my husbands dairy allergy. She took our order quickly and with a smile. The zucchini chips appetizer was delicious. We Ordered a pizza with eggplant on it and it was really good. I would definitely order that again. The vegetables were grilled perfectly and the sauce tasted really good. The cheese was not undercooked. The pizzas little expensive for the size they are but they are really tasty. The only other negative I would say that the floors under the booths were a bit dirty. Other than that I would definitely go there again.
The smokin style sauce is DA BOMB!!! My man and I shared the combo set with Snow Crabs Shrimp and Crawfish Corn Sausage and Potatoes and we were properly STUFFED. But not in a gross way. The service was lovely the ambiance was relaxed. Just know that the amount of garlic they put in their sauce will have you burping up some serious garlic for the next 24 hours. Potent. But amazing.
Micheal in service always gives great service! I ve been to him about 4 or 5 times over the 5 years I ve had with my car. Each time he keeps me updated with everything that s going on with my car! If they find things I did not know were not workin properly they usually take care of it for me! It s never a stressful experience and I m always given a rental without hassle. Doug also helped me get an appraisal on my vehicle and I probably could have sat all day talking to him! Very nice people! My vehicle drives amazing much better than before! Always pleasantly surprised! Thank you so much guys!
I have been coming to Smile Design Center for just over 6 years... these guys are amazing. Dr. James and Ashley are awesome and super friendly. The other staff is always nice and friendly. I will continue to come here as long as I live in Vegas.
Updating in response to Barbara C s comment I have had great Indian food and this place is delicious and the owner was incredibly nice and accommodating. Please keep your misery to yourself. Just walk in and the enticing aroma will hit you and the food lives up to the promise. Amazingly delicious and worth every penny.
Looks like fast food but better tasting than any of c u sit down spots like dos reales or el toro. Seems like it should be cheaper but still worth the money.
......... I m speechless... This place is fabulous! I ordered the New York Strip and they did not disappoint. It was so tender... Usually just the filets are like butter but believe me my New York was like cool whip. The staff were fantastic I believe our waiters name was Patrick... He was so kind and helpful shoutout to him. We got a few sides and appetizers... We got escargot which was surprisingly good in its garlicky sauce but I recommend eating with the pastry it comes with. We also ordered the vanilla shrimp which was so plump and fresh and probably some of the best shrimp I ve ever had. Our waiter Patrick recommended the lobster mashed potatoes boy was his recommendation on point it was simply divine. And of course you have to have a green vegetable so you just could not go wrong with steamed broccoli. Then after leisurely eating the main course for about 45 minutes it was time for dessert... Their specialty is the warm butter cake which we sadly did not get to experience instead we devoured the chocolate sin cake. The chocolate was so rich and pure and topped with house made whipped cream and garnished with a mint leaf but you simply could not go wrong with any dessert on the menu. Sadly you ca not keep eating all night it was time to go home with a big doggy bag. Until the next time I m sure I wo not be disappointed.
Todd and his team at Gartman Technical Services are amazing. The energy and enthusiasm with which they approach projects is awesome. GTS takes the mess out of working and living your busy life from the technical end. They can do anything from set up your home network for an amazing theatrical experience to make sure your office and work computers work without headaches. If there is a problem that is causing a headache they ll fix it! I love Todd and his team. Thank you Todd for all you do!!
Went there couple of nights ago for dinner as I was craving steak and have never had a full meal at canyon creek. I was pleasantly surprised with the food and drinks. After 5 on wed and Thurs is 5 drinks and 5 off apps. We sat in the lounge for the promotion. We had the Panora chicken app which was ok however the Chipotle sirloin and coffee crusted sirloin we had for dinner was so good!! I had the double chocolate brownie to finish and it s one of the best desserts I ve tried at a chain restaurant in a long long time. The service was good too definitely worth a try.
I ca not believe I ve lived so close to this place and never stopped by. After my first visit a couple of months ago it has become somewhat of a tradition for my family and I to come by on Sunday s. You must have their michelada and the aguachile. Their tacos are pretty delicious too! The staff is welcoming and very friendly. The prices are comparable to that of Lindo Michoacn however the quality of food is much better more home made .
I went with 3 of my friends after driving by and checking the other reviews on YELP. We have been looking for a new bar in the area since the ones we d been going to did not have decent food or drink specials. A couple people from our group were from Oregon the other from Philly and me from Tampa..We all ordered different things and each of us were more than satisfied with the freshness flavor and portion size. So much so that we went back the next day. Chris one of the owners introduced himself and checked on us many times throughout our meal. It was not smoky at all compared to other places that claim to have a smoke filtering system. It was so good we returned the next day to try out Happy Hour. Definitely will be heading back soon!
Located in the Miracle Mile Shops at Planet Hollywood this place was a nice find. I have to buy my 10 year old a gift every time we go to Vegas and it s always a struggle finding something that he wo not just go eh and throw it to the side. Don was in there when we got there and gave us the usual magic spiel when I told him who I was buying for and showed us a few different tricks. They all looked pretty cool so we went for one that was about 20 that it looked like he could do pretty easy. I m sure I ll be seeing the trick done over and over again for weeks to come!
Good place. Staff was friendly rooms were a good size. Pool was big. Went with a group of vegans and they got us soymilk for breakfast which was real nice. Easy highway access and a fast trip to stuff on the isthmus. Would stay here again
Outstanding customer service old school personal attention with all the latest tech!! I m extremely impressed with the service products and their entire staff. Shawn A. GM owner SW Henderson Fit Body Boot Camp
Roxu is delicious. The staff is great. Try it. Do not pay attention to the other reviews. Had steam buns to start ramen and the bibimbap. All were yummy. They also had a kung fu movie playing and gave everyone Asian popcorn. Get out and support a new local business.
I am giving this 5 stars because this was possibly the best Thai food I ever had. There were a few things I did not like about the place though...outside looks a little dumpy it was freezing inside and the prices were a little high. The food was so good though that I overlooked these things. Great service as well.
Excellent burger place! I do not like five guys because the burgers are always soggy mooyahs were just the right amount of juicy. Fries fresh buns and shakes were awesome too. Good quality ingredients and friendly staff
Love love love! Peach Ale is my all time favorite! I lvoed the green tea flavor they had with another brewery.. wish they got more of it! The pretzels with spicy cheese and mustard are to die for. Pretty solid food service and drinks. Def go for happy hour same portions etc but cheaper worth it. Only complaint sometimes the pretzels are a lil frozen.. and the Tempe location soemtimes has some bartenders that are a little rude.. same person tho each time so I just avoid her. Also try to change out the beer special from the white ale
Go on the weekend when you can get a great rate. We got it for 100 a night. Also on the weekend you can park in the garage across the street for 5 for each visit rather than paying the 27 valet charge. This is a beautiful hotel. There was a line at check in but the front desk staff was extremely efficient and very friendly. The room was quite spacious with a sizable walk in closet flat screen TV mini fridge safe iron and ironing board. The towels in the bathroom are large and plush. We occasionally heard people across the hall slamming their door but otherwise the room was quite quiet. The hotel has a fantastic lobby with plenty of places to gather and talk. We did not eat at the restaurant but the Sunday brunch looked delicious. We did sit briefly at the bar then went to the bar in the back of the hotel which was quite cozy and charming. Pittsburgh seems to be in the process of revitalizing its downtown so although there is a Macy s across the street from the hotel and a Brooks Brothers just down the street I ca not say there is much else around the hotel. A couple of blocks away on Penn are some dining options. I never felt unsafe walking at night in the blocks around the hotel.
Oysters of many varieties shucked before your eyes and presented in an adorable wooden box. They have both sweet or saltier ones I like both so I had 2 sweet and 1 salty while my companion had 3 salty ones. We agreed that all were delicious and perfectly fresh. On the side is some grated horseradish and lemon slices. You can also add tabasco sauce or malt vinegar. What else could you want? A nice snack and great to enjoy with a bottle of cider purchased in the next stall.
I really liked Old Town Scottsdale as a tourist and I have a feeling if I lived in Scottsdale I would love it too! A compact but diverse area with souvenir shops art galleries western wear and tons of restaurants to name just some of the things you can find . I loved all the MLB team flags down the street for Spring Training. Plus the vibe of the place was electric. I highly recommend! Parking is a bit of a pain but you just have to hunt you will find a spot!
This may be a small airport but it is a nice one. There are family bathrooms and a Mother s lounge. There are not a lot of choices for things to eat but you can find something in a pinch if needed. The best thing by far about this airport is the free wifi. Having free wifi saved me from having to turn in a grad school assignment late one time! Since the airport is so small checked bags come out very quickly. Security is pretty standard but just in a smaller space.
Another one of those surprises from my husband. Got a call late. Get ready we are going out. Where? just be ready when I get home he said some of you ladies know what I am talking about and guys you know what we mean. I thought ok! he is not proposing again but a new ring will be nice lol...this one is already 14 years old but I am still loving it let say it still fits. Ok! for this one I had to put on my best piece. Off we go and it is getting late Calgary is cold most places are closed. Here we are Montanas last call for dinner order. I have to say I was very impressed with the service. At the end of the day like this everyone want to go home but the waitress was patient and nice. I would recommend...There are different location but this was Sarcee Trail location. I would go back there again.
This is a tourist attraction. It is cheap and brings you to a nice view and can be done in a pretty short period of time. The lift is a smooth ride and it gives you a brief opportunity to exchange stories with fellow travelers. As long as your expectations are reasonable it is a fun thing to do.
This is probably heaven for your mouth. The food here is incredibly tasty so flavourful! Everything on the menu is amazing no exaggeration. The cost is extremely affordable too! Super low key laid back place. The music and ambience is awesome. This place is tough to find but it s worth searching for. Highly recommended.
I ve always tried to find a good local coffee shop that is not too far away from my house aka North Scottsdale not Central South Scottsdale and here it is. I happened upon this shop while driving down Scottsdale Road and I love it. The muffins the wood decor and plant wall the chai tea latte all super satisfying. I love to come here in the morning and drink an iced chai eat an apple cinnamon muffin and sit at a wooden table with my laptop and or book. The staff is always friendly and it s the perfect spot to relax with yummy drinks and food.
Lee and Michelle are husband and wife owners of this salon. They are the best! Lee does the best pedicure I ve ever had I will never go elsewhere. Both Lee and Michelle do great gel manicures. Very nice people and excellent service!
Five stars for service and three for the food. We went for an early lunch on Sat and were not overly impressed with the food itself. If not for the excellent service I think that we would not come back again.
I had high hopes for this place. I mean really a place named Bacchanal ? I expected an amazing I wanted to use a different word but you know let s keep it clean kids eating experience and that s exactly what I got. But as with all first times things can be learned. If you go for brunch try to go a little bit later. My friends and I got there around 10 am on a Saturday hoping to beat the line that was not there btws and although I think we were able to get a good idea of what Bacchanal had to offer we missed out on the following the Italian food and more importantly the SOUFFLES. They are not available until 3 pm on weekends. Had we known different decisions would ve been made. Favorites sweet potato tater tots anything that had a quail egg on it oh. so. good the CRAB do not forget the clarified butter! and the gelato which we were able to get on the way out and enjoy whilst we walked around the casino! Oh yeah did I mention the unlimited mimosas? I think I really only had 3 4 glasses but eh who am I to turn down free booze? And you know it s Vegas. A meal without booze is basically sinful. I think this is probably my favorite Vegas buffet thus far. The varied offerings and the more hits than misses in fact I m trying pretty hard right now to think of any glaring misses and I m coming up empty make it a great bang for your buck!
Supporting small businesses in Vegas is really important to me especially when that business provides a great service at a a fair price. We ve utilized Carpet Monkey on 3 separate occasions 1 Furniture cleaning our very large couch and chair were brought back to life 2 Carpet cleaning of our rental home we got our FULL deposit back after moving out they did an amazing job! 3 Carpet cleaning of our purchased home Stanley Steemers did a horrible job at our new home. The previous owners had hired them and the previous owners hated the job they did too. They scratched up a ton of surfaces and were just dragging the hoses along our walls Rick owner of the Carpet Monkey instead lifts the hoses so there is little to no damage to your home . The carpet was wet for days and even our painter who was a former carpet cleaner said Stanley Steemer did a horrible job and there was too much soap in the carpet. Rick comes to our rescue with a fiber rinse and also cleans the two carpeted closets Stanley Steemer neglected to do. We will continue to use and rely on Carpet Monkey going forward. They are fairly priced and offer great personalize service.
Went during happy hour. Half price oysters were great fresh and interesting paired vinegars. Unfortunately they do not have saltine crackers which i eat with my oysters but the waitress offered my toasted bread instead which was nice. Seemed to be a more crowded happy hour but it did not affect the service.
To bad theres no 6 star option! such a magnificent club! huge shout out to all the friendly staff.
Dishes ranged from 3.25 to 7.50 which was a surprise for a place located in the bellagio. Overall i was impressed with the quality of the food including the obligatory chicken feet and the service. The plates were smaller than other dim sum places not located in vacation areas the ambiance was not super vegasy and the wait was about 25 minutes they do not allow reservations . I ll def come back when we re back in town though.
Great place British pub food and well brew selection. Well worth the trip cross town from Summerlin.
Love this place for breakfast or lunch!!! Great vibe and staff!! It was perfect after a hike at A mountain as it is right there. Love the outside or inside seating as well as dog friendly restaurant!!! Ordered the steel cut oatmeal with fresh berries! So yummy!!
I love pizza and this place was pretty good. It was perfect for a late night snack and easy to find. We ordered a whole pizza pie with everything on it and it was able to feed 6. It is a little pricey about 38 for a whole pizza but if I was in Cosmo again and looking for pizza I d definitely be back here. We were there late and there were some long tables located just around the corner to enjoy your pizza.
We got to here at 530pm and waited an hour for a table for 3. The drinks were good but the food was better. The portions are larger and it had real flavor. They did not play it safe like some Mexican restaurants do and make bland food. I had the pollo en crema verde super tasty and cheesy. The mole enchiladas were hearty. The AZ burrito had tender meat but that one did lack a bit of salt. And our waiter was sweet I was amused every time he walked by with his little cart to make fresh guac. He would snap on new gloves each time! That s a new froufrou thing but cute!
I m always a little panicky about having to take my car in for oil change never mind when I know there s likely some serious maintenance needs...180 dropped my anxiety level by like 80 ! Everyone at 180 was knowledgeable professional thorough and very nice. I totally dig that it s owned and run by a woman whose team includes women as well! Highly recommend! funwithcarrepairs
An excellent place to have brunch on the weekend. Rarely do you find a place on the weekend which has superb customer service AND great food. You ca not go wrong with the menu though I would suggest sticking with the potatoes or fruit.
if there s ever such thing as TOO MANY CHOICES FOR DESSERT you ll find it at Jean Phillipe Patisserie the Aria!! they have eeeeeverything from cookies to pastries to ice cream to candy to chocolate to cake to coffee .... just go overload your eyes for yourself!! with NO SURPRISE i could not decide and asked a worker for the ONE dessert i had to try and she suggested the dark chocolate mousse because you can finish it w o it becoming too sweet! it was definitely a good dessert but ten bucks for such a small dessert is just outrageous!!! which brings me to give jean 3.5 stars!!
My husband and I stopped in to check this place out. We were going to leave however Kat and Shawn made us feel so welcome so we ended up sharing some appetizers. Am I glad we did. I thought my guacamole was the best. Not anymore! This was the best guacamole I ever had and I nearly fell over dead when the gal made it in front of us! The roasted corn was PERFECT everything was delicious. We really liked the service. As restaurant owners we can only dream of hiring such wonderful employees! See you next year!
I am writing this review on behalf of my dog Rocky. On a tip I went here to get some treats for my dog. They have an entire freezer of items for dogs. I picked up a big bone and some broken down ones as well. The bones are smoked and I am guessing delicious . My dog is in haven when I give him a new bone. The next time I will also be picking up some treats for me behind the counter.
The service here is super super fast like so fast I m pretty sure they asked me what I wanted to drink before I even sat down. Service like this can be appreciated downtown so I have no complaints. I think spending 1.5 hours at lunch when you need to get back to work and on the clock can be infuriating so I really liked how fast we were in and out. I got the Chicken Pad Thai lunch I ordered it hot but it s not insanely hot. It was cheap too maybe somewhere in the 7.50 range and comes with a free house salad. Also a free egg roll with the meal. It s in the same plaza right next to Starbucks and Jimmy Johns. Easy parking and positive experience.
We love Zoe s! We go once a week and love the quality and the service. Also Felipe is amazing he keeps us coming back!
I really love Sushi Brokers! I ve been over 5 times and I ve always had pretty good service! The Sushi outshines the service hands down. Only go for happy hour it is overpriced for normal hours. But the food is seriously VERY good. All of these other reviews are just hatin .
Went on a Wednesday night and it was a pretty active night. Not packed but most tables full. We were seated quickly and served our drinks pretty quick. The service was pretty good and prompt and drink refills were attended to as well as periodic check ups on how we were doing. I had the miso soup ramen and the pork tonkatsu. miso soup ramen was just the right amount of salty you d expecct from miso soup. I thought the corn was out of place in such a yummy dish. I ordered some Hamachi sushi and it was a nice belly piece and tasted fresh from the ocean. I also had some tempura fried California rolls and that was the right mix of crunch. These guys do it right. I d go again. Maybe next time I will sit at the sushi bar. Oh the pork tonkatsu bowl was standard fare. Nothing different from your typical Japanese Local Hawaiian food shops around.
My husband and I went here for our 16th Anniversary. I had told them this when I made the reservation. Spoiler alert.....there was a card waiting for us at the table! We bought the Date for Two and it was perfect! Salad steak dinner dessert...more than enough food. The waitress was pleasant patient and fun. Great suggestion of wine. Thank you for a great evening!
Seriously the best jewelry exchange I have ever experienced! Aaron is super friendly and easy to talk to he keeps it real and is honest. I felt super comfortable with the transaction. He gave me a fair price for the pieces I brought in. Look no further people!!! This is the spot for gold jewelry exchange.
Started agility training with my miniature Schnauzer Olivia a few weeks ago and Matthew is fantastic. She is loving it and learning a lot! Great facility and staff!
I went to Fatburger twice on my recent trip to Las Vegas. I was seriously tired of the buffets and loved the burger here. Got a king burger with onion rings and a banana shake which was to die for . I will be back here on my next visit to this location on the strip.
We visited Eddie Merlot s for the first time last night after months of talking about it . Wow!! What an amazing experience! The manager Orestis was welcoming and gracious. The staff was smiling and friendly throughout our entire visit. Our waiter Yervant was knowledgeable and made excellent suggestions to enhance our dining experience. The food was fabulous and flavorful cooked to perfection. We enjoyed a delicious appetizer of BBQ shrimp and rounded out our experience with carrot cake. It is our new favorite place for a fine dining experience. Perfect atmosphere ambiance food and staff who cares about the experience of the diners. We will be back in a few weeks to celebrate our wedding anniversary. Thank you to Orestis Yervant and the other staff at Eddie Merlot s for making our dining experience amazing!!
When I drove up to be serviced the service individual s greeted me. I usually go when they first open as the wait time is better. The price is bit high but fortunately I had a discount I was able to use. And because my car requires synthetic oil that drives up the cost. Because my car requires more oil than the 5 quarts then that costs more also. I was done and out in 30 minutes. So you can drop it off and walk to have breakfast. And when you pay you are offered a 50 percent off on car wash which I took advantage of from Fabulous Freddy s. So synthetic oil change 89.00 and extra for more than 5 quarts of oil. I guess it s better than the dealership.
Customer service across Toyota is not universal I m sorry to say. I called three Toyota centers within 120 mile radius for a walk in before I got hold of Ryan Hasse at Camelback Toyota. He was realistic enough to not make promises but the intent in wanting to make accommodation for a client was palpable which were non existent in the previous three dealerships. This alone is the reason why I chose to come to this dealership for service over the others. Upon arrival he listened attentively and ensured his best to make accommodation for the walk in as well as navigating a process issue. It s the small details that make a lasting impression He was the first Rep to demonstrate sincere desire to help a customer I honestly felt like he was advocating on my behalf and this makes all the difference in making choices with my money. He also offered us water and had not overlooked our pup either. He delivered an exceptional customer experience that Toyota should be proud of today. Highly recommend asking for Ryan Hasse if you have a atypical situation involving your service. He s not a robot and he does not read through the script. He notices and negotiates through the nuances. His professionalism and customer experience are worth emulating.
Unique concept with a nice menu that s bundled into a great location. I had the spicy boiled crawfish and I m very impressed with their food great blend of flavor and quality. Only thing that I did not like was the service. Epic service failure.
I would like to thank Charles ming for an excellent job he did to our first home inspection he gave us valuable tips and information on the house. Very friendly and passionate for his job ! This is my first experience purchasing a house and going threw inspection and was really happy with the results. I highly recommend home pride inspections to anybody that needs a job well done also ask for CHARLES trust me he s the best.
Kevin and Downtown Pittsburgh Dogs are a lifesaver! I contacted them in a pinch about boarding my puppy last minute and I m so thrilled that I did. They re super professional and responsive and I totally trust my dog with them which is not an easy feat! . During our 4 day board Kevin kept us in the loop with a couple of texts and posted a picture to Facebook. This definitely helped us feel connected and reassured us during our absence. I can happily recommend DPDs and will definitely be using them again in the future.
The micro beer and the burger was great the taste of the micro brew had a nice fruit flavor that I never tried before. My server was a super nice person
Located right outside Wellesley station Funnel Cake Express now makes the idea of eating funnel cakes all year round possible. There are many different flavours to choose from with three featured flavours that are only available for the month. For December I tried the Ferrero Rocher funnel cake which was part of their featured funnel cake of the month. It came with 2 scoops of Ferrero Rocher gelato and was made fresh to order. The funnel cake came in a generous portion and was enough to share with 2 3 people. Besides funnel cakes they also have a plethora of deep fried goodies you would typically only find at summer carnivals such as deep fried Mars bars and Twinkies!
In my humble opinion there are two types of sushi joints. Ones that push the envelope on Japanese cuisine and those that leave the diner feeling comfortable. You know what I am talking about. That neighbourhood sushi bar around the corner that hits the spot after a long day at work. It does not ask too much of you and you just ask that the fish is fresh and does not kill you. Edo ko is my neighbour sushi place. I have been eating at Edo ko since it opened in 1997 I think it was 1997....I have killed a lot of brain cells between then and now and has been consistently solid in both freshness and quality. Over the years I have tried everything on the menu....except for the eggplant.....I hate eggplant. Here are some of my favs. Miso soup...simple but delicious Chicken teriyaki...ask for all white meat Udon noodle soups...I usually get the chicken or veggie Spicy tuna roll Shrimp tempura roll Spicy crab roll Oh yeah...my cousin goes to this place so often that they actually named a roll after her. Just ask for the Sylvia roll. I am not going to tell you what s in it....but I think you are going to like it. Also try asking for your rolls to be cut into eight pieces. It cuts down on sushi related choking deaths and Edo ko s sushi chef will be more than happy to oblige. As you can probably see from my list of favourites Edo ko is more about consistently good sushi than broadening your palette for Japanese food. But on a Wednesday night after being abused at work who really wants to eat raw sea urchins when a California roll is all you really want.
On the outskirts of Kensington Market in Toronto this little cafe is a hit among the student population. It has modern decor that makes you feel cozy and at home and boasts some good bubble tea. Its assortment of bubble teas is phenomenal ranging from black and green milk teas served either hot or iced refreshing slushies and hot chocolate. From my past experiences here at Stay Cafeteria I recommend their apple lychee smoothie and hot taro milk black tea. Aside from their beverages the cafeteria also boasts a small but hits the spot range of snacks and foods. The portions are quite small that is it s not a full size meal however if you re thinking of ordering a bubble tea the size would be filling. On the times I ve visited I ve tried their dumplings and noodles. Their food was a nice alternative to the foods I usually go for in between classes. I liked the dishes I ordered and was pleasantly surprised with how they tasted. The cafeteria is a great place to be at not only because it is close to the university campus for students but because of its price range. Their menu is priced at affordable prices for all and for the quality of food and beverages you are provided you are getting a good deal. In addition when you ask your waitress you will also be provided with their wifi password which is a plus. All in all this place is recommended for all! Great staff great service and great food. I dare say that it is better than the One Hour Cafeteria across the street up one block on Spadina. Food 4 5 Service 3.5 5 Price Cleanliness 4 5
I had an excellent experience picking my new mattress. Annette and Charles were so helpful they are very knowledgeable. Its a great local business with great customer service and the true meaning of customer comes first they do not push any type of sales pitches they just want to provide you with a great mattress for a great price.
I recently attended the Textile Art Alliance Fashion Show and Luncheon and was really impressed with this venue. I have super low expectations for event venues in the area I have horror stories for days but Landerhaven far exceeded my expectations. The parking valet is really easy and fast. The main ballroom is appropriately spacious and appears to have updated dcor. The silk drapery and lights on the ceiling create a sweet ambience and the doors have an interesting Great Gatsby like pattern to them. The common areas have big bay windows with natural light. The food was also surprisingly good. So often I find event spaces to serve bland chicken and unattractively plated entrees. This was the opposite. The lemon chicken was a generous portion the asparagus was nicely cooked and the potato rosette was delicious. The table rounds in general were set pretty tightly which can be problematic if your guests are taller like me with not a lot of space to really move anything around the table at all. Otherwise the staff was really attentive and I would absolutely consider hosting an event here in the future!
Awesome. Fish Tacos meatballs lamb and definately the pork belly tacos. YUM.
Dr. Daniel J Martin offers all the services of a wonderful veterinarian right at home which I wish I had known having a 90 pound dog who did not like the vet s office and who also got car sick. Trips to the Vet were not fun at all for our friend. Dr. Martin came to us for the first time in an hour of need. Our much loved old dog needed help getting to the happy hunting ground. We looked for someone who could come to us instead of dragging our painful friend somewhere he did not like to go in the first place. Dr. Martin was very patient kind and understanding. He had been summoned to euthanise our dog but took the time also to help us understand if we were making the right decision. He examined our friend carefully and lovingly and he gave us time to deal emotionally with what had to happen. His job was done expertly checking our friend the whole time. His fee s were very reasonable. I cannot think of even one thing that I wish had gone differently. Thank you Dr. Martin for helping us in such a heartbreaking moment. If I had known that there was a mobile vet who could come to us especially with such a large dog I would have used him more often for his other services.
This was my first time at a vegetarian restaurant and I was very impressed. The food flavors and textures were outstanding. I had not heard of some of the ingredients listed on the menu but that was part of the fun learning! The service was attentive and the waitresses were happy to answer questions about the menu and their recommendations were spot on. I had the seitan and it was incredible. I ve been looking for it in grocery and specialty stores since learning that it is a good substitute for meat protein.
Highly satisfied with the food and service! The food has an authentic Japanese and Korean taste the price is reasonable as well. Definitely be coming again!
Good shooting range would recommend to my friends!!! Was mostly just here to practice on my accuracy.
Wow I cannot begin to describe what a wonderful experience we had from here. Superior service began at appointment scheduling. We had issues with a different LASIK facility and they were needing to get previous scans. Schwartz office staff was extremely patient and followed thru getting the necessary scans after multiple requests needed to the other office. We are currently 2 days post op and vision is a little hazy however being able to finally function without glasses is sight. Annie is one just fabulous at making sure you are calm and any explains everything as you go along. I could not have asked for a better. Thanks again to Dr Schwartz and his staff.
This is my favorite nail salon in the east valley! the staff are professionals who take their time appreciate the work they do and have always been fun to be around! For me I want to know my business is welcome at a salon and I ve always been treated as such here. The icing on the cake of course is their work it s top quality!! every single time! Bob is my favorite technician but I ve been pleased with everyone I ve had. if you re looking for a little pampering I suggest getting one of the seasonal pedicures. They are an hour long and sooo relaxing!
Went on Saturday before the Badger football game. Love the concept. Was easy for me to stay no carb by ordering the eggs scrambled with 3 ingredients. I chose 2 yr aged cheddar caramelized onions and asparagus. Side of greens instead of potatoes nice offering on the menu and a side of bacon. Everything was great with exception of the greens. They were not washed properly and super gritty with dirt!! At first I thought it was egg shell however just dirty greens eggs and bacon perfection One of the best Bloody Marys I ve ever had. Get the small I barely put a dent in the large. The large is big enough to share with 2 3 people. I would try this place again in hopes the greens were a fluke.
Went here 3 nights ago and this is one of the better hotel casino restaurants that I have been to. I ate dinner at the bar and they served the full menu at the bar. The bartender recommended the osso bucco with the saffron risotto and it was really good. Generous pours of good Italian red wine too. If I return to the Mirage again I will definitely return to this restaurant and try other dishes.
Our favorite drop in for Happy Hour bites and beverages. Wednesday s 1 2 off any wines that they serve by the glass is definitely the best deal in all of Scottsdale and their bar food menu deals are a hit as well. Top shelf 5 martini s as well are sure to leave you very Happy.
First time here and we loved it! Super friendly workers. They took our order while waiting in the drive thru line and had our coffee ready when we pulled up! We were greeted in such a happy manner by Raquel and Bailey! Egg nog Carmel latte is delicious! We will definitely be back!
I love coming to Heather s Skin Care for all my skin care needs! Her facials are amazing and I feel so pampered and relaxed like I m walking on clouds
I ve enjoyed the food there. The Cuban steak sandwich is my favorite though I have not tried everything. But it s authentic
Excellent place downtown for Sushi and drinks. Great happy hour. A
Loved this place was our first time and the staff were awesome. Came up to Phoenix early for a flight early the next morning and had dinner here thanks John at the bar for the great food and wine reccomendations and happy birthday!
Lindo s is usually a good spot they rarely disappoint. The menu has your classic authentic Mexican food and softer stuff for the kiddos as well. The staff here are super friendly and treat you well so that s always a plus. I m not sure if I came during rush hour or what but it was super busy. They have a bar televisions and a really nice decor. You can see them warming fresh tortillas while your waiting to be seated. Also if its your birthday you will probably get the loudest birthday song ever here enjoy.
My second time at Chi foot spa me and my family love the service and price are reasonable.. all the ladies have amazing hand with deep tissues make me reliefs my stress my muscles stretch especially I can sleep better ... really recommend
Atmosphere was so laid back and inviting. It was clean. The food most importantly was awesome!! The chicken was not too greasy the vegetables were crisp and not soggy. We will definitely be back again!
This place is really awesome! It s my new favorite place! The wings are amazing you have to try them! There is ping pong and cornhole to play. Such a great environment with lots of room to move around. Ca not wait to go there today!
Umiya is a very nice Japanese restaurant!! Highly recommended!! I was there almost midnight their open hour is until 2am what a perfect place to go at late night after drinking or party!
Thank you Henry for taking your time and you job seriously when it came to my nails. I appreciate how you did not just fill and paint my nails but that you made sure my cuticles were well manicured and that you did not leave a gap between them and where the polish starts like other nail salons do which makes you need another full just a few days later . I ll definitely be back!
I heard about this place from a friend. Went durning lunch hour and line was out the door! I never mind waiting when there is a line just means it s good! I got the chicken and beef skewer combo. I forgot to take a picture I need to remember to do that. Oh boy the rice it comes with is so good. It was fluffy and seasoned so delicious. Everything was really good and you get a lot of food. Definitely going back there is do much I need and want to try!
As always tandorri never fails in serving delicious food and outstanding customer service. Me and my parter usually get the chicken methi and the lamb vindaloo. Both meals are absolutely amazing and have a taste like no other Indian cuisine that we have tried. Also try ALL of the Naan Bread that is on the menu. It will not let you down!! The belly dancers are a nice form of entertainment on the weekends if you have time to see them. Will definitely be back to both locations
I do not know why it took me 13 years of living in Las Vegas to wander into La Bonita. I started patronizing the location on Desert Inn and Eastern. My Spanish language skills are almost non existent but I need not have worried. The staff I find are quite helpful. I gave my meat order to one of the butchers in very broken Spanish. He smiled politely and repeated it back to me in English to confirm. I must admit I had some trepidation trying some unfamiliar items but I have been pleased every time I have tried something new. Normally I like to cook from scratch but after a long day at work it is so nice to pick up a pound or two of their marinated beef chicken or pork and just whack it onto the grill when I get home. I found the savings on produce tend to be significant compared to the major grocery chains like Von s Albertson s and Smith s. Although some of the produce does not show as nicely it is easy enough to pick and choose what you like.
Burgers are good! The fries are alright but they need a bit more salt. Also the restaurants AC is always hot. That s the only reason I did not give them 5 stars.
16 haircuts!! In doing my rounds to find the perfect barber for me in Henderson LV I decided to give this place a go. I called first to inquire about the need for an appointment. They advised that they take walk ins and they were open at the moment. I was there in a half hour and there were about 3 people in line by the time but it only took them 10 minutes to get me in a chair. I had a sweet hip looking Asian woman named Carol. She listened to what I wanted and excelled at short hair. What I really liked about this space is that it felt neutral. All kinds of people were there to get all kinds of haircuts and it did not feel intimidating. I recently was going to a downtown barber shop to remain nameless and stopped because the atmosphere sucked. It seemed hip but then one day they just started playing some really disturbing music that just was not fitting for a public space racial slurs . Go here for a great cut at an amazing price. P.s. You should tip well cause it s so cheap!
Friendly and inviting. Service excellent. Food wonderful. Will definitely return. Highly recommend.
The average 3 star Yelp rating almost turned me away but I m glad I did not . The dim sum and the congee here is authentic and delicious. Service was fast and friendly. Overpriced? Definitely but it s Vegas. I took one star off because of the portion of the soup. I was expecting a family sized bowl but instead it was more of a cup. The shrimp dumpling noodle soup had too much noodles and very little broth. Other than that everything else was good.
Jayde is located inside M resort. When I just walked into the restaurant I was impressed by all the flowers inside the glass wall on each side of entrance hallway. I started my meal with cocktail Yuzu Rita. I am a fan of everything made with yuzu. However I did not enjoy this drink very much. It tasted artificial and lacked refreshing citrus flavor. I had 5 spiced duck sliders as appetizer. I did not like this dish at all. There was no 5 spiced flavor. All I tasted was lots hoisin sauce. I also had chef s famous dish bibimbap. It was very good! It was plating in very artistic way. I love the shiitakes in this dish. I also ordered Korean style lobster. It was very flavorful. Lobster was perfectly cooked and succulent. My only complaint would probably be its sauce. It was a bit too salty to me. I also tried seafood soup. Flavor of soup was okay. There was not anything special. For desserts I had lychee ice cream and white chocolate strawberry mousse cake. Both were excellent! I had lots lychee sorbet in my life but never had lychee ice cream before. It was light and creamy. I really enjoyed chef added some crunchiness in this dish. Strawberry mousse came in very beautiful presentation. It was made with just right amount of sweetness. Price is reasonable here. Service is very friendly and welcoming. I bump Jayde up from 3.5 to 4 stars for its great service and delicious desserts.
I absolutely love The Southside and I have hooked some of my friends as well. I have had almost everything on the menu and the only thing I have not liked is the duck pizza. I recommend the lobster bisque spicy chicken enchiladas calamari cuban sandwich and more. Their daily specials usually sound delicious too. Also there is a good crowd and great decor.
Great pizza with a large craft beer selection. Kids love it and the service is on point.
Delicious food amazing friendly service and very reasonable prices. What else do you need? A clean fresh smelling washroom says a lot about a restaurant.
Very clean place. Service is fast and efficient. Staff is very friendly. It s a good stop over snack shop where it s quiet and calm inside. It is also conducive for studying or reading. The bar stool area has a good view of the city life.
Great Restaurant Week deal during Queen s Feast. Fun atmosphere good margaritas and delicious guac. What more do you need?
Great Polish Scandinavian Canadian food. Yup that s right they got all that. Several dishes I ca not pronounce. Schnitzel sp? is good Cabbage rolls good Sausage good Perogies sp? good. Lots of selection and everything I ve had so far has been really good.
Really enjoyed my first time here. Location is convenient to the Flamingo Linq Harrahs or Caesars. Our party of 8 was seated within about 10 minutes near the bar. Ordered a half yard of the very good house IPA and that tided me over until my Nashville hot chicken sandwich arrived. You HAVE to get the half yard glass. C mon it s Vegas. The sandwich was delicious. Best Nashville hot example I ve had so far. Fries were tasty a hair salty but and the right amount of crisp. Would definitely return.
Excellent service and they always greet you when you walk in. Always have everything I am looking for and great people working at this location. A
Thanks fellow yelpers! I would not have found this restaurant without you! This place is quite an experience... Initially it felt like I was at Disneyland on the haunted house ride. We opened the door and entered into a small room with wall to wall dark wood. We stood there for a few minutes and then a small window opened behind us. I was so surprised and caught off guard I let out a loud yelp. The side door opened which lead us into a dark restaurant. The place was decorated with old italian mafia type accessories. Most of the props looked really old and it further reinforced the feeling of being at Disneyland. We were seated on the stage area and had a good view of the live singer who sang Dean Martin hits most of the night and it sounded really good. The restaurant was so dark the menus had small flashlights attached to them. We had the egg drop soup appetizer pizza scallops and arrabiata pasta. Everything was very good. I highly recommend this restaurant. I gave it one less star because of the aged mafia props!
This is the best Japanese restaurant that I have been to in the Phoenix area. Okay it s the only Japanese restaurant I ve been to in the area but it is as good as any that I have ever visited. Food is tasty atmosphere is nice and the price is right. we had a lovely lunch on the patio with perfect 70 January weather. Got a love the winter in Phoenix. Got to hate the summers though unless you think you will enjoy hell
Do not be fooled by the lack of reviews the pizza here is well made and matches up or exceeds the major pizza franchises. My buddies and I felt like having a lazy day at the hotel room in Vegas and wanted to get some simple delivery. Who knew it would be so difficult to find establishments willing to deliver directly to the room! The fact that this spot delivers straight to your room is a major plus and very convenient. We got the Sicily supreme pizza plenty of toppings and the food was still warm. Definitely appreciated the friendly service over the phone as well. For those lazy afternoons in after a rough Saturday night in Vegas I recommend checking this joint out.
I have scoliosis and a herniated disc in my neck . I went to 4 other Chiropractors before Dr.Harris still always in so much pain . I refused pain killers and steroid shots but was very close to surgery because the pain was too much ! Then I was referred to Dr. Harris this was my last hope I figured I d give him a try before surgery . He has been a Life saver !!! My quality of life has changed dramatically ! He is so different from the rest ! You do not even need to tell him where the pain is he always knows . He also never rushes you or hurts you . He does not try and sell you supplements or tell you you have to come 3 times a week ! Truly amazing person ! His office is also so calming . I feel like I m at a spa when I m there and Dr.Nicole who is the receptionist also is the sweetest and nicest person also . They are fantastic and have forever changed my quality of life ! Thank you !!!
Nicest PT s I ve ever been too The inside and outside look really nice compared to other PT s I ve been to around town. Great place to hang out with a group of friends without having to see all the weirdos and ratchets. Waitress was very nice and attentive even with other large groups in the bar. Sucks that they charge to play pool but I guess that s because it s one of the nicer PT s?
Food goes above and beyond in creativity and flavor. Upon first visit there is something to be said about parking. It is interesting but worth walking over the rubble even in high heels. There is a very welcoming feel as you are greeted. The staff is very friendly and attentive. And the rolls!!!! No waiting here you simply pick what you like off of the heavenly rotating appetizing rolls. Definitely try the octopus and climax roll. You wo not regret it!
Highly recommend. We lost the key to our Civic called up and he was there within half an hour. Half an hour later the key was replaced and we had an extra as well. Everything was explained throughout the process. Very very good work. Will definitely use again if the need arises and will recommend to others who need any sort of lock work.
Friend and I went here after my massage for brunch per the recommendation of my massage therapist ... We walked in and there was a wait... ME damn must be really good. We did not really have to wait long... we got seated within 10 minutes and given the menu. Their breakfast menu was very extensive... lots of options. I chose this place particular due to their filet benedict since the friend is in love with anything benedict. Our server came by right away... and I got the stuffed french toast with mixed berries along with a lemonade... friend got the filet benedict... Food came by really quick... it s definitely Vegas sized portions ... huge! The stuffed french toast was delicious... considering I m not a big breakfast person... it was really good. It was not dry... not too sweet... it was just the right mixed. I only ate half of it since it was huge. Friend thought the benedict was ok... it was interesting and a new twist to the typical breakfast benedicts. Anyway service was decent... friendly. Good spot for breakfast brunch.
The best pho! The beef stew egg noodle is pretty good and authentic! Their desert is good too!
Fabulous food ambiance and service! We just happened in as we were passing by. We are from Cleveland but not living here full time so it was a nice surprise to find a new restaurant! Wonderful Mediterranean food! Try it you ll love it. Nice folks!
I came in tonight just for a quick snack and drinks. Their wings are so good! Slightly sweet and a little bit spicy with carrots and celery sticks and blue cheese dressing. The grilled artichoke has a delicious pesto mayo dipping sauce. Service is always great!
About 38 years ago I discovered Mexican Restaurants with their food served on hot plates. Ask yourself this question Of all the restaurants you dine in which serves its hot food on hot plates? We serve home cooked meals on hot plates as a bar was set by Mexican Restaurants. We ve been dining in Arriba Meican Grill for years. Is it true Mexican food? It s more like Americanized Mexican Food which is ok with me. On November 28 2012 we had lunch here as we were nearby. Service is always great! Seated right away with chips salsa served along with our drinks. The serves watch you drink levle as refills appear without request. For this visit we orderd a lunch size Guacamole lunch size spinach Enc Flauta and a lunch size shredded beef Burrtio plate. By rhe time we were done with our chips.our meals arrived on the hot plates that keeps the meal warm until you re finished. Food and service has always been great during our experiences here. We highly recommend this location!
So here s my story of how I ended up as a patient of Horizon Spine and Sport. I was in a minor car accident a few months ago and I developed some neck and upper back pain and well that sucked. I ask my friends who are chiropractic aficionados who they would refer me to and I m directed to Dr. Chuck Badger. I ca not speak personally for the other doctor at this practice as all my treatment has been provided by Dr. Badger. Sorry Yelpers not really sorry but when it comes to medical professionals you are not my first resource for research. Perhaps more reviews like this will change that for future Yelp seekers. After a really easy initial appointment set up with Janine the office coordinator extraordinaire I come in and see Dr. Badger. They have appointments after standard business hours! This is is super helpful for those of us that work 9a 5p so I do not have to take time off of work for my three times per week chiropractic appointments. What I appreciated most about Dr. Badger on the initial consultation was the time taken to explain the spine and the muscles and the effects of trauma and how these could be remedied with treatment. I am one of those patients that likes to be educated on what is going on and I believe that an educated patient is a compliant patient. If you tell me because I said so well I m going to tell you to kick rocks with open toed shoes and seek treatment elsewhere. Initial consultation comes and goes and treatment commences! Prior to seeing Dr. Badger I d never received chiropractic care so having things explained to me as they happened was greatly appreciated. He addressed the pain and injuries caused by the car accident and he also treated pain related to your standard desk job which was exacerbated in the car accident . On more than one occasion I have dozed off on the table when receiving electrical muscle stimulation in my upper back thanks to the low lights and quiet of the office. And Dr. Badger is a huge sports fan so inevitably you will see a game on the flat screen TVs one in the lobby and one by the treatment tables so if you do not end up napping you can catch a few plays. This falls in line with his practice taking care of athletes injuries too. After several months of successful treatment I m nearly discharged. I feel significantly better than when I started treatment and probably better than I did even before the car accident and that s due to Dr. Badger s skill as a chiropractor. Dr. Badger has a great manner with patients from young to old and from athletes to car accident patients and all in between I have only ever seen him be pleasant with all. That pleasant demeanor is also expressed by Janine who is great in her own right. Ever deal with nasty staff at a great doctor s office that you re hesitant to return to the great doctor because the staff is so nasty? That will never be the case here. Horizon Spine and Sport is a top notch practice and I would recommend them to anyone seeking chiropractic care.
My husband and I have been coming here for sushi for many years as a matter of fact this is the only place we will go to when we want to have sushi. The food here is exceptional all of it! The sushi chefs are great! The only downer here and keep in mind we come here often and this has occured a lot lately the service is not the best. We noticed that if you sit at the bar this is not an issue but if you sit at a table forget about it. Our last visit was the tipping point waited for ten minutes and nobody approached us to order or even ask for our drink order. The guy who seated us passed by and we had to flag him and ask if we could order he signaled to a lady and said she would take our order....well we waited and waited and she did not even acknowledged us. Well he came back with his note pad and asked if we would be doing all you can eat. After ordering my appetizer and some sushi the sushi arrived first and no sign of my appetizer? Asked the waiter and he was was like oh yes and went to the back and then brought it to us. Best advice just eat at the bar. Update we came here again and sat at the bar this time. Everything was excellent!
In short this place is the Moe s of pizzadom. You walk in stand in line pick large or small thin or thick crust and a cornucopia of toppings. The food was well worth the price quality was better than good and portions were perfect. The only gripe is the atmosphere. The restaurant as a whole has taken the minimalist approach to dining. Otherwise this is my new favorite pizza in the area. Good job MOD I will return.
This place good. Fish good. Fire bad. 1. Crushed potato chips in the batter for extra crispy and extra flavor good. 2. Light crispy and not greasy. 3. Bigger pieces of fish than The One That Got Away the place I went to last week. 4. Friendly people working the register and cooking the food. 5. No deep fried Mars bars. One star off.
I am so so glad this place opened up on Spadines giving us local workers an alternative to Starbucks and Second Cup. And what really knocks this one out of the park for me is the massive gorgeous space they ve got. It s open airy full of light and offers plenty of seating. You can chill at one of the two large communal tables or head to the cozier upstairs to lounge in a comfy chair and join the nerds on computers I can say this because I am one of them . Free Wi Fi! The espresso is quite nice making for luscious iced bevvies and tummy warming cappuccinos. The fresh yogurt with granola and rhubarb was not quite as amazing as it sounds I think I wanted more rhubarb but the maple scone has called my name on more than one occasion. And their obese low fat muffins are pretty tempting... OH and it s always nice to find a cafe with smiling chatty baristas too ya know?
Friendly helpful service. The food is good. I enjoy Mexican and Korean food so this was a fun restaurant. They did good with mixing the two.
First time trying the milk tea boba with beans and I love it! Nice decor! We re coming back to try the other flavors.
I ve come to Heartwood about 7x since moving to the area from Northern California. I am used to having several craft coffee shops and roasters within a 5 minute drive from my house. Heartwood Coffee is a 30 minute drive for me but it is so worth it. The coffee is delicious and the atmosphere is perfect for working reading a book or chatting with friends. I am loving Heartwood and will continue to make the drive!
I am so glad that i am able to find a great hairdresser in my neighborhood. I used to drive to Fallbrook for my haircut before i met Shellynn. She is amazing! Shellynn s new studio is a one of the suites in Phenix salon. I like the fact it is very private. I have a Xmas party on the 15th so Shellynn was very kind to work with me to have my hair done on the 11th before her suite was even ready! I had my haircut in a temporally room in the same salon. I also have a 3 month old so Shellynn was very kind to have her teenage daughter to babysit for me while she is working on my hair. Very sweet Gentle bright young lady. Price is very reasonable. Amazing haircut. The color is not exactly what i want so i will change it in a couple of month not her fault as i did not really tell her any specific color. However the balayage job actually is very nicely done. Overall i am very satisfied and i am looking forward to my next appointment in 5 weeks.
i live at arizona and like this buffet because i love sea food. i always bring some slice garlic from my house and can eating anything and not worry about my colesterol an blood sugar. crab clam snail crawfish frog fish asian food dimsum peking duck mongolian grill korean grill.pizza american food too. and more item.they have sushi bar and tempura. i love sashimi sushi and raw oyster. they have 8 item ice cream i love green tea and mint chocolate. and some fruit and salad.and cookies and cake. i like caramel jello with milk coconut.yummy. if come weekend for dinner please come early long online. price 17.95 weekend for dinner. they have special room for party too. i recommend this place for seafood buffet.
This lovely store has by far the best collection of crystal jewelry I have ever come across. Their selection is so diverse and eye drawing it can be all too easy to spend an hour or more in this place just admiring and trying on all of the spectacular things and pieces. The energy is warm and inviting and the staff are all very kind welcoming and knowledgable. As far as jewelry and gem shops go this is my spot. Ca not say too many good things about it absolutely love love love
It s Jimmy Johns after all so what can you complain about they get the food right they do it quickly and they deliver quickly nothing extraordinary but definitely standardized and consistent
I do not know if I want to let the secret out but they do an amazing pizza here. We have had the pizza from here 3 different occasions now one of which was a big order and everyone enjoyed it every time. My sis even asked to get one from there last time she came for dinner. Starting at 19.99 for a party size with two toppings it s a great value as well. The ingredients are made in house I believe as much as possible since it is a cheese shop with an in house deli shop as well. The toppings are fresh and has parmesan cheese on top and the crust is nice and thin.
I came here for dinner with a friend tonight. You ca not beat getting ceviche and salsa as a free app instead of your typical salsa and chips. We both had the shrimp and octopus cocktail but I had the spicy version. The spicy one came with nicely cooked shell on shrimp three with the heads on loved it! The medium is PLENTY for one person but I could try to tackle the large if I was really hungry and did not go to town on the app . There are so many other delicious looking seafood dishes too that I have never seen anywhere else in Madison. A hidden gem! There was plenty of seating too. We got there at 5 30 on a Wednesday and there were not very many customers. Honestly I ca not imagine why since the service was speedy and friendly and the food was plentiful and flavorful.
Really good restaurant at the end of The LINQ outdoor entertainment district right next to the High Roller wheel. While a chain restaurant it s obvious the food is made fresh on site. I went with the Ahi Tuna Salad and the deviled eggs. Deviled eggs only because I was amused to see them on a restaurant menu and they were delicious. The Ahi Tuna salad featured perfectly prepared rare tuna slices. Excellent and the portion was just perfect. I was able to get up and walk around the rest of The LINQ and enjoy myself. I also went with their berry flavored green tea and it was excellent. All in all a great spot to have lunch or dinner. Good spot for vegetarians as well.
I ve used Clean Machine twice based on a recommendation from a friend. The service was fast and friendly. I had my area rug stairs and landing cleaned by Randy and he did a great job. He was able to remove some pretty tough stains including a heavy milk stain from son s bedroom carpet. I will definitely call them again. I ve also referred Clean Machine to a few friends who have also used their services and were pleased with the results. Recommend!
I come to The Martini a lot and I am never disappointed. Never. The drinks are on point and of extremely high quality. The bartenders are awesome they seem to be able to read their customers very well. Sometimes I go in to just hang out to be one with my thoughts and they let me be but if I m in a talkative mood they read my mood and are there to shoot the breeze. The martini s here are the best that I ve ever had. My personal favorite is named the Vespar made with Boodles Gin Grey Goose and Lillet Blanc. They also make a S mores martini that s insanely delicious if you have a sweet tooth. The Martini serves quality drinks that take craftsmanship not like the junk at Blue Martini that just get the job done which I m not hating on because sometimes you just need a drink that gets the job done. The food here is unreal. I ve tried pretty much everything on the menu. My favorite is the Chicken Scaloppini which is served with seasonal vegetables and risotto that s unbelievably good. I also recommend the Fish and Chips which is more than just fish and fries. It comes with beer battered zucchini and shrimp as well. I do not recall the prices of these dishes but they re very reasonably priced and comes with a lot of food. The quality of food for the price is second to none. The drinks are great and also reasonably priced. The atmosphere is way better than any other neighborhood gaming bar that I ve been to . Also everything on the food menu is served 24 hours a day.
First time eating here the food was exceptional! Pho was the best I ve had in long time along with the egg rolls! To top if off the prices were super low! If I did not live so far I would definitely be a regular.
This place is under rated if you never tried their Grilled Lamb Chops with Honey Basil sauce then your missing out had Ribeye that I end up taking home since I already had Lamb Chops and couple round of Heineken Light beer. My Server was very polite good job. Good early dinner.
Hawaiian fusion restaurant very ono. This establishment is known for their burgers but I had the wings and the brussel sprouts which were amazing. I ve had the burgers before and they are always cooked to perfection.
Red Chile Beef Burrito is amazing! I get mine rice and beans on the side. Nice beer selection for a burrito place. A couple Mexican beers and a couple Microbrews.
this is a popular sheehsa spot especially between middle eastern being someone that does not smoke sheehsa I m not the best to review a shisha spot but due to the fact i go there so many times a week cuz of my friends sheehsa lovers I can say service is great mint tea is good oreo milkshake is great and their wraps are very good. I have tried all their wraps and I can say my favorite is chicken Parmesan very flavorful and the steak and onions sandwich they are soo flavorful and the fries are good and comes with a variety of sauces i usually just get the chipotle cuz its my favorite. their carrot juice is actually fresh and their brownie with ice cream is great. heard their burgers are not the best so I will keep going for their wraps. They have cards and backgammon and their service is great. Samantha is always on top of things and Omar is great as well. 4 stars simply because the owner raised the prices and now its a little higher than average comparing to other shesha spots
This is the best for a place in town by far it has better spring rolls then any other Vietnamese restaurant in town and I love this place so much I come here like two or three times a week it s my favorite
My new fave Sunday brunch spot!! Today I m here with Trinity...she s enjoying the shade at our outside table. Very dog friendly establishment!! Jackie herself came out to warmly greet us! Jackie did not fail me!! The grilled turkey and ham sandwich was very filling and tasted amazing!! You could taste the love Jackie made it with! Even Trinity loved the cucumber salad! We will be back again very soon!
Great for kids under 10. Staff is friendly and everything is clean. The only bad thing about Kangamoo does not even have to do with the place it is the parents that do not watch over their kids. If your child is A. Still in diapers B. Aggressive does not know what taking turns means or the concept of sharing Or C. Still cannot talk You should probably keep an eye on them. The staff is there to ensure safety not babysit.
Loved it. The server who I presume was also the owner was very welcoming and friendly. I had the in house burger and thought that it was one of the best which I have not had in a long time! Their fries and onion rings are super crisp! A great place to stop for a bite to eat!
Seems like people have been complaining about slow service. I usually only notice that on incredibly busy nights. Which if you have any common sense you should know its going to take a while to get to everyone if you only have 2 servers running a fully packed floor. Patience people or simply get up and go some where else lol. Anyway besides that the owner that cat is mad cool. Props to you Bryan you ve done great things with Tomo. Easily the best sushi in the area. If you re super far south west in goodyear avondale area and you want sushi. Tomo is the top choice.
This place is awesome! Great iced coffee and pastries at such a reasonable price! It was so beautifully decorated in there I thought everything would be super expensive but it was not at all. Not to mention excellent customer service! It was such a nice treat after visiting the aquarium. If there was one by my house I d go everyday. Totally impressed by this little treasure!
Really impressed by this place! Bonjour is right by the Sprouts Market and is tucked away in the corner of a very unassuming strip mall. Upon entering I was hit by the lovely aroma of baked bread and pastries and cheerily greeted by the charming clerk. I chose a chocolate brioche roll a blueberry pastry and an apple beignet. All were fabulous and totalled 8 or so. Great value and quality! The nice clerk said that they have wonderful breakfast items and I said I d be back to sample those soon. What more can I say? Come say bonjour to Bonjour and enjoy some quality French fare.
Cozy ambience friendly servers great crowd reasonable prices. Did I mention wonderfully fresh and delicious rolls? If you are looking for great sushi downtown you just cannot go wrong with this place.
Had to say that I just loved this place. I thought the rooms were beautiful spacious and elegant. Since the casino is new it does not have that yucky perfume smell that a lot of the other casinos have and the size of the casino makes it feel more intimate. HIGHLY recommended!
Hidden inside Assembly Hall right off of Richmond you have to enter in the main entrance which looks a bit like a residential building. The Assembly Hall is not overly busy during lunch time and has a nice bustling atmosphere. Tachi is hidden right inside with two hostesses on the outside helping guests. Once inside it is a cozy space where there are standing tables. Luckily for us women there is a cubby space right underneath for purses and jackets. It is omakase style and it is fast! It is just piece after piece of delicious mouth melting sushi. I ve never had better sushi in Toronto. This is now my favourite sushi place in Toronto. The chef is entertaining to watch and I thought he was also very cute and charismatic as he spoke to the party. The entire experience was quick and delightful. There s a small selection of drinks. I opted for the green tea which was served in a to go cup. My friend opted for sake which was served in a can. This makes a lot of sense because there is no time or seats to sit and enjoy the drinks. The drinks are all made to go. Aside from the sushi pieces I also enjoyed the hand roll which was more of a tube rather than a cone shape. It had the perfect amount of filling unlike your usual rice filled hand rolls. Amazing. The bill came out as our experience wrapped up and there is no tipping. It is what it is and you just pay for it. With my green tea everything came up to roughly 56 if I recall correctly. I would definitely do it again! It s perfect for lunch.
EDIT Okay they re open again. Delivery guy said they all went on holiday that time. Still it d be nice to set up an answering machine that just says so or at least put it on their website or Facebook page. It s expensive for pizza but it s very good very filling pizza. Not your typical Montreal pizza. Would recommend. Previous review The pizza is fantastic but we tried to order from there again last weekend and the phone just rang and rang this was in the early evening on a Saturday night . No answering machine to say they were closed nothing on their website or Facebook page. Who just closes up like that in the middle of summer without any notice on any medium of communication? Is that any way to run a business? I ll probably order from here again when and if they reopen because the pizza really was that good but I m pretty put off by this.
Really solid place. Great beer selection and specials and consistently good food. Check out happy hour! Have gluten free veggie and vegan options. Fun for the whole family!!!
First place I went to for winterlicious 2015 and I have to say it was amazing. Although when you look at the deal you get with winterlicious you are only really saving 9 dollars since they have the Ruth s classic already on the menu priced at 54 compared to winterlicious at 45. But this is besides the point if your coming to this restaurant I assume price is not an issue for you. Starter Lobster Bisque Was not sure if there was any lobster in my bisque but it was flavorful. I found the bisque to be a little salty as did my friends. Overall I would not recommend this as your starter. It did not taste like a freshly made soup more of a premade soup but what do I know. Entree 6oz Steak Filet Amazing I got my steak cooked medium rare which I only get at higher end restaurants since I do not trust anyone else and it came out perfect. The hot plate with butter took the steak up a notch and it was by far one of my best steak experiences I ve had in Toronto. Ca not go wrong with getting steak at a steak house so I ll move on. Dessert Cheesecake By far the best winterlicious option. Our table ordered one of everything and I was not a fan of the coffee toffee cake nor the apple dessert. The cheesecake tasted like something from the cheesecake factory. By the end of our meal however I was stuffed. The entire course is very large and I do not recommend finishing the entire course however I did but regretted that decision after leaving the restaurant. Overall great place you ca not go wrong with Ruth Chris if your looking for a solid steak!
Gas prices seem lower here than the neighboring Shell Chevron etc. brand new pumps and clean handles. 7 Eleven located inside with all the cold drinks and snacks you could ever want. Good prices and located near the freeway for your trip out of town or just arriving.
Go see Walt he will take care of you. He fitted me and a friend for new irons. I could not be happier with my new clubs!!!!
I found this place on Pinterest and the milkshakes do not disappoint. The one I picked had a homemade cookie sandwich with ice cream and icing holding it all together. Then the milkshake had vanilla ice cream and chocolate and it was so good...no shortcuts here!
My boyfriend and I call ourselves regulars here now! The Sweetheart roll is the best thing I have ever put in my mouth! Never had anything bad or would not get again! Love it!
Short but to the point tour. We enjoyed ourselves and I highly recommend this tour if you have not done it yet!
I ca not possibly be the only one who thought of American Horror Story when seeing the Loftti Cafe sign above the door for the very first time! Or maybe I am. Anyways I ve had this cafe bookmarked for quite some time now and I finally found the perfect opportunity to visit! My friend and I had just eaten lunch at Lake Las Vegas and were in the mood for boba so we decided to drive all the way to this side of town for a drink! Because let s face it we all know there s no decent boba spots in Henderson. Loftti Cafe is a bit hard to find if you re not familiar with the area. It s hidden in the very corner of a strip mall. Upon entering Loftti we were greeted by a very soft spoken yet super friendly employee. She could tell that it was our first time by the way we looked at the menu so she offered to explain their options to us. Of course we ordered everything but the boba that we originally came for! We ordered two of the Frozen Cotton Candy desserts with the coffee flavor and one original Raindrop Cake. The Frozen Cotton Candy was actually really good. I loved the ice part of the dessert. It tastes just like Hagen Dazs coffee ice cream but a smooth shaved ice texture. The cotton candy was a nice touch and added the perfect amount of sweetness but I would definitely eat the shaved ice by itself! It was rich and creamy... Something I would definitely order again! The Raindrop Cake however that s a different story! Two words Weird AF! Or is that technically three? I had to try it after seeing it being circulated on my Facebook timeline a million times. It was definitely unique and worth trying but it s not something that I would have to eat again. The concept is almost like that of Jell O but without the flavor. The soy flour and sugar syrup topping was definitely needed! Overall a really cute cafe to catch up with a friend or get some studying done! I loved the decorations on the shelves in the back... It reminded me of a bunch of random things you d find in an old attic! I ll definitely be back soon to try this White Coconut Latti that everyone speaks so highly of!
The gal assigned Nikki went above and beyond. She was very easy to work with understood immediately what was expected and just knocked it out of the park. Very professional and courteous. I would highly recommend this service to anyone.
This place is quite and relaxing. I received the best 90 minutes massage from Linda she is amazing. She massaged my back and shoulders removing all the tension and pain I felt great when she finished.
I think some things should be clarified that a previous reviewer overlooked. When I moved back from Clemson SC RURAL to southwest charlotte I was floored that there was no hibachi express kind of places in the area. One night amidst a pouring rainstorm a bolt of lightning illuminated the NOW OPEN Pika Express sign and I was so excited I almost ran off the road trying to get there. This place has the EXACT same menu and prices as every other hibachi restaurant in the southeast. If you want sushi......this is not the place. If you want egg rolls and General Tso s Chicken....this is not the place. BUT if you want Hibachi....THIS IS THE PLACE! First you need to know that Hibachi is sauteed meat Chicken Steak Shrimp vegetables mushrooms or broccoli and glazed carrots and fried or steamed rice. There are two versions of each dish Hibachi and Teriyaki. It is a very simple menu and the food is prepared VERY quickly about 5 minutes and is incredible. All this is served with a side of shrimp sauce does not have shrimp in it...it s just the name which is great for pouring over your rice. It s actually much healthier than most of the food you would get at a Chinese restaurant because it s not deep fried or slathered with sugary sauces. Pika Express does a great job for what it is. The food is the take out version of what you get at a Japanese steakhouse where they cook it in front of you for 3 times the price. Needless to say I go there 2 to 3 times a week and the food has always been fantastic. If you want sushi and egg rolls...go somewhere else. If you want GREAT inexpensive hibachi you will be thrilled.
This is the perfect place if you love cider! Cherry Bobbin Trolls was my favorite. The staff were friendly as well as the owner. Also this place is 100 wheelchair accessible for anyone who needs to know this stuff when trying out a new spot. I will definitely be back!
Came here after golf on a Yelp! recommendation. Really good bar food. Love this dive.
Seriously cool place! Love the bar with a garage door to the patio very modern! And the food the Tikki Marsala was AMAZING really everything we tried and Abraham was the best. Some of the best Indian food I ve had in Arizona.
Alisha the waitress is the best!!! So informative and very attentive. My mimosa glass never went empty without her bringing out another and the food was always brought out promptly! Really liked the food here but loved her service the most.
friends of mine rented a double decker bus and rounded up a bunch of us for a 40th surprise party at the duce last saturday night. Made me proud to be a Phoenician. This place screams authenticity...total opposite of what we ve all grown accustom to in the valley of chains strips and stucco. Amazing food cocktails and atmosphere. Owners are more than present...they take the time to meet greet and warm everybody in their home. the duce is the !!!
I was pleasantly surprised to find this Indian Restaurant tucked away inside the Rio. The restaurant is a bit small but very beautiful. This is the nicest Indian Restaurant I ve ever been in and you re even greeted by 2 elephant statues at the entrance. They have a lunch buffet from 11am 4pm for less than 20 and it has all the usual Indian Buffet type food. There s a good condensed mix of veggie and meat dishes which I find to be common with most Indian Buffets. The food tasted great but I wish it had been a bit more spicy. Usually Indian Buffets stay more on the mild end to appease everyone so no big deal. The Garlic Naan was amazing though. Probably the most perfectly baked Naan bread I ve ever had. It was perfectly crisp without being burnt anywhere and just tasted amazing. If I ever come back to the Rio again this will be the only place I eat. This is definitely my top pick for food at this Casino. Especially if you re looking to get a quick bite and not spend 2 hrs waiting in a major buffet line or waiting for a restaurant reservation.
Bf and I go to ayce sushi dates at least once a month and we wanted to try something new. This place reminds me of sushi neko located also here in Vegas. We mostly order nigiri and their cuts here are very good 3 1 fish to rice. I was surprised how good the quality of the fish as well. The salmon nigiri especially just melts in your mouth. We went before noon and we were seated right away. People started to come in after so it became busy. We had 2 servers and they forgot to bring us our appetizer. I saw one of them giving it to the wrong tables and the customers not accepting it but did not say a word. We just ended up reordering it again and it did come. Overall it was good and we ate a lot! Going back to try dinner choices next time.
It s the to go spot if you want deep tissue and stretch. Al is good. The place is clean and the price is reasonable.
Finally! A Korean BBQ place in our area! Went here with my fam and tried the woo BBQ combo . Different slices of beef were served but liked mostly the marinated ones. The sides are all good but served only in little amount would love to have a little more . Love the tofu stew that came with it. Also the staff were all so friendly and attentive. All in all I will be coming back to try their other Korean dishes!
Good food is a rarity to find on the Carnegie Mellon campus and I m glad that we have a hot dog stand to compensate for that. The hot dogs are solid cooked right in front of you and served by a super nice guy. The prices are still a little high but compared to the hiked up pricey trash that the school serves this place really deserves a compliment.
There s a first time for everything and that time for me was today a Buldogis. I wish I had discovered this place sooner. All I can say is if you have not been yet it s time for you to get down there and try some Angry Kimchi Fries and a delicious hot dog to go with them.
Best cuban food I have ever had!! Get the short rib plate but make sure you save room for the homemade donuts and a cuban coffee to seal the experience...
Came here because I wanted a good steak and did not want to pay Strip prices for it. I shared the Mixed Hot Antipasti a huge plate of fried food the iceberg wedge and the steak and shrimp scampi which totally hit the spot to the T. Then we shared two 50 bottles of wine. All in we paid a little more than 100 a person but the meal was totally delicious and well worth it. My only critique is that service was slooooowwww. Not neglectful just slow. We were there almost 3 hours. Crazy.
I m Korean so I LOVE KOREAN FOOD. The only problem living in Vegas? There are no good Korean restaurants I like so I have to wait and wait and wait until I go back home to LA. I probably would have never given this place a try but my aunt and uncle came into town and wanted to eat here. So obviously I let them order because they re OG Korean. We ordered the seafood pancake and the pork and kimchee stew ? it s not the individual one it s the 2 person minimum order one . Anyhow BOTH WERE SO DELICIOUS and I do not even like kimchee that much . The seafood pancake has lots of seafood and the pork in the stew is deliciously tender. Whenever I crave Korean food I ll go here and eat...even if it s a 2 person minimum THAT S WHAT TO GO BOXES ARE FOR STOP JUDGING ME!
Pizza is THEEEE BEST!!! They serve pizza with different flavored crust. Employees are very friendly and helpful.
Office redeemed itself. See new review
This store is so much more fun than I could ve ever imagined! I was greeted by a super friendly staff who helped me put together a delicious pasta gift basket for my grandparents for Christmas! My grandparents spend a lot of their retirement in Ixtapa Mexico and Oil and Vinegar has SOMBRERO SHAPED PASTA! How cute is that?! I ll definitely be back.
One of my favorite restaurants is now complete they have updated their dessert menu and I am happy to recommend both the funnel cake and the banana baked alaska. Service is friendly but understated the wine flights are terrific they always turn out a great steak. Also recommend starting with the artichoke hearts and moving on to any fish dish or the daily ravioli. Only disappointment has been the parmesan noodles which were surprisingly flavorless.
Ive been coming to the nail room for a little while but I would say I have the best nails. And I get TONS of compliments on the daily from men and women. Ask for Anna
This is to Melt for having 25 off industry nights on Mondays! Hats off to you for remembering us fellow service industry nutcases on our coveted day off. Woo.
Oscar was amazing. Thanks for a great time! Many food and drink options. Good music. Fun atmosphere.
Highly recommended!!!! This is our second time in the VoF and enjoyed it even more. Customer service was great friendly. Will our guide was personally attentive to my sore back and we rode together in the two seater. It was really fun and had a blast! It was both trilling and chilling! Would do it again in a heartbeat.
Really fresh high quality food. We had chicken piccata and butternut squash ravioli both we very well presented and quite tasty. Ordered pistachio cake for dessert with baklava nest honey buttercream and pistachio gelato. One of BEST desserts I ve ever had!
Great Casino. It just opened a couple of weeks ago but only had the chance to visit while I was in Vegas. Theres lot of parking so no need to worry that you re gonna walk a mile to get into the casino. There was a self serve soda bar and the cocktail waitresses were coming by making sure i always had liquor. There was a large variety of tables and slot. Its not as large as the casinos on the strip but its a nice alternative to Green Valley Ranch or Sunset Station or any other local casinos.
I came to Platinum Entourage after my regular stylist Rachel joined the team. She gives great cuts and is the best for color. I m a natural redhead so when it came time to cover grays I was a bit scared but Rachel calmed my fears and I fully trust her. I ve gone lighter and darker all with great success.
The BEST local burger joint. Quality ingredients and super friendly staff. Simple menu but perfect. Cute patio.
Jalebi!! The best! I have never had such perfectly crispy Jalebi in the US! We went for the buffet on Saturday. Really great tasting food. So many varieties! All really well made. So glad they opened here!
Very honest and helpful. Definitely recommend these guys! They came within the hour of calling. Josh explained everything in detail so I knew what was wrong.
Great store with a super bunch of staff. My husband and son just got addicted to RC cars so we have been going to PM Hobbycraft for parts so glad to have now found this store they stock everything you could think of and are really knowledgeable and helpful.
I really like this place. I usually get a mixed kabob platter with chicken and filet. The chicken is garlicky and delicious plus super tender. The meal is served with rice and a side salad. and the salad dressing is super yummy and addictive. My mom loves the lamb shank but I have yet to try it.
Absolutely the best sushi in Vegas. Top quality seafood at very reasonable prices. Conveniently located in the northwest. Tip ask for some garlic sauce!!
We had an excellent service experience thanks to Bert and his team. We are full time RVers and needed a timely repair on our motorhome s power steering pump which was leaking and spraying onto the serpentine belt. We have a Ford v10 engine. We called yesterday and although they are busy and a service tech is about to go on leave next week Bert told us to come in first thing this morning. We arrived at 7.15 and by 7.30 they had taken it out back to diagnose and commence the repair. Bert handled our extended service contract claim as well and our RV was ready to collect at 5pm. Extremely happy with their service and Bert was just so friendly warm and helpful we ca not say enough about how thrilled we are with our service experience today. As full time RVers it s such a blessing to be able to find a quality service shop especially at short notice. Thanks Bert and co!
My go to spot! Friendly service and nick is very knowledgable about vape!! Also the prices are cheap and love their flavors! My favorite flavor is lemint lemon mint !
I recently moved from florida and have heard raving reviews from dutch bros but never been... Went around 8 30pm this Wednesday and was blown away by the customer service. Ive worked in a few places who prioritized customer happiness over everything but dutch bros went above and beyond. Lydia was my drive thru girl and she was so friendly and chipper that even if you were in a bad mood you definitely werent when you left. She asked me about my day and what i was up to related to us on doing schoolwork had me pull up so she could describe in detail the entire menu and was so incredible that i had to ask for her name because GIVE THAT GIRL A RAISE!! The dude running the drive thru window was equally as fabulous they talked to me like i was a close friend and showed. genuine interest. Starbucks is great for customer service but dutch bros went 100 ABOVE AND BEYOND and i was so blown away. I work as a server up the street so i know customer service and Lydia was a total doll who left a lasting impression. I did not get the name of the guy doing drive thru but he offered me a stamp card and also showed genuine interest in me as a person and not just a customer. As a fellow service industry worker i tip my hat and let you know this is my new favorite coffee spot. your staff is more than just well trained you can see they take joy in their work and genuinely made me feel at home. 11 10 first experience. thank you!
Pretty good Chinese I usually come for lunch really fresh. Price is usually right for any Chinese food. I do not usually take out because I feel the food is less fresh at any Chinese place.
Happy hour with great people and we had great time! They have that green tomatoes salad.. very good! Great beer and beautiful place!
My instructor Andy was great guy with fantastic attitude. His statutory warnings sessions are hilarious with punch. Once you enter the wind tunnel Andy has complete control of the situation and keeps encouraging to do more different manevours. He does it with so much ease looks effortless believe me it s not that easy to have control over wind 120mph. You should be submissive relax and let it go and enjoy. Overall I found it awesome experience.
The best egg foo young ever!!! Not like wanna be eggfoo young that s a frozen Patty soaked in a deep fat fryer. They make it from scratch and the sauce is amazing made to order. I love this place
One Nevada Credit Union on Rainbow is the best! Best customer service best location! What is great about One Nevada is their convenience with mobile banking and customer service. Also assisting in preventing identity theft. There have been a couple of times where I received a call almost immediately to verify a purchase! I feel that ONC is looking out for me. I have been a member for several years and love the convenience of the bill payer now mobile banking and their great interest rates!
Sadly they have discontinued breakfast brunch though they are doing a really nice Easter brunch. Look for my next review of another place that does breakfast without the crowd Carlys Bistro!
The Doctor at Northwest Vision Center is very friendly nice he is also professional and has a nice smile.
What a cool concept! I love that I can grab a cup of coffee while I wait to get my hair done. It s a bright open space and the best coffee in town. Definitely check it out.
Best breakfast burritos in AZ! Very consistent and great food hot sauce and quick service. Highly recommend.
Food was awesome huge choice of beers great patio and cheap ! Service was amazing too.
Air conditioner went out last week. They were at my house hour after i called. Andre checked it out and it was pretty bad. AC was 30 years old and on my roof that has some weird sheet metal shingles on it. He called Ed who got me approved for a new AC and a very affordable payment plan. Took a few days to get extra part for my roof and get crane scheduled. Once they got started it only took about 3 hours in all. The two techs were very good. I would recommend them to anyone.
Amazing people who know what they are doing and actually care about their clients Top notch on training and nutrition. Worth the drive from Phoenix .
Food is good also the service the salsas for the tacos need a lot of work probably they need a new salt shakers
We went here for Xmas Eve dinner. We faced something of a challenge because our family consists of 5 adults and 3 children a 2 year old and twin 7 1 2 month olds and we only had an hour and a half to squeeze in dinner between church and feeding time for the babies. The folks at Walnut Grill could not have been more accommodating high chairs and car seat racks for the babies candy canes for the toddler. We made it through dinner on time and had a lovely dining experience. My filet mignon was excellent as was my husband s ravioli. I heard good reports from the other family members on the stuffed flounder flatbread and gyro. The 2 year old enjoyed his buttered noodles too!
Thin crunchy crust with a chewy center. Stretchy cheese with just enough grease. Zesty tomato sauce to tease the palate Anyone who does not love this pizza simply does not love pizza. I make a bee line to this place every time I go to Vegas. I dare say that their pizza is better than anything I ve ever had even NYC. The place is always busy and for good reason.
I order here every weekend without exception. One of the only places around Charlotte with decent vegan options. I ve tried all the entries and prefer the BBQ tofu and eggplant curry. Their salads are all great as are the cold teas and desserts. What sets this menu apart is the subtle simple flavors. The BBQ tofu for instance comes with plain brown rice which does an excellent job soaking up any extra BBQ sauce that has not cooked into hearty tofu squares. There s no overloading food with salts or dressings. I could easily eat here daily. Some of the entries are hit and miss. The fake chicken nuggets taste way too similar to real chicken nuggets and one of the steak dishes resembles bologna eww but on the whole I m happy to have sampled everything and was left with a positive impression on most dishes. It s a simple pick up delivery place so do not plan on eating there. It s also prudent to call ahead because the meals take some time 10 mins or so depending on the item .
This review is for the 2013 Chocolate and Pastry show. It sounds from reading the reviews from last year that much is the same. I too got a Groupon for VIP admission and it was so worth it to have an hour to forage before the doors were opened to the general public. There was some very good chocolate. There was also the dried meat table but I did not wait in line for that. By then I was in such caloric overdrive that I was not in any mood for some real food. I just wanted the sugar stuff. For the hotels the desserts made by the chefs at Excalibur Luxor were the tops in look and taste. But there exquisite chocolates at almost every station you went. I do not drink so I really needed some water to cleanse my palate. Unfortunately the two large containers were dry. I was so glad I attended this event and I think I ll go again next year with a game plan already being devised. This plan however will have to remain classified. The fact that the event benefits St. Jude s Children s Research Hospital is just icing on the cake. It was as good as it gets except for one thing Robin Leach. He really is well named!
I have been to this location twice and both times have been so fun! The first time was just two of us and we did Top Dog. It was fun to work through and that was the first escape room I d ever done. We were close but did not escape. The second time it was two of us and then more people joined our room the fortune teller. Holy smokes! It was difficult but so fun. Again did not escape but the experience was super fun!
Woooo boy! Some harsh reviews on the poor little unassuming hookah gangsta rap hangout known as Crave. Well allow me to retort. Crave is excellent for what it is a mish mash of hookah cheap drinks and good food specials. It s a great spot to pre drink without dropping a hundred bucks if you re with those annoying friends who feel like they need to go out before 11. The food specials are solid as well. As Sunny mentioned five bucks can get you anything from a hummus plate to a quesadilla to a solid sandwich combo. Throw in a couple 2 beers or mixed drink and you ve got yourself an excellent post work wind down. The music selection does get pretty gangsta on the weekends but if you are just looking to avoid the long lines at Cue or Zuma and want a cheap drink while you re doing it Crave is the place to be. On a side note I ve never lost my card or witnessed anyone puking.
Would give it 4.5 stars if I could. Food is really good lots of variety and the smaller portions sliders mean you can try a few different things. I had the short rib slider which I found very good and the buffalo slider which was excellent. Came with an onion ring that was nice and crispy had obviously not been sitting around. The peach BBQ sauce on this was also great. My wife had the ahi slider which she loved and the hummus app. Also had the sweet potato fries which were good though a little salty. Service was very good but this may be the luck of the draw. Our server was Brandon who was friendly knowledgeable and attentive but we had a couple of interactions with another guy who I am now calling Grouchy Smurf. You do not want him as your server. I look forward to going back especially to try more things.
We are loving this place! Good food great service and cold beer! The bartender Ben is awesome.
Consistently good service and food. Especially good service experiences from Ian and Julio! I always have a great time visiting this bar and I suggest to everyone!
Honestly probably the best BBQ I ve ever had and that s saying something. Having been to the top places in Texas Missouri and elsewhere this place is ever bit as good and then some. Pimento cheese fries and the Combo Sampler platter are definitely must try s.
Awesome beer selection. even better video game selection all free lots of t.v. with sports and great tunes. Just needs great food to be 5
Seriously? More than a 100 reviews and an average 5 star rating on Yelp? It s certainly rare to find a restaurant with 5 stars after this number of reviews. I had to try it to believe it. Food 9.5 10 Simply incredible. The first time I visited Gaucho I went with the most frequently mentioned Yelp item the carne steak sandwich. This sandwich is HUGE! Generous portions of a cut of your choice. I go for the ribeye which is a great choice for flavor. Other components of the sandwich include roasted red bell peppers onions chimmi churri sauce. The bread just absorbs all the juices from the meat and roasted peppers not letting any flavor go to waste. If a sandwich is not your thing there s certainly a variety of other proteins for your choosing both from the land and sea. I was surprised and impressed with how absolutely delicious Gaucho s camarones shrimp were. I m always weary of ordering seafood if I m not near the coast line with the concern for freshness. But goddamn these shrimps were hella succulent. Sooo succulent. Other worthy proteins include the chorizo chicken and flank steak. If you re in the mood for some vegetables Gaucho s grilled corn and their mix of asparagus portabello onions peppers zuchinni are also great choices. If you still need more flavor there are 4 sauces to help enhance the experience 1 chimmi churri fresh herbs garlic extra virgin olive oil vinegars 2 pimenton charred pepper garlic fresh herbs extra virgin olive oil 3 ajo roasted garlic fresh herbs and extra virgin olive oil 4 cebolla carmelized onion rosemary thyme vinegars and extra virgin olive oil Service 10 10 Family owned business are always great. The two brothers running this joint never fail in making you feel welcome and are full of energy and enthusiasm for the food they prepare. Ambiance 8.0 10 The place is small and cozy and unfortunately there are only a handful of stools for people to sit on as they enjoy the greatness of Gaucho. Overall Opinion Incredible food. Awesome service. What more could you possibly want? Well my only annoyance with this place are their business hours and the very limited number of seats for people to chill out and enjoy their food. I heard they are about to expand so this will solve the latter issue. Their business hours were a major influence on why it took me more than half a year after moving to Pittsburgh to finally visit this place. It would be great if they opened until at least 8 or 9 pm. It would also be great if they opened on Sundays. Nevertheless their business is thriving and certainly not short on customers. Like I said in the beginning of this review Gaucho had an average of 5 stars after 100 reviews. I now understand why. It is TRUTH! Now make your pilgrimage to this fine establishment in the Strip District.
Love this place ! Great music service ... Delicious food. Too bad no one knows about this place hidden gem
Still a wonderful little outa the way cafe. Yay for that and yay for the expansion of wonderful small shops in this neck of the Beaches.
Friendly service and great cuts here! The entire family makes a trip here every 6 weeks for a trim. Lin is awesome with colour and Sam gives my husband and kids cool cuts. They can get pretty busy on weekends so give them a call before going. If you want to see their work they have a gallery of before and after photos on their Facebook page.
This might have been the coolest most urban modern nail salon I have ever been too. All the people there speak perfect English and are really friendly and keep you quite entertained. The woman who did my nails was Nini. She was FANTASTIC. I had never met someone so into the costumers like she was. After talking to her I felt like I had known her my whole life. Make an appointment before hand because that place is rockin and you never know how long you need to wait for amazing nails. I have been to many nail places before mainly for my acrylics. This place hands down had the best acrylic yet. They were so sturdy and tough not one nail fell off. 10 10 would recommend. Thanks Nini!
Sparkle nail bar is quite amazing. The customer service is superb and robin the owner is the best. Very efficient if you are on a time crunch.. this is the place to come. I definitely recommend this place!!
We had the best experience ever. Our room was beautiful. From the living room to the bathroom to the bedroom. We arrived and set our things down and noticed the room was not clean. There was receipts on the sink towels in the shower and things missing from the snacks in the fridge. On our way out we told the front desk and they automatically fixed our problem. And restock ed and cleaned everything. The view at night is gorgeous and I loved waking up to the sunrise. They have all the best cable channels I only kept it on vh1classic the entire time. The bar dj plays awesome music! We spent one night in the hotel. The hotel is beautiful and so is the bar. The only negative thing is that they do not mail things out. They had us go to the Mandalay bay for stamps.
The only dental office I will go to ! Janet is the best dental hygienist. She always does the best job and no one can compare to her . Way to go Singh Smile Care !
This is one of my go to spots. They have great southwest egg rolls! DA BOMB! food comes out hot fresh and tasty. price is as expected! comparable with any other casual sit down restaurant. check them out if you have a chance!
I love this place the food is absolutely delicious healthy and fresh. Prices are reasonable and they give you a lot of food for the price you pay. The staff are very nice and pleasant. If they mess up your order they will own up to it and make it right. I eat here about 3 4 times a week. My fav dishes are the ground beef plate Greek salad and falafel. They use fresh feta cheese and make their own hummus. They are very busy because they re so so good so I d recommend calling in your order so you can just come pick up and leave.
One of my favorite hours of the day is in this studio. They have great teachers and staff. Yes they are moving to Life Power but your practice your breath your pace. Most of the teachers will be the same. As soon as I take a class there I will write a review about there studio. Ca not wait!
Hats off for this find In town for a sporting Clay s tournament and looking for a bit of fine dining What a find I had never heard of Flemings before Definitely 5 star fine dining at its best Great cocktails great steaks and the brussel sprouts and seafood tower are fabulous Our server was Kurt Very attentive pleasant demeanor very polite and well spoken
Last minute get together to celebrate my buddies birthday and all he s about is playing games. What better way then get everyone adults and kids together stress free at the last minute and get some good food cocktails and most importantly play some games. Eat and Drink first and the games shall follow. When I learned I was coming I did what everyone else probably does reaches into that shoebox or kitchen drawer of game cards from years ago hoping to find some magical points tickets or money loaded to extend the night. I had 6 cards.... We were undecided on the apps so we went with the Fives All Around which included 5 of everything Chicken Wings Chicken Quesadilla with what I think was salsa and then these 5 Pretzel hot dogs and pretzel pieces that actually were pretty good When it comes to dinner the best bang for your buck are the eat and play combos. I went with the Caveman Combo which included ribs sliders and fries while others ventured with the Crispy Nashville Hot chicken or took the healthy route with the grilled chicken and kale salad. As far as cocktails I stuck with my Mule which was good and the birthday boy went with the Green Ghost Crown and apple whiskey in which it comes with a green glowing cube that we kept followed by the Strawberry Watermelon Margarita which also had a glow cube in it . The drinks were good but more entertaining if you ask me. Then again when we shifted to games I think that s when it all kicked it... the liquor that is... Variety of games are cool and you will find yourself swiping like crazy when it comes to games that say you have 10 seconds to continue ... Overall experience can be fun a bit pricey but where else can you find an 8ft Rock em Sock em game deliverying blows.
This is the go to place for anyone with a love for artisanal baked goods. I go there often and it is always clean and the staff are friendly. I have tried anything from their quiches and lattes to sandwiches and almost all of their baked goodies. Their tarts and take home goddies are pricey but that is the industry standard for the quality of their pastries. I would vote their croissant and baguettes the best in town although in my opinion they share that title with Jules on Mount Pleasant. I did some sample comparisons and they are the suppliers for both Pussateri s and Whole Foods. I shared my suspicion with the staff and they confirmed tongue in cheek.
I have own a hair salon and a condo. Both had glue paint and anything you can image on the floors. I never used a floor company before. I always tried clearing my own floors. Never have my floors looked so well and clean until I used Sweettouch. When people walk into my salon after cleaning they always ask if I got new floors. My wife has never been so happy she always looks forward to having new floors with Sweet touch again.
Free vacuum nice car wash. Never used the gas pump due to my Sam s and Costco membership card.
this place is lit. like lit up by the light of a billion machines. Great selection of new and older. Great stuff like a Kiss machine and AC DC machine. Oh and the mature themed machine for dirty old rednecks.... Bring some quarters Bring some bills The silver ball promises thrills and chills. Bend and bump that machine to your will Hold that soda so it does not spill.
Every time I visit Arizona I d come to this place to eat Thai food. I usually order their tom yum soup red curry and shrimp pad Thai. It s one of the better Thai food places I ve experienced here in Arizona.
This is a great neighborhood Italian family restaurant. The lobster ravioli is my favorite here. Delicious garlic bread is served with your meal as well. Great service and food!
Very vegan. The menu includes a variety of choices. Under the sandwiches and burger section everything is mock . I like the Big Wac it s the same as a Big Mac but it s bigger and more filling. The fries are way better than mcdonalds. Plus they have Jones soda. I love this place. Do not be surprised to see some artzy fartzy people though
Took my mom out to Lo Lo s for dinner on the 29th. This was my 3rd time at Lo Lo s and the 1st since the expansion. The place looks great! It was a busy Saturday night and the restaurant was packed but they still found us a table very quickly. I ordered the Famous Soul Food Platter w 3 pieces of chicken a cornbread muffin mac and cheese a waffle and some of that good ol lemonade. My mom got the Toy Toy I think that s 2 wings and a waffle and some grape Kool Aid. We expected to wait a while for our food but it was on the table in no time. Our chicken was hot crispy and juicy even better w that hot sauce. The mac was good cheesy and not cooked to death which I really appreciated . That corn muffin was tasty and the waffles... they were just BOMB. I rolled up a piece of chicken in it and that really set it off. Even with all those people in there the staff did not even seem stressed. They checked on us and made sure we were taken care of. Everybody was all smiles the whole time and our server gave us a God bless on the receipt. Nice touch! I ll be back. You better believe I WILL be back.
SW steakhouse is by far one of the best steakhouses anywhere. There are few restaurants that I would give 5 stars too because there s almost always room to improve. I think SW is at the top of its game. The service was outstanding. Our waitstaff was headed by a very friendly woman. The rest of the team was intuitive and nice. This helps set SW apart from many other steakhouses in Las Vegas. The food was also outstanding. Everything was top notch. I was told that the bread was amazing and that was right. It s baked fresh on premises and excellent. I did not want to fill up on bread but I could have. It set the tone for the rest of the meal. My caesar salad was excellent and the rest of the table loved their seafood appetizers. We went off the menu with a slice of bacon. This was also awesome! I ordered a strip as always . My strip was fantastic. In fact it was one of the best I ve had in a while. The steak was perfectly cooked. There was a nice amount of char on the outside of the steak and the inside was soft and pink as I wanted. I believe the steak was seasoned with just salt and pepper. The salt stood out but was not overbearing and the meat tasted fantastic. I do not recall all of the sides ordered but the photo above shows that we had parmesan creamed spinach. I m pretty sure that we also had the truffled creamed corn butter roasted fingerling potatoes and steamed asparagus. All of the sides were excellent. Overall one of the best steaks and meals I ve had in a really long time. I m looking forward to my next trip so I can sit outside and enjoy the show.
Masterworks is awesome! Extremely honest Boruch and the guys do great work and are trustworthy. Ive had work done at Masterworks in the past. I recently had to take my car to their shop for a check engine light. They took a look at it spent considerable time coming up with a plan that made sense for me. They did not charge me a diagnostic fee even when I ultimately did not get the work done due to personal reasons. My go to mechanic in Cleveland!
The Oaxaca with tofu is my favorite delicious and filling! I just wish it was a little cheaper...
Rainey is the best tattoo artist very patient and listen to what YOU wanted. pay attention to details with an unbeatable price
Me and my wife stopped here during a motorcycle ride yesterday. This place is awesome. Great little dive bar with cold beer and huge shots. The bartender Tony was great and very nice. We ll be back for sure.
My husband and I came to their soft opening on their first day. We ordered Korean fried chicken with fries amazingly juicy fried chicken with a crisp light batter and delicious sauce sweet with a bit of a kick . The fries could use a bit more salt. Rice balls with taro chips the rice balls with kimchi was nice and crispy with fluffy rice inside. It s pretty much like an Italian arancini balls. The taro chips were a bit over fried. Pork belly roti taco the pork belly was nicely charred and the cabbage added a nice crunch. Half corn the charred cheese with the carrots and zucchini on the top was good but I wished the corn was charred throughout as well. The corn felt like it was boiled then charred on a top before serving. Again it could use a bit more salt Otherwise we will definitely be back to try their Galbi and more Korean fried chicken!!!
I was very very VERY pleased with this hair studio. I went in early on a Saturday morning as a walk in. At first I was told to check back in throughout the day in case anyone cancels and I got their info. On my way out Essence stops me and asks me if I needed my hair done and got me in the chair within minutes. She shares a great price for great service! If you are in the area give it a try the place is amazing on the inside and it s a good environment.
Sign 1 that I am getting older. I have a favorite grocery store. Yes...I have shopped many...Randall s HEB Super Wal Mart and Target Harris Teeter Food Lion Bloom RIP Bi Lo Fiesta Safeway Giant Whole Foods Central Market Trader Joes Sunflower. The list keeps going. All make me pine for Publix. Now we in the Charlotte area have a NEW BIG BEAUTIFUL Publix to enjoy. For those not familiar with the beauty of Publix let me wow you 1. Double Coupons up to 50 cents everyday. 2. Free help to your car with your bags...they will never take tips. 3. Amazing deli sandwiches and Bakery. Seriously...ahhhmahhhzing. 4. Best selection of delicious store made sides ever. Try the southern potato salad. Better than my mom s....almost. 5. Seafood department to rival the coast. 6. A store that you enjoy being in No flies not sticky spots on the floor no burned out lights no broken carts. 7. FRIENDLY PEOPLE!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! I know that they are not as cheap as Wal Mart but they also seem to care about the people who shop at their store and the people who work there. I live 25 miles away and have already been twice. Harris Teeter has really let their stores go and now with Whole Foods and Publix moving in I hope that they step up their game. Ca not wait for them to take over Charlotte. May the best store win!
Not a bad Mexican restaurant. The salsa is very delish. Has the perfect amount of kick. I really wish they would add black beans to their menu. Would also be nice to have sliced avocado instead of guacamole. They have only messed my order up once. Added beef instead of chicken.
I started coming to RYK kundalini yoga and meditation classes last October and was hooked after the first class. Unlike any other type of yoga kundalini focuses on uplifting your energy and spirit through breath and body work. It s pure yoga in my opinion focusing on connecting us spirituality to each other and the Divine. I love all the teachers and community of students I have met. Cosmin offers themed new and full moon meditations each month and supports various charitable causes throughout the year. Love it here! Sat nam!
This is my Go To service for Vegas. This time we were taken care off by our hostess named Kayla and she was very helpful and nice. Definitely a company that I trust. Thanks!
I had the quiche today broccoli and it was excellent. Next time I want to try the green chile quiche but the sandwiches also sounded amazing. I wish they were open on weekends because I do not work in the area. Today they had a fresh squeezed tangerine lemonade which was the perfect blend of sweet and tangy. The service was friendly. They made me feel comfortable the moment I walked in because I was not sure where to order. This is the perfect local place to support.
This place has a great location that is perfect to people watch really good food and really good service. We went there for dinner because we were staying at the MGM and were seated right away and our waiter was great and really attentive. We were not super hungry so we just got an appetizer sampler and some sangria. The appetizers were sooo good and their chips and salsa are super tasty too. The sangria was strong and really tasty. This was a really fun food experience and I would definitely recommend it to anybody visiting Vegas!
Pretty good place I had a apple fritter and I would put it up on the list of top 5 I have had. The store is easy to get in and out of and the price is the same as Bosa the staff was very fast and friendly.
This is a GREAT pub in Toronto. I wanted to write a review of it after the first time we went but never quite got around to it. Now I m glad I did not because I can add more in this time after my second go around. Stout is named as a tribute to Murphy s Irish the only Irish stout you ll find on draft here. I like that the place wants to celebrate the other Irish beer that often takes a backseat to the popular front runner but holds its own with a creamy nutty flavor and full body without a bitter aftertaste. You wo not want to mix Murphy s with cider unless you want something that tastes very very sweet. Just drink it straight. The craft beer selection here is commendable. There is always a Great Lakes beer on cask and the microbrew selections are a nice combination of American and Canadian. They turn over their kegs rather frequently too a good thing when it comes to the quality of the taste. The food? Very very good. Better than you d expect for a pub. Fries and Stout burger crisp and juicy respectively. The bun could ve used a little extra work. However the fish and chips was OUTSTANDING. The beer batter was perfect and the fish meat itself slimy almost gelatinous pretty much perfect in my eyes. Some people may be put off by just how soft and slippery the fish was did not have a white fish meat texture but I adored it. It was a large portion and I found myself wanting to finish all the fish because each bite had the ideal texture of crispy to mushy without being oily. Stout it a winter bar. There s a fireplace in the front room many board games for use a dark cozy feel and the attitude that it s best to be safe and cozy with a pint and some grub rather than outside braving the cold. Highly recommend it for a relaxed dinner in Toronto. We ll be back!
I have been going to Brenda since before she open EcoChic Salon. I love the cut and color I get with her. I have always had thick course hair and the products she uses on my hair make my hair feel soft and shinny. I love this place and the all natural products. 2 Thumbs up to you Brenda for opening a salon with all natural eco friendly products.
This place is so cute! Super busy but not a long wait. They have sweet and savory options all good. State street had been missing this place for too long.
A nice place for dining and shopping. I love True Food Kitchen and the iPic is a nice addition for entertainment. parking can be a haul depending on which stores you want to visit but sometimes you get lucky and there is curbside parking available. This is a great place for a date night or just for meeting up with friends so the next time you are looking for that perfect place to shop or dine or catch the latest movie no children allowed at iPic after 7pm this is your spot.
Great old school sushi bar feel. Very fresh we lived the Houston role Service was good and price was fair
Food is excellent and atmosphere was excellent. The only issue I had was the lighting. The lighting was low where we were sitting but it was romantic I just could not read the menu from where I was sitting. The webpage does provide in detail the menu which helped for me because I knew what I was going to have before I went in.
Mche was a highlight of my Montral trip. We were searching for a place and decided to take an Urban Spoon recommendation and was pleasantly surprised by the whole experience. The place was well designed the menu was quiet extensive and the food was great. I had la boule parmesan meatball with tomato sauce and la p tite vie shepards pie with ground beef corn and mashed potatoes . Both were great. On top of everything my bill came up to 15. If you are looking for somewhere easy nice but cheap I would check this place out.
Dionne and her team are great. I own multiple businesses and they are always on top of everything. I never have issues and my business and personal extensions and returns are always handled quickly. I would highly recommend her services.
While we were on a vacation our ice maker decided to break. I gave Aquire Restoration a call right away Monday morning and they had a team at our house within a few hours to begin drying out our floors and walls. Throughout the entire process they informed me what they were doing and how long the process would take. I ve never had this happen to me before but I ca not imagine any other restoration company doing it any better than what Aquire did. 5 stars all the way!
I went here after seeing all the yelp reviews and was really satisfied with the service as soon as I walked in I had 3 different servers asking me if I needed anything that s great in my book im usually invisible the food was good the price was reasonable and its a mile away from my house so they got a new customer.
I use them personally and recommend them professionally. Rod Odell knows his stuff. The staff that comes out is always friendly.
Efrain and his wife were on time and efficient. Great price and quality work with a lot of options. Efrain informed us of pros and cons and used his car as a model to make sure that we were comfortable with how dark the windows were going to be. My neighbor even came out to check out his work and ended up hiring him!!
Great place love the tasty food and awesome service. My kiddos love the kids menu. I love all the vegetarian options. There is something for everyone on the menu. Give this place a try its one of our favs!
This is a place where I prefer to eat apps. I eat the hell out of there stuffed mushrooms and they have these Asian firecracker or something spring rolls that I love. Do not judge me but I can eat a whole loaf of their bread by myself.
The best customer service I ve ever encountered at a fast food chain. When I walked in the manager held the door open welcomed me and ASKED HOW MY DAY WAS. Whoa!! Every cashier was chipper and helpful and staffers went from table to table to check if customers needed anything else including topping off soda clearing trays and fetching more dipping sauces. I even saw the manager serving fountain drinks behind the counter to keep up with the pace of soda orders. Coming from NYC where you re considered lucky if a fast food place gets your order right I was thrilled by the quality and amount of care I received. Oh yeah the food was great too... Fresh and piping hot!
the tennis dept is much better than most sporting goods chains in the area. tennis staff actually play tennis and are well knowledgeable.
Cesar came through. There was a miscommunication the day prior and he apologized. He came in and did the work as promised. Very clean work and gave updates along the way. He knows what he s doing and I know I will contact him again in the future. Do yourself a favor and call him. He also installs lighting and fans as a FYI. Thank you Cesar I truly appreciate it.
We held welcome Drinks for our wedding here. It was fantastic. We had the whole bottom floor to ourselves It was easy to get everything set up and the entire event was customizable. Just tell them what you want and they ll make it happen. The food and drink were fantastic and the ambiance was great. But what stood out above all else was the flexibility during the event. We got about 40 more people than anticipated and the staff just rolled with it and keep the food and drink coming. Also when we wanted to extend the time of the event by 1.5 hours it was no problem. I d recommend this as a venue for any type of gathering. Best of all everything came at an affordable price.
I am so impressed with this studio! It is tucked away in a small strip mall so you may not notice if you re not looking. BUT! Upon entering for the first time I was greeted by the friendly receptionist. It was a very busy time for the studio but the atmosphere was very relaxed. It is a very clean and cozy place with a boutique full of clothes books accessories etc. The restrooms are very clean and pleasant. Not like some studios that I ve been to yuck! One thing I really like is the room that Im regularly in has no wall mirror. Some may argue that you ca not check your poses but I believe this gives everyone a chance to relax more since we re not all gazing at each other. It is easier to listen to your body instead of constantly making sure you re doing it like that person...etc. My instructor is so bubbly and kind. Her voice is very calming and her instruction is relaxed. Granted this is an intro class but she makes sure that everyone feels good comfortable and really focuses on the importance of self. Making sure to listen to one s own body with gentle correction if something is truly off . Everyone there is very warm and friendly and I cannot wait to continue my classes at Yoga Pura! A true gem.
This is the only place I trust to watch my three dogs! The staff is always so helpful and friendly they know my dogs by name and I always feel they are cared for. I am an helicopter dog mom so I have very high standards when it comes to doggie daycares I love the open indoor and outdoor play areas they re so spacious and I never feel like it s overcrowded. Love that they take pitties too my two pitbulls go crazy when we pull into the parking lot! Would not take Buster and Bowie and Sparkles anywhere else!
Did not catch his name just left drive through about 10 minutes ago the gentlemen had wonderful customer service that s hard to come by these days and our food was all nice and hot
In a frantic last minute search to land a dinner reservation for Valentine s Day we were lucky enough to secure a 6 00pm reservation at Brassaii. We arrived 15 minutes late but called ahead as a we were stuck in traffic. Parking was a cinch to find as street parking is available starting at 6pm so were able to score a spot right out front. We walked down the romantic cobblestone courtyard up to there signature red doors. We were welcomed by a pair of hostesses holding the door open followed by complimentary coat check. Another hostess offered us complimentary glasses of sparkling wine before leading us to our table. Since it was Valentine s Day they had a complimentary candy station and picture booth. We of course took part in the picture booth dressing up with props and received the free photos at the end of our dinner. I thought that was a great idea we had tons of fun doing that. We were seated a cozy table in the corner dressed fittingly with red table cloths and napkins and candlelight. Our waiter was really friendly and attentive the whole evening. After taking our orders he brought a basket of warm sliced bread and butter. For Drinks we went with two glasses of champagne Moet et Chandon which is always delicious and bubbly. For starters we went with the house soup Butternut squash pumpkin seed brittle apple parsnip The soup came in a huge bowl very creamy and flavourful without being too heavy and I loved the added crunch from the brittle For mains we both went with the striploin 16 oz Striploin grilled mushroom sauce shallot choice of one side The steak came beautifully plated in thick juicy slices. it was a humongous portion looked far more larger 16 oz more than enough for one person. The steak was cooked perfectly medium rare nice tender cut and very flavourful. I also loved the sweet grilled shallots adorning the steak. For my side I went with the Brussels Sprouts Pancetta Again another huge platter which was fitting for two people. The sprouts were lightly caramelized with bits of the diced pancetta giving it a nice porky flavour We also go also a side of the House Cut Fries Parmigiano Reggiano Aioli Again another huge portion. The fries were ok very golden brown with a sprinkling of grated cheese over top nothing more to it As if we were not overly stuffed at this point I could not resist having a look at the dessert menu Pot Au Creme Baileys Alunga Milk Chocolate Dulcey Orange Tart Coffee Sauce The pot au creme had that distinct bailey s flavour however I would have liked it to be slightly more chocolatey. The orange tart with coffee sauce was the clear winner on the plate I was really hesitant that I would not like it all coffee and orange? however the flavours really complimented each other the bright citrus flavour from the creamy tart and the sweet coffee sauce really worked well together. Overall I have to say Brassaii really did a great job in creating a romantic and memorable Valentine s Day. Food portions were very generous staff were all very friendly and service was great from start to finish.
The desserts at Serendipity are worth a visit alone simply incredible. My only complaint is Serendipity gets very busy when The Strip loads up and wait times get long. But that s because it s a great restaurant worth waiting for.
The only ramen place i go to in Mississauga. It does get crowded at night and you ll have to write ur name down on the list to get a table. Otherwise its pretty quite at other times. Never had to wait too long. Their menu doesnt carry a huge selection. But good enough. And theyve added rice dishes in there too. Their ramen is pretty good. All my friends love it. Havent tried their rich dishes but after reading the reviews on here i might do so next time i visit! Tried their salmon oniguri for the first time. Its a rice ball wrapped with seaweed and stuff with salmon inside. They also provided these finger gloves for you to eat it with. I thought it was really cute. Overall good experience every time i visit. My go to ramen place in sauga!
Tonight we were able to catch happy hour for 30 minutes. Loved the variety they had on the happy hour menu however I was a little disappointed that there were no cocktails only beer or wines. The ultimate goal tonight was to get my hands on the Oxtail Fries not on the happy hour menu . We got to try the wings pork buns and fish tacos. The wings let me tell you are divine. Super crunchy and full of flavor without having to drench it in sauce. The pork buns are always a safe and flavorful bet. The tacos though were a disappointment. I saw no fish only avocados and the other veggies that were inside. It had flavor but it s called fish tacos for a reason. The restaurant was clean the waiters were friendly and there was no wait for a table. Ca not wait to visit again!!!
I love watching movies at the Forum especially the 5 pm shows on Cheapy Tuesdays. The fact I do not have park and can just get off Atwater metro and walk across to the theater earns solid points. Do not want to spend 20 on popcorn? no problem Dollarama in Place Alexis Nihon! or pick up a burger at McDs Vegan? there is a copper branch down the street! With over 18 halls playing Imax 3D and other cosmic movie features including main stream and foreign films Yes even Bollywood . Not to mention the Forum also houses a comedy club arcade club and bowling alley SAQ restuarants and boutiques! The down side of the movie theater is that there is only one food beverages counter and you do not earn as much Scene points for your purchases. Go with the kids pop special for 8 Drink popcorn m and ms and collectors cup is a steal . You may not be experiencing a hockey game y like in the olden days although you can pretend to and pose for a picture in the old styled seats but this is a fun activity center for the family.
I read the reviews on here and wrote Ron a message for a quote first. He wrote back pretty much immediately! His price was right and he said he could get to my house between 8 9 the next morning so I could get to work. He arrived at 7 50am He was done before 8 30am! He fixed my crappy issue lol. I had the cap open up on the ground and tissue and waste was coming out made a big wet circle . It STUNK! Ron was friendly affordable and fast! He also informed me that flushable wipes are not so flushable! Lol. I recommend him 100 times over! He s won my business even though I hope I do not have anymore issues! Oh yeah and he has a 30 day warranty!
I went to Chippendales for the first time and it was so fun! The music the choreography the costumes THE GUYS were so playful and hot! Definitely recommend for a bachelorette party birthday party or a random girls night out. I ll be back for sure! Soon
I was incredibly satisfied. I felt like a Las Vegas mob boss smoking a cigar and getting head from a showgirl when I was done with my breakfast. Like a fucking champion! The night before had been Stevey s b day dinner and since I did not have to work Saturday morning I got to indulge in brunch well really breakfast since O.E. closes at 11 30 with some quality PHX peeps! Kristin and her partner in bad parking crime big J had a bad time with the parking maybe the huge truck backing out of a space smaller than my vagina had something to do with it? and right next to the Vig shone Over Easy. There were cute benches set up outside and the wooden cosy eating venue outside was super classy. It felt very west coast and I agree it was nice not to see parking lots or highways while eating all patios in the SW should seriously consider building more outdoor friendly structures like O.E. The wait for our group of 5 would be about a half hour totally reasonable. I asked if we could have mugs of coffee while we waited and our server was totally sweet and brought it out for us and we hung out outside enjoying the sunny day that was chilly enough for all of us to wear light jackets sweatjackets thermals and cable knit sweaters but not have crippled cold hands for eating. Our server ended up sitting us down early warning us the kitchen was backed up the food looked huge all around me so I figured it was worth the wait. The menu was a picky eater heaven. Most meals come with meat and there is never a substitute for non meat eaters like a fruit cup or scone something of an upgrade from meat except more toast or potatoes. But I digress. It took me forever to figure out what I wanted but I made my own meal from the sides menu with the country potatoes that Stevey seriously would NOT stop staring at. Now I know how chicks with big boobs feel. Stevey look at ME not my country potatoes you piggy! I also got one egg over easy no bread and a chocolate syrup belgian waffle from the kids menu with the short glass of OJ and coffee my bill came out to under ten bucks! And I got a LOT of food that was cooked just perfect with really good hot sauce on the table and extremely helpful wait staff. Kristin was right in taking note of the slats when waiting take note of where you will want to NOT sit trying to eat while the bright arizona sun is burning your retina causing you to flinch and tear up is not the most desirable morning after look you know? The fact they let us linger and drink more coffee was def. a huge plus I love the time a good weekend brunch takes with friends its a great way to catch up what happened the night before or plan outings for the future or just shoot the shit making each other laugh while having a good simple meal. I peeked inside and noticed how bright and cheery the counter space was I would totally come here early on a weekday just to read the paper at the bright happy and hip counter. The tables inside were small but very cute diner esque. I just hope they plan on having misters come summertime so people do not melt like butter on waffles!
I mean as a staple of Mesa dining you know what you re going to get. Something fried. And sauce. All the sauce. I am partial to their tarter sauce which I could eat on its own. But it s not going to be handmade fish filets or shrimp scampi so if you come knowing that you ll enjoy it.
Dusty and his moving team were efficient friendly and courteous. They showed up on time after calling prior to confirm their appointment and immediately began working. They were careful with our items and followed directions very closely. Also their rates are very low compared to other estimates but unlike other low bidders the quality is there which is SUPER important. I was surprised because I have had some poor experiences with other movers in the past. Thankfully I could trust in Dusty and his team to do a good job.
What a great experience for our 29th Anniversary! Our server Dalia was so friendly and made us feel so welcome! This was worth every dime!
Here for smog test Great service great price and quick. Definitely will come back for future services.
The service here is great! I m a new client but they made me feel like a regular! My nails look amazing and the pedicure was fantastic!
I had a maple cronut plus a scoop of eis cream...absolutely wonderful! Everyone should give this beautiful place a try.
This is a five star restaurant for me because of the overall experience the humble cozy exterior the atmosphere and simple decoration inside the servers absence of annoying music and the smooth sound of people talking the pickles the food and the dessert. I just end up having a great time every time i go there. I do not speak any french and most servers seem to prefer to speak in french. Nevertheless they are always kind helpful and some of them have a fun pleasant sense of humor as well. They bring a jar of pickles to every table and leave it there for you to munch over. The food tastes great and the portions are what you d expect of a french restaurant. I ve tried the ravioli the steak the liver the risotto... And a few of their desserts. My fav dessert so far is the white chocolate pistachio brulee it s a great place to treat a friend who s visiting or just to catch up with an old friend over excellent food
My husband went to Another Broken Egg in Louisana and really liked it. So he was excited to see them expanding into Charlotte. When we heard that this location and South Park had both opened we read the reviews on both and decided to try South Park first based on the unfavorable reviews for this location. I ve posted a review for the South Park location too However when we received a Coupon deal we decided to give this location a try since it s significantly closer to home. We re so glad we did! The service was excellent and the food was delicious! Thankfully we did not experience any of the issues that have been posted here! My husband and I are trying watch our waistlines so we decided to share a dish. We had the Huevos Rancheros and it was delicious and more than enough for us to share. We also ordered a side of fruit and was pleasantly surprised by the fruit selection...fresh raspberries sliced cantaloupe sliced kiwi and sliced pears. The fruit was very fresh and quite substantial for a side . The coffee was also quite good. Next time we visit I will be sure to take a picture of the Heuvos Rancheros to post here. It looked as fantastic as it tasted! Our server was very friendly and attentive. She was also happy to answer the handful of questions that we had about the menu. During our meal the Manager also stopped by our table to check on us and to ask if we enjoyed our meal. She was very friendly too! The prices here are comparable to other local breakfast restaurants. So no complaints there either. I do need to say...I wish that Yelp had the option of giving a 1 2 star because I probably would have gone with 4.5 stars instead of 4 and only for one reason....all of the food is fresh but it appears that the breakfast potatoes are not made fresh. Do not get me wrong they were still very tasty and we ate them all but fresh potatoes really would have kicked the rating to 5 stars for me. So let me say...in my opinion this should be a 4.5 star rating but that was not an option...so I need to go with 4 stars. If they had fresh potatoes the rating would have been 5 stars. We ve been searching for a go to breakfast place for several years and it looks like we may have found it. Finally! I can only hope that our future visits will be as good as our first one was. Keeping fingers crossed!
My absolute favorite breakfast spot! The Huntington Skillet with a short stack of German Chocolate Pancakes hits the spot every time! I crave food here and eat it about once a week!
Great store only reason for 4 stars is having to wait even with an appointment. Staff is really helpful and was able to answer all questions in regards to the technology I would need to start my podcast and website
Let me start off by saying that I am have not stepped a foot inside of this Sunchain location prior to today nor have I ever used their tanning beds before. I live in Gilbert Queen Creek area so this location would not be doable for me on a weekly basis. However with that being said I had an excellent experience today hence my 4 star rating even though Alexa was wonderful I am unable to give Sunchain higher rating since I did not get a chance to use their tanning beds . Alexa was super friendly both on phone and in person and in my opinion displayed one of the better attitudes I have encounter lately from a customer service standpoint. She surpassed my expectations especially since the only thing I had to purchase was some tanning bed eyewear... C mon let s admit it most tanning salons employees would not have been as helpful if they knew in advance that you were not planning to purchase their tanning packages. Alexa seem to be that rare exception and that is the reason why I decided to write this review. In my opinion she deserves a 5 star rating! Even though I was not able to become a client at this particular location I was given information on a Sunchain location much closer to my home. I will check it out soon and if all Sunchain locations have this type of customer service well consider me a new client!
Order using iPads. Fast and accurate. Good food with large selection and comfortable seatings.
The service was great the place is really cute it s especially good for a group of girls the food was really good I had the eggs Benedict. My group of girls and I had the tangerine Mamosa s and they were delicious.
Love this place! Salmon fried zucchini garlic fries burgers wedge salad shakes and BBQ pizza are all favorites. We had breakfast there once and it was great too! Be sure to check them out on your bday too!! Also this may sound random but the bathrooms are very unique!
I love this place! Incredible sandwiches rotating menu great location awesome app for easy take out orders and very very nice people working here. The space looks great too. Soooo many good sandwiches. The only thing I had here that I did not care for was the huge buns used on the breaded fish sandwiches. The breads normally used are substantial... anything larger makes it hard to eat and hard to taste the good stuff. I order the Falafel or the Fish. Rye or sourdough bread. AMAZING!
Let me tell you a little story......I called Salon 42 and ordered a 100 gift certificate to be mailed to my daughter for her birthday. I live out of state and could not be with her. There was a mix up at the Salon and the gift certificate was never sent. The morning of the birthday I called the shop and spoke to the owner Cara. She could not have been nicer and she very much wanted to make things right. She personally delivered the gift which she had created a beautiful gift bag of goodies along with a balloon to my daughter s place of work. But wait.........she also SANG Happy Birthday to my daughter AND video taped it and sent it to me so I could enjoy the birthday wish too! Now THAT is going the extra mile! I was absolutely thrilled that a business owner would go that out of the way to please a customer! Cara you are a doll and it is easy to see why your business is so successful !!! You are a wonderful person and I would recommend you and your salon to anyone for the mere fact that you care so much about your customers and the services you provide! Everyone go to Salon 42 and tell Cara she sings a great Happy Birthday! I would have uploaded the video but could not figure out how to do it Sorry
We have used Saul and his team for the past three years for all of our landscaping needs. He is honest reliable and very talented. He has done both my personal residence and some of my commercial properties over the years and I have never been disappointed.
Always friendly and always accommodating. You should go for the food. Very large selection of deli and pizza selections. The sit down area leaves much to be desire. Booths and all well broken in and it is very dingy. Just now inviting. But the food offerings are excellent and we have always enjoyed the food TO GO.
From what I have seen so far vegan places typically do not focus on having a great decor. I guess people go there mostly for the vegan food. I have found myself wondering many times with so many classy chic restaurants in Montreal how come we do not have a classy chic vegan restaurant where people could enjoy both the food and the ambience. Restaurant LOV does just that it has a nice selection of food and wine great decor and gives the feeling that you are eating at a proper restaurant and not a food court. To be honest I have not tried any of their main dishes so ca not really comment on the general quality of the food. But will definitely go back.
This lounge is very laid back and fun to come to I come here at least 2 days out of the week and every Friday they have a live DJ everyday of the week they have different specials going on and its all decent priced I wish they had snacks though but other then that I love coming here.
Our family traveled from California USA and we had such an amazing experience at Pig Out BBQ! Jackie was superb! She along side her coworker were able to accommodate our family of 15! The food was delicious and so tasteful. This place is located right across the University of Toronto and I d recommend it to anyone who s in Toronto. The experience Jackie gave us was definitely unforgettable and we appreciated her attentiveness. If I ever return to Toronto I ll make sure to stop by again! The pulled pork sandwich was mouth watery and full of flavor! Thank you Jackie for your great service! Best Regards Karen from California USA
French toast with carmelized bananas pecans and carmel sauce is delicious! We went on July 4th and we waited for 20 30 minutes. Not sure if that s normal but the service was friendly and fast.
Hands down some of the best BBQ I ve ever eaten. I would say this is just as if not better than some of the best BBQ I ve had in TX. Do not pass on the Q Rolls we almost spoiled our dinner by devouring the amazingly melt in you mouth brisket goodness. The spicy sausage and brisket was our favorite the complimentary cornbread was great as well. All in all a 5 star restaurant that we ll definitely be going back for more. We literally ate until we could not any more and then the check came to save us from ourselves... then the magic happened. After we paid our check our waitress came back with a bag of the complimentary cinnamon sugar donuts we had watched them make fresh while we waited for our table. The perfect way to end the evening!
I have been going here since I was little. I love everything there! Their ranch dressing is also amazing... The downfall for them though is the prices. For example the wedding soup there taste great BUT its almost 4 for a cup .... And its definitely not 4 worthy amount. Service is also great! I will definitely always go back
The best place for a high quality coffee and scrumptious breakfast. Everything we had was on point sooo we went 3 days in a row while in town from Oakland. Yum! Everyone there and the space have a solid cool vibe.
I really enjoyed the work that was done at Curl Ambassadors. I would definitely recommend trying this place if you have curly hair and would like some guidance hair tips or styling info. My stylist was quite good sorry I forgot her name I just remember she was a black women with blonde hair if I get the request from any other yelper out there I will call them and find out her name . I alos have a friend of mine who goes there for regular haircuts and sings their praises as well.
This place is amazing. Clean Organized Great customer service Never any long lines Always fully stocked Affordable Great deals and discounts Very fast at checking you out Greens 1 3 Roots 1 Citrus 1 2 3 Orange turmeric Apple Lennon Vanilla almond This location is great and so close by to my house that I go here once a week. It is located in Tivoli village and recently they have built more development so it s nice to just walk around or even Have lunch or dinner. People often enjoy a juice while they are walking the farmers market every Saturday. You will love this place!!! It s a healthy gem. Enjoy. Tip if you attend the David Barton gym upstairs they give you a 15 discount on your purchase.
Love love love these bagels. Nice sized caf with friendly service. Well situated near bus stops if you are a BMW er bus metro walk living in the west island. Bagels are warm when you get them and you can watch them making them! I have yet to try out their eating section though just grabbing my fix before I head back to boring bagel Vancouver. Everyone should try one at least once in their lives. Montreal bagels are the best in the world!!
Today was the 1st time I had been in Sin City knit shop and I was pleasantly surprised by all the beautiful yarn. Debbie was so much help and even took the time to sit down and show me how to knit a new pattern. The shop was very busy with lots is knitters and I felt right at home... If you have not been there yet it s a must see!!
Really great haircut very convenient location downtown. Maria was great to talk to and most importantly left me with a haircut exactly how I wanted. Fit me into her schedule last minute! Will definitely be back.
Delicious hand pulled and knife cut noodles. Wonderful appetizers I tried hot and spicy pork wonton fried pork dumplings and mangolian beef pancake. All incredible. I ll be back.
This restaurant has a cozy wholesome vibe and performs wonders with unprocessed food. Like many raw food restaurants Live is great for those who cannot eat gluten. I enjoyed a chocolate coconut cupcake the coconut somehow tasted like cream cheese or maybe my mind was playing tricks on me and a slice of almond crusted cake that was nicely sweetened not saccharine . I also bought some cinnamon raisin gluten free bagels to go which although tough to chew were tasty. An additional plus Live is close to the subway.
Ace was our contractor and the entire experience was amazing! He was always available to answer the many questions we had. He was very patient and worked the schedule perfectly so all work would be completed in time for our daughter s swimming pool birthday party! Our pool was resurfaced and our cool deck as well and all the work came out gorgeous! Thank you Ace!!
Name Brand just needs to have more smiling employees! They have good music playing so the attitude at all times should be reflect also in employees. Dre and Christine ? I think are soo friendly and just inviting. As far as the clothes there they need to urgently be out with the old and bring in the new. Prices are not bad but they have competition with Buffalo Exchange and Rag o Rama good spots to shop for unique pieces . These two other resale shops do Dollar days and they need to jump on that band wagon. They do have 3 racks and stuff outside but that should all be 1 really. As far as reselling they ll buy good decent stuff here no matter the brand as long as its in good condition and payout around 40 . They take a range of stuff and always pay out cash unlike Platos in Scottsdale at least who only do store credit most of the time.
Happy plate size were small but flavor jammed packed. Sangria is no joke and let s not slouch on the male servers.... they on point!!!
Amazing food service and view! Lonnie and chef Cam were the best! Chef Cam came out to check on us. Made adjustments for our lower carb diet older person in our party and our fun group. Definitely will be back when we want a special dinner. Best food on Mt. Washington that we have tried so far.
Farm Basket is one of those nostalgic treats I allow myself from time to time but not too regularly. The reason? It s SO greasy. And more than that the grease is GOOD. I do not know what they do to it or if I ve just become acclimated to it over the years but an order of fries from this place sends my taste buds tappin but the rest of my gastrointestinal system into severe distress. But man are they ever good. The Gobbler is awesome. A breaded turkey sandwich with Miracle Whip hey that s what they give you and cranberry spread it s just darn delicious. The Clucketos are classics and if you find yourself dipping into the Colonel s bucket too often you should try some of their fried chicken on for size. It ll win you over. Plus you get to drive through a barn. That rules.
This is the best dentist I ve ever been to hands down! super friendly staff state of the art equipment and HD TVs for every patient! relaxing atmosphere Dr. Carlos is friendly and amazing!
I just started my service with Primavera and I am very happy. I have had a different cleaning service before and I thought they did an OK job. Well I now know how a place is supposed to look once it is cleaned well. They are also very will to discuss the cleaning and to be accommodating to my work schedule.
We stayed at the Palazzo and had breakfast here twice. I would absolutely recommend it for breakfast. I had the buffet both times and it really was outstanding. The fruit is fresh and nicely cut. You have a toast area that has many bread choices as well as bagels and English muffins. The only downside is there was no cream cheese for the bagels. The hot area had an omelet to order area as well as excellent waffles ready to eat very nicely done scrambled eggs which is rare in general and by far some of the best bacon I ve had ever. There was also ham sausage and hash browns as well. The price also included a beverage. My friend got the huevos rancheros which I tasted and they truly were amazing. Fresh and delicious all around.
Excellent service...done promptly and professionally. If you have quality eyewear that deserves only the best...this is the place. I highly recommend...
Best Italian you can get around here!! You re in for a treat if you get Lewis as your server! He is fantastic! We had the zuppa di mare and spaghetti and meatballs! Fantastico!
Always great coming here for brunch even though there is a wait but the egg Benedict s is a must plus a side of pancakes with the excellent maple syrup. Also check out the cool graffiti work in the restrooms.
The food is amazing here the staff could be a little friendlier and quicker. Otherwise really good place!
Average food but a big plus for speed and price when you have somewhere better to be. Half the people seated there were speaking French so it could not be all that bad eh?
Very knowledgeable staff very helpful products very reasonable price. I shall return
I love this place! I come here almost every week. The last few times I ve been in here though there has been a black girl working and she always talks to the employees rude and condescending. She even talked to me rude and I did not appreciate it! I think I ll start going to a different location as long as she is there!
a very cute cafe with comfy benches covered with pillows. Yay I love pillows in cafes also friendly barista. and they had some crazy looking coffee making machine that looked more like a locomotive oh the desserts are yummy sea salt brownie here was my second this week first being in Green Beanery and it was sooooooo gooooood! and the variety of drinks is great!
JUST visited the Greek Pita a week ago after driving past it for the past year and a half. It was pretty worth it! The bf and I have to give it a 3 1 2 stars... 3 from the BF and 4 from me so it s a 4 on Yelp We each had the falafel pita with french fries. The bf said the falafel was too dry for him but I found it pretty decent. My only complaint was that there was too much tahini sauce in my falafel yet not enough in the bf s... we probably should have traded! Other than that I thought the pita was absolutely delicious. The fries were so so do not think I will order them in the future. That said the ambiance of The Greek Pita is really cool it s well decorated and nicely set up. Lots of seating lots of booths to make it semi private. It s also really cool to see them shaving the gyro meat right in the kitchen! I mean I m not a meat eater but the bf thought it was cool so you know... if you re into that... It s fairly well priced about 8 falafel and fries plate. Bf thought it was a little expensive for the quality but I would imagine that s about average. We will definitely be going again next on our list is the gyro for him and the hummus platter for me!
Eating healthy is not exactly the most fun thing to do UNLESS you go to Pita Jungle! The desert ridge location has a great patio a great bar and is always busy!! The menu is incredible! The chicken and hummus on the starter menu is sooo good! This weekend we tried the Mediterranean chicken salad and the black bean burger. Being a meat and potatoes girl I was a bit skeptical. The meal was flavorful and filling! We get take out there all the time too! If you are looking for a great meal and a great patio look to Pita Jungle at Desert ridge! Yum! Yum!
I like this place a lot. Everyone is really friendly and the food is so good. My favorite is the buffalo chicken sandwich.
I had the pleasure of staying at the Trump due to a business trip to Toronto. When I arrived I was greeted with very nice staff and an amazing smelling lobby. Doormen are friendly and somehow this one knew my name...whoa. I did use the gym one evening however it closes at 10pm and is quite minimal in equipment. As for the room I was stuck with two double beds for myself instead of a single king bed as I requested because they were fully booked. Boo... I would have liked my giant bed. The beds themselves were quite uncomfortable for a hotel chain with such a nice reputation. The middle of the bed sunk in causing my back to hurt for the 3 nights I stayed there. I ve also suprisingly had much better pillows at say a Hilton... these standard down pillows deflated instantly. However they have a full pillow menu that you can order different kinds of pillows from I just could not find one that was right for me. The bathroom huge tub and nice shower with the rain shower head There s also a TV in the mirror which seems a bit unnecessary. Everything was clean upon arrival. Though it was not perfect my stay here was one of the most comfortable I ve had in any hotel I did not feel like anything was ever dirty and made myself at home.
Very good meal and location with an outdoor terrace overlooking the strip. We had the bone in filet and meatballs as an appetizer. Both were cooked to perfection and the table we had on the terrance could not be beat.
Pros Great value for the money. Cheaper than the strip higher quality than the other downtown hotels Great location right next to the Mob Museum and 2 blocks from Fremont St. Rooms are clean fairly spacious. Friendly receptionist and dealers Free ! valet parking for hotel guests. Pool area on 3rd floor deck with lots of chairs and couches. Fast elevators. Weird compliment I know but I have bad memories of waiting 5 minutes for an elevator at larger hotels on the strip. Cons Casino not very lively Tiny fitness room. Felt claustrophobic even with only 2 other people in there Bland room decor reminded me of IKEA Pool itself was quite small ca not imagine doing much swimming if it was a busier day. Wifi did not work during my stay
One of our favorite spots for lunch we returned thanks to this Vegas heat for some cold soba action....Twice in two weeks! Their Battera and Zaru Combo is no longer offered so I went with the Tonkatsu Don Zaru Combination and that too was absolutely DELISH! On Father s Day They ran a special 4 course menu of Battera Spicy Kara Age Chicken Wings Cold Zaru and Tempura Bowl and Coconut Ice cream for dessert which was very tasty as well. If you re looking for a Japanese restaurant serving simple honest food with delicious clean flavors I Naba is your spot....ALOHA!!!
It was my first time in a Korean bbq restaurant and I was not expecting to see stoves in the middle of the tables just like Melting Pot. Since Melting Pot is one of my fave restaurants I was excited. We ordered the bbq combo 1 which includes pork steak and chicken. We also ordered sake bombers and an rainbow roll. Rainbow roll was great. The bbq was decent although it left a weird coating in my mouth. There was plenty left over. We did have a good time trying to cook everything while doing bombers. 2nd time around we had sushi. Caterpillar Spider and Rainbow. Rainbow and Caterpillar was good. Spider was okay. Service was good and bad. They are super friendly and nice. They make sure your water or drinks is filled. But they forget things like utensils and napkins. Our server also did not explain how to use the stove since everything was written in Korean. Even though we told them it was our first time. We learned when we got our check how to turn it off or adjust the temperature. No wonder it was hard to keep our meat from burning. But they were so friendly that I can let those inconsistencies slide at a low key place like this. On a side note they do have 2 small rooms available for karaoke parties. Might be fun to get a group together and do sake bombers while rapping or singing. I give them 4 stars for now because I enjoyed both my visits. It is more 3.5 so I grade them a B
The show is definitely entertaining. Good music and good vocal singers. The show will be closing soon. Should catch it before it s gone. bazVegas
Went there Friday evening. Food and service was excellent and presented better than most other celebrity restaurants. The karaoke mc made the place even more fun. We are locals and will go back. Btw thank you for no parking fees for anyone
Great food and Great service! The only downside is they were still waiting for their liquor license so no drinks for me . I will definitely come back the next time I am in Vegas.
I had a craving for jerk chicken so I tapped on my trusty yelp app and came across this cozy little place. If you blink you ll drive right by it. The dining room only has about four tables but there is a patio outside if you prefer al fresco. I ordered a beef patty and the jerk chicken dinner. Total around 14. The beef patty was the best I had in years. Enough spice to make you say whoa thinking it may be too spicy but it never gets to a painful point. Perfect for me. The jerk chicken dinner I got was small size since this was my first go round with this business. It s a really generous portion and the food was delicious. Please support this lovely local business.
Do I really need to review this place? I mean who could not like chocolate crepes pastries savory sandwiches and delicious coffee? Only reason why it has 4 and not 5 stars is because of their prices! My boyfriend always gets the White Chocolate Mocha which is roughly a 10 12 ounces for 7.75. Geesh! It s pretty good but Geesh! They offer gelato smoothies sweet crepes savory crepes tons of pastries cold hot sandwiches and coffee. Everything is EXPENSIVE so do not expect a cheap treat! You will also find different pre packaged treats for sale. One important thing I recommend STAY AWAY FROM THE SAVORY CREPES ham swiss chicken turkey etc. They are just nasty in my opinion! The batter they use is different than the one from the sweet crepes. This batter is dark brown and tastes like cardboard! The inside filling does not make up for that awful taste!
Anthony just left from repairing our garage door and we are completely satisfied. It stopped working all of a sudden and A1 responded quickly and was very professional even over the phone. Anthony contacted us 20 min out was knowledgeable and efficient. I know previous reviews say this company is ripping people off but sometimes you ca not put a price on piece of mind. We ve owned our home nearly 10 years and it s no surprise items get worn. He replaced upgraded our springs and bearings. We also got a lifetime warranty. Yes it was several hundred dollars but it s one less thing we ll have to worry about.
I m a picky eater and this place was sooooo good!!!! I had the carne asada burrito they were very helpful in explaining the ingredients with me having a lot of allergies it really meant a lot. I love this place!!!!
Me and my boyfriend went on a weekday. Not too busy with a good vibe! Waitress and hostess were very nice. Healthy option menu. He got the dwblta and added an egg. It came with a tomato soup which was equally bomb. I ordered the truffled egg sandwich hold the shrooms. Was probably the best scramby egg sandwich I ever had. Potatoes I were not crazy about but that s ok. Loved this place. Would go back again.
The best breakfast I have ever eaten. I was passing through town on my way to LA and stopped here for some huevos rancheros and an horchata after which I cruised the neighborhood looking for real estate so I could fantasize about living closer to this restaurant. The smell of roasted chiles hit me when I first walked in and the sauces delivered on that promise and so much more. My breakfast mate had tamales and eggs and I was licking the red chile sauce off his plate like a farm animal after I had finished the roasted salsa that had been on my eggs which were perched atop crisp homemade tortillas with a secret minimal layer of cheese underneath. The refritos were more velvety than a 70s dinner tux. The chorizo home fries were another whole come to Jesus moment. After this experience I m really not interested in eating any other food in my entire life but Presidio Cocina but sadly that will not be practical.
Go see lisa at prism she is amazing my mother and I have been going to her for years and we could not be happier. Her talents are endless and she is very professional and always makes time for us. You wo not be disappointed.
My fiance and I had talked about visiting the Melting Pot several times in passing. Well last night I decided what the heck and took her out for a great night. I was extremely pleased from the time we entered until the time we left the resturant. We decided on the Big Night Out which right now Is Central South American themed. Every course was great! If you like lobster and a good mix of other meats I would recommend the Fondue Fusion with the mojo cooking style as it works well with the other flavors. Dessert is every bit as good as it sounds and more they even brought out more of what we liked best at no extra cost. As other people have commented in reviews set aside a couple of hours. We were there for 2 1 2 hours but enjoyed every bit of it. Thanks again to the excellent staff and our server Brandon for making a memorable first trip.
Good pizza the best in Little Italy. It does not matter if it s close to NY style pizza or not. It s still pretty good. The thin crust is great and I love the variety of toppings they have. Walking distance from class made it even better. The last few times I ve been I ve actually gotten their dinners. My favorite is the eggplant parmesan. It comes with pasta bread butter salad and dressing all for about 9. That s a great deal for a college student. Their eggplant parm is good and their red sauce is flavorful. The only downfall is that it gets on the greasy side sometimes with a pool of oil on the bottom of the container. The place is really small so just expect to either pick it up or have it delivered. I do not know if they have tables outside in the summer but they might.
I lived at the Cabrillo for a year and 1 2 never had any major issues. Let me tell you when I first moved in the prior residents had animals and the management was unaware so I moved in and immediately was allergic I requested a unit with no animals clearly I was livid! Ultimately I had already moved all my furniture furniture in and was 6 months pregnant kinda sucked! Thank god for great management they really did all that they could they came in within a day or two and moved all my furniture replaced all the carpets and base boards. Although it was stressful they did their best to fix a shitty situation. As far as any other issues management was always attentive helpful and courteous to any issues that I had. I will add that the pool could use some remodeling it s a bit small for the property. Other then that it was perfect for the temporary placement that I needed.
I gave this place a second chance cause I really love the Aria and I really felt let down the previous time I was here. To my delight everything was amazing this time. The bread steak and wine were all top notch. The only reason I give this place a 4 and not a 5 is to keep people clear of the seafood. Not just from this place so please do not take it personal. Maybe specialty restaurants but only maybe. It is the desert after all..
One of the best restaurants in Charlotte if not the best. Every dish is amazing. Be prepared to wait on a Friday or Saturday night but it s worth it.
Unfortunately I had to come to the emergency room here luckily they took me in right away. Super clean and very nice people that work there. My nurse was Sandy and my doctor was Christy they were both amazing and made me feel extremely comfortable. They were also very patient with me. I will definitely recommend coming to this emergency room. And of course we had to wait here and there but they did everything they needed to do. And thank God it was not anything bad. I was prescribed antibiotics and I felt better knowing that everything was okay. So thank you so much !
Enjoyed the sale lots of things we need. Just moved to Vegas from Kaua i 2 weeks ago. Even got my son a suit. Let me know if the treadmill does not sale. I will talk my hubby into getting it
Great food atmosphere and service. Had the lamb sandwich with the soup of the day lentil and pasta soup. Deeeelicious flavours! The lamb was tasty with very fresh vegetables and a spicy sauce on the side for dipping a nice touch. The soup was excellent first time having soup with mint in it and it was a really good surprise. The service was excellent very friendly and handed out samples of crepes and other items. Atmosphere is modern and clean. An upscale cafeteria format. Lots of food options and some really beautiful desserts! Tried the pistachio cherry cake nice and light and the chocolate almond raspberry tart chocolatey and rich. Neither were too sweet. Looking forward to returning and trying the flat bread and gelato!
One of the better Indian Restaurant even in Brampton! Freshly prepared dishes and tons of flavour. Tried the butter chicken with naan and Lamb chops. Wow! Was the lamb chops ever a delight! Definitely would recommend it!
This restaurant opens all afternoon so i can just grab something small whenever I feel hungry. Food is delicious and staff are friendly.
Virgil and company are the absolute BEST BAR NONE for any auto repair standard maintenance jobs you may have! I ve been using Highland Auto exclusively since moving to the area 6 years ago after a recommendation from a co worker. These guys are reliable honest and stand behind their work! I ca not state effectively enough how much I appreciate Virgil and his crew! Next time you re in the market for an honest auto repair at reasonable prices do yourself a favor and go to Highland Auto!
Friendly office that provides affordable dental care. I came here for alternative options to Invisalign to straighten my teeth. They made the process so quick and simple. 10 weeks later my teeth are straight and I did not spend a fortune. Thanks Northside Family Dental!!
I m giving it 4 for the food. Would have been a 5 if common sense was a part of the experience. I aside at 5pm on a tuesday. I asked to be seated by the window to relax and have a view. I was one of 6 people in the restaurant. In come a group of 4 and where do they seat them directly in the line of the setting sun so instead of seating them at one 20 empty tables not in line with the setting sun they are seated then the sun shade is dropped over the window by my table. So much for the relaxing view. Lalo my server was spot on great kid.
Loved the atmosphere as well as the martinis. Had some awesome customer service from the bartender Skyler! Would definitely recommend!
What a cute little place! The word TIABI stands for to inspire and be inspired. I love this place for so many reasons. They have fresh juice smoothies vegan options and WAFFLES! Yes I am conscious about being healthy but I do have a sweet tooth and this place gives me both! Plus the owners and workers are super nice which makes me want to come and hang out more often. My favorites Peanut butter banana smoothie Vegan Belgian waffles with the toppings of your choice! Vegan kale chocolate chip ccookies! This place is still pretty new so I can tell they are adding and changing the menu due to demand.. Love it! They have everything non vegan as well so you can enjoy the place with vegans and non vegans
LOVE this place! Not only do you get a haircut but you get a head shoulder and arm massage too. I always look forward to my hair appointment. Everyone is very friendly and they all remember who you are. Yeah you ll pay 60 for a haircut but it s SO worth it. Ask for Cindy! She s AWESOME! Trust her. She knows what will look good. It s hard to find a hairdresser you can trust. She s an expert! Totally made me love my hair again. The only thing that would make this place better is a glass of wine. he! he!
Love the Tempe locations vibe .. Good Beer good food.. We stop by once a month or so for years now.. BIG FAN you will not go wrong here!!
I can say with conviction this place for dim sum is comparable to East Sea Fok Lum Mun and Four Seasons in HK who has M stars. Their DS creations are unique lobster crab foi gras and other offerings are delicious. So are their regular menu DS. Service is attentive and not over done. The food overcomes the sometimes slow turnaround and it s need for a face lift.
The food is pretty good one of the better currys I ve had in America. Service and ambiance fine you know what you are going to get when you pull up outside the strip mall. Update been for a second time since food was better not sure if we caught it on an off day the first time.
I got the Donnie brasco sandwich which was amazing. They had run out of the Italian bread so I had it on a baguette instead. I think it would be easier to eat on the Italian bread but it was still delicious. My friend got the po boy sandwich. We both agreed that it lacked crisp and had a not so pleasant fishy taste. We ended up just sharing my sandwich since it was so big. We also got a couple beers on tap that were delicious. If you are in the mood for a beer and sandwich I would totally check this place out.
If you have a regular diet go here if you have a strict diet go to protein house!! Amazing place to go to ca not wait to go back..
Fabulous! Amazing! Spectacular! I randomly selected Seasons Gourmet Catering for my birthday celebration and I was impressed with Stuart from the first phone conversation. Then I did a tasting and the food was wonderful! The servers provided for the event were also amazing very professional and very friendly from start to finish. Everyone at the party commented on the great food and great service combined. I would highly recommend and would certainly use again.
I really love this place! The food is absolutely delicious. Everything is homemade. Their menu items are unlike anything you can find elsewhere. I had such a difficult time picking what to order and I am already ready to go back and work my way down the menu! The service was great everyone was super friendly. Definitely recommend!
We stayed in the Terrace One Bedroom Suite with a Japanese styled bathtub that overlooks outside the window. Need I say more? This place is awesome! My only gripe would be how unorganized the check in line was but overall the decor of this place is sleek and modern exactly what I like! They offer you bottles of water as you wait in line and all staff are friendly. The room is very comfortable and and spacious which is nice if you ll be going with a non gambler or non drinker and will be spending some time in your room. We ve also stayed in the Terrace Studio which does not have the Japanese styled bathtub but in my opinion I find the studio layout to be more cute. I personally favor staying in the studio over the one bedroom. One of my other favorite things here is the Secret Pizza!
In university I used to eat at the Ginger south of here honestly like 4 times a week. Meal and pop was under 5. That one does not exist anymore but its older grungier brother does and it is steps from my office. Ginger is not epic by any means and its not really Vietnamese either. Its fusion which is admittedly something else entirely but really good value. The price has increased slightly over the years and the customer service is still of the quick and dirty variety. Line Up view boards overhead select tell cashier hand money be given number sign scramble for available seating pick up chopsticks napkin and chili sauces sit down and wait less than 5 minutes before your food is brought out. Their fish sauce is super sweet spring rolls are decent their tofu dishes tofu vermicelli with spring roll are really good and as I mentioned in the Hanoi 3 Season s post their Veggie Pho Called Hot and Sour Tofu Noodle soup Is the best that I have had in the city and is insanely inexpensive. In the 4 range. Good sized portions. Lunch is always super packed so go another time or get there early. Be prepared to sit with strangers. Super fast so quick turnover. The staff will accommodate you bringing your own takeout containers from home as well. 3 stars for food and experience extra star for price. Great Cheap Lunch.
Awesome arena surrounded by a great fun atmosphere The Park for adults. I would recommend coming early and grabbing a bite to eat and a few drinks before your event. I went for the grand opening with The Killers Wayne Newton and Shamir. We parked at the Excalibur and walked over. It was definitely worth it because it was backed up awhile by New York New York and Monte Carlo. We walked through New York New York and it was a quick and easy walk. The area is huge and very modern! I heard the seats shift so depending on the event the audience gets the best view possible. I sat upper deck. The stairs are very steep and the seats are not the most comfortable but we were standing most of the time anyway . Drinks and food are price but standard for an arena. The show was a very slow start. The lights were on for all of Wayne Newton s performance and we waited about a forty five minutes for The Killers to come on. The audio for Wayne was not the greatest. However they worked it out for before The Killers started. There were giant screens for those sitting higher consequently it was hard to see from the angle I was at. The Killers were amazing. They even brought out Wayne Carrot Top Blue Man Crew and the lead singer of Imagine Dragons also a Vegas local . This was the grand opening and I only see this place getting better as time goes on. It s an enjoyable time and a great night out with friends or for a date.
Matt did and excellent job on our interior paint job. He showed up on time and completed our job on a Saturday as we requested. He answered all my questions and asked me questions so that the job was done as we would want. We will use him again for any future paint jobs.
I went to Carly s Bistro with a big crowd of mystery readers and writers to attend an event called Noir at the Bar where a few of my friends were reading. It was a fun reading and I was surprised by the massive turnout most of which seemed to be local I was with a conference crowd mostly from out of town staying at the depressing Hyatt Regency a few blocks away . We filled the restaurant and had a good time. The space was charming and comfortable with plenty of seating and an ample bar. It was a little bit warm but otherwise pleasant. Service was great a couple servers circled the room taking care of everyone even during the reading. Bar service was good too and the staff kept good track of our tabs. I definitely ordered at both bar and table in like three different transactions. The drinks were excellent. There was a great selection of draft beer including the Stone Delicious IPA which I ordered as soon as I saw it on the menu forgetting about the loaded Bloody Mary I d seen on Yelp. I had to get that for my second drink and it was glorious a small meal in a mason jar. The Bloody Mary was spicy and flavorful on its own but I was really taken by the garnishes a skewer of salami olive and cheese a whole pickle spear and a stalk of asparagus lemon and lime and seasoned salt on the rim. My actual meal was decent too. I got a Santa Fe panini with warm roast beef chipotle mayo green chili and pepper jack on an onion challah roll. Nothing amazing but a solid filling sandwich and I really enjoyed the side of orzo pasta salad which was bland on its own but strangely tasty with the sandwich. I d be surprised if I came back here again I m not local and this is not quite a vacation destination but I had a good time at Carly s. I appreciated the attentive service and the quality drinks and would probably swing by now and then if I lived in Phoenix.
Review is for summer 2013 Restaurant Week menu I was so glad to look at the Restaurant Week list and see Comme a listed. I ve wanted to try this place for a long time now and this made a perfect time to do it. I went with the 5 course RW menu with the supplemental pan roast of foie gras for an extra charge of 19. Bread was brought out quickly after we ordered and the thick bread sticks were very hot!!! Course 1 I chose the warm asparagus salad. The salad was a surprise. On the bottom was the warm asparagus spears. They were topped with mixed greens and the black truffle salumi was sprinkled on top. To the side was a poached egg with Hollandaise. It was an interesting and flavorful way to make a salad. Course 2 I got the roasted bone marrow with oxtail jam. What delicious food and what a lot to eat! The roasted bone had some coarsely ground salt on the side and the oxtail jam was a large serving of meat with some greens on top and slices of small toasted bread around the edge of the ramekin that held the jam. Course 3 The supplemental roast of foie gras with vanilla bread pudding foie gras and a goie gras cherry bomb was next. The roasted foie gras was on the vanilla bread pudding and the cherry bomb was another piece of foie gras with a glac colored red and a cherry pit coming from the cherry bomb. Very tasty and a nice play on the firework. Course 4 Parisian gnocchi with braised lamb neck and goat cheese with some fava beans. It was good. Course 5 Peach pie with almond streusel and rum raisin ice cream. The whole meal was very nice and quite interesting the way the chef planned the food and its presentation. One of the things that stood out were the rich sauces with the food. There was a lot of effort into getting those tasty sauces with the courses. The items on the RW menu are available from the everyday summer menu but I doubt I would have ordered them as separates if they had not been packaged like this for Restaurant Week. Our server Sabrina was a very pleasant woman. She looked after our table. It was not too hard as last night was a very sparse night even when we left around 7 PM. It seemed like all the restaurants at that section of the Cosmopolitan were low on customers. The kitchen seemed slow. It took almost 2 hours for this meal something I d expect from a multi course meal at a restaurant when I m doing a tasting menu of this or more courses. The wait sometimes was welcomed but then grew too long at other times. The views out the windows toward Planet Hollywood and Paris were great! What more could you want except to be sitting at an outside table. A nice way to finish Restaurant Week with a meal here and then A Streetcar Named Desire at a community theatre a few miles from there. Addendum My wife who s very food challenged and resists trying anything new ordered the Comme a burger a large burger with cheddar cheese and slaw and a HUGE order of French fries. She liked it very much and even took a small taste of my bone marrow! Score one for change! Sabrina asked when we wanted her burger brought so she was not sitting there already long done waiting for me to finish. She got her burger at my foie gras course and it worked perfectly!
Finally got a chance to check out this place. It was nice and quiet evening. Love the bakery breads and the hot foods items. Pick up a few good sale items. Got a bottle of wine for a great price.
Decided to go to Hillstone after a recommendation from a friend. Read reviews and heard complaints about customer service and decided to form my own opinion. Was served by Cary who was phenomenal. I got the Hawaiian ribeye and it was cooked and marinated to perfection. Cary was very attentive courteous and pleasant. Would highly recommend requesting her for excellent service. Tres leches was for dessert never had it before but first impression was a good one. Key lime pie was also good!
The mysterious entrance behind a pawn shop is just the tip of the iceberg of the excitement this place brings. We ordered half the menu because we just could not decide. The grilled cheese tomato soup dumplings were like my childhood reinvisioned. I m fairy certain I want to buried with the mac and cheese side dish. Overall phenomenal dining experience and I ca not wait to go back.
SAS staff is always VERY nice. They recognize their regulars. Some days the cupcakes are dry but its usually hit or miss with that. I can understand that its not easy keeping them moist if they have been out for a few hours. The red velvet is to die for. My kids love the place.
Great facility! They offer a wide varsity of class choices and awesome instructors.
Only was able try a handful of gelato flavors but what I did try was stellar!!! Lemon sorbet so tart and lemony but creamy as well Coconut sorbet the flavor I chose to get a scoop of. I ca not resist coconut anything and this one delivered that great tropical flavor and the texture was great. Did I taste some rum in there as well??? Peanut Butter Gelato SINFUL! So rich peanut butter gelato with a ribbon on peanut butter swirl throughout... delicious but do share as it is DECADENT! The bakery items all looked great. The croissants were HUGE and the muffins were coming out of their baking cups fatty muffin tops..hehe
We were looking for BLT burger on the Vegas strip when we actually came across this place in the Mirage hotel on centre of the strip. At the end of the meal we did not regret our decision to try the food out. IMO this place serves the juiciest burger in the country. I tried the veggie burger PGP not sure what that means fries and shake combo the meal was delicious to say the least and the portion size huge. The food is slightly overpriced but that s true for almost all restaurants on the strip. Definitely recommended!
I had THE BEST time at Vin Room yesterday. It was sooooo good in fact that I just had to upgrade my review from a 5 start to well.. a 5 star. Have you read any reviews that wished they could give a biz 0 stars? The same feeling works in the opposite direction. I wish there were unlimited amounts of stars to shower on the delightfulness that is Vin Room. It was the first time I had been upstairs at Vin Room and we spent our Friday afternoon ordering tapas from the menu and sipping on custom flights of wine that our server Christian put together for us. Once again those egg plant chips had a love affair with my mouth and the first of the white wines danced around my tastebuds as I swished the light sweet liquid around my palate. Other tapas we tried included the couscous with quinoa. The quinoa added texture and substance to the dish. I m not so sure about the presentation on this one it came out in this silver bowl and it was made into a square in the middle. I felt a little bit like I was eating out of a dog food dish. Let me make very clear however that it tasted nothing like dog food. It was light and delicious and I gladly ate every last morsel from that dish... which in fact came in handy for ensuring nothing was leftover. So while it looked a little weird it was indeed very practical. We also chowed down on the Cornish game hen. One leg thigh piece battered and brought up for us to share. Maybe battered is not quite the right word it was not like a deep fried piece of chicken but rather came lightly dusted with spices and with a crispy skin on the outside. And lastly we finished off with a cheese board goat cheese blue cheese and brie. And I cannot forget my final glass of port. I think I spent 20 minutes sniffing it before I was ever ready to take a sip. It smelled of Sun Maid raisins the minute you open the little box. At the end of our visit we were the only two left sitting upstairs. Christian took care of us every step of the way. He even stayed well beyond his shift he ended at 4 instead of simply passing us on to someone else. At one point in the afternoon Tara had something caught in her eye. While she was in the washroom taking care of it Christian inquired after her I hope she s alright he said with genuine concern. He even offered to fetch the Vin Room s eye wash kit if she was unsuccessful in her efforts to remove whatever was bothering her eye. Talk about your table side manner. Suffice it to say I m in love with this spot. From food to drink to service it s a real treat every time I visit.
I understand all of these reviews are negative due to billing that should not take away from Dr. B as a doctor. Dr. B has been my sons doctor for 4 years. As a first time parent in the hospital she made sure my newborn was healthy and provided awesome care. Dr. B always remembers my son and makes him feel comfortable and loved. As a child you re automatically afraid of people you do not know. My son is excited to go to see Dr. B when he s sick because he knows her and loves her. Thank you Dr. B!
Great place for lunch. The value is great and the food is very decent. Normally order the chicken kabobs.
Every year I get my son s birthday cake from here. The cassata cake! Best dang cake I ve ever had. The cake is always fluffy the frosting is not over powering sweet and the strawberries are huge! There is always a huge line on weekends because everyone is going to get their baked goods for their weekend festivities. I have had a deli sammich just a turkey one nothing special but the bread was fantastic. I also tried my first cannoli recently. And holy cannoli. It was fantastic. They re not over priced fairly reasonable. I mean if u want cheap stick to Giant Eagle. If you want quality then expect to pay just a bit more. I think my sons cassata cake was about 20. Which is a great price for what you re getting. I have had some of their pasta salads and those are good as well. Cupcakes are great and again frosting is not over powering. Their pizza... is good hot or cold. I usually buy 4 pieces to go and eat them throughout the day. I ca not wait to go there this weekend and get some pastries!
Called ahead while on shopping wknd in Phoenix. Very helpfully pulled 2 specials bottles off the shelf and has them witing by the register. Figenzia fig vodka....deelish with twist of lemon and topped with Fevertree Mediterranean tonic.
Rushed to the 5 30pm opening and the restaurant was already full... we took a number and spent some time at T and T for 30 min before returning to the restaurant. We ordered a pho must rolls with pork yum and a vermicelli omg it s good . Amazing good great service always worth the wait.
I went to the stand that they had set up at the Christmas market and I really enjoyed it. The service was great all of the staff were very friendly. The only thing I did not like was the wait approximately 40 min but at the same time I know that they have no control over this as the crowds come and go. I had the graham cracker chimney with chocolate fudge sauce. It was really good and I would go back again if in the neighbourhood.
Interesting food and atmosphere. I found it to be delicious. I would go back. I ordered the surf and turf and the vegetables were great with it . I m sure you were not expecting the review to be about the vegetables but I liked the flavor a lot. The steak and shrimp were also flavorful.
I really wish I could give this 3 and a half stars. Let me start of with the ambiance and view. Honestly It really and truly is amazing and I do recommend it for dates special birthdays anniversaries and for tourists. The inside of the restaurant is huge and I love the seating arrangements and the lighting and how everything is placed. The view is beautiful and breath taking especially in the late afternoon night. I have not been since the twelfth grade for a friend s 18th birthday but I can still remember the view in my mind. The food is alright. I can honestly say I did not enjoy the bruschetta at all but I loved the crab soup and the steak. However it is very pricey. The service was really good the servers were very friendly and accommodating. Overall like most have mentioned you are paying for the view.
Contemplated getting LASIK for years and honestly it s the best thing I ve ever done. I was nearsighted and had relied on my contacts and glasses every single day. It s been exactly 3 weeks today since my surgery and my vision is absolutely perfect now! The staff is beyond friendly and very informative about any questions or concerns you might have. I highly recommend LasikPlus Vision Center to anyone considering LASIK you wo not regret it!
I m so glad to have found Infinity Solar in Las Vegas for our pool heating needs. This company is fantastic! The installation team was great and did the work quickly and professionally. The owner Rafael checked in on the job and made sure everything was done to perfection. They are surprisingly affordable while using top of the line equipment that comes with an amazing warranty. I highly recommend this company.
Pete showed up this morning as scheduled. He is super friendly efficient and pays attention to the details of the work. He fixed what needed to be fixed and explained things as he went. He was careful to keep the work areas clean. We are very happy with this service.
Absolutely awesome...l ate at the one in Henderson now l live near this one. Had a fabulous New Years Eve dinner loved the food the atmosphere this is my come to restaurant now. The same bartender that was at the Henderson one was here he even remembered us l didnt catch his name but he sure is personable. Had a pizza from there last night it was superb. I am having a house warming party l am going to have them make the food for me.
Been craving a slice of NY pie since our trip to the Garden for Phish s NYE run. So glad I found this place. The owner is unbelievably nice and his pizza was exactly what I needed.
I ve always loved Bonfyre since the first time I ever went with my girls before a high school dance . I ve tried their steaks salads flatbreads and desserts over the years and it s all been wonderful. But this weekend was the best so far. I ordered the Red Berry Mojito which was easily the best mojito I ve ever had. But then I got the Chicken Parmesan and it was life changing. Honestly one of the best things I ve ever eaten in my life. Aside from the fantabulous menu options our server Valerie was very friendly and the service was fast! Yay Bonfyre! See you soon for more Chicken Parm!
Came here last night for the first time and had a great experience at TopGolf. From the second you walk in the door the staff was really friendly courteous and knowledgeable in helping you figure out how to get situated. The facilities are incredible and the bar on the main level is large which makes for a nice sports bar environment. They ve also got billiards tables Xbox Kinect and Fooseball to make sure that even the kids are entertained when not hitting golf balls. Having three floors of hitting bays is awesome and I definitely recommend getting on the top floor. Being able to look out over the field and seeing the targets is really cool. This is definitely no driving range people that would consider themselves moderate to very good golfers should not need anything close to a driver when hitting balls here okay maybe the ladies but definitely not the guys . The experience is more about target shooting and racking up points in their pre programmed games not hacking balls as far as you possibly can. I ll for sure be back at TopGolf the entertainment value is high for everyone even if you re not into playing the links or taking swings at a regular range.
After the first time I came to Grazie with my girlfriend she made me come 2 more times within less than a week!! The Tasca pasta is really good Grazie does a really good rose cream sauce. However I was even more impressed with the Basta and I usually only like tomato sauce based pastas! Both dishes are great and are definitely our new go to dishes!
Jeannie is absolutely wonderful! I have been going to her for about 4 years now. I get some sugaring done and have had some facials and pedicures too. She s really personable and makes you feel really welcome. I totally recommend her.
Good food always. I wish the staff was a little more friendly and I really wish the portion sizes were a little bigger. I end up ordering a 3 item entree to fill up. Very good food though!
Wonderful service. The staffs make sure you are well taken care of. The food is great with good portions and good price. One complaint I have is the fruits bowls.... 4 for a small bowl is a bit too much for me. Overall there are options that are less expensive for more than a fruit bowl worth. I give it a 4 for the awesome service the food and the atmosphere. I took out one star because the price can be a bit too crazy for the portion of the food.
I made it! Haha barely. If you are new to hiking I definitely recommend North Mountain. It s a great place to start I took my dog with me not sure if that s allowed but he and I both needed gradual climb to get us started.
Excellent. Inexpensive place friendly stuff and quick service. I will come here often
WINNER check out this 50 s style gem!!!! We loved it must return for dessert prices were perfect and food and service to match ! I think we will make this a every year spot on our race weekend. They serve entire menu all day
The brisket and rib tips are all i have had both both were great after I sauced them. They have a great happy hour till 7 and 4 wells and Jim Beam is there well whisky! The happy hour app specials are very good and especially enjoyable while listening to some live blues band on a Saturday night. I love the Southern atmosphere and the porch area they have a bit past the bar. Oh and their apple biscuits are amazing. With some whipped butter they are basically a dessert. My only recommendation will be to make sure you have a wheelchair to be rolled out in since you ll be eating up some very hearty bbq!
I have always loved this place. The hot rolls are so good I could eat just those and still be satisfied. I m a steak girl I must admit yummo.
Seamless worry free process. Laura was patient and kind even as I was working through many issues . Looking forward to building a great relationship with this management company.
Awesome rueben super lean and moist! Great pickles! Super location in beautiful Tivoli Village with no smog or traffic to get here! Romeo was fantastic and sweet and made sure everything was perfect!
We found out about this place on Yelp and believe it or not it is way way better than what you can expect from the stars ranking they have First of the owner was very cool to us as new guys in town and more in the us vacation we did not know what the most thing to eat is he told us about the Philly Cheese Steak and his CheeseBurger and my brother and I were verse surprised by the taste because it was so yummy and tasty To sum it up it is a very good place to grab something to eat you ll get your money worth over there with a full belly Plus as Muslims it is entirely halal and they do not sell any alcohol which is rare nowadays lol the Owner Ahmad was very nice and let us pray in the back Muslim or Not Go there you wo not be disappointed I promise Kenzi
We stopped by here on our way home from Vegas. I think one of the things this place has going for it are its late hours and good pho which is the best post drinking faire in my opinion . The broth is well made albiet a bit greasy and the meat is tender. All pluses in my book! P.S. The boba in this place is a bit stale hard rather than chewy so if you re opting for a smoothie or a tea nix the boba.
Tucked away in a strip mall this truly is a gem of a place! I m not what you would call a sushi expert but absolutely loved the valentine roll spicy tuna roll and salmon skin roll we d ordered tonight. Prices are very reasonable and staff is very friendly. I wish the restaurant was a little more spacious but thats not a major complaint.
Best Pizza in Las Vegas!! Staff was super friendly and the pizza was delish!! Crust was great. Sauce was great.
Great after work crowd and good vibe. Has a great small bites tapas style menu. Favorites include steamed shrimp dumplings calamari crab and corn cakes and the lettuce wraps. Great edamame too! Avoid the bison burgers dry and the soft shell baja fish tacos not great . Cheap and good martinis! 4.44 after 4pm Monday to Friday....
Dr. Misty and Dr. Nicholas have healing hands ! I have been seeing Dr. Misty for my back pain and Dr. Nicolas for my lifewave patches. After only a few months my pain level has decreased energy improved and posture realigned. They use diversified method adjustments and encouraging words they offer are both soothing and relaxing which is just what this girl needs after a long work week. I look forward to my appointments that are affordable. For only 55 I get 4 adjustments! Truly unbelievable. There are no contracts and you can go any day of the week. I highly recommend Healing Hands Chiropractic as your one stop pain management fix!
If you love the basics you ll love Steak n Shake. It s what a burger should be. Simple flavorful and cheap. This is not you re average Vegas eatery with a small dining room and fast service the only thing Vegas is the line on Fridays and Saturdays. The shakes are great not super thick so that you have a small stroke while sucking on the straw but milky velvety and smooth. Fries are true shoe string fries almost splinter fries but all too good. Make a trip to SouthPoint go back near the sports book. That s where you ll find Steak n Shake. Cowboy boots optional.
We had to travel from Vegas to get neuro evaluation on our 1 yr old puppy.. Neuro recommended this hotel. We were greeted by a wonderful staff who were concerned with our baby. The room was one of the cleanest we ve experienced spotless.. Our beagle was welcome and they have area for dogs to do their business. Dinner free! Breakfast free! 3 drinks each free! Free wi fi! Free business area! Great priced 1 bedroom w living area! Nice young lady tending bar in restaurant that listened to our story We HIGHLY recommend Drury Hotel! We will definitely stay at this wonderful place on our travels with our puppy
I LOVE this coffee house the drinks are spot on and the staff is so upbeat. I was in Vegas visiting my daughters and had a coffee drink everyday delicious!!!
Huge portions! We had a great waiter who helped explain the entire menu and offered suggestions! Food was fresh and very good! I had the BbQ chicken with a salad instead of fries which I enjoyed very much! Homemade blue cheese dressing was a bonus!
Staff s really nice and the food s spot on every time. We went to check out their new brunch today and got bloodies mimosas french toast and a breakfast pizza with schreiner s jalapenos and egg. Football on the TV kids running around on the lawn pretty much the definition of a five star Sunday.
Cleveland Heights has a number of very good sushi restaurants and Ariyoshi stacks up with the best of them. The interior of the restaurant is bright open and welcoming. The service is excellent. Our server was attentive without being annoying. Ariyoshi has regular rolls for 3 all the time. We ordered six of them and they were all delicious. My only minor complaint with this restaurant is that they do not for whatever reason have descriptions of the regular sushi rolls anywhere on the menu.
get the pastrami or reuben! soooo good....I go every time I m in MTL.
Eric at wheel fix it is awesome. Received my new bumper tire carrier for my jeep and with out hesitation had it done in the fastest turn around time and best quality I have seen.
This place has something for everyone! The owners are super friendly and always smiling! The Zumba instructors are fantastic! I ve taken classes with all of them because they offer so many during the week that happen to fit my schedule. The classes are super fun and the instructors are so motivating and definitely make you want to keep going! And the best thing of all drop in classes are only 9! It s usually hard to find anything less than 10! I would definitely recommend this studio
Very intimate setting great decor inviting atmosphere and awesome service. We love this place. The menu is wonderful! We ve been here 4 or 5 times now and every time more than meets my expectations! The wine list is extensive and the staff knows how to pair the wine to the food. We usually get what s on special and the appetizers are a MUST! I recommend taking a date and enjoying a great meal!
Dr O Lee is by far the best doctor I have come across in Vegas. My 8 week old son had to see him to have a procedure done on his mouth. Although the procedure was not complicated you could imagine the fear I had at my 8 week baby having someone cutting inside his mouth. Dr O Lee was not rushed and answered all of my questions. He also reassured me that he had done this several times and I had nothing to fear. He showed me videos and asked me several times if I had any more questions. He explained everything. I had some other questions about some breathing issues he was having as well and he knew right away what the cause was and again showed me video and gave me tons of info on the cause. After everything was done he let us stay in the room to soothe our son.. we were not rushed out so the room could open for someone else. When we were leaving he told us if we had any concerns to call him and gave his card or to come back. He was amazing. I wish he could be my child s regular pediatrician!
I spent a few days reading reviews of ceiling fans I went with Hunter and pendant lights before making my way to Home Depot for the big purchase 5 ceiling fans lights fans and 2 pendant lights . I stacked everything up in the hall and jumped on Yelp searching for an electrician s to assemble and install my new bounty. After receiving a number of quotes on Yelp from various electricians I decided to go with Central Power Electrical Services for two main reasons 1 they have really positive Yelp reviews and 2 George was quick to respond with an estimate. Three guys came over and they were careful speedy and efficient. Within maybe 100 or so minutes I had all of my new ceiling fans and pendant lights installed. Take it from this UNLV Professor George and his team at Central Power Electrical Services gets an A .
Best baba ganoush I ve ever tried! Really enjoyed the turkey and lamb shawarma with the roasted potatoes. Owner and staff are lovely. Overall highly recommend!
Often times businesses have the wrong people answering their phone s. But over the last two days I have called Nick and Ben s Pizza Company on two different occasions. Both times I have spoken to two different girls. Both of them were incredibly nice and helpful. My mom picked up the pie. The first thing my mom said was how sweet the ladies were who helped her. If the pizza is as good as their service it will be excellent!
Bra tops were too big went back to exchange and they were missing a size in one of the tops I picked a different top but it was slightly higher priced and she exchanged it as an even exchange anyway which she did not have to do. Very helpful in the dressing rooms and knowledgeable about the products.
Amazing brunch at an amazing restaurant.... For a group of 7 people without reservations we waited only a few minutes which made me feel a bit uneasy at first because I knew it was a popular place amongst the Yelp community as well with Thomas Keller groupies after Per Se and FL I m one too so why no wait? On route to our table my high expectations quickly returned as I peeped the many lavish looking items other patrons were devouring. If it is Spring or Fall and you have the option to sit outside I HIGHLY RECOMMEND it. The outside portion of the restaurant is in the courtyard and is way nice. Due to the shape of the Venetian the courtyard is warm but without the sun beating down on you. I can only speak for our waiter but let me tell you he was way cool and very nice. Whenever we needed him he was there. My coffee which I might add was perfect was always filled and he helped the non decisive ones with recommendations which all turned out for the best . We all enjoyed the french bread with jam and butter which was a nice palate prepper for the goods to come. For the most part we all ordered something different which we all got to try snippets of. Everything I tasted was really good. I was in the mood for something sweet and the waiter recommended their French Toast. It was not the typical french toast I have been accustomed to but nonetheless was much better. It was round and layered with brioche custard apples and bread pudding and was baked and topped with fresh apple slices and maple syrup. At first glance it looked a bit small but let me tell you I was stuffed when finished and I shared some . Other items which deserve honorable mention were the corned beef hash wow and the Croque Madame decadent . I must also mention the vanilla bean Tahitian butter because I just about put it on everything it was that good. We arrived hungry and left full but lighter by about 22 per person. When you take into account the ambiance food and service this was probably my best brunch to date. When you take into account price there is just no comparison to anything in Vegas or Orange County CA. I will never ever ever do another buffet in Vegas while places like Bouchon are out there. Thank you Michelle T. for requesting we go here you rock! and thanks for the extra fries which I gladly dipped in the Tahitian vanilla butter and jam
Giving this place a 4 star because the prices are a bit high. However they do honor military and that s fantastic! Glad to have a healthy snack option in the area other than fast food. Check this place out because it s a chill atmosphere clean and good for you! Girls working are very friendly and nice. Thank you. Will be back
Yummy! Delicious nachos great server! In a town with celebrity chefs and amazing restaurants a downhome relaxed environment.
Could not be happier with the service and the cleaning from Coit. I ve been married for 20 years have 3 kids dogs and cats so I have used carpet cleaners in the past. I decided to try Coit this time for my before the holidays cleaning. I am so upset that I did not use them sooner!! The two gentlemen I worked with could not have been better or more professional. Al visited my home to give me a quote on a Wednesday. He was so knowledgeable and was not trying to push services on me just to add to my bill like I ve had with other companies. Joshua the service technician came out this morning Friday and did a beautiful job. Everything they said they would do was done. Best experience I ve ever had with a cleaning service. I did not have them clean my tile only my carpet. Next time I m having them do it all.
Excellent service timely and professional. I was happy with the price and how efficient everything went from start to finish. Jesiah and Joe went beyond the call of duty with their compassionate tortoise care during their work and we really appreciated it. I am so glad we found this company and will use them again for sure.
This is a rotten degrading sexiest racist comedy that will have you crying with laughter within the first 2 minutes. You think they wo not go to far but they do! I did not stop laughing for the entire show. Not for people who are easily offended.
Interesting concept dining within a market. You order your food at the counter and once you find a table your order is brought out to you. Friendly employees efficient service quirky concept good food decent prices and wine. What more could you ask for? My party tasted the meatball sub cheese ravioli veggie sub and pizza. All very tasty. Shopping after eating it s a win win. Great location in South Scottsdale with ample parking. I ll be back to try the fettuccine alfredo. Heard good things about it.
They are the best it starts with a very friendly Lisa who sets appointments with a bubbly smile over the phone. They came to my home did 3 rooms the 13 year carpet looks brand new. Next They will do my upstairs. Professional fast service. They were in and out in less then an hour. When my neighbor saw the results he hired them on the spot they did his house an hour later. The results? Outstanding. Hire them you will be glad you did as I am.
A True gem. If you re fortunate enough to be able to see her consider yourself blessed. Her approach is before her time and a breath of fresh air. She s not your every day medical doctor drug she actually cares and runs the test to prove it... You wo not walk out of there with a handful of prescriptions that you do not want to take and you do not understand
Located uptown in the Overstreet Mall Uncle Maddio s has some pretty decent pizza. You can pick the first 3 toppings for free and they offer a pretty good number of options. They throw it into an automated oven that cooks it rather fast so this is a pretty popular spot for the uptown lunch crowd. Bottom line the pizza is good and fast. I could do without the corny this pizza was cooked with love line they give you but other than that no complaints.
I would say their pho noodles are decent. Not quite pho tastic and not much variety in their soup base other than sate soup but their chicken and pork rice combo is mm mm good. Nicely grilled on the outside and juicy but not dry on the inside. It comes with great Pho 88 fish sauce not diluted and goes well with their spring rolls. Portions are great. Highly recommend!
As far as meals go Ha Long Bay s Mango Currey Chicken tops my list as my all time favorite. I no longer live in Madison but every time I go back I make a point to go to Ha Long Bay. Although I only ever order the Mango Currey I ve tried other people s dishes a number of times and they ve all been very good. If you re looking for a place to take someone for a special occasion this may not be the spot for you as it s very casual and the atmosphere is nothing to write home about. But if you re looking for amazing food and a reasonable price you will not be disappointed.
Best donuts in the entire city. Baked to perfection. I drive 35 minutes just for a spudnut.
As I have mentioned previously no visit Las Vegas is complete without a visit to the botanical gardens. It really is the only reason we bother visiting the Strip these days. We caught the waning days of the Fall exhibit titled Proud as a Peacock was scheduled to end in the middle of our trip so we visited early on. This year s exhibit did not disappoint with the highlight being a pair of 19 peacocks dressed in vibrant flowers. Other interesting exhibits included a number of scarecrows the talking tree and a fountain surrounded by two topiary acorns made from 1 700 flowers.
We came her before a Hornets game and the service and food were great. The best wings in town !!
Love the sandwiches here! We love going for our Sunday brunch. Their bloody Mary s are to die for. The staff is alway friendly and attentative. If you re in the area make sure you check this place out
Oh my god!!! Life changing! I have always done regular wax. Never again! It s way less painful. I also love that they offer early appointments being that my schedule is crazy it works perfect. I loved Heather Blackmon she made me feel so comfortable and explained the process. She is so sweet and professional!
My husband and I just did the Rim to Rim Grand Canyon hike with two night stay at Phantom Ranch. Awesome experience from start to finish. This is a ca not miss opportunity. AOA handles all the logistics and does it very well. We are not big on the group travel thing so the real appeal for us was small group size seven max . Our guide Kevin was fantastic knowledgeable friendly relaxed. We were able to hike at our own pace allowing all to have a great hiking experience.
While this is not Mexican food per se it is really decent for Americanized Tex Mex. Very friendly and attentive service good decor. The margaritas are made with lime juice not sour mix always a welcome item. Fresh made table side guacamole is really good as well and can be tailored for spice seasoning level. I usually get the Enchiladas De Dennis but the fajitas are good too and the charro beans are on point. Great place for lunch too they service a large business park and know how to turn and burn for lunch time.
The buffet is great the tikka Marsala is awesome came her for dinner it was a nice environment good service all around good place to eat .. The lights randomly dimmed when we where here place might be haunted lol but cool atmosphere .
Went for dinner and left in a food coma. Luckily my group and I beat the dinner rush. Once we left there was huge line. There was a wide variety of foods to choose from. I kept going back for more. I did not really enjoy any of the desserts possibly because I did not have anymore room to stuff them in but there was an abundance of gelato that I saw. Paid 35 per person which I found very reasonable for dinner and for the amount that I consumed. I would definitely go back next time I m in Vegas. You gotta try this buffet.
22.00 gets you a very relaxing 30 min door massage and a detoxifying machine that cleans and determines what was cleaned the most needed within your body. I would come back here for a foot or scalp massage again
This review is only for delivery service. I ordered from here a few times my pizza arrived hot and just as I ordered. I do not think the Pepperoni Lovers has enough pepperoni on it compared to other locations but it still tasted delicious. I took off one star for this. My favorite is the Pan crust but stuffed crust is a close second. Love the 5 special as it makes the pizza more affordable . I find the pizza quite pricey normally and the pies seem to be shrinking in size but man is it ever good
I liked the short ribs! And the red curry with duck was great too. Because we liked the food we had on the first night we went back to this place another day. That time the pork chops were not as great as the short ribs. The drunken noodle was not as spicy as we requested. We still like the short ribs and red curry so we give this place four stars. But your experience depends on what you order.
Freddy s is an awesome business. It does not get better. I called for help with a slow drain and he arrived within an hour 1 2. His work was perfect and he even spent a minute to talk casually. Freddy is a great guy and a great plumber. I m so glad that I found him.
I brought my cat in to have a ruptured tumor removed from her stomach. When I called them Monday morning the rupture occurred over the weekend they were able to get us in right away. I was very relieved to have to have such quick service. Additionally the vet found a second smaller lump that my original vet missed and he only charged me half of what I was quoted for the tumor removal at my original vet. I was very pleased! My cat is doing well after her surgery and they have called to see how she is progressing. I am a fan of this animal hospital.
Amazing photography. I always enjoy seeing your new work it s a great representation of our wonderful city. Keep up the good work
I stayed here for three nights and overall had a very nice stay. The rooms are spacious mine had a king bed a little pullout couch and a kitchenette. I really only needed the bed since it was just me. But if I had brought family or friends then this room would have been nice and convenient. The hair dryer in my room would not turn on so I called the front desk and they had someone bring one up to me right away. I was extremely grateful they did because I do not leave much extra time to get ready in the morning. My one complaint is that I was in a room that had a connected room and a door between it. I could hear everything in the next room. I could have retold conversations I heard next door. This was problematic because I was in Vegas for work and needed to go to bed and be up early. I m not sure if all of their rooms have a connected room but I would suggest trying to get one without if possible.
Went here for restaurant week on the 2nd day they were open and then again for lunch a few weeks later. Both times the food was very good although there were a few kinks they need to work out with some of the menu items. I think it definitely has potential but they will need to work hard to justify the prices which are on the higher side for the area.
Luna s is simply amazing. I ve been going here since they opened a few years ago and they just keep getting better. The food is not only delicious fresh and healthy but gorgeously presented with a lot of respect for the ingredients. Everything on the menu is seriously painstakingly prepared. The work that goes into sourcing and lovingly preparing their phenomenal ingredients is seen on every single plate. It s clearly labor intensive but worth every single cent you pay I have never found better quality or a more consistent experience anywhere else. Some favorites are the fire and brimstone quinoa burger I get mine wrapped in a collard leaf the avocado sandwich I ask for half the onions because they can be a bit overwhelming the living bagel the rawco taco salad the cacao cacao smoothie their unbelievably delicious coconut chai and the volcano juice. They also have really yummy raw lemon cookies you can take to go. Everyone who works here is friendly helpful and go out of their way to help explain things. It s so great to have a place like this in Charlotte and every time I take out of town guests here they love it! A true gem!
Quaint pharmacy with an additional range of cosmetic products including high end brands that are not widely available. The staff is also very kind and knowledgeable. Overall a better experience than you will have at CVS. Note that you will not find generics here.
Had the typical two queen beds. The room was clean and very inexpensive. The pool was nice especially since it was 112 outside. Nothing fancy but I was not expecting it so no let down.
It s Mandalay s old pool that is now secluded and left only for those staying at Delano. It has gone through some remodeling since the old pool and there is some cool chess pieces for you to mess around with by the pool. It does start to get crowded around 9 or 10 so if you want a chair make sure you come early. Staff is nice and greets you at the entrance and does stop by once in awhile to check on things if you order. Downside is that it is not as big as you would expect for a pool that is set aside for guests of Delano. Either way you ca not really go wrong here as you re in Vegas by the pool so just kick back order some drinks and enjoy it!
The food is really good I ve tried many different dishes and they re all good. The service is decent. Price wise it s average maybe even a little more than average for some people. The place itself is not the best it s spacious but not the most aesthetically pleasing. Overall I come here all the time for the food and I would recommend it.
Nice little bar with a good selection of beer and liquors and great service. Neatly s is good a small menu but good nonetheless. Will definitely return!
Loved it! Was there after 3pm and they took 30 of my bill its happy hour 3 7pm! Uni sweet shrimp and rolls all super fresh and tasty!
I ve there once and I was impress with the spicy sauces. I ordered the 1 lb shrimp with potatoes and sausages. I got the spiciest sauce and it was intense! I had tears the whole time eating it but I could not stop because it was sooo good. But I ve decided that the next time around I ll do a medium spice because I want to finish my food!
So I found them from a Facebook my first couple of auctions were fine. biggest complaint is the pick up hours are generally in the middle of your work day 9 to 3 not particularly convenient if you have a day job and you have one day for pick up. My last auction I bid on some stuff that I liked but did not really need but the location for pick up was convenient and I could pick it up at 8am on my way to one thing then hit the 9am pick up and be at the office on time. Well got there for the 8am pick up and no one was there tried calling a LOT left messages did not get a call back. When I did the 9am pick up I asked and they said it was at a different location and to call the office so I did a LOT. Got to my office saw there was a new address. Wrote nasty review as a wasted an hour to do the first pick up and the alleged new address was right by my house. Arranged to go to new address. Went to new address. Nobody there. Had received a response to my nasty review with phone numbers started calling phone numbers finally got a response. Pick up is at old address in the BACK. GRRRR. Said not driving anymore already wasted two hours to get 10 of stuff. They agreed to cancel. So why they get four stars and not less is a guy called me back personally apologized took the blame for the address errors and then delivered the stuff to my house to apologize. Now that is customers service. Especially the accepting responsability for the mistake. GOOD job and thank you again. The folks at Procoyn are great always nice and helpful. Please remember folks you are buying at an auction no promises of perfection yes sometimes scratched needs further cleaning etc. but as long as you remember you generally get what you pay for you will be happy.
Excellent staff and doctors. Never had an issue with my family of 6 since the past year plus of being patients there . Dr Gale is wonderful and his staff are very polite and courteous.
This place is authentic delicious and everything that i could want in Thai food. I would recommend a reservation or you will have to wait in line for dinner. If your first visit here is for the lunch buffet keep in mind that the buffet is not a good refleciton of the quality of this place. The Tom Yum Kai is awesome but the the En Tuan Beef and Tendon Soup is absolutely amazing. All the broths at this place are rich spicy and very complex in flavor. The curry here was good as well but was not much different from other Thai curries i ve had before. The Pad Thai noodles were cooked just right and had a balance of flavors. The Papaya Salad was very refreshing and just the right amount of dressing. The unique dishes here is what makes this place a must. If you looking for mint and chicken you can get that anywhere read the reviews as you enter the restaurant and try something different and authentic to the region you wo not be dissapointed.
My Dragon Boat team had a regatta in Montreal during the weekend so our whole team stayed here during the Summer time. We ve stayed here the previous time we were in Montreal as well. ALT Hotel is not too far from downtown Montreal and they have great prices for the weekend stay as we got a special rate. Checking end is very quick and seemless process. The front desk staff are super friendly and helpful. Our room has two big Queen beds that can fit 2 big guys on each one as we were a party of 4. The rooms are very clean and quiet. Beds are super soft and comfortable like you are sleeping on a cloud! Had really good sleep during my 2 night stay here. There s an LCD TV in the room they provide all the basic necessities in there and the dcor is very nice. I like how your key card acts as the mechanism that powers the light in the room pretty cool. Checkout was also very quick and easy. It can be difficult to find hotels in Montreal but I highly recommend choosing this one for your stay! Overall it was a great experience staying here.
I recently bought a TV Console 2 Living Room Chairs a Sofa and a Bed and I could not be happier with my choices. The sales people were extremely helpful while we were deciding what pieces to choose. Their knowledge and professionalism was truly appreciated and noted. Delivery went smoothly and professionally. The Camelback location has a much better layout and a much classier look but the lack of real help from the sales people is why we decided to check the Tempe location. The artwork accessories lighting and furniture will set your space apart from everyone else and give you a one of a kind look.
Best Hawaiian food in Chandler. Now that I moved I ll miss this place. Anything you get from there is amazing!!
Been in Arizona visiting a week and tried different food places . Restaurants and fast food but this has been the best at customer service and the best at taste. I ll be back for more .... got the chicken tacos and chicken burritos
Carpet Tech is by far the best carpet cleaning experience in town! I office out of my home so my flooring takes a pounding! We also entertain a lot and have dogs. I was thinking my 10 year old carpet needed replacing until Scott G. and the Carpet Tech crew got to work. WOW! night and day results. The attention to detail was amazing! Super courteous and professional. You must give them a try worth every penny!!!
Still a 5 star still amazing. Go early or you will have to park on the street. The parking is my only gripe. I go at least once every 2 weeks for lunch. It is worth the hassle of parking.
Okay first of all do not look through the photos and make a decision about the food. I have to admit that these are not the prettiest of sandwiches around. The main reason for the slight unattractiveness of the sandwiches has to be the amount of delicious flavors squished between two pieces of bread. I mean I could not even pick out what I liked most about my sandwich because it was bursting with deliciousness. On my first visit here and definitely not my last I tried out the Reading Rainbow. It comes with avocado cheddar cheese and Ike s red pesto which is a pesto with sun dried tomatoes...so good! . I added tomatoes and red onion to my sandwich and ordered it on the dutch crunch bread. Oh my god that bread is seriously delicious! Do not order anything else. They also add their dirty sauce to almost every sandwich. I can be a bit of a picky eater and I did not dislike anything on my sandwich which means that dirty sauce must ve been pretty tasty. I also ordered chips and a drink which were pretty standard. The sandwich comes with a carmel apple lollipop which I thought was a fun little treat. I absolutely have to mention Ike s incredibly diverse menu options. Holy crap they have some serious sandwich selection here! If you re a vegetarian or just mostly enjoy vegetarian options like me or if you re a meat eater you re set. I may have taken at least fifteen minutes to make a decision and I ca not wait to try more. They also have awesome gluten free choices. It s pretty much impossible to be disappointed here. The character of this place is like none other around town. Mesa just got cooler because of the addition of Ike s. Like waaaaaay cooler. I live about thirty minutes away and it s definitely worth the drive. That being said I hope they spread to other locations around the valley soon. Like ASAP! The shop is bright and funky and had some sweet nineties tunes playing during my visit. They re not lacking in character here. Oh and did I mention the awesome staff? So friendly and helpful. Chase is doing an awesome job of running the place...his energy is contagious. Ike s is definitely the best sandwich shop I ve tried in a long time. So the moral of the story you ask? Get your butt over to Ike s Love and Sandwiches as soon as you can. I do not care if you live in freaking Surprise...it s worth the drive.
This is the best auto repair shop in Glendale. The customer service is great as well as the quality of workmanship. The staff is very helpful and repairs are done in a timely manner. I want to thank the service manger Ken for doing such a great job in running that shop. If anyone in Glendale or surrounding areas need anything auto related I would go there. I am a mechanic myself and anytime I need anything done I will be taking my vehicles there. I will be a lifetime customer. Thank you brake masters staff for all that you do!
Love this place! I love how they do not mind if you ask for more than 2 or 3 samples because they know how to appreciate customer.
Just ordered delivery for the office. Super fast delivery! Food was hot really fresh and really good! Will be ordering again!
How can a Brazilian resort not have Brazilian Rum? The food was good and prepared exactly how I ordered.
It feels so good to be able to write a positive review. I had been writing so many negative reviews recently that I was afraid people would think I had turned churlish had become an angry discontent in my old age. My experience at Tamarind however was so positive that it served as a welcome slap in the face Art! Snap out of it! You have found a great new Indian restaurant in Charlotte and you need to write about it! The first sign that I had found a place where I could feel welcome was at the entrance. I arrived at 9 40PM only 20 minutes before closing time on that evening. Because I have been made to feel extraordinarily unwelcome at some other restaurants as closing time approaches I asked whether it was too close to closing time. Edwin who seated me flashed a handsome smile and assured me that it was of course no problem! My server Shakti is recently arrived from Mumbai where he worked at The Maratha a Sheraton hotel belonging to the Starwood chain in north Mumbai not far from the airport and The Leela which is the extraordinarily expensive hotel where Microsoft put me up when I traveled to Mumbai a few years ago. Perhaps most important Shakti pointed out that The Maratha is home to what may be one of the world s best Indian restaurants Peshwari. Certainly Shakti is the best server I have encountered within any Indian restaurant not only here in Charlotte but ANYWHERE. Although I had made some tentative choices from the excellent menu Shakti eagerly recommended the Lasooni Gobi as an appetizer and the Lamb Rogan Josh as the entree. My recommendation take his advice! The Lasooni Gobi is delicately deep fried pieces of fresh cauliflower with pieces of red green and yellow bell pepper very lightly sprinkled with a garlic red chili sauce. Although I ve had Rogan Josh at other restaurants this rendition was leaps and bounds above what I ve tried elsewhere even vaulting ahead of the version I had in Kirkland Washington which had stood as the best Rogan Josh ever until last night at Tamarind. I also could not resist ordering the Madhavi s Cucumber Salad although I realized I was ordering too much food. I took most of the cucumber salad home with me and am enjoying it as I write this review. The diced cucumber is mixed with moong dal coconut and cilantro. Wonderful. With a full meal it would contrast refreshingly with a spicy dish. For bread I ordered the Tandoori Paratha which clearly arrived fresh from the Tandoor. Although of course I want to eventually try their naan the whole wheat Paratha was not only awesome but allowed me to believe that I was ordering a healthier choice. Late in the meal I asked Shakti my server whether it was too late to ask for dessert since at this point 10PM had come and gone. He assured me that there was plenty of time that he and the others still needed to clean up the restaurant anyway and urged me not to be in a hurry to leave. This is my kind of restaurant! I ordered the Mango Pista Kulfi which was very good but Shakti insists that the next time I come if I can order before closing while the kitchen is still fully staffed and open I should try the Rasmalai. I feel as if I m gushing here. I m not accustomed to writing an unabashedly positive review. For contrast see what I have written about the restaurant Bombay Cuisine at other sites and will soon write here as well. If you see a review signed as Art or nipper that s going to be me. I almost forgot! This restaurant is also a new member of RewardsNetwork which among other things manages the dining for miles programs for Northwest Airlines Delta Airlines and others which is what first alerted me to the existence of this restaurant. So I not only had a great culinary experience I earned frequent flyer miles as well! In my experience this restaurant is the best Indian restaurant in Charlotte. As far as I know it has no relationship to the evidently excellent Tamarind restaurants in New York and London but I can attest that those esteemed restaurants should not feel slighted if diners believe they re in the same family. Tip if and only if you enjoy your Indian food extra spicy ask for the Indian spice level which is the level of spiciness served to customers who are actually from India. If you do that with the Vindaloo dishes be prepared! Remember mischievous grin it burns at least twice!
OMG the sourdough baguettes are amazing. Crunchy on the outside soft and chewy on the inside. Get there early though because they go fast! Or do what all the smart kids are doing these days and order ahead. Jan LOVES special orders! The crack bars are super addicting and I really am not a sweets girl and she s added them to the regular lineup. And the tried and trues never disappoint cinnamon rolls cheese puffs now in different flavors like sun dried tomato and basil pepperoni cheesecake bars and always warm fresh coffee. Jan is super committed to providing her customers with convenience so if there is anything at all that you d want her to consider please be sure to let her know! She s here doing what she loves for all of you! Nothing in her repertoire has yet to disappoint so go on in give her a try and I guarantee you ll be hooked. And I hear she cooks all of the calories out so eat to your hearts content!
My wife said she loved her poke bowl. She had the scallops and tuna said it tasted fresh. The spicy house sauce was defiantly spicy but good. I had the katsu chicken which was good chicken was not to thin like some places can give you when having small fried chicken like this. Friendly staff and good ingredients makes this place worth going to again.
I had the best experience at here! Mike does amazing work! And Mary and Chris are great too! I signed up for the skin care plan three years ago and I ve had it ever since.
This place is always full and loud and fun. I went to the one in the West End a few times before and was happy when they opened this one in the area. This is not like thick slices its Neopolitan style. so its super thin and sometimes even a little soggy in the middle. But so tasty! Yummy salad and the staff is super friendly. If there s a wait for a table you can sit at the bar. Both times I ve been here there were pretty loud families but i do not think thats a big deal.
Our friends took us here for breakfast and wow they picked a winner. The food no matter what you get is all out of this world! They will let you know they fear the lightrail expansion though.
So fun so tasty! Came here for my good friend s birthday this past weekend and I m so glad I finally got to visit this talk of the town seafood joint. Although it is a bit pricy you re getting fresh food and hearty portions... Truthfully the experience in itself is worth it! But I ll get to that later ... The menu has about a million options to choose from so even if you re not a huge fan of seafood there are other fish less options. However you d be missing out if you did not just try something with fish from here. I went with the fajitas de camarones or shrimp fajitas. It was about 10 lb. of sizzling spicy shrimp with peppers and onions. So good and definitely worth 18. Paired with an ice cold Pacifico and a couple of scoops of ceviche I was in HEAVEN ... Plus it was enough food to feed me the next day too. Now back to that experience I was talking about earlier Despite my party of 10 arriving without any kind of reservation we were seated immediately I m not even sure if they really even have a reservation process? They seem to know how to handle large parties on a whim Anyway that was impressive because it was a Friday night! The service was also quick and attentive. The food did take a bit to come out but that s just fine. We had plenty of ceviche cerveza and live mariachi music to enjoy in the meantime!
It s recently been redone inside and is not quite as fun to sit in but Mercury Espresso Bar is by far one of the superior cafes on the new and improved Queen East stretch. Grab a double Americano and lounge on the patio a prime spot for watching passersby or take one to go as you get on with your day. Either way you ll be glad you did!
First time here ...To be completely honest they truly did one hell of a job! Thank you guys again!
An extension of there original Maryland Pkwy. Location. The staff is friendly and manage by Tiffany S. one of the owners. She will always make you feel welcome and aims to pleased everyone she meets. Everything here is great and finally tried their Thai Basil Wafflewich today which was simply amazing must try. It s great to see an independent coffee shop in an area that is underrated. Kudos to Paul and Tiffany Stiles!!! for being part of a community that deserved something unique and truly TIABI To Inspire And Be Inspired .
I AM IN LOVE WITH THIS PLACE! Great prices and great staff. I love it seriously. I m so picky when it comes to gettin my nails done seriously. I finally found a place that I never want to leave.
I travel and move around a lot for work and always have the hardest time finding a great haircut. Do not get me wrong I may be very peculiar on my haircuts. It was my second time trying this location out but I have to say Taylor did absolutely a great job. An amazing haircut and even got me to pick up some new product as well. I will definitely be a regular of his from now on.
DSW has Row after Row of famous maker shoes for men women and children! They also have a very good selection of sizes. Prices are very good well below list! I would highly recommend this shoe warehouse to ALL!
Pop rockin roll is a must try. Usually I m not a fan of signature concoctions but these ones work. Nice selection of shared plates including the crispy rice. Had the toro and it was fresh and delicious. Service was spot on.
My girlfriend was at a conference for work at Talking Stick when we came and we were looking for a light lunch and were heading out of town when she got off. Sakana was fast. We had waited a little bit and the service when we walked to the corner of the bar almost had me wondering but we settled in. Ordered sushi and nothing else. I tend only want to attend to Sushi spots that I know will be solid. Sakana you re good. I ll be back.
Wow! What a great place! Vegas style buffet Blooms in the Desert. The selection is fantastic they have 4 different Islands of food with Many trays in each Island Grilled steaks to order Sushi Mongolian BBQ..........you cant go wrong. For the Price its the best buffet in town. Service has always been excellent and prompt. It always seems to be busy as well. NO Complaints from me I have high expectations of places this is a 5star buffet in comparison to the other options out there in the Valley and for about 11 bucks with tax you cant go wrong.
Oh yum. Bonjour to the best chicken I ve ever eaten. Lately I m just so bored with chicken. It s like the white bread of meat. boring. overdone. everywhere. Kind of like how my vagina used to be before I quit whoring. And then I met Romados. The shop is on the edge of a sweet little neighborhood. Parking is plentiful or you can easily ride your bike here. Great bike lanes all the way down Rachel. Ordering was funny. For me. Not for my mom who fumbled her way through that only written in French menu. She tried to order by the price. I m laughing now only because it was so damn cute. I love my mom even moreso when she tries to speak French with her sweet southern twang. The chicken is moist. Juicy. Delicious. Spicy. Just like something else I know. It s kind of indescribably good. Really. It comes with a MOUND of french fries so you re better off just ordering a whole chicken platter. Split it with someone and you have a delicious filling meal for under 15. Order it spicy. Eat it there although the space is a bit uncomfortable. I just cannot imagine it would be as good later on.
The drinks here are a bit pricy especially after conversion when compared to Boston Chinatown but we were in a vacation mood. For take out though they seem to offer a slight discount when you pay cash. The taro slush minus the tea I had was good. We also came here for lunch once. They have these super filling Tea Meal Sets for 15.49 where you select a Main Course King s Tea Pork Ribs with rice for me! you get a Salad your choice of 3 Vegetable Sides Alluring Jasmine Tofu a Soup Tea Flavoured Wonton Soup a dessert Green Tea Mango Mousse and a Drink if you order a different drink that what s offered you pay 1 2 the price of the selected drink Lychee Yogurt Slush 6.99 reg price . That s what we all went for. The salad okay but a bit drenched with dressing. The wonton soup was nice and hot. The pork was great! Tender and tasty and plentiful for me anyhow . I tried all three veggies and I must say I liked my tofu much more than the turnip or the cabbage both steamed . The slush was okay but I was up for trying something else next time. And the dessert was tiny at perhaps 2 inches square but was perfect since I had not been able to finish the rest of my meal. In fact I had to recruit help to clean up on the pork and tofu. For me it was a tie between the mango cake and the coffee flavored frozen Twister Freeze Cake with the Green Tea Snow Cake with it s too soft a texture and lack of flavor at a distant third.
Venue is clean food is fresh and good and service is legendary lol coconut ice cream is good
I had the best experience today at KLC nails. Julie greeted me at the door with a huge smile! She took her time helping me figure out what I wanted. I decided to go with a acrylic set and pedicure. Julie started my nails and then another tech took over I believe her name was Lisa . While my nails were getting done Tina did my pedicure. That was by far the most thorough wonderful pedicure I ve ever received! It was a very relaxing atmosphere and I felt very comfortable. After Julie was done helping another customer she came back to check on me to make sure my nails were exactly how they should be. I ve gotten a lot of acrylics in the past and this is by far the best I ve gotten. The shape is perfect they put on enough coats of polish and they were very gentle about it. I m definitely coming back!
I ve been searching for a new esthetician since relocating to Henderson 6 months ago... I m glad to say that my search has happily ended. Prior to scheduling my appointment with Kristy I emailed her to inquire about the type of services I needed wax eyelash extensions and scheduling. In my email I asked her to text me since it s the quickest means for me to reply. To my surprise she was able to fit me in for both services the same week! She did the most thorough clean fast Brazilian without me flinching once. We kept a steady conversation so the process was a smooth. literally as well I was very happy with my new eyelash extensions too! She made sure that I understood ahead of time that this was a new service offer and sent me photos of previous work. Hence the VERY affordable pricing . I had no complaints at all. I just met her and I love her already! I booked my next set of appointments before I left knowing she has a busy schedule. If you re feeling nervous hesitant on scheduling your first appointment with her do not ! I left a happy camper and I know you will too. Thanks Kristy!!
I be customer of redbowl since the first location in fort mill The staff is always very nice and friendly I food is good Sushi always fresh. love the gulten free Menu.and they have children menu. Not many Asian restaurant have children menu.
Nice quaint setting! The Hubs and I really enjoyed. Food was delicious rather small in portion size but still fulfilling!! Live music A Definitely a bang for your buck!
My 2nd time here it s kind of small so they are usually crowded with people The first time I came I ordered aguachilis not sure how you spell it and it was to spices for me I guess they could not make it less spicy which sucks since that s my favorite dish I got a shrimp cocktail and we ordered a bunch of drinks I got a Michelada first which was delicious and then a mojito and last was the watermelon drink All of them were yummy and very tasty They have live bands that come around and will sing u a song at your request I ll come back for sure
Always a 5 star experience no matter which one we go to. On a Friday night before Christmas it was a bit busy and we did have to wait over an hour which is longer then usual. The server was very friendly and helpful for our large party. The menu is huge but everything I order I end up loving. THe fish and chips were so crispy and juicy! Th fish tacos had so much flavor. I try a new cheesecake every time and this time it was the Hershey Chocolate one. Wow! A mouthful of chocolate in all its forms and cheesecake! I was in heaven!
I came here for a birthday lunch and wanted to try their expansive udon menu. I always walk along Yonge street and pass by the starry lit MeNami sign and have always wanted to check the restaurant out. Once we were seated I studied the menu a bit before deciding on the Seafood Yaki Udon. On the other hand my boyfriend ordered the Tonkatsu meal set. The corn kaki age has been something I ve always wanted to try so I ordered a plate of that as well. Before our mains arrived the server gave us each a bowl of salad. It was quite refreshing and tasty. When the mains were served I initially fell in love with the sweet aroma given off by the udon reminding me of takoyaki balls and okonomiyaki. The udon noodles were sitting in a thick sauce with mussels and morsels of squid all topped with bonito flakes and mayo. I was a huge fan of this dish. It was the star of my meal. Not only was it rich and flavourful but the mussels themselves gave off this smoky flavour that really complimented the savoury sauce and noodles. As for the pork katsu I thought that they made the dish really well. The meat was tender and not dry at all and the exterior coat was very crispy. The sauce for the dish was tangy and sweet. The corn kaki age was satisfactory. I found that the corn fried with what looked like batter gave it a chewy texture inside which contrasted with the crunch you got biting into the kaki age. I did however love the sweet sauce they gave us to dip the bites in. Overall the meal was amazing and I loved the service that they provided to us.
Great place to train in Las Vegas. The mat space is very large with mats covering the walls. It is also very well maintained since I ve been training here I have yet to hear of someone getting staph or ring worm. Also note what seems like the front door is really the back door. The front door is on the other side of the building. That got me when I first entered the gym. The training and instruction is top notch here. Professor Hector is a very knowledgeable black belt under Cobrinha. He focuses on all his student on and off the mat as well as helping visitors learn the techniques. He encourages students to ask questions on the technique of the day or just any technique the student has in mind. Another cool thing about this gym is that a lot of famous jiu jitsu practitioners come here to visit. Just to name a few Cobrinha obviously Miyao Denilson Pimenta Bruno Malfacine. The jiu jitsu itself is amazing. This was not the gym I started my Jiu Jitsu journey but how my game has evolved since I started training here is baffling. Come here and roll to see for yourself!
Huge shoutout to Fat Tuesday for getting me and my boyfriend sufficiently tipsy enough to almost walk the entire strip with huge smiles on our faces 4.2 miles according to Google! . Fat Tuesday was on my list of must do s in Vegas solely for the fact that I wanted to be a silly drunken tourist and finish a 40 oz huge bong shaped cup filled with pure alcoholic slushee goodness. Judge me if you must. I thought my visit to Fat Tuesday would be a one time thing but after realizing how delicious these slushees tasted and how strong they actually were I probably drank at least four of these while I was here. The bong shaped cup got a tad annoying after a while so I switched to the cup with the handles for easy carrying. My favorite flavor was the blue raspberry. So delicious! The mango flavor was very mango y seems silly to mention but my boyfriend was not a fan since it was such a strong fake kind of mango flavor. His favorite was the 190 Octane with an added shot of everclear. If that s not a recipe for a fun drunken time I do not know what is! So close to a 5 star rating but with all the alcohol and sugar this is a perfect storm for a raging headache boo . But to be fair this is Vegas after all.
Great good and good service. Good family dinning atmosphere. We got a individual room so no wait was needed but when I arrived I saw so many people line up. I would not personally line up for it as you can make reservations here or other similar restaurants and the good is similar. I do like it more than Fisherman Lobster Clubhouse though.
I absolutely loved this restaurant. One of the best sushis I ve had in North America. High quality fish beautifully presented and amazing service. I had the sushi combo plate and everything was beyond excellent. I liked it so much that I ate there 3 times during my visit in Toronto!
The Protein House is my new favorite spot in town. They prepare some of the freshest quality food and pride themselves on being hospitable. Kristin Rodrigues Ashely A and Danny Garcia always go out of their way to make sure my order is correct each and every time. I highly recommend Protein House Phoenix for anyone looking for healthy options on the go or even a nice sit down refreshing meal. You have to go check it out!
If you are looking for a no muss no fuss excellently cooked steak run to The Palm right now. I went for Summer Queen s Feast and I highly recommend it. My plan all along was to have an All American steak house meal. I started with the Caesar salad which is not something I normally order but I was pleased with the result. The romaine was crisp and sturdy which showed that The Palm was not skimping on freshness or flavor just because it was restaurant week. There was a generous amount of cheese and croutons which I am a huge fan of and the Caesar dressing was creamy and slightly acidic and did not drown my lettuce. For my main I went with the obvious choice and ordered the twin tenderloin filet medallions. My steak hit the spot it was perfectly rare in the middle and had shallot butter generously melted on top with some crispy onions as well . I love it when chefs have an in depth knowledge of meat temperatures just talking about it is getting me excited and whoever cooked my steak at The Palm definitely knew what they were doing. The one downside about the restaurant week menu was that it did not include a side dish with our main courses but for only 3 a person we ordered a family style side of Brussels sprouts which were almost as amazing as my steak. The Brussels sprouts were bathed in a delicious lemon brown butter and the tanginess of the lemon coupled with richness of the brown butter perfectly offset the Brussels sprouts natural funkiness or should we say bitterness? Sour taste? . I would eat those over and over again. To complete my three course meal I ended with the classic New York cheesecake but stole a taste of my friend s Key Lime Pie because I was having such a hard time deciding . The cheesecake was good it was creamy light sometimes cheesecakes can turn dense and not too sweet. But after a sort of heavy on heavy on heavy meal I was not able to finish it all it still made a great snack the next afternoon . Read the full review here
I met one of the owners she was very welcoming and has a great smile. The fish taco was tasty so was the spicy pork taco I dined in so received the chips salsa and Guacamole all very good. The owner gave me a free second helping of the Guac and a free sample bowl of a seafood soup they are experimenting with and thinking of selling it had kimchee and seafood lt was like a fusion of Mexican seven seas and spicy cabbage soup my tasty buds where whirling in confusion hehe.
Best pool service EVER!!! If you re looking for honest reliable most knowledgeable professional person to service your pool do not look any further. Call Casey now. He will resolve all your pool problems without trying to rip you off. He will explain every step of what he is doing and describe the alternatives you might have. Call Casey! That s what we did and we cannot be more happy.
Been staying here for over 20 years. Located in a quiet area and close to everything. The bed was awesome got a great night of sleep!
Excellent choice! Being from out of town it was our first time here and we were going based off reviews. We ended up driving by another Z Tejas to get to this one because of the reviews and boy are we glad we did! We were greeted by Amedeo and was instantly treated with A service. The excellent service did not stop there.. Gavin also helped us and was just as great! The food was good but those Margaritas mmmhmm! Max of 3 is understandable strong but delicious!
We have a new puppy and our breeder recommended Dr. Arn. We had her in for her first puppy check and he put my mind at ease! We just realized we had a worm issue today and Dr. Arn was on the spot ... called back immediately and again put my mind totally at ease! They have gone out of their way!
Breakfast all day. Who does not love breakfast for dinner? Every where i live i have to find a place that serves diner style breakfast all day because every now and then i need pancakes for dinner. This is a little diner type place that has good pancakes and all your regular breakfast items. On weekend mornings there is always a wait and lots of larger groups but it usually moves pretty fast. They have this thing called a Dutch Baby I never tried it but it looked like a giant bowl shaped pancake.. people seemed to like it. Omlets are HUGE pancakes are fluffy coffee is diner style.. i like it.
My all time favorite hotel. Its beautiful brilliant and well crafted. The gondolas are so lovely. This is the best looking hotel its clean and lively with a great touch of class.
This place is supposed to get more attention from Asian food lovers especially for who love chicken on rice. The place is small and neat. They have very simple menu with just a couple items. I tried the white meat chicken on rice and the waitress was very particular asking me about the type of chicken that I want white or dark in bone or no bone skin or without...Everything came out perfect but I still feel like the soup was missing for the best combination. Good service and good food!!
CBW Westlake is super! They have convenient hours separate dogs by size and activity level have cameras in the play areas and associates who obviously love dogs! So glad to have found this place!
Very nice clean and try the Philly sandwich with the works and mayo jalapeno sauce
Laura and her entire team are awesome. They made the process so easy. We closed on our house and sold our old house on the same day so we could move door to door. We ca not thank them enough!!! 10 10 would recommend to anyone looking for a knowledgeable kind and hardworking realtor. Thanks again Laura!
Tasty food and reasonably priced. Friendly staff too. BUT the music speakers are way to loud when trying to enjoy your meal.
Thank you Carlos and Genesis for doing such a great job on our cars. I called Carlos and he was able to fit me in on the same day. They were very nice and Carlos took his time on each car making sure they were in tip top shape. My car looks and smells great thanks to power detailing.
My hairdresser retired on me. I called many different salons trying to find the right person for the transformation I had in mind. I called The Savvy Stylist and Michelle answered. She made me feel really comfortable after explaining what I had in mind. I was extremely nervous about the huge change I did not want my hair to get damaged and end up with a pixie cut. Anyway I went in for a consultation and felt she was the right person for the job...and I was right! During my appointment she was very meticulous not to damage my hair. She did an amazing job! Everyone in the salon was nice. I really liked Heather the owner she was very friendly. I am very pleased with my decision to try this salon.
Had the pleasure to dine in the private dining room and it was a wonderful experience. Design and atmosphere here is gorgeous very chic and upscale. Very relaxing as well especially with some classical music in the background. Service was outstanding. We tried the 18 course dinner and it was a great experience not only the food is presented beautifully but it was very delicious as well. Chef and his staff are very very talented absolute work of art.
Amazing food great atmosphere and service was A . The table side caesar salad is so good along with their steaks. I recommend this place to anyway looking for a romantic atmosphere excellent food and top notch service.
This has got to be one of my favorite places to dine in. The restaurant is pretty big as it is only one level. During evening hours it s always busy inside and outside parking . If you get lucky you can find parking on the side street just a minute walk from the restaurant. During their dinner hours it is a wait to be seated I m not sure about lunch as I have never been. What s great is that they will ask for your number and shoot you a text call to let you know your table is ready! The seating is tight as in you can hear your neighbor s conversation. I personally like to sit at the high chairs where you can watch the chefs in action. Oh and how can I forget once you walk in and exit you are greeted outloud by all the staff in their language. I definitely recommend getting Kinoko Bibimbap ultimate favorite Salmon Oshizushi blowtorched salmon? hell yes! and Ebimayo ask for extra sauce . I ve tried almost every item on the menu and those are my must haves! Also for drinks the Blue Chu tastes bomb! Service is excellent and quick. Servers are very friendly. The atmosphere is loud which I pay no attention to because of how great the food tastes. Overall you will have a great experience as I always do.
I had to look something up on the Internet so I went to the Mustang Library in Scottsdale AZ. Being from out of town I thought that I would have to join up to use their computers. The very nice lady that helped me found out what my needs were and accomodated them without having to sign up to be a member. She was extremely professional very helpful and when I move here I surely will become a member just because of the way I was treated. Mike H.
This is the second time staying in the towers. They are nice clean this last trip had me in tower 3. They are part of MGM yet they are easily 3 or 4 blocks behind so if you want to walk to the casino or the strip you can but it is a hike not that bad though it is all inside and a portion walks you through a mini mall. I was not happy with the water pressure in the shower is low.
Great park! Great prices! If your not familiar with the all day dinning pass it s available in season pass format and or day pass from 30 an addition 80 on your season pass and you can eat every 90 minutes with the day one and twice a day with the season pass dinning every time you visit! Totally worth it! You can also count on the park being less busy during overcast days and the rides will still run!!!! Amazing no? They also have instalment for season passes as of October to the following year so it does not break your bank in one shot come June! However I am disappointed in this years staff. Every staff member I have seen working in the food areas are not only unhygienic but extremely slow like slugs. Yes it is hot. I am hot too! But I keep moving when I m at work!!!! Common this is not a chore it s a business.
Almost two years after my first visit to Sage I made a return visit to have the Iron Chef America menu that Chef Shawn McClain s made and served the judges on last week s 9 5 12 Iron Chef America. Chef McClain challenged Iron Chef Forgione and McClain won handily. They are serving the menu this week only at Sage tomorrow being the last day. I really like this restaurant the food the dcor and the general ambiance. Onto the meal. I m glad Chef McClain does not shy away from salt. There s soft butter served with a small container of sea salt. Several of the dishes had a salt flavor that enhanced the food. My server and I spoke about this for a bit and he agreed with me about using salt. Course 1 Dinner started with whelk toast with a tropical sangrita. The sangrita was flavored with padron pepper. ginger and lime. There was a nice kick from the padron pepper. Very refreshing beginning. The whelk toast was very good. Course 2 This was sashimi of Hawaiian nairagi. The nairagi was in small roll like curves and had some sea salt crystals on the outside. The sashimi was on coconut pure with shaved hearts of palm and togarashi cured pineapple. The pepper flavor with the coconut and pineapple was fantastic! Course 3 Whelk ceviche with green zebra tomatoes avocado espuma and green mango. What a complex mix of flavors. Everything went well together and the whelk and tomatoes were wonderful! Course 4 Lemongrass coconut soup. There was a tempura fried prawn on the soup the noodles were made of young coconut and it was given an extra flavor kick with Thai basil. Course 5 Braised pork belly. This was served with sweet coconut rice thin slices Iberico ham with glazed pineapple. There was a peppery flavor to the pork belly and it was such a great counterpoint to the pineapple s sweetness. Dessert Creamy white chocolate with coconut. This was a white chocolate soup. The white chocolate was in a small pitcher and the server poured the liquid chocolate over the rum compressed pineapple and sweet tapioca that were in the bowl. There was also a serving of mango sorbet. The tapioca was cooked to perfection the white chocolate was addicting and the pineapple was great! Lastly at the end of meals at Sage the server brings a small container of hot chocolate that has both banana and caramel mixed in. What a delightful reverse amuse blouche with which to end your meal. Service was exemplary as I knew it would be. When my iced tea glass was low a server brought me another glass. No asking no waiting just excellent service. My head server was James and we chatted about the contest and how everyone had kept the results secret for almost a year since the show was taped. James was excellent! I hope he s working when I m there again. What a treat to live in a city to have such fine chefs as Shawn McClain! Another pleasant meal at Sage. And I will be back for another one soon I hope.
Second time at Film Bar. Took my girl to see The Shape of Water. Very kick back comfortable seating. Old school theater with beer and wine Orange blossom for her and a nice IPA for me. Great start to a downtown night. Of course popcorn.
So I lived in Beijing for 8 months and would eat dumplings at least three times a week. Five kuai roadside dumplings fancy purple ones you name it I ve tried it. When I left I was REALLY upset about the prospect of never tasting the same calibre of dumplings again so I did a quick google search and came across Mother Dumplings. Wooee the Mother of all Dumplings? Well guess what this mother has neglected her children because the whole experience was extremely underwhelming. In search of a new source to satisfy my dumpling addiction I came across Dumpling House. I m glad to announce that these have been the best dumplings I ve had in Toronto so far. Perfect thickness of jiaozi dough great fillings and superb chilli for your vinegar chilli dipping combo. Four stars because I want to remain credible but in my head it s really 5.
Visiting Toronto for work. Great chicken sandwich and fries. Nice service. They were playing music with vulgar lyrics when I came in but when I inquired about their choice of music they immediately changed it.
I throughly enjoy McFadden s! I typically visit for lunch or late afternoon meal. Food and service consistently good. I love the McFaddens Salad with bleu cheese dressing. I recently had the vegetarian burger amazing! A fine Irish establishment!
We spent the afternoon at Ripley s Aquarium of Canada. It was festively decorated. There was lots to see as soon as we walked in. As we started walking around there were lots of cool fish. Before you leave you can pick up some souvenirs at the gift shop. The aquarium is a fun place to spend some time!
Now THIS is customer service. Much improved!! CASH REGISTER I went to guy buy a shirt got to the cash and she charged me full price. I vaguely remembered that the shirt was on sale. This is how it went down. Me I think the shirt is on sale but I m not sure Cash oh sure let me check she checks the flyer you re right! punches in the sale price Me hmm...I think the rack said it was this XX amount Cash Let me call the department I ran over myself to check the price and came back at the same time as the sales rep in the department Me I was wrong. You punched in the right amount Cash oh not a problem. It s always good to double check And that my friends is how you handle a price check. There was no judging no rolling of the eyes no sigh but was validation from the cashier that it was ok to check. I would go to this Zeller s any day now compared to the one at Thorncliff. Thorncliff could definitely learn a thing or two from this location.
I love this place because it is always open when you want to go out to eat even when nothing else is open. I love the art and the history on the walls when I come in it is obvious this place has been around for a while. They re open on all holidays too! The waitresses are so nice and friendly definitely make you feel like you ve been coming here for years. The food is awesome. The Skyland special is a great deal. The only thing that was off is that the hash browns are a little bland but definitely so good. Definitely one of my new favorite diner spots and they have a good Christmas breakfast menu.
Myself and my girlfriend went in to have a meeting with Jeremy Shugarman as we had to get new insurance midyear when open enrollment was already closed. Jeremy sat down with us and went over everything thoroughly. He answered all of our questions and walked us through the process so we knew what we were getting. A weight was lifted when we walked out and we will be recommending him to everyone we know. Thank you Jeremy!
Good piping hot food great flavor. Service was good and margaritas were tasty. We ll be back in again.
I would say the best overall asian grocery store in Cleveland is here. The facility is large clean and have many products I could not even imagine. The staff here is always helpful and friendly so do not hesitate to ask someone if you ca not find something or have any questions. The cooked food section is amazing! Real authentic and delicious asian eats such as roast pork sesame balls yau tiu fried cruellers soy milk and my FAVORITE their duck! They have an amazing selection of korean and filipino foods but a bit short on the chinese products. Fish dept is a bit smaller than the other places though they do have the essentials. Not the busiest market in the area but definitely the most fun and happiest atmosphere. I go to other markets once in awhile and though more people the staff and customers seem to be drudging their time. Here the staff are casually socializing with anyone that has questions and having a good time. Although everyone has their own experiences and are free to have their own opinion about places I find some of the 1 star reviews are a bit mis directed. Two people had issues with products snack and fruit which no one could tell had any issues until actually opening it up. Box is unexpired or the fruit looks fresh on the outside how can anyone short of x ray vision know that the item was bad. Seems like a supplier issue not their fault. Probably should ve brought it to their attention and see how they would ve handled it. Though I can say they may have some items past their time but they have not failed to address them when brought to their attention in my experiences. Anyways I digress. The store always changes a little bit after a few months so I do not know if they re trying new layouts or if they do it to keep people on their toes lol. Either way I always seem to have to ask where things are when they re moved but they re more than helpful. They have a small cafeteria restaurant in the back which has some decent Pho though their spicy soup bun bo hue is the one to go for. In short this place has all the essentials you ll need great friendly staff clean big store some products are lacking but their hot prepared food is the best bar none! ...Did i forget to mention they have fidget spinners? Ha!
I ca not say enough about Michael and the incredible team and business he s built. My husband and I have used Michael Johnson s for years...literally since he s been in business 10 15 years? . He s fairly priced overflowing with integrity family friendly treats his employees really well has always made every problem right on our cars has always made good on every estimate he s given us even if he was wrong about the problem and he ends up having to eat a cost and every few months we get a phone call telling us there s a box of clothes for my son at the shop that his son has grown out of. This is a guy who really cares about his customers cares about the quality of his work and cares about maintaining a solid reputation. I ll never go anywhere else.
Had a haircut from every worker here and every haircut I ve had here is awesome. Cheap too. Gonna be going here for a while.
Officer Tom Beck is awesome! Because of the tsa pat down and protocol I lost my laptop on Friday when one of their agents stashed it under the rest of my belongings. I was in a hurry to catch my flight and it was left behind. I have been calling tsa since I found out it was gone and could not get ahold of anyone. I was instructed to make a police report which is how I was connected with Officer Beck. He went out of his way to help me and his partner was able to get my computer back and have it ready for me when I get there saving me 2000 and from missing my first day of online class . THANK YOU!!
The wife and I had the opportunity to go to phx pride this year. It was my first time to venture to pride and I was pleasantly surprised. We went Saturday and it was so awesome to see so many ppl straight and lgbtq community coming together. The alcohol tix were 6 each and we spent a pretty penny getting drunk lol. The vendors were pretty neat and took home a lot of neat stuff shirts included. It would have be awesome to have more live music from famous ppl but it s all good. Over all fun experience and great atmosphere
I came here with a couple of friends the other night. I had the dry egg noodles with seafood along with the soup on the side. I loved it! The service was actually pretty good. Most Asian places do not offer good customer service haha. I was able to have a good conversation with the servers and I had a really good time. I will for sure come back with my husband to try the other things in the menu. It is also VERY clean. Always a plus!
Eversince So Good Cafe closed down I needed a new Vietnamese sandwich Cafe joint to plop myself down in. THANK GOD this place opened up right at the same time. Everything is made fresh onsite and quite delicious. I love the minutia and the obscure dishes offered at this joint. I also love to support the owner chef because they season their food with love. The pride and customer service do make a tremendous difference in the quality of their product. Nice job I hope you last and continue to work towards improving your quality. The rest will fall into place.
If I could give Howard a 100 star rating I would. After calling several so called pool cleaning companies and not even get a courtesy callback I found Howard In the Ahwatukee newspaper. I called and left a message and he called me back the same day. He came back the next day and true to his word he never charged me for this. He answered all my questions and my problem was due to my human error. He showed me what I was doing wrong. He is so honest. I will definitely recommend him to all my friends with pools.
To be honest I only drove thru this place because a friend of mine told me they have corn dogs. Whaaaat?! Somewhere besides Hot Dog on a Stick that serves my beloved processed meat deep fried in a cornmeal batter?! And not having to wait for the local carnival fair to come into town to indulge in this fare food?! I was so there. They have a special of 5 for 5 corn dogs and although I was so tempted I stuck with my usual 2. It was steaming hot as I drove away and dug right in. So delicious and worth the calories. I will be going back for sure...for the corn dogs. For anyone reading this review and wonder why this would even be helpful so what I like corn dogs and not getting anything else. Enjoy!
The East End Food Co op has become my favorite place to get groceries. I ve recently changed to eating vegan and this place has everything I need. The bulk food section is awesome from all types of organic flour to organic candy granola rice pasta teas coffee even bulk tamari. You can bring your own container and fill it up. If not bags and containers are available. All different types of vegan as well as some non vegan canned goods soymilks vegan cheeses and meat substitutes are available. There is so much crammed into the place sometimes its hard to find what you need but staff is very friendly and are always there to help. It does not have the glitz and glam of Whole Foods but the prices are a little better. If you become a member once a month you can purchase items at a pretty good discount.
It s not that i dont like mexican food it s just that my bf likes it a little too much. Like a true californian there s nothing more familiar to him than good mexican or tex mex. Thus when I come back to toronto without him the last thing i am thinking about eating is mexican food. And yet here we are on a gorgeously sunny day with some gorgeously looking girls we sit out on a patio with glasses of mojitos on Unionville Main Street shoving dripping tortillas into our mouth. I had ordered the Sopes Mexicanos with Chorizo which are mexican corn cakes topped with delicious refried beans sour cream pico de gallo and who knows what crack. I also had some tacos from my friends and a chicken sope. I dont know how i have never had sopes before but now i am hooked. Unfortunately i m not sure where in Europe i m going to get to find these things but let me tell you you really should stop by Planeta Mexico for them.
Faith and Begorrah did I pass out and wake up in the Emerald Isle? This Irish themed casino has great drink prices and some excellent dealers. I really enjoyed my 2 1 2 hour stint in their nightly No Limit Holdem tournament and the non stop delivery of free Guinness. The food court is good I always go for the Pizza...pretty good NY style. And the beer pong area is hilarious.
Service at this smashburger is crazy good! Mike took our order food came out quickly and hot! Mike was also running around bussing tables bringing boxes just a real pleasure thank you Mike
This restaurant is awesome and very interesting. It was a very long wait when we went out there on a Saturday evening so plan for it. The food is served tapas style small portions . 4 5 dishes would be good to share amongst 2 people. My favorites are the Korean steak. It was delicious.the octopus dish was spectacular. Everything is pretty good my only complaint is the size of the good for the price you pay for it. Staff is friendly.
The two of us walked in at 9pm on a Saturday night without a booking and we were told half an hour we managed to get seated within 10 mins because of some no shows! The service is great really efficient. Standouts of the night tofu plain more than agadeshi sea urchin with egg and roe tuna sashimi special. Also they have a nice toilet Japanese toilet seat
Visited on a Thursday at lunchtime. Only moderately busy and the two of us were seated almost immediately. Our service was prompt first drinks OJ and coffee and then food pancakes french toast bacon . The food looked and tasted fine totally on par for IHOP. The place was clean but neither of us visited the restrooms. We had to wait maybe 3 4 minutes at the register to pay everyone was busy elsewhere but other than that we had a good experience and would return again.
This park is nice depending on how hot out it is!! There is a children s play area which is quite nice looking and then there is a large field with a few small trees. Garbage and recycling cans are available to keep things tidy.
THEY HAVE THE BEST Mango coconut pancakes!!!!! O to the M G!!! Favorite pancakes EVAAA! you guys rock for late nite yummies!!!
Fantastic. I was looking for a plumber that was reasonable and does a great job. I went on Home Advisor and found 100 Plumbing. Mont scheduled an appointment and was on time. He did a great job and I gave him 2 referrals. He is my new plumber.
Having a nice dinner at The Feast buffet. My server Lori was very attentive to detail. Her service was appreciated and very efficient. The baked chicken was perfect very tasty! I recommend this buffet. P. S. My previous reviews taken about line cutting being a problem seems like the issue has improved. No problems in the last 4 visits.
Food and service are good. You definately get a lot of food for the money!
The Sharp Edge Creekhouse was one of the first local places I tried since i moved to Pittsburgh over a year ago and has been the preferred lunch spot during the workday. As this place is renowned for its selection of Belgian beers it balances a nice variety on the menu of typical bar food with a touch of flair. My personal favorite is the Venison Cheeseburger that makes any 3 hour morning sales meeting seem worth it. Sharp Edge has daily specials and I personally get giddy over the pierogies and sausage. A typical favorite through these snowy days is the soup salad combo with cup of Irish coffee. Overall the service is good the staff are nice and i have not had a bad experience. There is a covered deck for outdoor dining and an upstairs dining room for those busy nights. As for the beer selection...let me just say that i make it a point to bring all my hopheads and beer junkies to Sharp Edge simply for the selection and to talk beer.
This place is genius!! Daycare boarding grooming and a full bar to hang out with your baby ies ! Food trucks on the weekend and various animal fundraising events. Great team of staffs! My baby loves Charlotte one of the managers. They take great care of my baby whenever she goes there.
I recently went there on a business lunch and my colleague and I ordered the fish and chips. The place got busy during the time we were there. The fish came with several dipping sauces and was very good. The french fries were delicious and the cole slaw was also good. I had dinner at Liberty about a year ago and it was very good then too. The food at Liberty has a distinctive style. It is not the run of the mill variety and I will definitely return there. The service was good but not great. I had to flag the waitress down to get a couple re fills. It is a nice place to enjoy a good meal.
I worked with Stephanie. I received my completed resume within the given time and it looks great! I originally sent her what I had as far as a previous resume and she let me know that I would only need a revamp which was good news. I will also do a cover letter to finish it up! Very prompt communication throughout the entire process. Use them if you need a resume or resume revamp!!
Well another trip just to make sure it was not a fluke. This place has great food and wonderful wait staff. Have yet to try anything that was not good. Bacon garlic knots still the best. Will remain on a must list when in vegas.
Yes I love buffets especially great ones. This one in Scottsdale basically within 20 minutes of home is shockingly good. I went there on a Friday night yesterday for dinner before a concert. They had Asian Mexican Seafood American Cold Deli Hot soups Hot rotisserie meats stunning variety of desserts even some sugar free Gelato. I had 2 heaping plates with chow main duck lamb beef wellington lobster claws crab legs grouper cod shrimp shu mai clam chowder won ton soup. So much more I wanted to try but wanted to be able to walk out For dessert I had a fruit tart berry trifle and berry layer cake. All good. And they all stayed in my tummy. I was satisfied and more. It was worth the and a splurge. I had good service. They added gratuity when you paid so it was convenient if you did not have cash. I would return. the only con is the allowance of smoking inside the casino so if I went into the restroom smokers would exit.
I ve been coming to this place with my family for years. By now they all know us but the service is always great. I really like that they give you hot towels to wash your hands before you eat. Al of their sushi is always good. Sometimes it s best to make reservations but sometimes like on a Sunday evening there s no need for a reservation. They do carry out as well. I will say sometimes their sushi is pricier than other sushi places but it s a bit more upscale.
One of my favorite brunch places when I can make the trek. The service is friendly and the food is great! I generally order the Monte Cristo Sandwich which tastes amaZING and play a game of chess with my friends while we wait. They ve got all sorts of board games and I get to ask for hot water tea refills so what else do I need on a weekend afternoon? Along with the fact that the bathrooms are really nice .
I ve been to Markville Mall many times and I ve never really gotten a chance to go to this place until tonight and I must say I m really impressed. I ve always thought that they only sold generic bar food but their stuff is actually very delicious and high quality tasting. They have wide variety of items on their menu so there s something for everyone. The service was quick and the servers are very friendly and genuine. I love this place definitely coming here again!
Burgatory is probably the most hyped burger bar in Pittsburgh. I would reccomend coming at non peak hours or when the store opens... This place gets packed. I ordered the hard Espresso shake 8.50 at 11 00 in the morning because I wanted to try it. The shake was quite good. It was not an overpowering amount of alcohol nor negligent. If you do order a shake they are large and you will want to be prepared to take some burger home with you. I tested out a fairly standard burger. I ordered a Standard Deluxe Burger 9.50 which came on a Brioche Bun with Smoked Gouda Lettuce Tomato and House Sauce. The burger was not overly memorable but tasted good. Is it worth waiting hours in line to eat at Burgatory? Absolutely not. But if you want a quality burger and the wait is not too bad check it out.
My first experience at a Dine in Theater! Such a great idea like seriously this is the connecting link between purchasing foods at concessions and a dining experience at the theater. I came here with Khoa N. to watch Guardians of the Galaxy and previously booked our tickets online love how you can choose where your seats are located so you do not have to worry about other people stealing your chair and all that nonsense. Once seated we looked over our menus and got our orders taken. I had an Appletini and we shared a small order of Onion Rings and Buffalo wings. The drink was good delicious with that alchy kick. Food is decent think Applebee s or Red Robin s quality. Overpriced? Hell yeah but it s the novelty of being served food and eating a full on dish inside a movie theater. Only cons were Khoa s beer glass was luke warm and dirty. For a dine in theater I expected it to be a lot louder during the showtime but the noise level was pretty quiet. Comfy big chairs and alcohol during a movie? Can I get another hell yeah? The service was good we were served and brought the bill. The servers were not too distracting either. If you park in the lot get your parking ticket validated before you leave it s right by the exit. Esplandade 14 you have ruined me from watching movies at a regular theater it was totally worth it!
It s IN N OUT you ca not go wrong. Great food great service.
Costco now sells really good Honey Baked Hams. and if you have never had a REAL HONEY BAKED HAM as in FROM HONEYBAKED HAM Co. on Cactus Rd then you ca not die just yet. You must at least once in your life have one from here. I only buy them around holidays like Christmas and I have to wait in a big ass long line just to pick the ham up. You must pre order your ham in advance to guarantee you get one for Christmas! So as I stand in the line I tell myself that it would be so much better if I just decided to buy a ham in September sometime or in July but I forget. Not that waiting in the line is so bad they have lots of free samples of food and there are usually nice people around you to make conversation with ever so often an angry husband who must not have know what he was getting himself into when he said sure I ll run and pick up the ham honey . So this ham..... it is this perfect crunchy outer sugary glaze that just makes my mouth water thinking about it. You need to go to Honeybaked Ham. Like FOR REAL.
You cannot beat the views! The seating is comfy and plentiful for a reception or modest company event. The food service is pretty good. Today we were served a healthy variety like hummus veggies and baked brie with spicy cheese. The DJ is playing great music for the occasion and it is grooving! You would have a nice seats for a Panthers game bring binoculars for a closer view . The atmosphere is amazing with mountain views. Oh there was a marriage proposal happening when I arrived! Congratulations! Check out this location for your next event!
Was in a mood for a good steak we decided to try this place out food was amazing and services was great too
Best happy hour around! So many choices of rolls as well as appetizers and tacos! Always great friendly service!
So yummy and authentic. I have been there several times and each time I m please with my experience. The food perfect the staff is always friendly and although there s a long line it moves along so fast you do not even feel like you re waiting
WOW! This place is divine. We got a reservation off Open Table and came here with a friend on Saturday night and we started off with a glass a wine they had an excellent selection. Next came the awesome bread basket. OMG whatever those rolls were with the cream cheese were beyond incredible. We started out with Corn Soup which came with a yellow pepper stuffed with cous cous and shrimp and fresh herbs. It was probably the best most fresh thing I ate the entire weekend. The corn soup was pureed with a little bit of corn mixed throughout it was very creamy and pretty good. I got the Cast Iron roasted game hen and it was a little too pink for my enjoyment. I did eat the part that was well done however. It also was not as nicely presented as the other plates that I saw walking out. But the vegetables and sauce that the hen was laid in was very tasty. My friend had the Maryland Crab stuffed trout and it was beautifully presented and it looked divine. She said it was fabulous. And would definitely return for it again. For dessert we got the Spoon Bar and it was very delicious and incredibly chocolatey. Also when we finished our meal we asked if they knew a good reliable cab company that we could call and she returned saying she would call them for us. I thought that was a nice touch. We would return if were even in Pittsburgh again!
So I feel like I need to write another update. We ve eaten here several times and have a great experience every single time minus the first time with the delivery issue but we just decided to go get takeout every time . The owner and pizzaiola it s what they call the guys who make pizzas in Italy are very friendly and the pizza is always great. I ca not say enough nice things about those guys and this little pizza spot. Keep up the good work boys!!!
So my girlfriend a mom of 2 is a fanatic for Mexican food and it is Mother s Day so we had to try it. GREAT PLACE! From the moment you walk in you know you re in an authentic Mexican restaurant decor music etc. Everyone except my lil one tried something outside of their comfort zone and loved it! The service was incredible and this was even more impressive since it was a packed house Tip Make a reservation . We must have been asked 5x if everything was okay which some may think is annoying but I appreciate this in a restaurant and it shows a willingness to correct anything that may be wrong before the meal ends. We ll definitely be back and would recommend it to those wanting a good experience and good food.
If you re into candy and chocolate cocktails then this establishment is right up your alley. The chocolate martinis are highly recommended but the goblets are the main attraction. They are 36 but worth it considering the amount of alcohol they put in there our waiter said it was 12 shots for a 60oz goblet .
Had to see what all the hype was about this burger joint. Coming from NY I have to say nice touch at locating themselves within the NY NY hotel and casino. When we got there the line was out the door but even though to was a pretty long line it moved fairly quickly. They had someone manning the door and letting people in as the line inside started to go down. And once we got up to the counter every cash registered was being used and you could see all the people proactively working hard. The cashier who took my order Donna could probably tell I had never been there. She was extremely helpful friendly and even though there was a super long line behind me she was incredibly friendly and full of smiles. She helped me with my order and i have to admit she started off my experience quite well. The food itself was pretty good. I tried the shroom burger and it was definitely full of mushrooms. The sauce they put on the burger is very tasty and adds to the burger. We also ordered the bacon burger and it had tons of bacon. They have so many different flavors of shakes. I got a strawberry and it was delicious!!! Not too thick but not too thin..just right. Only thing that did not make it a 5 star visit was that there was no place to sit inside or outside . It was pretty busy so I m sure that factored into it but trying to savor and enjoy your lunch while cramped up half sitting half standing kinda takes away from the total experience. The way they are set up I guess does not really allow for any other way but maybe one day.
5 stars just for the nostalgia !!!!! This was one of my best Vegas activities on my trip. If it were not for me telling my date this is one of the things I wanted to do in Vegas my trip with him would have been a complete snooze fest til a lovely saved me from this trip a day later LOL. I do not mess around if you bore me I will leave and have fun with someone else. Anywho ever since the announcement of this particular Cirque show I knew I had to go. But my PIC at the time of their US tour was not having that GRRRRR. So it only made sense to watch staying on the same property. Now this was my first Cirque show so I ca not compare to the others. All I know is I enjoyed this show A LOT! So much I want to watch this again! Just the nostalgia alone will have me come back. I ve never seen Michael Jackson live and I m sure if I did I would be wowed more than watching this show. I was thoroughly entertained from beginning to end. I even had a moment where I started tearing up because its sad to see such a talented person come to this demise My date even had a great time and he admitted to me that he did not even want to go to the show and he was happy that he did. DUH anything I want to do is going to be fun LOL p I wo not go into great detail of the performances because I believe everyone should experience this Cirque show at least once. Make sure you get the middle tier seating and sit at the end row against the wall because the first tier seating left room to be harassed by the fake paparazzi and your pic would show up on the wall. F that LOL. Good looking out on my date picking the perfect seats. I will be back!!!!
Kim s pharmacy offers fast friendly service! Best part is that your prescriptions are filled very quick and they are always in stock for your medications.
The owner Alberto greeted us at the door and took us to our reserve table. The restaurant was quite charming. Service was good and the food excellent. My wife had the linguine with mushrooms and I had the carbonara both were extremely well done and very large portions we had the leftovers for dinner the next night . We will certainly go back the next time we are in Cave Creek. The only disappointing thing was we were not offered dessert .
Calling all east enders!! This hidden in plain sight gem serves up so scary good fresh Hummus and Moutabbal roasted eggplants and tahini with the freshest and fluffiest out of the tandoor bread! Not going to lie we could not do justice to our mixed grill entree because we ate the bread and dips like we just came off a carb free diet for a month! Did not have and space left to try any dessert but the Turkish coffee was superb think chai spiced coffee and felt almost ceremonial as it s presented beautifully in the traditional pot and cup. Ps sad but the fluffy to die for bread only gets made on weekends right now
Delicious fast food at the Eaton Centre s urban eatery. Singapore Noodles Tofu were both excellent and for about 8.50! Yum
Great People Great Enviroment and personally i think the best lanes that i have bowled in AZ so far. Living in East Mesa Apache Junction Area there really is not many bars to choose from this place is a diamond in the rough! Really beats driving to Tempe and the prices are better and drinks are better. Grey Goose Martini here is the best in town! Best part i have never had to deal with drama whatsoever here unlike college bars. Everyone that comes is here for the same reason to have a good time. This is my regular spot.
Interesting to say the least love the small hole in the wall atmosphere. If you are into beer tasting adventure this is the joint. High tops couches and a small bar decorated with eclectic nostalgia. Everyone is friendly and the conversation flows well with neighboring tables. Most are locals and regulars and most everyone is on a first name basis. No food! Which sucks they do have lots of free pretzels. The group beside me ordered Papa Johns Overall a good time for the wife and I to pop out of the crazy house and have some time away from the kids......... Oh they are only open until 9 pm but most everyone just hung out until 9 30 or ten no one was run off........
Wow I m going to try everything on that menu. My wife and I live in SH and could not wait for this place to open. We stopped in last night and got the Rib platter with a biscuit and collard greens. Everything was so good and the 1 2 rack was definitely enough for both of us. Looking fwd to going back. We ve needed a place like this for a long time .
Excellent food. We got the lamb kabobs very Smokey and tender! and the spicy noodles. Great amount of spice! Some reviews say that the service is terrible so we were fairly warned. You just have to flag the girls down when you are ready to order and pay that s all. Help yourself to to the drinks in the fridge and they will add it to your bill. You re right Avi K. I should have reported it right away. I have removed it from my comment thank you .
Great home made food friendly family owned restaurant and good prices. What else do you need to know. Bring an appetite
One of the best places for Boba in the area. Not only do they have boba but they have pudding milk tea! Boba was cooked perfectly and the pudding was delicious. The milk tea that I had there was delicious and the boba was soaked in honey and brown sugar I believe. The place used to be Lollicup but I think they got a lot better after switching and losing the franchise. If you re looking for great tasting boba milk tea or even better pudding milk tea the Yes Cafe is hard to beat in the area.
This was our first time here and one of the employees told us how to order and their process of doing things. We ordered the avocado wrap and it tasted perfect! I would definitely go back and recommend this joint!
I just recently moved into my first official place a second story condo and was hoping to do wood tile as it s all the rage nowadays I ve heard. But alas tile was way too expensive to install and hello I ca not install that stuff myself. Ai not nobody got time fo dat. So after reading a bunch of awesome reviews here on Yelp I decided to contact Cosimo for some help hoping that he would have some great price on tile and the install for it. He responded super fast which I loved and came out to do an estimate for me! I had already kind of picked a tile out that I liked but after looking at it he did notice that there was some bowing going on which made sense since the tile was fairly inexpensive. He also pointed out that the install would be very expensive for tile and because I live on the second floor the tile would most likely not be completely flat. He suggested instead high end laminate which is just as durable looks more like natural wood and is much cheaper to install. I went to visit his store to see the options and he has a lot of nice options for laminate wood style floors! My family could not even the difference between the laminate and the real wood floors he had. I found one I absolutely loved and met all my criteria and his crew worked super fast. After ordering the wood he booked his crew to install the floor within a week and they got it done in 4 days! And it was amazing work! It was super beautiful and they did an exceptional job on the stairs as well. The only small thing I wish I had been warned about was that they would not leave everything exceptionally clean so there was a fine layer of dust on everything which was fine as it s not their job to be cleaners. He did offer to have them come out again and wipe everything down for me which was nice of him but I did not want to impose. So just know if you re getting your floors done make sure you put everything in storage or cover it if you do not want it to be dusty! Luckily I did not have anything really in the condo so I did not have to do that much cleaning but I could see it being a problem for people who already have things moved in. Overall I was super happy with my floors and everyone who s come to see it has told me it looks great. I feel like it has the charm of wood floors without the maintenance and I m all about things that are low maintenance. I was really happy with the great service the price and the speediness of the work.
Great place! Broke my phone today and they fixed my phone in less than half a hour! So happy! If you need anything for your phone this is the place to go.
Soyo Korean Barstaurant is great place to hang out and enjoy some Korean tapas and heartier fare. Like other Korean restaurants they also serve small complimentary side dishes like kimchi pickled radish and fish cake with your meal. They used to serve their cold tea in these tin bowls that kinda look like small dog bowls. They recently switched to tea cups but I have to admit I miss the novelty of drinking out of the tin bowl. It actually made the beverage seem more refreshing. Try to get seated in one of their booths. It s cozy and I like the feeling of being tucked away in my own little alcove. Soyo has a large menu and I ve enjoyed everything I tried so far. I gravitate towards items such as the gal bi jim beef stew in hotpot grilled mackerel and the dukbokki spicy rice cake . I ve only come here to eat but Soyo seems popular with the late night drinking crowd. Soju beer and some spicy good food? Sign me up!
Amazing! Loved it! So satisfied! Friendliest waitress ever! Whole staff was so sweet. I witnessed multiple servers practicing real kindness to guests. I felt completely at home. My wife recently went vegetarian. It s not always easy to find a totally vegan restaurant that I can eat with her at but I loved it. I was kind of timid and only ordered black bean hummus and a black bean chili stuffed sweet potato. They were great! I also had a bite of the chicken pot pie. We will be coming back again before we head home in two weeks.
This is my favorite lash place! Perfect long lasting beautiful lashes! Thy does an incredible job.
Update Some guy mis measured the turkey in my most recent sandwich. It was literally 3 4 less in the large sandwich than usually received. bad day. Mac and Cheese also an off day and please put some bags for take out onions near take out area tired of asking for them every visit. The place smells like smoke everywhere even in the restrooms which is a good thing. This appears to be a chain out of Kansas that somehow has one location in Phoenix. They play country music here but somebody needs to mention that we are not in Kansas anymore. As for food I have only tried the large Turkey sandwich 6.50 and both times the meat is great smoked and no fat of course. They use a mild bbq sauce which is sweet but you can put hot stuff on at the table. Grab your onions and pickles and you barely need a side. The mac and cheese has the edge over the curly fries right now. Fries are not greasy but mac and cheese is a personal side and this was nice and sticky style. Great turkey and fast service but everything is ala carte.
OH EM GEEEEEEEEE!!!! PEPPERMILL HAS THE BEST BREAKFAST IN VEGAS!!! The portions are huge and your food comes out pretty quickly. I have a pleasant experience every time I visit. The wait can get crazy so it is best to arrive early. I m not a fan of the mimosas I think they re too strong...not sweet enough. Something s off! When you come here they ll offer to take a picture of you while you re seated. Its free to take the picture but its costs to actually take the picture home which is not surprising! Cool place definitely try!!!
I ve been seeing other chiropractors for years both in Las Vegas and in other cities that I ve lived San Diego Kansas City etc . Dr. Noggle is definitely way up there on the quality chiropractic scale. So the back story is that I d had a car accident back in 1996. Some serious inoperable damage to my low back was the direct result but the indirect result was a slow and steady decline in various other areas like my hips shoulders and neck and a persistent weight problem because I m no longer able to get out and be active. I m 45 but often feel closer to 70 because of the almost constant pain. Now I saw my regular chiropractor I wo not give you his name! a few days ago and had absolutely no relief from pain. It was an 8 10 pain this time and I was flat on my back for days on end. I wanted to get back in to see him again but his office staff made me wait 3 additional days to get an appointment. I d finally had enough of waiting where I d likely get no relief anyway so I Googled for a chiropractor in my area that would take new patients and would not cost an arm and a leg. Luckily for me I found The Joint pretty quickly. As the British say they ticked all the boxes . Let me explain. There are no appointments so there s no waiting for a free time for the doctor you go in and if the doctor has a patient you wait there until you re seen. So far there s been no wait for me. Next there s a 19 introductory special offer on their website which was half what my regular guy charges for his wham bam thank you Sam treatment. Third Doc Noggle saw me listened to me and actually dealt with me in a unique way based on what was actually wrong with me I was not assembly lined on her table! Lastly they offer a 49 month membership that gives 4 visits at about 12.50 per visit which is an absolute steal and the wife signed up on the family plan to get hers at 39 month! OK on to the Doc. She s a bit on the young side which is not a problem but I was concerned that she d still be in the learning stage of her practice. I can assure you that she s satisfyingly well trained and does a better job than the much more experienced guy I d been seeing. I was also concerned that she might not have the strength to deal with me in the way that I needed I m a big guy and have a chronic low back problem that s tough for every chiropractor. Again I was wrong as she took an approach that I ve never seen before instead of just wrenching things back into place she took a slow and steady approach and did small light adjustments until everything was back where it should be. It was odd for me but really really worked well. To say that I m pleased is an understatement. To say that I m excited is as well. I saw Doctor Noggle 4 days ago and I ve been pain free and able to move the entire time and I ve never been able to say that about my regular chiropractor. She dramatically improved my weekend which I really needed and has given me fresh hope in chiropractic care. Instead of being 45 and feeling 70 today I m 45 and feeling 35 which is a good feeling indeed! So yes Doctor Noggle is utterly fantastic. Go see her make sure that she stays in business so that she can keep all of us in good health. I mean it. Go. Now. You will be very happy that you did!
I m pretty sure this place is open 24 7 and for that kind of restaurant it s pretty good. Decent selection quite fresh and everyone at the table were pretty satisfied with their dish. I ve had their granola which was excellent but it s pretty hard to go wrong with yogurt and granola and our friends had benedicts pancakes and omelettes and were pretty happy. Overall quite good nothing too creative or crazy but it tastes good.
I have not eaten at the restaurant and can only comment on their food for a company catered lunch. I was blown away with how fresh the food was. The green chili salsa was excellent. The meal was simple tacos and burritos. Maybe I was hungry but the black beans and rice were really really good I am a big fan of Carolina s in Phoenix but this was a step above. I will definitely be eating there again.
What a wonderful dining experience here and our server was great. Unfortunately my meal was just subpar. I had ordered fish and chips and the fish was soggy wish they were crunchier... my birthday cheesecake was AWESOME!!
The first time I visited Madison was for a job interview and my employer put me up in the Edgewater. Unfortunately I ca not recall my room having a lake view but the accommodations were pleasant and front staff helpful. After getting picked up at MSN in the Edgewater limo how pimp is that? I ducked into the bar for some late eats and to see what was going on. Strangely enough there were a gaggle of dentists in semi formal wear celebrating the end of a dentist convention. I did not stick around too long. Food and drinks good. Hotel good. 4 stars.
Very creative menu but not impressed with the quality of the eggs or hash browns. The burger was excellent and I drooled over the French toast passing by.
Wow! Great cheap food on the strip. 2 tacos on Tuesday even if that Tuesday is Christmas with fresh tasty ingredients. Lots of meat options and a few veggies ones too. Spicy salsa is spicy. And maybe I was lucky that day because they were out of many toppings but the ones I wanted sour cream jalapenos pico were available and tasty. And even though they sell frozen alcoholic drinks and beers there if you re careful you can go to the Walgreens or ABC nearby and pick up super cheap beer to go with your super cheep tacos!
My review is about the amazing lunch specials. I do not think there is a better deal for 2 slices and a drink out there. The pizza is great for how much you pay. Definitely a great spot for a quick cheap lunch.
My favorite Starbucks! Everyone is extremely friendly and my order is always consistent and correct! I come here 5 days a weeks and they never miss a beat and my mobile order is always ready. Thank you!
Unreal place to enjoy lamb chops service is out of this world hummus is the bomb no matter the flavor. Ca not wait to go back. Love this place and the atmosphere
Great service good wine decent food... The outdoor patio is one of the best. Enjoyed it.
They are undergoing a change to their rewards program be VERY careful that they moved your rewards over I am missing a LOT of drinks. The selections of coffee is good like that they have almond milk and a variety of sugar free syrups. They will also sell whole bottles of syrup which I really appreciate! Baked goods are usually fresh and I like that you can get plain oatmeal or jazz it up with certain toppings. Staff seems to turn over quickly which I dislike but they are typically friendly hipsters who take pride in making a great drink.
If you have never visited this gallery you are missing out on a wonderful experience. Gerald and Mary have been in the business for years here in Charlotte and I have had the pleasure of knowing them back to the time when they had there gallery on seventh street. I wo not go into a long description just click on their web site and take a look at the names of the artists that they represent and look at the work. This fine gallery sets the standard for all others in this area and Charlotte is truly fortunate that they are here.
I ca not believe I almost went my entire time at u of i without trying this place! The location in the student union makes it the perfect place to stop by in between classes or work shifts. There were several sandwich options presented in a create your own style. I ordered a toasted turkey sandwich on a croissant which was bigger and tastier than I expected it to be. The croissant was perfect warm flaky light and buttery. I was so full after the sandwich that I did not even have room for the chips I bought. As a poor student though the best part about this place was the low prices! I ll definitely be back for another turkey sandwich plus I still have not tried the ice cream.
We did not have the full dining experience because we ordered room service at the Hilton Garden Inn but the gentleman who took our order had personality for days and made the experience pleasant. Our food was ready quickly and arrived hot and fresh. We devoured the diovala pizza and enjoyed the fresh basil and spicy meat. Ca not wait to try the full experience next time but if you are looking for tasty thin crust pizza give this place a try!
The Cabana Room is exactly what I look for in a casual dinner place. The entrees are very reasonably priced at 5 9 and in addition to several good vegetarian options they allow you to replace any of the specialty burgers with veggie burgers. I had the vegetarian burger with roasted peppers and goat cheese a GREAT combination.
Okay so this was my reaction when I passed by the Betsey Johnson store recently OMG IT S HERE IT S HERE IT S HERE!!! Like many fashionistas I ve been awaiting Fashion Central with baited breath ever since I heard about it and I was even more excited when I head Betsey Johnson was coming to town! The boutique is adorable and the staff are super nice. They offered me cookies the first time I came in. The store is stuffed full of all sorts of great stuff floofy skirts and fuzzy grandma floral fur jackets and jumpsuits and colours galore! Betsey Johnson is known for her fun take on fashion and it is definitely present here. I m so happy for Calgary that we have something this wonderful here at last.
Staff that works early morning 6a 7 30a shift M F are all FANTASTIC! I am always greeted w a genuine warm smile by whoever happens to be cashiering. Their drinks are always made consistently good too! Side Note Personal Pet Peeve The family on vacation donned in shorts or the retirees also in shorts who take their sweet ass time at 6 45am ordering their drinks baked goods in front of me in line. They do a lot of squinting at the menu hemming and hawing over choices scratching their heads stepping back etc. NEWSFLASH There are working ppl who are on a time crunch for their commute step aside if ordering is too much for you! Thank you.
First off even before I talk about the food I just want to talk about the customer service Awsome!!! The young guy on the phone was so helpful and did not sound the least bit irritated as I had alot of questions He was very accommodating to everything I asked his answer was always Sure we can do that for you . They also give a discount to businesses in the area as well as deliver for free in the surrounding areas even if it s just a few Boba s. I have never even met this guy but it was so refreshing dealing with a genuinely helpful nice person in the food service industry!!! Now to the food and drink Hella Cool is what comes to mind Fried Squid Balls Tuna Rice Balls Yakisoba French Fries Butter Brick Toast Avocado Slush You see what did I tell ya and Hella Yummy too... Now there were some misses for me The Barbecue Pork in the Bento Box was a tad bit too dry and could have been flavored more and it was the first time I ever had a Jelly Frosty drink It was best described as a Gummy Bear drink too much jelly stuff so much that I could not even enjoy the mango juice it was in. Even with that said the customer service the cool snacks and drinks all compensate for the misses and I still have so many other items to try. The location puts a smile on my tummy nothing cool is around here except for Retro Bakery . I ca not wait to try the Curry French Fries Mango Slush Mochie Ice Cream Popcorn Chicken Shrimp Oh Boy this place can really ruin a girl s diet....
I came back again and got the crispy duck OMG SO GOOD!!!!!! The duck is cooked perfectly MUST GET THIS DISH. I think it s the best one. In Summary Note the store hours they are closed in between lunch and dinner Cab ride from airport is about 44 and it is also impossible to get a cab back have to call Order CRISPY DUCK CHICKEN PAD THAI CURRY ROAST DUCK Bonus garlic prawns are pretty good too Warning You will have dreams about this place and coming back....I miss it
Husband and I stayed here and were quite happy with it. The rates were cheap and the rooms are so clean and modern. I am surprised that some people have reviewed this hotel as low as they did. Their complaints I saw nothing of during our stay. The location could not be any more perfect. It is so centrally located we walked everywhere! Great places to shop and eat all around the Linq. Everyone is so nice and we will definitely be returning guests.
One of my favorite hotels Top resort Away from the Vegas madness but also very close to everyone The real secret of the strip Rooms could be upgraded But pool and service Makes it the best
The waffles are light amd fluffy best waffles I ve ever had! The eggs benedict was delicious I like the meals come salad and fruit instead of greasy sides perfect balance of flavors
Some friends and I went to Blueberry Hill late one night and order a wife variety of entrees steak dinner pancakes breakfast skillet cheeseburger and various other items . Everything was very good and so cheap! The steak was tender and cooked perfectly. The pancakes were phenomenal I had apple cinnamon . The portions were large and the coffee was great too. Our only complaint was the service. Once we got our food we did not get visited by our waiter for a very long time. We needed refills on our drinks and it took forever. We could not even flag down our waiter to get help. I recommend going for the food despite the service but I warn you to be prepared for mediocre service. You may want to order two of your drink or a carafe just in case.
I remember when I was a kid my dad used to take us to Johnny s on the occasional Saturday. He used to grab a bunch of burgers and we d open the trunk of the van and have a little picnic. GOOD TIMES. Nothing has changed here If you check out the pictures you feel as you ve been transported back in time. I kinda like that and nothing has really changed in terms of pricing. You can get a really decent meal here for under 10. I would say this beats every chain burger place like McDonalds and Burger King. I ordered the Banquet Burger which is a 4oz patty with cheese and bacon. With over 2 million burgers sold this place is still doing things the old school way. I obviously had to order Fries and Onion Rings. An older guy who s been there forever asked me what I would like on my burger classic options only ketchup mustard onion and pickles. I took my to go container to the car unwrapped my burger and it was really like going back in time. The bun was super soft the meat was very juicy and soft and the toppings were all fresh. The fries were okay but the Onion rings had a great crunch to it which I liked. This is not some gourmet burger shop so do not except a triple AAA patty but the quality of everything surpasses any other fast food joint for burgers. Give it a try! Keep Eating Angela
Pizza is amazing! Has that smokey flavor that you get only when made in a stone oven with wood chips. We had the daily special which was a spicy salami with maple pizza. The pizza was extra thin crust and cut into four pieces. The center was thin and juicy and sides were crispy and chewy. We also had a side of the flank steak skewers that were quite good but the bread that was part of the skewer was a bit burnt. Overall the flavors were nice and definitely worth returning for a second visit.
Awesome food with great atmosphere.. We tried the cheese curds Mediterranean small bread Clearwater garden sandwich tortellini spinach with creamy pesto and strawberry walnut salad with raspberry vinaigrette.. everything was just so fresh and light. Our waitress Grace was too sweet and nice to answer all our questions and give recommendations.. do try the new Glarus beer spotted cow .. overall a nice place to stop by and grab a quick bite.
Really good noodles and soup also really friendly customer service the Friday special is my favourite
I ve been going to this Cawthra and Lakeshore icon for milkshakes and banana splits since the 80s though it s been around a lot longer. You ca not think of the Dairy Cream without thinking hot summer nights long lines of people hanging out the door cars and loud stereos and sticky ice cream droplets all over your hands clothes and car interior. I remember as a kid hearing my parents talk about how it was slowly declining in quality and service since their teenaged years and in the last 4 or 5 years I ve been singing the exact same song a slow nostalgia death might just be part and parcel of its allure because no matter how much I m convinced its just not what it used to be I always find myself back there again each summer slurping down a great shake. There was a time when the counter was over flowing with banana bunches for the splits and the shakes and while that amazing display is gone you can still get a real banana mixed into your favorite shake flavors but make sure to specify you want a REAL banana. A few times in the recent past they ve squirted some nasty ass banana flavoring into the mix which is a mortal sin . My favorites are mint chocolate chip shakes or chocolate marshmallow shakes or strawberry raspberry banana shake they HATE making that last one with the three ingredients but it s so good! You can also get anything else imaginable that s made with ice cream. Including to go cakes! sweet! literaly!
Great smoothies and super friendly service. It is always very clean. The smoothies are all made fresh love stopping by after my workout.
So happy we came in here on a chilly Sunday. Fresh taste every flavor compliments the next all around great dining experience. Will be back for sure!
The MGM Skylofts are simply the best of the best of Vegas. If you are looking for first class treatment and first class accommodations the the Sky Loft is for you. From the Rolls Royce that picks you up to the entire staff greeting you upon arrival to the unbelievable room service and in room dining there is no better in Vegas. I would like to thank the entire staff for a wonderful stay and I d like to thank the MGM for the unbelievable room and for creating an offering like the Sky Lofts. Believe me... I ll be back. 5 Stars.
This restaurant is really cool especially for an on campus restaurant! I do not think I ve ever been to an on campus restaurant that actually brings the food to your table. It s also really cool that they use locally sourced ingredients. I will say that the options on the day I visited did not really speak to me...but I ordered teriyaki glazed salmon with fried rice and still managed to clean my plate. I think that for a college campus where presumably students are trying to eat healthy some nutrition facts about the food would be a good addition. I ve seen that at other college campuses and it can be helpful. Otherwise nice job to ASU for a creative spin on campus dining.
The seasonal Offensive Tanooki is my favorite by far. My husband really enjoys the black mage which is funny because he does not like coffee but it has cocoa beans!
My burger melted in my mouth! I ordered the el diablo and we all shared zucchini fries sweet potato fries as well as onion rings. So very tasty. I had a glass of chardonnay and although everything was cooked to perfection this place would have gotten five stars if it were not too expensive for everything ordered. Not to mention the hostess forgot to give us kids menus and were not brought to us till it was time to go. We basically just had to ask if they served kid burgers no big deal. But we will be back next time we are craving melt in your mouth burgers. Oh and happy hour looks like a great time to fill up on wine and food for the best prices.
Like this place. Food is PRETTY good which is why 4 stars drinks and service is 5 stars for sure not too pricey by any means. The patio is great! The firepit is lavarock or something similar and really nice.
They sell everything from bobypins to birds to fish to toy trains and planes! they have a wonderful candy selection too!
The Gluten Free French toast is where it s at! Love Luci s!
The food and service were impecable! Roger our server went above and beyond. We had great conversation with him he was extremely helpful and he had great club insight! We enjoyed every second of our dinner.
This is some pretty good Pho. Did not want to drive all the way to Chinatown anymore since I live closer to this area now....and thanks to Yelp I may have found my go to Pho restaurant. I m a creature of habit so I ve been ordering Pho Tai since them early high school days. Either that or some kind of Vermicelli bowl....depending on my mood. Pho Tai is good here....although...I ve got to say they give you wayyyyy tooo much noodles and not enough beef. I probably got like 5 slices of beef? Is that normal here? 7.50 for a small bowl and I think 8.50 for a large bowl? For an appetizer we got the summer roll. It was my boyfriend s first time eating that and he loved it!!!! You get two rolls...each cut in half. Very light and refreshing.
Always yummy!! I had the green chili pork omelette with breakfast potatoes. Very happy!!
It s a trap! Admiral Ackbar. Stoners beware! This block of West Flamingo is dangerous. Enter at your own risk. There are medical marijuana dispensaries on both sides of this Sonic Drive Thru. Check out the video! They sell you pot knowing damn well you are going to get the munchies. They know you re going to end up next door at Sonic. By the time you finish your feast you need to burn again. Back to the dispensary. It s an endless loop. Stoners check in but they never check out. Mikey C says m kay?
I love shawarma and this place ... it hits the spot. The food is really fresh and despite being a fast food it is not greasy and they use quality products. The staff is really nice and the prices are spot on. I really hope this place sticks around it s a welcome addition to the neighbourhood. Try it!
I LOVE this place. Relaxed atmosphere friendly staff and the food is so good with plenty of vegetarian and vegan options the southern fried tofu sandwich is SO GOOD and the coffee is delicious and plentiful. Good place to meet someone for a chat or just come to hang out and read.
As my main man Randy Jackson would say Yo DOG that was OFF THE HOOK! We actually had a shitty table but this was one of the funniest nights I ve had in recent memory. Possibly because of the people I was with but Tryst was one of the most awesome intimate clubs I ve ever been to. Went on a Thursday night which is supposedly Industry Night and had a blast. Great service lots of shots lots of dancing and we made lots of great memories.
We are at a yoga training and ordered wraps and salads to go. They delivered everyone s meals and drinks and we were all happy. Everyone has something different but each item was pleasing. I ordered portobello wrap YUMMY
Recently bought a dozen cupcakes last week and all were delish!!! We will be coming back again!
Two words best describe this place Duck Tacos! That did not do it for you? Let me try two other words for you Lamb Tacos! Are you kidding me? Lamb tacos and Duck Tacos? This place is the bomb! I love it here! And the street Corn they serve here is super delicious. I am a fan! Do not ever change.
This is such a delicious laid back restaurant! The food is phenomenal and affordable. You MUST get the steamed pork buns. They are fluffy pillows of goodness. Pros Great atmosphere Speedy service received an appetizer and our meal within 10 minutes of sitting down at our table YUMMY food easy to street park outside outside seating in warmer months BYOB with ONLY A 50 cent cork fee you actually ca not beat it tables large enough for big groups bathrooms are clean your food is steaming hot every single time I ve always seen children here eating the food so I imagine they have good child options Neutral They take their spice seriously it is a smaller building but I think this helps them give great service and fresh food CASH ONLY Cons No reservations Long wait times when you go at peak times My boyfriend and I like to go in the afternoon for lunch and we NEVER wait to sit down. Occasionally we have gone for dinner and while there are long wait lines they allow you to begin drinking your wine while you wait AND it is totally worth it. As you can tell I m pretty obsessed with this place. It is so yummy! TRY IT!
The shawarma fries are the best! The meat is soooooooo awesome! Ca not wait to try their other dishes
LOVE this place! The staff is quite funny. The pastries from La Bamboche and they baked them onsite at Fahrenheit daily!! are more than great. The coffee is one of a kind. They are the first and only coffee shop that offers customers to choose the beans for espresso which is really cool. I can pick the flavor depending on my mood. Also they change the beans from time to time so you get to try different stuff.
Nothing but good things to say. Phenomenal service and good fish. Rolls not only taste good but show the attention to detail. Get the Screaming O and baked dynamite appitizer. For nigiri the garlic tuna is very good and the seared tuna as well. My go to spot with the girlfriend.
Professionnels et artistes ! Un salon accueillant tout le personnel aux petits soins wowww! Bravo
This restaurant is decorated super cute a little crowed but looks very clean!! As soon as I walked in I was helped. Everyone working was very kind to me. I ordered shrimp cocktail and it was delicious I definitely recommend this place to anyone
I am new to the Charlotte area. I had a lot of skepticism about allowing a new person do my hair. It was after the snowstorm so the hairdresser was booked and I spent most of the day in the salon. Sharon let me know on a normal basis that would not be the case. However I left happy and satisfied. I received a relaxer dye and my ends trimmed all for an amazing cheap price. The atmosphere was very professional and Sharon and the ladies make you feel like a part of the family! I would recommend this place to anyone. I HAVE FOUND MY NEW STYLIST!
Went to the Keg for my husbands birthday. Our server was Brian and was very attentive and informative. I asked him many detailed questions regarding the menu and he was very knowledgeable and helped me decide. I finally decided on the Rib steak and it did not disappoint and my husband decided on the prime rib yummy. We asked for European service slow and it was a perfect romantic evening. It was restaurant week so Appetizer baked garlic shrimp wonderful and we took his advice and dipped the bread into the sauce yummy and for desert Spanish Coffee a nice touch.
The bottom line is the rib eye was the best I ve had in 20 years seriously. I ve been to the finest steak houses all over the country and only a couple of them served me a rib eye as delicious and perfectly cooked as I received at Vic and Anthony s. This is only the second time I ve been compelled to write a positive review on Yelp. I usually use Yelp to find ethnic and other interesting restaurants but this time I used it to find a good steak house and I was pleased to see the reviews were accurate. We were a little worried about leaving our beautiful hotel on the strip to go to the Golden Nugget for dinner but after reading the Yelp reviews we had to take a chance. I told my wife not to worry because we were not going to be hanging out in the Golden Nugget just eating at the restaurant inside. First I was surprised that the Golden Nugget had been remodeled to pretty high standards. Second Vic and Anthony s makes a very nice initial impression and it frankly it does not really matter what casino it s located in because you ll only see it coming and going.
After an awesome trip to Taliesen West my two friends and I found Flo s. The decor is a little strange with some cultural posters such as a series of pictures of women standing next to a plane during wartime interspersed with poorly designed posters such as one of the word stir fry superimposed onto a picture of raw broccoli. The menu is your typical pan Asian menu so I had low hopes but the food turned out really great! I got the Thai Basil Chicken which came with lots of vegetables which I like and a scrumptious side salad. I also thought the wonton chips that came with each lunch order were delightfully quirky and delicious. All in all it was a fun experience made even better by the great company I had.
This was just lovely. There is nothing like relaxing in comfort while waiting for your flight to come along. The staff inside are all very friendly and provide VIP treatment. The bar serves large complimentary cocktails along with your complimentary dinner buffet which was SCRUMPTIOUS! Plenty of outlets to charge up your phones and laptops while lounging on very comfy couches benches tables you name it whatever is your fancy.
AMAZING PIZZA! Beats Queen Margarita in Leslieville hands down. This place should be mobbed! The pizza is just as they serve it in Rome. We ordered the regina margerita and the parmgiana pizzas. Both were unbelievably delicious and we re totally food snobs. We also had the arugula salad which was really tasty and served with a heaping side of really nice quality parm. We will definitely be back. Wanted to spread the word about this adorable pizzeria!
The atmosphere was great we were in and out in an hour on Saturday night. Table side guacamole was great it would have been nice to have a choice of spice hot level. The Birdsong Jalapeo APA American Pale Ale was a great beer it is a full body beer with a hint of pepper that fads away making it easy to drink. My wife got the house margarita frozen and said it was one of her favorites.
We love this dentist office! I have had very bad luck and experiences with dentists and hygienists and this office made me feel comfortable. They are very knowledgeable if you have any questions and we ve actually referred multiple people here for procedures like root canals pulling teeth fillings and routine cleanings and all of them have loved it as much as we do.
The customer service was extraordinary on an evening during spring training. And the food was delivered fresh which you expect from a sushi restaurant and they trumped it! My first review that I ve done on Yelp and they deserve our accolades!
I know this place is considered old Vegas and it s off the strip location limits it somewhat but I love the Hilton! I guess I am a little partial to this place because of all the good memories I ve had here the past decade. My father racked up a bunch of Hilton Honors points when he was traveling for work and so we would always stay here for free or close to free. Granted the casino and hotel are outdated and the size of the casino itself is a bit small table games . Also there is no poker room. But there is an awesome Benihana here where you actually have to take an elevator up to the dining room. There is also one of the best sports books in all of Vegas here as well it s listed separately on Yelp so check out the reviews if you re a sports bettor . This last time we just visited for a couple of hours. There has always been a bit of a ghetto crowd here but this time it seemed more pronounced. It was mostly around the side casino though where the old Star Trek exhibit used to be. However the main casino and everything else were the same as before. The Las Vegas Hilton is home to many good times with my Pops and cousin who would visit from Germany just to go to Vegas. Basically if you are not too high maintenance and do not mind hanging out off the strip you will have a good time at the Hilton. p.s. this hotel is owned by Resorts International but has kept the Hilton name and still honors Hilton Honors points pps. the Las Vegas Hilton is the site of the famous Navy Tailhook scandal Google it
I started coming here about three months ago and now I come here all the time . I ve been to a lot of nail salons been looking for a place since I moved here two years ago. Cathy has truly been the best so far . Sometimes they Close the store early if they are not busy or open a little later on weekends so just call first to make an appointment and they will always make time for you . Cathy makes sure you get what you want she s very precise when she does nails . Salon could use some more technicians working though.
Considering this one is located in Meadows there is decent and plenty selection here! It s organized and clean and the associates are friendly and helpful. Enough fitting rooms in the back and they re private enough to sneak your lovey in....not that we did that but....
The waiter was extremely friendly and attentive the beer selection was good but not fantastic the food was quite good. The lobster roll was really good and so was the corned beef sandwich. I d recommend picking on of those specials they have where you choose the type of meat and bread and the you make your own sandwich. The price was on the high side but i believe they run special happy hours regularly so if you do not mind the crowd you can go there during those times.
Beautiful club beautiful people! I had the BEST time here. We got a table bottle service and I highly recommend it since XS is one of the top clubs in Vegas right now. It s just easier not to become separated from your group no need to fight the lines with others to get a drink at the bar and I was pretty impressed with how fast and often they would come and check up on us. Music is mainly house and truthfully I m not much of a fan for the house techno genre but XS just made it So.Much.Fun! They would play a hip hop song here and there but it was in very short spurts. The dance floor was packed! And I love how the bathrooms girls bathroom had VS fragrances lotions and such to use. Minus 1 star due to the fact they would not let my cousin in with a temp legit ID aka they re super strict so you ve been warned!
There s a nice patio if anybody is interested? Not that I ve ever seen people eat by the patio before. It is a Chinese restaurant after all. However I must say this place is doing quite well! Considering there s not that many decent Chinese restaurants around Yonge Major Mac this is our go to restaurant whenever we are around the area and we enjoy it. We were also there on a Wednesday night around 9 and there were still lots of people which is good for them! This place does open till 11. Been here for lunch and dinner. We usually order the spicy clams although it is hit or miss because sometimes a lot of the shells may be empty congee because how can you not have congee at Mr. Congee or fried rice noodles for lunch and many other things from the menu. The nice thing about this place is there are lots of options to choose from.
Wow...love the build your own burger concept..love even more that the quality of the burgers. Ordered cheese fries and the wings oh the wings were awesome. Love the choices for the burger toppings and the service was great.
Solid place to grab breakfast. We had a good meal with quality ingredients. I had the Veg d Out Omelet and they happily made it as a scramble for me upon request. My boyfriend ordered the French Toast Monte Cristo. He said it was a unique dish with a lot of different flavors. I also liked that the had flavored coffee creamers at the table. Our server was very sweet and helpful. We will definitely come back here next year.
I ve been a real estate agent for over 9 years have worked with at least 25 different inspectors in the valley ... and this is the FIRST time I ve ever reviewed an inspector. As you know there are many different types of personalities people out there and some are very difficult to please no matter what you do. I have that buyer that is never satisfied with anyone or anything and this was our 4th home we put an offer on. I had to go with the best and thank goodness I did. George was so detailed and answered all the crazy wacky questions my buyer would ask. George stayed calm and professional ... where I was ready to lose it! After spending 2 LONG YEARS with this buyer this is the first time he did not complain and actually seemed happy! Good job George!!
I like Yogurtlands flavors so I m a fan generally. This location at least when I visited is bustling for a winter day compared to other locations. Good for them but a bit annoying as this place is crawling with oblivious children and teens. It could be they are running a stamp card special for the holidays. 3stamps get 3oz free then you keep your card and when you hit 6 stamps 12oz free. Make sure to grab one! Plus of this location is its near a lot of restaurants so easy to do dinner and then dessert.
Fun atmosphere. The food is not the best. Lots of games to choose from. Would not suggest going on a date there. More of a group thing to have fun.
I heard so much reviews about the buffet here. The hotel tries to cater a lot to California people. They also have a 5 off on your buffet when you show your California ID at the cashier. We decided to try out the breakfast buffet. As we walked to the counter the lady asked us how many people in out party. The breakfast buffet is regularly 10.99 but after we showed our California ID she took off 5 which was awesome for the buffet. How can you beat a 5.99 breakfast buffet. Breakfast was good but what I liked especially was the omelet bar. Will try this place for lunch when i go out to Vegas again.
Small tight place but the food makes it up for it where the fish taco was AMAZINGLY and their homemade chips with salsa.
So bad that it s good. Steak egg and cheese biscuit should be my morning ritual. But I wo not even though I want to. It seems that I can smell the buttery biscuit from miles away and I refrain from making it a habit. You know you can pre order an entire fried turkey and sides during the holidays right? Look into it. While I have not personally ordered one I ve eaten some and well it was pretty darn good.
This restaurant is really a very good one. I discovered it on internet. I went on a Sunday afternoon. The place is very cute and welcoming. The personnel is kind and involved. I ordered as starter a Mediterranean salad and as main course a Lamb Shank I was told that it s prepared during eight hours . I was not disappointed all was great and very tasty made of fresh ingredients. I definitely recommend this places. I ll come back.
Their chicken katsu is so bomb must try! Juicy on the inside and super crispy on the outside. The tonkatsu sauce drizzled on top is so delicious I wish they had it on the side to dip P Pork katsu was not bad too however I d pick the chicken over it just because the chicken is more tender and juicy. Taro chips were also good very addicting but oily. Overall a pretty good experience great service fairly quick and big portions imo. I love how they make it on the spot so everything is freshly cooked. Would love to try their seafood pancake and bulgogi next time.
Pleasantly surprised at this hotel the room was updated and clean. The bedding and pillows were very comfortable. We had a room by the pool which was overhauled and the water is now blue! Steve is the maintenance man who is very friendly and never seems to stop. The breakfast was great! No complaints!
I wrote an earlier review 2.5 years ago that was not good but now that I m about to have my 2nd baby and have been seeing Dr Bartell here my opinion is totally different. This is a wonderful Dr s office. I would recommend this office to anyone having a baby.
I do not know why I always shop around bc I know Pruitts will have the best price. I wish they had a better website.
LOVE LOVE LOVE this mountain! Parking for both trails i ve hiked on are a little tight. Echo Canyon Trail off of Tatum and McDonald is pretty hard. The parking lot used to be super small and if you had a bigger car then your luck of finding a parking spot was very slim. I ve hiked that trail twice and I will tell you now if you re just getting into hiking I do not recommend hiking Echo Canyon trail! There is a ton ton of steps to get up the mountain and then when the steps end it is all uphill where you have to climb pretty moderate small rocks to even to get to the first look out point. Getting down is even harder. The parking lot is currently being worked on so you ca not even hike that trail right now so hopefully when they re done with all of the construction the parking lot will be bigger than before! The other trail Cholla Trail off of McDonald and Invergordon is way easy! Piece of cake! The first time I hiked this trail And have not hiked before that in 1 year I made it to the first look out spot very flat spot in 5 minutes. That s how easy it is. To get to it you have to park on Invergordon road which requires to you to parallel park to either get in a spot or get out and the line of cars can get very long! You have to walk up a big hill street up Cholla St. which is a pretty big hill and almost can be a workout. But after you get up that the trail has a little steep part and then half of it is literally flat. Which is easy and prepares you for the little more of a steeper part of the trail. It s easy to get up but is a very good workout! I definitely recommend Cholla Trail because it is the easier trail on Camelback Mountain and easy for first time hikers!
If it were ever possible to love a brick and mortar building and all its contents in a legally significant way I would chose this one. Their beer is beyond anything and when they combine thier expertiese with another brewery the result is of a Gotenks like magnitude. Just amazing FUUUU SIIIIION HAAAA. The GM Jason is incredibly welcoming knowledgable and savvy about brew. Their food is accessible but elevated things like poutine burgers AND most importantly meat candy. Their bacon appetizer glazed in chile and sriracha is the most amazing thing I ve ever noshed. We had two flights that spanned only half of their beet menu and nothing on it was less than perfection. Some were from other local breweries but most were from their back room. I had many pints of their stout called Morning Sex and it is EVER BIT as good as its namesake. Other winners include thier Peach IPA which is a beer you want to order as soon as you get word of it. They do not print it on their menu because it is so popular. Kegs are drained in 2 hours they report. The flights are served in brass knuckle holders with each brew in a beaker. Its all academic and I want to transfer my credits from college as soon as I can.
The pizza is good..the crust is said to be made fresh daily.. Definitely true. It is perfect thickness.. Not to thick not to thin..cooked just right. The sauce is amazing. Sauce is the first thing I look for in a pizza. Delivery was fast and food was hot and fresh. The hot wings were not what I expected they were a smoky hot and you can see the flavor of peppers and spices. O was expecting a buffalo style hot being from NY. But they were still good. They paired well with then delicious homemade ranch. I m pretty picky about what and where I eat so when I travel i try to stick to chains so I know what to expect. I looked up a few different places in the area and I m glad we choose to come here. I ll be ordering again when I return to Pittsburgh!
finally got the chance to check out this place after my husband told me about it. I can honestly say these were the best tcos I ve had in a while! I got 3 steak tacos with rice and beans and loaded it up myself with their self serve salsa bar. Everything tasted fresh and its very cool eating while they grill right in front of you. I will definitely be back here!!
Hands down my favorite casual dining restaurant in all of Gilbert. In fact all of Arizona. Their menu is diverse and each item is absolutely delicious. The wait time my be pretty long over the weekend as it tends to attract large groups but it is absolutely worth the wait. All their food tastes fresh and amazing and you can tell they put a lot of care and attention into what they cook and how they cook it. The staff always seem friendly and happy to take your order. The atmosphere is also fantastic as they have outdoor seating with an amazing peaceful view. I also recommend the little coffee shop that is located next to the restaurant. Overall just an amazing place to grab some amazing food with friends and family.
I had urgent issue that need to be addressed these guys are awesome and help me very professionally and economical way. Definitely considering for my next project
I just moved into Henderson from Arkansas. I needed to bring my 4 runner to check low tire pressure. When I brought my 4 runner it was 6 25 PM and unfortunately the service portion of the store was closed. However Doug listened my concern attentively and contacted the service department immediately. David from service department was still working at that time even though they close at 6 PM. They both went above and beyond and I am very happy with the quality of service that I received.
Food and service incredible. Will be back for breakfast any chance I get! The crepes out of this world
I do not like warm sandwiches at all but I do like Earl of Sandwich. I went here with my friends for lunch and I ordered because the group decided to eat here. To make a long story short I loved my sandwich! I highly recommend this place. My only disappointment is that you ca not add avocado to your sandwich.
Damn! I do not know how better to start off this review. Just had dinner there tonight for the first time after wanting to try a new place and reading the yelp reviews. I am so happy I went and tried this place. When I first walked in we were greeted by the friendly staff. We sat at the bar and the gentleman asked us for our drink order. Being a big fan of beers my attention was quickly drawn to the cooler. I noticed they had some unique craft beers that I ve never seen before which is a surprise in a sushi restaurant anyways but i was sold on a Japanese beer that I ve never before great beer by the way forgot the name but has a white label almost looks like a sake bottle and a craft of lychee sake which had to been some of the best I ve had! The the gentleman went on to explain some of the popular items on the menu such as the sashimi rolls short rib etc. After we ordered a couple of recommendations we met the owner John as well as some of his other chefs. Do yourself a HUGE favor when you go put the menu away when you look at it and let John and his crew hook you up!!! I ca not describe how epic the dishes where they were creating for us. And do not worry prices here are VERY reasonable!!! We ate a ton majority off the menu with lots of booze and our bill was about 100. The short rib is an absolute must and hands down the best on the planet. They braise it for 8 hours and glaze it in a homemade veal stock. The fish is so fresh no cloudiness or weird texture. Just really amazing and everything is made in the restaurants from sauces to deserts. I can go on and on about Soho but you have to go. I went based on a yelp review and I m so glad I did. Hopefully you ll have an opportunity to experience this culinary marvel as well!!! Happy Eatings!!!
Considering that I ve been living in Beechview for 5 months now I m a tad embarrassed that I had not visited Brew on Broadway until today. Lively quaint hospitable and bookish BoB sits a block away from my trolley stop and is within walking distance from my house! This afternoon before lunch and a trip to the supermarket Kay and I each came in for a quick pick me up. Not being a coffee drinker I instead chose a velvety gently steaming cup of hot cocoa got deja vu? see my reviews for Beaver Valley Coffee and Tea Co. and espresso a mano that was garnished with chocolate syrup and homemade whipped cream. The whipped cream which was piped on via a gleaming silver dispenser cut the sweetness just enough to make the warm beverage both refreshing and indulgent. Confectionery equilibrium was achieved. The mondo chocolate chip cookie had a bizarre cornmeal texture and flavor that took me a few bites to appreciate. I did something with the cookie that I had not done in far too many years I dunked it into the hot cocoa which made it taste like a drowned biscotti or tiramisu. Oh to be a child again. I can see BoB becoming our spot and am glad to see this business survive in a neighborhood that struggles with nuisance bars. My single complaint is that unlike its Brookline twin the excellent Cannon Coffee BoB does not seem to offer any savory dishes. Kay and I were somewhat disappointed that not even sandwiches were listed on the chalkboard. BoB might become very popular with the local commuters that catch the T daily if they sold breakfast sandwiches and other wholesome portable morning items. I m hoping to remain in Beechview for a spell and hope Brew on Broadway does the same. Beechview needs this business supposedly Brew s profits are pumped back into the community and in turn Brew needs your business. What Beechview does not need is more bars with cokeheads and riff raffs stumbling in and out at all hours. Let s keep that from happening by drinking more coffee.
You ca not go wrong wherever you sit! It s not the cheapest tickets around but it certainly is worth it. I ve seen almost all of the Cirque du Soleil shows and La Reve is certainly up there with all of them. The visual is stunning and most of the time I m overwhelmed by where to look because there is so much going on! If you can fork out the or lucky enough to get tix for free do not miss it!
I went during the week for lunch and the price was just as comparable to any of buffet. The only reason it enticed me was the fact that aria is a new hotel. The food was good and there was a wide variety and it was nice and bouggie but... it was okay overall. There is nothing different from all the other buffets I feel. they had crab legs for lunch and a cool dessert bar... but what buffet does not for that price?
After being in this valley more than 25 years I have really grown to appreciate the Walking Trails in Peccole Ranch. As a Realtor I am usually out playing tour guide showing many of the communities Las Vegas has to offer. Peccole Ranch is usually on the list of places we visit. Being and older community the huge trees offer relief and solace to a point you would think you were somewhere else in the country entirely. The miles of trails offer great exercise for your morning walk or detailed work out on your daily regiment. Disc Golf within the trails is a great way to spend many hours getting out with family and friends. There are also plenty of picnic areas if that is more your speed. I highly recommend this community to many of my clients for its very unique walking trails that are not like anything else you will find in Las Vegas
This place was insane. My compadre got a MASSIVE sage fried chicken and waffles.....biggest I ve ever seen. I m not sure the herb was sage though might have been rosemary . Other than the possible herb mix up I was very impressed. The breading was very good shoutout to corn flakes and paired perfectly with the waffles did I mention they were filled with bacon? No I did not . The waffles had bacon in them. Amazing. My simple healthy egg white scramble with bacon looked inferior compared to the tower of chicken that was in front of it.
I loooooooove this place. Only been to Cora s twice but loved it. I had the 1990s Harvest during my first visit and was so impressed with the amount and quality of fruits on that dish. Then on my second visit I had the Blessing Banquet which again impressed me. The only problem is that I love the 1990s Harvest so much that I might just order it again every time I m there.
Good Pho I like that you have a few choices on whats going in the soup.
We went before a Pens game and the place was packed! Good pizza burgers and sandwiches before a PPG Paints Arena event. We had 5 kids with us. Pizzas burgers tuna tacos nachos breadsticks fried green tomatoes all good.
Christina was amazing!!! She was extremely friendly and helpful. Even though she had other tables and was very busy she made it a point to check on us and make sure our experience was great. I would definitely come back. The service and food was wonderful. Thanks christina!
I ve used multiple services haircuts massages wedding hair up do full make up for wedding day and have been thrilled with every experience! Everyone has always been so kind and friendly and sometimes there s even an adorable dog there to greet you. I m so happy I found Element every visit is relaxing and of high quality service. Also this is an Aveda spa and everything smells amazing!
Just got my plasma installed by jake....top of the line insallment..really recommend who ever wants to get a plasma install..great clean work and on time...hard working man never backs down...
I tried almost all the Indian restaurant in GTA Toronto but the place s food is so good economical and service is also nice. So 4 stars for all.
Un vrai petit paradis en plein milieu de la ville. J ai eu un peu de difficult trouver le bon stationnement parce qu il y a plusieurs autres attractions similaires et autant attrayantes dans le coin mais une fois au bon endroit les fleurs les beaux arbres et mme le dcor de difices m ont tout de suite fait relaxer. J y tais pour un vnement spcial et les employs avec qui j ai eu interagir ont t vraiment utiles et courtois quand j tais perdue. Il y a certains endroits du jardin qui sont l intrieur et de grands espaces extrieurs aussi. Au cours de l anne diffrentes expositions y prennent place. Ma favorite celle des papillons au printemps. La raison pour l toile qui manque est simplement parce qu il me semble que a serait bien d avoir un accs gratuit aux jardins extrieurs.
Skyline is always a winner for lunch and dinner. Some stores have counter ordering. Some have waitresses. I prefer a waitress. The chili is served on spaghetti with a pile of shredded cheese. Oh so good! The best part is the oyster crackers you can munch on. If you want you can purchase cans of the meat sauce which we do and take on a vacation or give as a gift.
Ambiance Most will find this to be a more modern torta restaurant compared to a traditional torta joint. It has flat screens menus to order from tablets for payment and a open air kitchen. It s a medium sized restaurant with 13 tables inside and 4 tables outside. I would say it s on the large size for your typical torta place. Very clean and well cared for. Pan Dulce and helados sold here as well. Patrons are of all ages and backgrounds. This is a well established torta franchise in the Valley for the past decade. Food Tortas most popular here but I went with the fish tacos. Pretty damn good! Cabbage was fresh fish was lightly breaded and slightly spicy. Try the Mangoneadas a delicious frozen mango pulp with a slightly spicy chamoy red glaze . Price With it being modernized I was worried prices would be inflated but they are totally fair. Overall A great torta taco restaurant with a traditional backbone but modern touches.
P and M Pizza is awesome. The Original P and M is unique to this area. It has some crazy cheese blend that is really tasty. It s worth trying. If you do not like the Original P and M you should try the New York Style pizzas. Their NY Style is some of the best pizza I ve had in the area and I ve had a lot of pizza from the best in the Burgh.
We got a case of growlers for our wedding. Everyone loved both ciders that we chose. The owner was super helpful to us and even personalized each growler with our names and our wedding date. She also gave us a great discount. We got a percentage off for buying a case and then a percentage off because it was for our wedding.
I am extremely glad that I found this office on Yelp! Dr. was gentle in examining the painful area in my mouth and the whole posh team was super friendly and playful. The atmosphere there was fun and inviting. After visiting my regular dentist because I was in pain the night before I left his office feeling hopeless and in more pain than before my visit. He sent me out the door in pain with no antibiotics and told me there was nothing he could do for me but refer me to a periodontist that happened to be next door to their office. I agreed and they set me up with an appointment for a month away. After leaving their dental office hurting especially after my dentist measures the amount of bone loss in the infected tooth my co worker suggested that I get second opinion and so I found Posh Dental on Yelp. They concluded after taking x rays and examining my mouth that I do have an abscess and that is below the gum line. My chin and gums were swollen and very painful to touch! They were very friendly and gentle with my mouth. I was in excruciating pain but thanks to Posh Dental I am being treated for my infection and I have an appointment with them to do a root canal after my infection is gone. I keep thinking how much pain I would be in if I had not gotten a second opinion. I ca not stress enough how awesome this office is. If you re afraid to go back to the dentist DON T BE. Just go to Posh Dental. I am so relieved this place exists!!
I recently leased a 2015 Honda CR V from Honda West and it was a great experience. I dealt with Jim Serantis and Gabe in Finance and they were both wonderful to deal with. They got me a great deal payments that fit into my budget delivered the vehicle when I needed it and went over the whole vehicle with me. I would highly recommend these guys. Unlike other car dealerships Country Hills Hyundai who ripped me and other people off for depsosits. These guys represented themselves with integrity honesty and first class service. I ll definitely be back for my next vehicle. Thanks again.
Cost Expensive top 10 15 Quality Very good 85 Decor Poor 55 Staff Friendly average service 75 Value 80 Worth mentioning is the king crab congee!
Great NY style pizza and pastas and great customer service what more do you need? On top of that the food is always ready super fast!
This place is Fantastic! I am a self admitted coffee shop snob and have a hard time with and place that is not my beloved Flying M in Boise. So I am always a little skeptical! Gypsy Beans you have proved my skepticism wrong! I was looking for a pace to hunker down on a rainy day and work on some grad school applications. The atmosphere is quiet enough to allow for focus on your own projects but loud enough to not be stunned by silence. I enjoyed a bowl of lobster bisque and a Syracuse which is what they call a peanut butter mocha Both were exceedingly good for coffee shop fare especially the bisque. Prices seem reasonable for Cleveland this trip cost me less than 10. Wireless internet is free and the signal is strong. A perfect study spot! I ll be back Gypsy Beans!
If you like waffles at all then you have to come here. The waffle is like no other waffle I ve ever had. The real maple syrup and heaping of butter do not hurt either. The side of bacon is always perfectly cooked and balances out the sweetness of the waffle. The hash browns lemonade and fresh jam are also must haves. sure the wait sucks but if you stick it out the food is well worth it!
Get the fast pass. They are always great! If you have any issues ask a manager and they ll fix it. Plus give you a free wash next time.
We stopped here for a bite to eat after Wine down Wednesday at The Silverton. Traci T raves about it and we caught it before they closed! I got Massaman Curry dinner no spice. When we got it home Traci T said I got about half the size that portion usually is. Bummer since it was sooo good. I ll try it again but I ll make sure before I leave I got the right portion size.
Waverly s is a fabulous place for an evening out. The ambiance is cozy with a talented live pianist . North Las Vegas has very few nice restaurants with the kind of atmosphere and attentive staff that Waverley s offer. As it is close to our house we find Waverly s to be our go to place for fine dining. Darrell has been our waiter often and is outstanding and very professional. This is a place you can go and have a relaxing and enjoyable meal. I have nothing but praise for Waverly s. Keep up the good work!
When I first came to Dr. Huey I had 12 cavities. I am ashamed to say it but it is true. I had always had fear of dentists plenty of bad experiences so I just learned to live with my mouth pain. Well when I was convinced to go see Dr. Huey by my husband I reluctantly went...AND IM SO GLAD I DID!! She was so attentive and concerned about my well being. She takes the time to explain what she is doing and actually waits until you are totally numb before she starts working. Not to mention she offers you noise canceling headphones while she drills away. I love that and I actually look forward to going to my appointments now. She does a fabulous job! And all the staff members are just as wonderful. We have recommended her to all of our family and friends and those who go love her as well.
Huge portions great value for money. The platter is great for sharing. They make all of their own sauces and they are all SOOOO delicious. Its so nice to support a local restaurant and hidden gem. I think the drinks are a bit over priced and I am not a huge fan of their Ceaser with burbon.
This was the best customer service she met with us on a whim helped us get a super complex design created and printed right away for my brother s Airforce graduation and we could not have been happier! Would absolutely recommend again!
I love enchiladas. They are my favorite Mexican food. When I saw this place I thought What? An enchilada only place? I think it blew my mind. Coming from NYC should expect the specialty restaurants that specialize in one type of food only e.g. Mac and cheese meatballs etc. but in Phoenix? Anyway a friend and I stopped there on a whim. I was not surprised but amazed at how good this was. The concept is really line style read Subway where you pick your tortilla then your meat then your toppings and slide on down. I ordered 2 enchiladas. First the tortillas. I did the half wheat half corn. They are super soft and chewy with a soft texture. Next the chicken and then the cheesy potato fillers. Both delicious. Gadzooks offers two vegetarian options one is potato cheese for the filler and the second is spinach. Then the topping green salsa please. Some cheese on top and into the oven it goes to warm up and crisp up the cheese on top. Just like a pizza. The last time I was there I tried the tortilla soup. I love tortilla soup in all kinds and types. This was rich and perfectly seasoned. I will definitely get it again.
Beer was good quesadilla as well but only negative was the explosive diarrhea on the flight back to Portland.
So moving is not exactly super fun haha... I thought moving across state would be the ultimate nightmare I was so stressed and I did not want to ask friends to do Such a long distance move. I found them on Yelp and called them. My call was returned very quickly and Ed was polite and helpful. I was nervous about some furniture getting banged up or worse. They came prepared with wrap and tape and I got the blankets as well after considering the suggestion on how much more protection they offer. I am glad I spent the few extra bucks for that because not one scratch!!!! I m still looking and I ca not find not one! The price was more than fair and exactly what they gave me at the estimate. I would highly recommend to anyone!!!!
Marge has done 3 tattoos for myself and 2 for my husband! We absolutely love her and her talent is AMAZING! We both get compliments all the time about how beautiful they are! She goes out of her way for her customers. She worked on my husband s back into the morning hours. She loves what she does and that shows through her work!! We would not go to anyone else!
Came in for dinner with my girlfriend and had an amazing experience. The food the service the ambience was outstanding. the server was very knowledgeable about the food and he manager helped up pick out the perfect bottle of wine. The wine list is great btw. Will definitely be coming back soon!!!
Barroco is not only the most colorful restaurant I have ever been to but it also has a very delicious and diverse and artistically entertaining menu of Colombian food to offer. I brought my mother here with me on a weekday afternoon. Street parking was easy and convenient to find along Larchmere Blvd and there was no wait to be seated in the restaurant. We ordered and shared the Barroco Salad Steak Patacon and the Reina Pepiada Arepa and the most important takeaway is that their plantains Maduros and Tostones will make you wonder why you do not have plantains every day of your life. The food comes in large plate portions so you will certainly be filled to your heart s content if not just order more Maduros... One thing I did notice is that the meats beef and chicken in my case did not have as much seasoning flavoring on their own however you can request from a selection of 5 different tangy and creamy sauces to be brought to the table to compliment the dishes my favorite was the garlic aioli. Another plus about this restaurant is that there is live music so there is no paucity of entertainment while dining here. Also if you are someone who likes to prioritize which foods to eat first when they arrive on the table choose the Arepa it is best eaten immediately while still hot from the kitchen!
The line here was so long because everyone wanted a taste of this awesome little ride. Its about 20 plus a person which takes you on a very calm and relaxing ride. The ride does not last very long but it definitely was not short either. It was the right amount of duration. Its located inside the Venetian Hotel. To purchase the tickets go the place near the Godiva shop and you should find it. At first I thought you had to pay there but nope its located next to the Godiva shop. We thought the Venetian was the perfect hotel for something like this to occur in. The hotel is beautiful the sky ceiling creates a great atmosphere and overall it was a nice change of pace from the hustle and bustle of Las Vegas. Plus on a hot day in Vegas its nice to experience something like this especially in the cool AC lit hotel. The ride fits up to 4 people so be aware that you might have to share a ride with people depending on your party size. The songs they sang were pretty mellow. It was not my choice of music but it was a great choice for the environment that we were in. Overall its a pretty nice experience to have in Vegas should you come here. Very sweet and lovely.
I ve been here several times so I definitely feel like I can give an honest review. The service is great. Very friendly and sweet lady who runs it. Also the boy who helps is great too! I ve tried many things on the menu and Ive enjoyed them all. The price is also great! All in all I would say good food good service and good prices!!
It pays to live in Scarborough when you have a Banh Mi place 10 minutes away from you I m here when I need a snack. It s the perfect meal for in between lunch and dinner because it s substantial enough to tide you over without making you feel too full. I always get the BBQ Pork. I ve never tried any other item on the menu because why mess with a good thing? They smear a Vietnamese style airy Baguette with Mayo Butter and then stuff it with tons of Pork Pickled Daikon and Carrot Cilantro and Cucumber. If you can handle heat try it with the sliced Viet chilis. But beware they will blow your head off!
There is not another minister in the same league as Phil and his associates are carefully hand picked truly the cream of the crop. His words are finely crafted and his presence is refreshing.
Definitely a five star subway. I absolutely love coming in and seeing everyone smiling and always in a great mood. I love the work ethic all of them have. Perfect subway!
I been a fan of Chef Stacey since her catering days. EVERYTHING she makes is wonderful and will have you craving for more. The nachos are outstanding even so that I can get two meat loving preteens to beg me to take them back for more. I ve always been weary of kale chips until I tried hers. Crazy seasoning and a depth of flavors made we want them over my usual seaweed nori snacks. If you want food that looks good tastes good and IS GOOD FOR YOU this is the spot.
I was craving sandwiches at 3PM on a saturday and busted out yelp. Came here based off the reviews. If you re in the area and looking for good food seriously just go here. The sammy I had from illstyl3 s was delectable and you can bet your ass I ll be back to order another one of them jawns. I ordered a philly cheese steak. I ve only ever had one philly cheese steak sub in the past illstyl3 s sammy truly blew me away. Enough for me to write a review within 20 minutes of eating there. Beef was tender cheese was melted bread was fluffy sauces were superb and the kale was a nice touch for both color and flavor. Did I mention the peppers? This was all thrown onto a flat top grill and cooked to perfection. Ingredients really came together and the chef Germaine was incredibly friendly. 5 5
I am not a big Italian food kind of guy but my wifey is so I go with her. I have to say that the place looks great on the inside and the service is the same. I order the garlic chicken cant complain. Great place I would definitely comeback. Try it for yourself!
I had an amazing session with Christine this afternoon. I had never tried an aquatic massage before but I highly recommend giving it a chance. I expect that their more traditional massages are top notch as well. Everything was very professional and very comfortable and I could not be more relaxed. I m so glad that I stumbled upon this gem.
My favourite is the jerk chicken I get it every time go. However the last three times I went there was no jerk chicken left which makes sense because it s so good. This place is usually packed every time I go but it s worth the wait for the jerk chicken and jerk pork. I ve also tried their curry goat but it was not that good. The food also is not that spicy if your looking for something with a bit of kick. If the jerk chicken was spicy i d give this restaurant 5 stars but nonetheless it s worth going and trying a few of their dishes.
Went there on a Sunday evening after a day of skiing. We had tried to go on a Saturday night on the weekend after the Super Bowl and it was absolutely packed. I could not get a seat. So we tried again on a quieter night and were immediately seated. Service was friendly and quick. We had our six year old with us and they were smart about taking his food order early unprompted! and serving it pretty quickly. My wife ordered a Mead not theirs and enjoyed it. I had a flight of beer Belgian porter Smoked Ale and a hoppy American Strong Ale . Each beer was well balanced and very drinkable. I settled on a second glass of the Belgian porter which was smooth and tasty. My wife ordered a bacon sandwich with cheese and onions. She loved it. I had a pizza with a unique plum tomato sauce. I ordered my pizza with prosciutto and peppers. The taste was pretty good though I wish it had more peppers on it and for some reason the prosciutto was placed on the pizza after cooking. That was a surprise but it did not taste bad. All in all this is a welcome addition to the area and given that it s 10 15 minutes from our house and reasonably priced a place we will definitely put on our regular rotation. Also for beer drinkers out there they WILL fill third party growlers.
Fate led me to dine at Matt s Big Breakfast yesterday. We drove by this tiny restaurant while on our way to find somewhere to eat brunch. The sign indicated that they are closed on Mondays but we saw people eating inside so we sent a representative to inquire. I should note that the restaurant closes at 2 30pm and we arrived at 2 25. The waitresses were more than happy to serve us even though they were technically not supposed to be open. Score! I ordered the insider burger not on the menu and it was honestly one of the best burgers I have ever had! How is this possible you ask? First off the meat is cooked in butter. You heard me right. Butter. Second the burger is topped with 2 eggs AND bacon. As if this were not enough to convince you it comes with a side of homemade chips and a pickle. Love it! I did not even care that my face was covered in egg yolk. If you re more in the mood for breakfast Matt s has plenty of options. Their breakfast potatoes have the most intense rosemary flavoring the bacon is thick and tasty and their homemade toast and jam is wonderful. Order anything on the menu and you wo not be disappointed. This is a great restaurant with friendly service and awesome food.
Very accommodating and friendly! Will definitely visit the next time I m in town! Thank you Showtime!
One of my favorite things about Home Plate is that it is family friendly on the dining side and perfectly bar friendly on the gaming side. I only wish it was smoke free on both but I know that will never happen in Vegas. Both sides of the establishment separated by large glass windows have a large number of televisions... some are a bit outdated and could use an upgrade but big numbers just the same. The dining side also has a small arcade area which is PERFECT for bringing the kids especially when the adults would like to hang out for a while but the kids do not have the attention span to do so. All of the food I have had here mostly Pizza is excellent and the staff is friendly and good. Definitely an once month spot for us and would be more if we lived closer.
This is a nice place to have a drink while enjoying the lake and the good weather. You can grab a bite to eat from their somewhat simple menu. The burgers are actually pretty good.
We are staying in one of the many RV parks nearby and have discovered that our RV needed maintenance several times. Not because of neglect but just in general because we like to be on top of things. We are part of a captive audience because Little Dealer Little Prices is the only RV service center nearest to us. In four years we have been taking our motor home for warranty service and they have been extremely accommodating. Easy appt times reliable service and staff has gone out of their way to make us happy. I could name them but it would be unfair since they all go out of their way for us. We are happy and will continue to do business with these folks. Totally reliable in every way!
Very good for homework or fun little cafe dates. Drinks come fast and there is a variety of cups and tumblrs there. Staff are constantly kind and always making conversation. I have never had any problems.
I came here the other day to take a Yoga Nidra with Sound Healing class. It was really nice! Quiet calm nice vibe. There are two locations within the shopping center so I ended up in the wrong building to start with. I finally figured it out and was greeted at the front desk. It s a very nice location. They have a lot of props to use which is nice especially for Nidra where you need to get comfy. The sound healing was relaxing and beautiful. I adore the singing bowls. I wish I lived closer so I could go to more classes.
This dental office is by far is the best dental office I have ever been to and it s all because of the staff! I have been in need of a cleaning and exam for quite some time as I was driving to Sprouts I happened to stop in to see what they would charge me for teeth cleaning without insurance. That day they were able to get me the information I needed and set an appointment for later that week. Last Friday was my appointment I was greeted by their friendly staff whom even made small talk with me during my short wait. The dental hygienist the dentist and the dental assistant were all very pleasant as well. They were able to modify my exam to no x rays because I am pregnant each staff member checked on me and made sure I was comfortable while in the exam chair. Each exam room has their own TV and remote for your viewing pleasure during any procedure the entire office is clean and new. I was already satisfied with my experience and to top it off I received a personalized thank you card in the mail yesterday thanking me for choosing their dental group! How cool is that!? I definitely felt appreciated as a customer and I highly recommend this dental office.
Go here often ever since the owner changed its great to go to this place for AYCE. The vegetables and meat are of better quality. It s a more casual place and it has bells that allows the waitress to know you are ready to order.
I m from the SF Bay Area and have eaten at many Italian restaurants and delis including quite a few in SF s North Beach. Must say I have never had any better Italian food. We ordered or pointed to! lasagne a meatball parmigiana sandwich eggplant supreme ham salami pepperoni and cheese Stromboli and cookies oh my. Every bite was absolutely delicious we have enough food left over to have another full dinner really and we spent about 15 per person. My only regret is that we did not take home some gelato which also looked very good. Will be telling friends who visit Las Vegas about Rocco s and we ll be back . Anyone who lives in Las Vegas is lucky to have such a great deli restaurant nearby.
Katie Peters is amazing I m was impressed with her her all the way around and the salon is wonderful. Treat yourself today I will definitely go back.
Stopping by FMP I wanted to try Eggette Hut out after hearing so many positive reviews. The cashiers were nice patient and explained all of their options so service was definitely a plus! While my friend did not LOVE the strawberry yogurt waffles I thought they were really delicious and will be back soon to try their more popular flavours like durian ahh! and cheese explosion out. P.S. they have a waffle beside the cash register for display. Do not do what I did and ask for a sample it s actually just for decor haha oops
have you ever visited Korea or gone to a very traditional Korean restaurant that is run by Koreans with Korean servers? If you have you are well aware that their service is not all about smiles and chatting but one of diligence and speed. Some reviewers before me complained about the service being awful but I assume they are not used to the way things are run in places like this. It may not be an excuse but as long as I get my drink refills and food on time and they pass by and glance at our table to ensure that we are constantly well kept I do not care if Chung Li smiles at me or not. If they do their job well I m happy. With that off my shoulders let s get to the juicy review! This is the sister restaurant of Maru in Summerlin and I have to say that I prefer this place over Maru any day of the year. We discovered this place on a whim after trying the restaurant below this one it was horrid . We walked in and there s a faux well in the dining area and everything is clean and well kept. That s always a good sign. They seat you or you tell them where you want to be seated you get the menu and begin the experience. They have a variety of traditional Korean dishes and with the Korean patrons eating there when we first arrived I knew this would be good. We ordered our typical dishes bulgogi and kalbi shrimp tempura appetizer to start. We asked that they cook it in the back and they did. Our tempura was out on our table within five minutes along with the usual side dishes. I personally love the picked radish and croquette. Their rokio is good too although not the typical white pearl onion version. Our food arrived promptly and we waited no more than ten minutes if that for the food. It was good. I mean really really good. When the waitress brought out the salad and then wait for it.....the radish beef soup . i wanted to cry. Let me explain my need for this soup. When I was five years old my parents took me to a Korean BBQ restaurant back home. They served this awesome clear broth soup with what I assumed was thinly sliced potatoes and maybe a touch or two of beef. As simple as it sounds it s a traditional soup appetizer to have with a Korean meal and I ve eaten it every time I had BBQ out at a restaurant. For two and a half years we searched Korean BBQ places in Las Vegas for this appetizer and for some reason none of them serve it. Finally after 2.5 years of searching when the girl brought the soup out in its traditional low rimmed bowl and I had to use the typical long stemmed spoon to eat it i teared up. My childhood wafting in my face with the smells of radish and beef broth. It was a great moment. The soup is simple and contains nothing but clear brother flavored by the radish and beef with thin slices of radish and one or two pieces of shredded beef in the bowl. It s simply yummy. After eating two bowls of it along with the great BBQ and appetizer I was stuffed and thoroughly happy. I craved the BBQ daily for a week and satisfied my craving for dinner that week. I never get sick of bulgogi and kalbi. When I finally cooked it at our table one night I decided that was the way to go from now on because I could burn my bulgogi a bit more than the cooks in the back would to get that sweeter flavor. If you ever go to a Korean bbq place cook it yourself. It s fun and tasty! Overall a great experience and my only BBQ place where they serve my childhood soup. I m looking forward to more of their food again next week and the week after and the week after that. I know that I sing high praises over the soup and the food but it honestly is that good and is the only spot we will eat Korean food from now on.
Best family owned business in town! 10 10 recommend to anybody in the Pittsburgh area
Big Daddy s has been very tasty both times I have been there. The food is well prepared and delicious the service is good and they have a competent drink selection. Also there is outside seating which is really very nice. I love that you are given the option to create your own burger. I enjoyed pineapple on my burger both times. Additionally their sweet potato fries are great. The only drawback is that there can be a fairly substantial wait. I wish that there were more seating so that I could enjoy a burger sooner. They did have cornhole outside to play while you were waiting though which was nice.
Best food ever. Love this place. Never disappointed. Wish I could eat here every day!! Staff is always friendly. My boys love to eat here too.
I went on a Monday night to watch the Pats Dophins game figuring it would be dead and I could sit in peace and enjoy the view. Guess I got in for happy hour b c it was only 5 at the door and my two vodka drinks were 7. The place was dead though which was not really a surprise from the empty parking lot. Sat down to enjoy my drink in front of one of multiple televisions and saw one dancer up on the main stage. Not the best dancer by any means but she was quite attractive. She was up there for one song and then another dancer took the stage. Again no tricks on the pole but really good looking. I picked up on the trend real quick. One lady one song. I sat there for a long time before one of the ladies worked the pole which I really enjoy as it takes some real talent IMHO. Needless to say I did not watch much of the football game last night. All the women were very attractive in my eyes. None were overly aggressive. The 20 lap dances are worth a go if you re into that kind of thing. I have two complaints from last night. Only three or four girls every worked the pole. The other dozen or so danced a little on stage and looked beautiful. My second complaint is that this place full of beautiful ladies was really devoid of men to help out with these ladies with their ever rising costs of tuition. This is the first place I ve ever been where the number of women outnumber the men. Everyone on staff seemed pleasant enough to talk with from the barkeep to the bouncer. If you re in town you should stop in and tell me what you think.
Every time I come here I know exactly what to expect and I m never disappointed. The food is great their coconut milk curry is delicious so flavourful but also very simple. Staff are nice prices are good and overall I highly recommend the place for a casual lunch or dinner.
Visited this based on the Yelp recommendations. It did not disappoint! Looks a little grotty from the outside and seems typically tacky on the inside. Good thing the food is crazy delicious. Almost makes me wish I still lived in Mesa just so I could visit weekly. Instead I will have to plot my next visit and merely dream of taquitos.
A little pricey but very tasty ! Our waiter was really good explained everything well .. The price is the only thing if they have discounts for locals I m sure plenty more will be dining here more often
I had to try this place because of course.. ramen! But I got the regular miso ramen while my boyfriend got their most popular I ca not remember the name and it was super yummy! The broth itself was full of flavor and it felt fresh. A good Americanized version of pho I feel like! I am super weird about meat and even the pork chatsu was delicious minus the fatty pieces which my dogs loved. Super easy ordering on yelp eats and quick fast and friendly
A lovely lovely place to have summer dinner with good friends. Unlike many of the reviews that precede mine we had an attentive server who made an effort to find the coldest sauvignon blanc in the fridge for us and who explained the subtle differences between a grilled sea bream and a grilled bass. And was spot on since we ordered both. As mentioned by others the bread is amazing hard to keep your fingers out of the basket with a plate of spicy olive oil along side to dab. My partner began with a sweet potato sopa soup full of silky flavour. The grilled calamari appetizer was a tad toothsome served whole not in rings but generous and yummy. The caesar salad however with completely uninspired whole leaves of romaine lettuce barely coated in dressing a shake of cheese red onion which is not necessary and no anchovies as promised. Mains were fabulous. The 2 grilled fish dishes were both succulent somewhat boney to be expected from those fish types and completely full of flavour accompanied by a mango salsa yucca fries and a limey arugula salad. First class if messy to eat. The guys both had a maresco al limon pappardelle dish listed as fettuccini artfully served with mussels and clams circling a huge shrimp atop the spicy tomato based pasta. Never had meals this high end in Peru that s for sure. We passed on dessert and finished the meal with an Americano each but found the coffee very strong and acrid. A bit of cream and sugar and an additional pot of hot water helped but one should not have to doctor a good restaurant s coffee that much. On a minor note the upstairs lavs were surprisingly hot easily 20 degrees hotter than the rest of the building. Prices are a shade above average for good dining in TO eg whole fish were 32. So...food wine service terrace ambiance 5 stars. Caesar salad coffee washroom lost them one star. Would return happily.
Great food. Great service. Ca not go wrong. Lettuce warps were the best.
Dr. Agarwal is by far the BEST pediatrician in the world! None of his locations are close to where we live but yet we still make the drive to his west valley location. When our daughter was born she had a tongue tie and Dr. Agarwal was highly recommended by 2 different lactation consultants who do not know each other by the way . Our daughter already had a pediatrician so we only went to see him for the procedure. By the time we had a follow up we had already worked with Dr. Agarwal 3x. At this point we had already seen 3 pediatricians at our daughter s original peds office which was conveniently only 2 miles away from our house . Seeing Dr. A allowed my husband and I the opportunity to compare him to our daughter s office. There was nothing wrong with our daughter s pediatrician by our house. However working with Dr. A and seeing how knowledgeable and wonderful he is with our daughter made it impossible to go back to the peds office by our house. He is so gentle and loving and we know he truly cares for our daughter. Anybody can see the passion he has for his craft and he makes a point to get to know each family and make a connection to them. We love Dr. Agarwal and we are so blessed that our daughter is under his care.
I love coming here for lunch. Their subs and sandwiches are awesome. Fresh baked bread fresh veggies a good variety of sauces and spreads and quality meats and cold cuts. Not only that the price is very reasonable 5.25 for a very decent size submarine. Also I take advantage of other lunch items like their daily made coleslaw pasta salads and specialty items like their cold pad thai noodles. Their daily soups are also very good. At this particular location they have 4 5 different varietals hot and ready to eat everyday of the week. Going out for lunch can be costly so if you want a good amount of food that has quality ingredients that s also made fresh pretty well everyday for under 10 Safeway is a good bet.
We ve been going to this restaurant and over time it has really gotten better. The service is very friendly and the happy hour food is awesome. The prices are good and portions reasonable. I am happy to report that my evaluation has gone up. I am and east coast girl with very high Italian Food standard so I ca not go to 5 stars unless the Pizza drips oil down my arm as I fold the slice to take a bite! The pizza is decent but not NY decent LOL. Give the place a try you will like it.
The gentlemen at the Tire Factory are true gentlemen. I had a problem and they solved it..I needed 4 new tires immediately for my car. The tires though no exotic are not necessarily easy to find and I braced myself for the bill. They got the tires right away and the cost was really reasonable. The service was impeccable and I went from Great no car at 8am to driving myself to lunch by noon. Chandler Tire Factory is locally owned the owner is a great guy and though I m not slashing my own tires to go back I highly recommend them.
4 stars based on this as quick takeout delivery food. This place is really easy cheap convenient reliable consistent. I enjoy every dish I ve had here but would not eat here every day. It s my go to delivery for that guilty take out.
I ve been taking my son to Alex for his hair cuts for the last 5 years. Alex is the owner he is extremely professional and personable. My son loves getting his haircut by him. The shop is always packed because they do a really good job. They are super fast here were always in and out in under an hour. I highly recommend any and everyone to go here. Make sure you request an appointment especially on the weekends!
Fantastic customer service I am a repeat client and will continue to be. Dean and his staff are phenomenal at providing wonderful repair service. I would highly recommend Simple Computer Repair Henderson to my friends and family.
There is no need to elaborate on this review. I had two new tires installed at another Discount Tire in the valley a few months back. True to form they did not disappoint. However when I stopped in the Bell Road and Cave Creek location to get the other two tires replaced the level of service impressed me. It was fairly busy but I was greeted right away. Mark was extremely friendly and inspected the two tires immediately. Fortunately they had the right size in the same brand of tire that was put on last time. I love my new Pirelli s sorry Michelin ! The bottom line is Discount Tire offers a very good deal on performance tires and there are no hassles or nonsense. Mark and his fellow employees busted out my car in only an hour. Thirty minutes less than the other location. Thanks guys!
I loved this delivery service!! They called 30 minutes before arriving which gave me time to pick up after my kids. They build the sectional pretty fast and besides being very friendly they picked up after themselves which is great. I just moved in and we re catching up with trash soo again very important. Before I signed the gentleman asked if I had any questions and gave me a suggestion which I wo not mention but I thought was very knowledgeable of him.
I called this Company yesterday due to the fact my garage door would not go down. The Friendliness of Jason who I spoke with on the phone was awesome. They gave me a call 30min out to inform me driver will be there and the driver did call me when he arrived. Adam was the Tech who serviced my garage door and he was Great! i highly recommend this company and I will definitely use them again!!!! Thank you for your honesty!
I love this coffee house. Staff is always friendly and helpful. Their coffee is fantastic! I like to buy the dark roast coffee it is absolutely delicious. Their isnt a whole lot of food menu choices but the food and bakery is yummy.
This was my second time to Snooze and this time I remembered to snap a quick pic before devouring my amazing breakfast! Snooze is a hot spot for breakfast and will get very crowded on the weekends especially since it is located on ASU campus. You will see your fair share of sorority girls and frat bros but do not let that deter you from enjoying the creative breakfast selections. I went for the vegetarian friendly Eggs Benedict and was very pleased. They serve their hash browns made into a small cone with good flavor but I do prefer mine slightly crispier. The eggs are cooked to perfection and are served on top of a wide range of fun selections. They also have some tasty sounding sandwiches and plates that I have yet to try. The service is decent but you can tell they are trying to move you through as quickly as possible. They clear your table before you re really done eating and bring the check when you re only half way through your meal. This does not bother me too much since I d rather not wait forever to get my check but I do not like feeling rushed either. Despite the long waits and mediocre service Snooze is totally worth it because they are friendly and most important the food is fabulous!
The guys who work in here are awesome and nice... I love the tattoo I got from Cameron! I will go back again and again.
Visiting from CA and happy to find a great cheesesteak! Good friendly service. Had cheesesteak with bells onions and mushrooms.
This is my favorite place for a good morning workout. You will work up a good sweat here! I like to take the trail towards black mt and then wind back down the mt once i see the view of the city. Takes about half an hour.
By far the best bar in town. The staff is always nice the food is always great and it s just an all around good atmosphere.
Who loves getting a root canal? NOBODY. But unfortunately for me my family does not have a history of great teeth. I floss brush rinse but I always find myself back at the dentist office and being referred to an Endodontist for root canals. But I am glad that Dr. Phan from Town and Country Dental referred me to Dr. Duong at Lakeview Dental. After two visits a total of 2 hours trying to get my root canals 1 of 3 root canals was calcified therefore preventing Dr. Duong from getting to the end of the canal. There is nothing else that Dr. Duong could do and if that canal gets irritated then the next procedure is the Apicoectemy. But since as of now it is not irritated Dr. Duong made sure that I am scheduled for a post op in 6 months to track the progress of that canal. The feeling I had when I heard of the bad news is that at least I can place my trust in the capable professional kind competent Doctor. Additionally Dr. Duong s assistant Bertha is AWESOME! She made my experience easier and not painful at all. Highly recommend.
Came in while walking the Linq Promenade and sat at the bar. Had a few Black and Tans plus some appetizers such as the chicken spicy dip hot wings and pulled pork sliders. The chicken and cheese dip was good with crispy potato chips. The wings were a nice size but were not as hot as I thought they would be. The pulled pork sliders were not good at all passable really. The females working the bar were attentive and nice as for the people dropping off the food well they need some lessons on how to address someone if they ordered food and a simple hi excuse me just do not slap the plate down and walk away. Hope to be back in the future.
My husband pointed this place out randomly as we were looking for a place to eat. We were pleasantly surprised! The place is cute. And welcoming. They have a cute little tempura bar and the noodle soups are very tasty! Awesome experience.
ok so evidently this place has terrible service. of COURSE it does it s asian and it caters to young cheap poor students that and the drunk club goers at 5am. So yes lets get beyond the obvious service sucks. BUT 1 the food is excellent. Get the pho or the rice and meat dishes wo not be disappointed. Second best restaurant in Chinatown I have been to first is Asian Legend 2 it has a CLEAN and modern interior so no gross plastic table liners and bugs crawlin around 3 It s on the second floor which in chinatown makes for a MUCH cleaner restaurant really 4 it s cheap. oh so cheap. 5 It has insane hours I ve been here til 6am in the morning as they are cleaning up. So yes the servers walk around like they hate their lives. but it has everything you need in a proper chinatown restaurant. I always come here when Asian Legend is closed.
Wonderful service. I came in looking for something that did not exist and they offered a simple solution for my cracked laptop screen free of charge that will do until I either spend the money on a new touch screen or get a new laptop. Plus they explained how I was never going to get my keyboard working again properly since I had used the wrong type of solvent to clean it. No charge for this either. Just some real knowledgeable nice guys trying to be helpful. I do not write too many good reviews but these guys definitely deserved one.
Just bought a 2016 Honda crf150f for myself. The salesman John was great helpful and patient with my 2 crazy boys in tow. Happy with the purchase and time spent with this purchase!
We had an interesting experience at the Persian room... The wife and I took our two kids who are adventurous eaters not picky by any means and I would say it was a good enough experience. Upon being seated we were presented with the free appetizer of naan basil butter and white onion. Not being familiar we had to ask our server what to do... He kindly shared the process and we found that to be the most delicious part of our meal. All the diners loved the naan burrito. We moved on to the entre and we found that the simple dishes were the most delicious. Again on the server s recommendation I had the chicken kebabs. The chicken was moist the basmati rice was perfect. The wife had the appetizer platter for her entre and she really only enjoyed the dolmeh. Our children are full on carnivores but they did not enjoy their ground beef kebabs Koobideh . Being the father of course I took some bites and I also did not enjoy the taste of the ground beef kebabs. I would say to keep it simple and order what you know and you ll be happily surprised with your experience.
Ordered takeout from here a few times. The curry and the peanut chicken was good. The appetizers specially the sate beef was dry and chewy. The coconut soup was yummy and so is the coconut rice. It s decent tai takeout
These friendly professionals have NEVER kept us waiting even take us early if we arrive early and they ve done a fantastic job of taking care of my daughter. She adores her orthodontist! At the beginning they explained the entire plan and how everything would work including finances. I highly recommend Olson Orthodontics.
We enrolled our daughter to learn respect and the basic skills to defend herself. The staff is professional and full of knowledge. They work with all ages young and old. I recommend this place to anyone interested in training or learning taekwondo.
Excellent cocktails amazing rum selection and delicious food. The Pineapple daiquiri was a very traditional daiquiri made with a pineapple rum that was very faithful with a little extra sweetness. The Zombie flight was 3 full sized cocktail variations using 3 different version of the recipe. All 3 were very good and different from each other. The empanadas were out of this world outstanding. Great place great atmosphere. Cannot wait toncom
The service and honesty about the problem was excellent. He was quick informative and thorough..
Out of the way place En Sushi was a drive and we were already staying in Henderson but well worth it. Went on a Saturday afternoon. Place was empty and WYATT my three year old stretched out on the padded bench and promptly fell asleep so the rest of us had an unhurried two hour late lunch a nice plus . The atmosphere was casual the decor seductive and the service relaxed personal and attentive. The premium sake we had paired well with everything we ordered and our little ice carafe was well attended frequently refilled by our server. The miso one of the usual Japanese restaurant choices of JULIANA my five year old had lots of the housemade tofu and was her all time favorite. Sadly her shrimp tempura was a bit undercooked and the oil was not quite hot enough so the batter was a little greasy . From the robata we did not specify how we wanted them cooked and the kobe nothing special and the duck breast the basalmic made it were both medium well and not the medium rare I would have preferred. And i a notorious tough reviewer still gave the place four stars yeah it was that good. The beef tongue which we had after the foie gras was good but in the same teriyaki sauce as the foie not particularly distinctive. The corn potato was just plain fun. The foie gras was OMG. We it was a party of four had three cut rolls Sexy Girl Candy Cane and one whose name I ca not recall a salmon skin hand roll plus white tuna yes I know it s not really tuna and uni sashimi. Sauces were more subtle and complex than the usual chili mayo and sweet soy concoctions you get at the typical American sushi joint. i know the review seems overly critical but to tell you the truth i was really wowed. Really a good dining experience.
Went thru the drive through ordered breakfast and the kind young lady asked if we wanted hot sauce I told her sure can I get one of each she was kind enough to put the hot sauce in to go cups and mark them awesome! Great service and great food! Ice tea is excellent also!
Super close to our apartment!!! Nkter Juice Bar are everywhere in Scottsdale. I have always love their aa bowl.
Excellent in all areas I would highly recommend this hotel for business or pleasure. My room was not only unique and beautifully decorated it was created thoughtfully with plenty of plugins and various types of lighting. It included a lovely full length mirror two robes and of course the top notch service of the Kimpton brand. We held a two day meeting with CEO types and never had a complaint. The front desk staff the meeting planners and the F and B staff were all wonderful. The restaurant The Commoner was really good as well! Triple gold star!
I do not remember the name of the guy who cut my hair but I spoke to who I think was the owner and he told be for my type of hair the person he set me up with was the best. It costed me 40 for the combo pack which was a hair cut and to fix up my beard I had an option to complete remove but I felt like keeping it . I found he did a great job my friends and family saw it and I was told it was the best I ever gotten . I would defiantly come back just wish it was just a little cheaper but hey I was satisfied with the end result . If I took the time to review a barber place then I think it s worth a try. One more thing to keep in mind is to call or go online to see if they are booked if you just walk in from what I ve seen you wo not be getting an appointment the same day.
I really like their noodles! If you do not like salt you can ask less salt. Their is a long waiting line here. Everybody likes this Japanese noodle house
I have been coming to La Perla since I was a boy. When I would not go to school for some reason my mother would always take me for lunch. They have the best ground beef tacos anywhere... the mild salsa is outstanding... the beans are great they have a chorizo flavor to them... excellent chimichangas and enchiladas. The one bad thing I will say is the place is a little run down. You sure do not want to go on a weekend night when they open up the bar you ca not hear yourself think... unless that s your kind of thing. But the food is excellent and they have never let me down all of these 40 years
Laura was truly great to work with. She s professional does not push and cares for her clients in a way that makes you feel like a friend more than a transaction. Most Realtors could learn a lot from Laura on how to serve a client rather than just making a sale. Thanks for being so awesome Laura!
Simply wonderful. Every single thing I ve ever tasted here has been superb. They are happy to prepare beef and ahi rare or medium rare and the menu encourages you to do so . Their beef is tender and flavorful. Their mashed potatoes are blissfully light and creamy. Their house French fries are uniformly crispy and pack a hint of spicy kick. Their taco platters let you assemble your own tacos on soft warm white corn tortillas. Even their caesar salad is particularly good. As for drinks I highly recommend the basil gimlet Goodnight Emily and their iced tea. One of these days I need to try their lemonade. The service is friendly and attentive. Both indoor and outdoor seating are pleasant though the natural canopy of tree branches on the patio can sometimes result in full sun. I bring a hat just in case. Chelsea s Kitchen is absolutely on my favorites list.
I have always loved starbucks. This one has great customer service and I have never had any issues there!
Food 8 10 The Bachannal is definitely one of the best buffets in Vegas. It s a little on the pricier side but the food is well worth it! Their seafood bar is well stocked but there s ALWAYS a line so make sure you grab a friend and bring back as much as you can! But beware of dirty glances when if grab a few dozen king crab legs like we did! Their other selections are really good too and I do not know if they usually have this but their TACO STATION is LA quality! Real legit real good! My favorite has got to be the dessert bar though! They always have such a huge selection and if you re not into the experimenting with different desserts their Gelato is a good go to as well! The food here is simply amazing Service 8 10 Definitely very good service here. The waiters are very patient with us especially since we re a large group with 4 tables or so and they were very accomodating. We started leaving a few people at a time and consolidating our tables and the servers were very understanding of that Overall 8 10 Additional Notes You definitely need to come here! And being Diamond Platinum 7stars definitely helps as these lines are YUUUUUGE.
This is the best of the IHOP restaurants in the area. This location is always clean and has the most friendly staff. On my recent trip here last weekend the restaurant was relatively packed but I was very impressed with the excellent service I received from my server even though I know he was very busy. I got the breakfast sampler and strawberry pancakes everything was delicious and cooked to perfection. I also ordered a crispy chicken salad to take home for later. They changed the lettuce from iceburg to mixed greens making it an even better salad I know where I am headed the next time I have a craving for a good breakfast!
These guys are awesome! My car was making a loud noise and I was convinced it was muffler related. They checked and said the muffler was fine. When they could not find anything wrong structurally they had me drive them around the block. They determined it was tire related. They would not even charge me for a consultation fee! I will only go here from now on!
Fun for the whole family. The extra tokens to feed the fish and that is okay but expansive
We had Ice Cream Sociables come out to our Lake Pleasant Real Estate office for the last day of school and it was a huge hit!! The icecream was SO good and the lady serving was very sweet. We even got 20 off for being a first time customer. We will be using them again at our next event Thank you Cameron Duncan for being so flexible with our schedule !!!
Community Tire did a great job! What I appreciate most was their openness and honesty in handling me and my vehicle. They even went above and beyond with replacing one extra piece after the issue did not seem to be fully solved. They definitely made me a return customer!
Speed. Care. Price. Community. This was the standard of Sterling Cleaners more than ten years ago with the first clothes I brought that continues today. When I first brought my clothes to Sterling and the dearly departed Rick cleaning was just 1.25 per item and for same day service!!! OK I was cheap. I had been paying 5 to 7.50 elsewhere and Sterling was too good to be true. Even though it s 2.25 for everyday items today the 1 more is still many times less experience than alternatives. And I m not a cheapskate anymore. Of course the average cost of a house in Vegas was also under 75 sq. ft. back then and it s triple that today. Ah Vegas. If you want the clothes that make you a living cleaned and pressed fast and for half the price of your latte or Happy Meal Sterling Cleaners is it. Besides if you re a working professional or small business owner there s no better karma than bringing your business to small businesses like Sterling do unto others as you want others to do business with you.
Delish!! Food never fails to disappoint! So yum
Always a fan of this Farmers Market in Tivoli Village it gets better all the time. This past Saturday the market was abuzz with vendors shoppers people already at Tivoli seemingly stumbling upon the thriving open air offerings and tons of Zombies. Some of the above may or may not be true... The Baking Cup was unfortunately out of the divine and addictive vegan chocolate chunk cookies but is always a vendor I love to see I also enjoy fooling people with her delicious treats that s right you were just RAVING over vegan treats McInNOutKing! I scored some local honey and beautiful CA artichokes which I later stuffed and steamed Sicilian style Go to see an array of local artists musicians start up and established artisan food vendors. Go to have farm fresh seasonal fruits and veggies. Go to Virgin Cheese and be amazed that cashew milk and passion have created vegan cheese that will tickle any turophile s pickle. Go when they are having a festival. Just. Go. No really. Seriously. Go.
This place was nothing short of FANTASTIC! I spend 5 days in town for work I ate here 3 5 nights! I had the yellow curry twice and the chicken pad Thai once. Both dishes were AMAZING. Be careful with the spice level. They give you a 1 5 option. I got a 3 the first time I ate here and it was much spicier than I anticipated but did not stop me from eating everyyyyything . Price amazing Customer service amazing such friendly staff! Seating very limited Parking very limited And my favorite COMPLIMENTARY DESSERT that tastes even better than the price I will be visiting again next time I am in the area. Highly recommend!
I grabbed a few of these while I was at longos and they are actually delicious! The bag is microwaveable I did it for 12 seconds and it was perfect slightly warm and soft! Not mushy the bag really keeps it fresh! No need to put in fridge.
Oh tenoch how do I say this? I love you but I hate you. I ca not live without your chicharron quesadillas nobody in town that could even come close your barbacoa and consome makes me believe I m back at home your pambazos! Omg your pambazos are great when you dont run out of ingredients and fill them out with random stuff. If it was not for your inconsistency and awful service I would say your the best thing that ever happened to toronto. And I mean it!! But for crying out loud stop turning down business fix your hours and improve your bloody service!!
Love Love Love this place. Great dive bar with amazing people and service. Free cookouts every Sunday with burgers and chicken. No food served but you re welcome to have a pizza delivered from your favorite parlor.
Excellent food and atmosphere glad to have one in my neighborhood finally. Cottons Club or Mama Majerles are a must.
Had the New York Style pizza including pepperoni sauted mushrooms salami and Italian sausage. I was able to add goat cheese which was awesome so I m assuming you can add extra toppings to any of the pizzas however I m not sure if it costs extra b c I did not see the bill so be sure to ask if you care about that. The pizza was definitely good. Not bad not out of this world. My hubby his grandma and I shared their donut dessert that came with chocolate and raspberry sauce. Yummy cripsy and fresh out of the oven! Extra points for expressing sustainability and buying local ingredients as a matter of importance on their menu. Yay sustainability local ingredientsand yummy food!
This.place.is.banging! Pita tzatziki Greek salad gyro all amazing! Best feta cheese.
My mother had her surgery at Kensington Eye Institute today. Dr. Clara Chan is amazing. She s the best. My mom was definitely in good hands. The staff at Kensington Eye Institute were all very nice helpful and efficient. Thank you.
Haze nightclub inside aria resort and casino is my favorite nightclub in Vegas. There are many reasons to why it is the best and my favorite. For starters the music is always great and on point. Especially when there s a performer. Haze has a great performance stage unlike any other club so it makes seeing the performer a whole lot better. Compared to other clubs who make their performers perform in the Dj booth haze has the best set up. The music type is hip hop top 40 and some edm. But mainly hip hop and top 40 Next the layout of the club is by far superb and the best. The dance floor is big enough so people can actually dance and people are not shoved in a little small space. There s enough room between the table reservations guest and the dance floor so not everyone is shoulder to shoulder. Haze is a two story club that has a great view of the Dj performer. I honestly rather be upstairs on the glass looking straight directly at the Dj and or performer than being eye level and having to push your way around to see the performer. Being on the top glass you have no one to worry about being in front of you. Perfect view of who s stage. Another pro about the club is the staff. Haze nightclub has a great staff from their management team host cocktail waitresses bussers bartenders and security guards. Everyone is so friendly and quick to respond to any customers need. They have everything running smooth and efficiently. The haze dancers are also amazing to watch dance. There are tons of dancers and all cute! During the night the dancers go on to a stage and do a little dance show in front of the crowd which gets everyone going. Also prices in the club are reasonable. Not to expensive but also not too cheap. The average drink at the bar was about 15 20 so not bad. At first I thought it was a little too much but after having the drink you can tell the bartenders were not shy with the liquor. Lastly the experience at haze nightclub has been one for the books. I could have not asked for a better time here and everything about haze made it memorable. One thing I will say is if you plan on coming here plan on doing table reservation with bottle service. It may sound like a lot of money up front but if you break it down it s actually a lot cheaper than going through general admission. Expect to pay 120 200 a person might as well put all that money together and get table service. The breakdown entry roughly 40 a person few drinks at the bar 60 to how ever many drinks you buy the inconvenience of waiting in line outside the club and bar... Way more stress. Getting table reservation there is no line and you get more drinks than you would at the bar and you have a place to sit! I definitely will be coming back and I will be telling all my friends about this nightclub.
Yummy Grill is a quick grab bag of Asian cuisine. There are elements of Chinese Japanese Korean and Hawaiian influence in their menu. This is one of those places where it is easy to stop in while running some errands. The food comes out quick and the prices are reasonable. For three people we had lunch for 35. That included three entrees one roll and two hand rolls. The food is solid and there was nothing to complain about. I had ordered the Mongolian Tofu and a Spicy Tuna Hand Roll. My main meal came with a large scoop of rice and two cream cheese rangoons. As a lunch special it came out to be a little under 7. The amount of food was generous and filled me up. Kept me filled until dinner and that is rare with Asian food. They are set up like a fast food joint more than a sit down. The prices are a little high for that but the food is good.
Found this restaurant on yelp and we figured why not! After we tasted our noodles my husband and I could not stop telling each other how glad we were we found this place. I ve travelled to mainland China Szechuan area and my noodle took my right back!! Loved my spicy ground beef noodle with Szechuan peppercorn flavor!! And it s super reasonable!! Definitely going back again.....this week!!
Back home everybody knows Rita s it s where you go after ball games or camping trips or when you just want some delicious water ice. which is kinda like a shaved ice well Rita s to shaved ice is like gelato is ice cream... not even in the same ball park. Rita s out here even has yummy frozen custards. You can get anything pretty much mixed into it or even combine it with the ice. I was delighted to find one of these right around the corner from me. 5 stars! Give it a try you wo not regret it!!
I came here with my relatives while we briefly strayed off the strip. They were happy with the buffet and the Mardi Gras beads they received for signing up for the players club. Joining the players club does have it s advantages like we did receive a whole dollar off each of our buffets. There are lots of slots to choose from which is pretty entertaining to try different ones. The one that caught my attention the most is the machine called the Siberian Tiger. It s probably because it did give me 41 free spins during a bonus. The more Tiger eyes you get the more spins you receive. You need to at least get 5 to trigger the bonus. The staff is very alert here because I did witness a young family trying to take pictures of their children sitting in front of the slot machines. They put a stop to that in about 2 minutes or less. This is still a good casino for families because there is a bowling alley and a movie theater here that you can take the kids to.
Secret Pizza always comes through when you need something fast to eat after a long night. They offer a variety of pizza and you can either order by the slice or pie. You can get it heated up and eat it there or you can get a box for to go orders. PIZZA SLICES I ve tried multiple slices and each slice was good! I do not think you can go wrong with whatever slice you choose. If you do not see what you want ask them if they have any other pizzas available because they store some under the counter as well.
Love this place! So glad to finally have a place like this in Henderson. Their shaved snow is so fluffy it melts in your mouth. They also have a great variety of flavors. Ca not wait to come back and try all the other desserts! Great staff and friendly service too.
I ve been here a few times now and love the attentive and colourful service the homey feel of the place and the excellent food. A bit on the pricey side though.
The pizza is delicious. The crust definitely makes it stand out from other pizza places and the toppings are delicious too. We ve only walked in to place an order and have gotten it within the time they said.
Simply amazing! We had been wanting to try this joint for a while and finally got the chance tonight. As soon as we walked in we were greeted. The place was clearly busy with only the owner there to manage all the orders but he was able to serve everyone equally. Food was fantastic. The best fish n chips in lad Vegas by far. He went above and beyond by providing a small tray and extra small pieces of fish for my two yr old who devoured it. We will be back!!
I love this company! The service is so friendly and the staff is very professional. They do a great job on repairs. I would totally recommend A1!
Excellent movers. I called on short notice and William was able to squeeze me in. The moving crew of Cameron Justin and. Nate R. were top notch. Those three guys were super efficient handled our stuff like it was their own put all of our furniture together and they were super friendly to my whole family and little boys. Highly recommend this company and will most definitely use again for our next move. Thank you AZ Bros Moving!
Excellent food and service. This is one of the best Chinese restaurants in Charlotte! Unlike some Chinese restaurants they make their own sauces which is important to me because of the MSG.
I m so glad this place is here in Scottsdale. Even better is that it s located right off the greenbelt and conveniently located 2 miles from my house. Oh and Wildflower Bread Company. I first visited this place for a free group run followed by a free spin class at CycleBar next door to celebrate Sole s anniversary. It was a load of fun and I got quite the sweat session on that morning. The place was clean stocked with the best goods for us runners and everyone was so nice. Legit recommendations from this Yelper.
Great atmosphere and pretty good food! We went for brunch and ordered a bunch of things. The Jamaican Chicken Curry Soup was my favorite very flavorful but I d prefer a little more heat. For the chicken and waffles the chicken was well seaonsed and not dry considering many places can mess up a fried breast. However the waffles were a little on the dry side. The flavor was spot on though. Other favorites were the New Mexican slow cooked pork. This is served in several ways. You can get it in a bowl atop rice and an egg. Or you can get it served in an omelette. Whatever you do if you go in a group have one person order the slow cooked pork. It s great. Heard the cury vegetable couscous lacked some heat. I think they should have it like a Thai setup with a 10 point scale. When I think of Jamaican influences I think of bold flavors. Everything was good...Some items couldve had some more heat. Will def be back for dinner. This place deserves all the hype.
We used LV Photo Party for a non profit charity event held at VooDoo Lounge on April 27 2013. I was blown away by the service of the company. They walked me thru the process of getting everything set up which was really easy! The only thing that was hard was to decide on what kind of photos we wanted to offer at our event. On the night of the event they were so fun and very professional. They also helped us out in our time of need. The venue was having issues getting wireless. Collin and Johnny of LV PhotoParty let us use their Wifi Hotspot and saved the night as all our invoicing was online. Everyone had a great time and talked for weeks after the event of what a nice touch it was to have them there. I highly recommend using LV PhotoParty!
I went in for teeth whitening and I got right in and the staff were friendly and professional. I look forward to going back again for future services.
Fabulous experience! Food was perfect and service was even better. Will come again next time we re in town!
The best of the best! You ca not beat the view... the venue is gorgeous! Upscale yet relaxed and the food is AMAZING. Try the mushrooms and the pig ears to die for. The staff was so friendly and welcoming I will be a regular.
By far the best Auto service place in Las Vegas!! Great and fast customer service Shilo greeted me right when I walked in the door and helped me out right away! Very Comfy waiting area this will me my place to come for anything I need done with my car!!
Came to Las Vegas this week for A Lincolns Dealers meeting we got to see the all new 2017 Continental MKZ And the 2018 Navigator. Las Vegas motor speedway way is Huge we got to test Drive the Continental BMW Cadillac and Audi 4. Continental is far Superior to any make the Las Vegas motor speedway is fantastic and it s made for speed and the beginner like me feels the need for speed and high speed through the cones zig zag style. I loved driving the All new Lincoln MKZ great job Lincoln. Will be back soon to test drive the Shelby 2017 Mustang 350R.
This place is honesty the best Korean bbq in North Carolina! From variety of meats great service high quality meats etc. honestly with a group of friends you would enjoy for sure. The meat was not frozen and served to order it s spacious and gives a welcoming feeling. As far as service it was really good my waiter was attentive and nice. I had lower expectations but this place blew my mind! Definitely recommend.
Selection is great. Prices are not too competitive much of the time. The employees are terrific. Today s awesome person was Samantha. She wandered with me for 15 minutes pointing out wines to try. That s an incredible help and will keep me coming back. Do not be an idiot like me and push the cork into the bottle. Now I have to finish the bottle. Oh...darn?
beautiful upscale bar that recreates the opulent opening to the Ohio Theatre from when it was built in the 1920 s. The dcor is something you cannot find in many other bars in the region and it enhances what Playhouse Square has to offer. On top of all that we ordered some well made cocktails and tasty appetizers. A bit read way high class for my typical night out but perfect for a classy evening.
Wow! Just finished dinner at Chada Thai and Wine and it was phenomenal! We have tried many Thai restaurants here in Vegas and this one is my new favorite. This place is small and the ambiance is dim classy and romantic. They have impressive wine collections offering wine at reasonable prices with hardly a mark up. The menu focuses on food from Southern Thailand including Bangkok . The prices are very reasonable with most appetizers soups and curries hovering in the 8 23. For appetizers try Spicy Herbs Spring Roll New lettuce wrapped with ground pork with ginger onion lemongrass and thai basil. It was flavorful and seemed healthy. Yum Kai Nok Kata a flavorful appetizer of fried quail eggs topped with dried shrimp cilantro and red onion tossed in a spicy lime dressing. Yummy! For entree try Chuchee Cripsy Prawn Deep fried Prawn served with chu chee curry was divine. It was hot juicy and full of flavor. Really enjoyed them. Yum Woon Sen Seafood Bean thread stir fry with tomato onion cilantro chili lime juice and fish sauce. Also delish. The staff are very friendly and serve the food fast. All in all we really enjoyed our meal at Chada Thai and Wine.
Yama the only Charlotte answer to the age old question Where should we get Octopus Balls tonight? Yama is located right beside Bistro La Bon and if you blink you might miss it. The interior is dark but pretty sexy with a bit of a lounge type feel. Our waitress came and seated The Lady and I immediately and we perused the menu. We did get the Takoyaki which is a fried dough with octopus fun fact Tako is Japanese for Octopus! . They were... they were different haha. But I enjoyed them! Piping hot and comes with bonito flakes which kinda squirm against the heat. It sounds weird it looks weird tastes pretty darn good. For our dinners we both stuck with Ramen because we had heard great things! I had the Tonkatsu Ramen and The Lady got the Vegetable Udon Soup. Both were fantastic and our waitresses recommendations and accommodations to keep things vegetarian for The Lady just made the whole experience better. My broth was as many others have said extremely flavorful and full of umami and the noodles were perfect as well. I think The Lady enjoyed hers a lot but I did not have time to ask her before it was gone Anyways it s hard to say if we ll be back here often but it s a fantastic option that I ll highly recommend on my list of ramen places now.
Small but uniquely stocked store. Has a small selection of men s suits and button ups and polos along with a small section of hats. The women s clothing consisted of long dresses and tea length dresses from several different eras. Customer service was great. We were offered a beer for free on our way out. Note that if you pay in cash you do not have to pay suave taxes as in most places in the arts district .
During a business trip I visited and found a great selection of cigars with knowledgable suggestions if asked and quite an array of excellent beverage choices to compliment my cigar. A nice relaxed atmosphere with good folks gathered to relax chat and have a great cigar. The staff was helpful and attentive too and the prices were more than fair for top shelf beverages. Swing by grab a comfy chair and enjoy.
Walked in when I visited Arizona from California because I needed earrings eyelashes and edge control lol the 3 E s that keep me together . I walked in and was greeted with a warm welcome from the 3 ladies and a man . I could tell it was a family business because the vibe was cool and closer than just regular coworkers. They helped me out and got me out of there in no time. I will revisit next time I m in town thanks !
We decided to eat for lunch. I picked the place b c it said breakfast until 2pm and I was in the mood for eggs. It was a nice place when we went in. The food was pretty good and decently priced. My husband really liked the chicago deep dish pizza. Friendly Staff.
Delicious! Everything is made fresh to order. This is where you can find some of the breakfast burritos in the valley. Yes it is inside a gas station...but do not judge a book by its cover.
I do not even think I could list all of the awesome bands that I have seen in the Tavern or the Ballroom over the years. Heck I probably could not list all of the awesome shows I missed over the years. That s a testament to how great the Beachland is. A great place to see a show and the fact that they ve helped bring economic development to that street is just icing on the cake. Take your crappy corporate run venue that rips fans off and shove it. I ll take the Beachland any day of the week.
So I moved to AZ from Texas. Been a Sam s club member before in TX. So when I moved everyone in my office were members at Costco. So let me check it out... I love Costco bought the membership w money spent rewards after a year. What I loved by the Customer Service Rep you can cancel your membership if you do not like it and we refund you! Well that had confidence written all over it!!! Since then I have bought membership gift cards for my friends back in TX. I love visiting to see what new deals I am get and learn about new products. The employees seem to be very nice here. I even had to do exchanges and or returns and did not have to have the receipt. They have it all logged on your membership! Cool right? I hate to admit that some of the returns were not repackaged the same as I bought. Again no sweat comments or rolled eyes. Just done!!! I will be a Costco member for awhile.....
Absolutely delicious!! What a dining experience it was coming to Milo s in Montreal. Everything from the service to the wine and food was amazing. Highlights the octopus appetizer.. It was possibly the best dish I have ever had in my life. An absolute must for all diners the Olive oil with fresh oregano cut at the table. Simple and fresh the Greek wine! Our server recommended a fantastic white that the entire table enjoyed Go to Milo s if you re in Montreal you will not be disappointed!
Very good service delicious food and amazing choices for the menu. The restaurant is very clean and organized. Will recommend to other friends and family.
From the Warren G playing in the background to the minimally beautiful decor to the perfectly cooked al dente vegetables Sosoba was a homerun. With bases loaded. In game 7. This was PERFECTION! We started with the Tso Tso Cauliflower and Calamari which we chopstick battled each bite for! I enjoyed the Hostile Takeover. Bulgogi beef tender and just enough for my perfectly proportioned bowl of ramen broccoli and mushrooms. I literally ate every drop. Hubs had the Mic Drop. It was like Asian Bbq in a bowl with noodles. A party for your mouth. We finished with the Grasshopper because...cheesecake. The presentation was great the cheesecake cold and oreo crumbles just a perfect amount of crunch. We left full and delighted! Our new date night spot fo sho !
What s not to like?! Huge menu great food fast and very friendly service indoor and outdoor dining and an awesome location in the Fashion Show Mall with great Strip views. Not to mention free parking in the garage below. Highly recommend.
Hands down safest cleanest and most wonderful facility and attendants owners!!! We travel all over the US working in hospitals living out of our RV so I m an expert! Haha Boulder City is awesome! For the past three and a half months now this facility does not disappoint! The machines always work great prices and always clean safe and great owners attendance and the sweetest lil pup Pearl comes in on a regular bases. I truly feel like part of the family now. But we will be finishing our work here in a month or so. I will be sad to leave Boulder City!
Great great food. Priced very fair. Staff was great and on point. Kids loved the pancakes and French toast. I loved the chicken fried steak. Our new favorite go to spot. A well earned 5 star. Just a heads up.. It has become deservingly so a very popular place so you may want to call in advance to check wait times on weekends. We had to wait 20 min but it was absolutely worth it. Highly recommended.
Very friendly atmosphere. Everyone said Hi as we walked in the door. It was very busy but we got right in. Our server Cheyenne was professional and very pleasant. The only negative I would have to say is it took a little too long for someone to greet us after we sat down and take our drink order. Minor!!!! Food was good and served in a timely manner. Atmosphere was fine. My P s enjoyed the restaurant and said they would go back not an easy task for them. Great Job Texas Roadhouse...
This place is legit! The service is top notch and all the food we ordered was delicious. From the ostiones aguachiles camarones empanizados carne asada tacos de Marlin to the delicious micheladas. Played a round of golf across the street and ended it with this delicious treat. The only thing that was a bit loud was the live performers. I will be back soon.
Update THEY NOW ACCEPT CARDS so you do not have to walk across the street and use the sketchy gas station atm.
Been going here since July 2008 when I was on my way to a Star Trek Convention that used to be down by the Airport after a friend recommended it. I ve gotten a handful of people into this place. Incredible food and great portions. A little pricey but when you taste it and see the portions you ll be glad you went. You ve tried the rest. Now try Zet s. Cash only.
Chada is probably my favorite Thai spot in Vegas. We never felt like drinking here but I know they have amazing selection of wines. Do not order the drunken noodles here. Probably the only dish I think they do below average Thai places. It s very sweet and saggy and also on a bed of salad greens. Just weird. Their Curry is good especially the crab curry. The seabass was cooked perfectly too. We always come here on business dinners. It s also one of the Most expensive Thai restaurant in Vegas as well.
Amazing authentic some of the best tacos I ve ever had in phoenix and I ve lived here my whole life. Sample each meat if it s your first time they re all good so you really ca not go wrong...but be warned get the habenero sauce on the side it s crazy hot!
Yay we have a new puppy! Thank you Leslee and Tashena for your puppy counseling! Service was great and we are so excited to bring our new Bassett home !!
Shame! Shame! Shame on me! I have been here at least 4 times and have not given them some love! Well let me say... Oyshi is my new fav sushi place! Grrreeeattt Sushi at great prices... What can I say? I mean everything here is fabulous... I am a big raw eater so that is where I spend my calories and it is FRESH! To agree with others Yes it is 26 for all you can eat! However there are also some great sides... they have these lil potato croquettes... sooo yummy... also they have some steak wrapped asparagus It is so hard to name all of the yummy eats they have there... this is def my place... I do not mind the drive from Henderson takes me 15 20min and I am in sushi heaven Yes you must go there! Go there and enjoy! You will not be sorry... one thing though since it has become popular a reservation is recommended on the weekends... LOVE the Iris roll! happy eating! your constant companion deirdra
Always go here at least once when visiting family in the area. Good food and good prices with a great atmosphere. Great place to watch a game plenty of TVs or just hang out. I m not really a video poker guy but they have that too if you are interested. Overall always enjoy the food and time hanging out with family here. Would definitely recommend to friends.
First I have to start off by saying I ca not believe I have been in charlotte for almost eight years and today marks my first time venturing out to sushi 101 as I have heard so many things about this place but never seemed to find myself nearby when I needed my regular sushi fix which is pretty much any day ending in the letter y but all that changed today. I ordered the panhandle roll the jasmine roll and the voodoo roll and hold on I seriously do not want to put my chopsticks down to type because these three rolls are absolutely AMAZING! The individual flavors mesh so well together and the freshness of the ingredients is clearly evident with each bite. I love spicy and the server did not disappoint with her recommendation as these are some of the most flavorful rolls I have ever tasted and that my friends is not hyperbole or exaggeration! I also have to give my server Megan special recognition as my water glass never got less than half full before she refilled it with a smile every time. She was extremely personable and actually genuinely appeared to enjoy being there which sad to say is not always the case with servers in some places as I am sure we can all attest to! First class service with a smile fresh flavorful sushi at a solid value the next entrant into my five star club! Congratulations sushi 101 as it is well deserved and I will definitely be back again and again and again!
This is the best bar in Downtown East. I go all the time to see Landon he makes great cocktails. Plus they have a great happy hour monday Friday until 8 pm.
Being from California this reminded me of Sonic s system where you pull up and order from your car. However this place has a little more of a retro feel also because its been around way longer than Sonic sorry for the comparison . It was midnight we just got done dancing our tails off at a wedding and were starving! We ordered up two Galley Boy burgers zucchini fries and the potato teasers. This was my first time trying the Galley Boy which is THE burger to get two patties creamy melty American cheese two sauces mayo and bbq i think and all in the perfect handheld size. We scarfed the items once they arrived to the car these boys run their hearts out and they still have a smile! Power to em I respect what they do.
I like this place. It s a new ish spot in Arsley that does it all. There s a bowling alley inside some cornhole games set up outside and good food to boot. The service has always been great for me and the food is classed up traditional bar food. You have to try the chicken and waffles appetizer it s worth the diabetes. Last time I was there a group of women had just come from seeing Girl s Trip and immediately bonded with my wife over how good the movie was. We did not even know them. This has nothing to do with the restaurant but you should really go see Girl s Trip or get the Bluray when it comes out.
If not the Queen City s classiest Blue Taj is without question one of the city s hippest Indian eateries to date. Its coolly lit swanky modern interior but echoes the style and panache associated with Ballantyne Village in which the restaurant resides. For some prices may be BT s Achilles heel. A dining experience smooth and polished as the restaurant offers justifies comparatively premium costs but whether or not menu items admittedly simple in nature like their Masala Chili Cauliflower Florets or Mustard Tawa Lamb need require a 5 or 9 decrease in one s wallet respectively is understandably debatable. It must be affirmed however that food taste and quality are consistently outstanding. Though non appetizers offered below 10 are virtually non existent both lunch and dinner menu selections are more than substantial despite opposing reviews . Looking past the 13 20 price range nothing disappoints... each and every dish utilizes a considerably more robust complex of ingredients compared to those presented by competing Indian restaurants. Moreover portion sizes are satisfactory. One aspect worth highlighting is BT s selection of drinks and cocktails. Prices are expectedly high yet the sheer uniqueness of each drink due to its fusion of traditional Indian herbs and spices far outweighs any initial pangs. Execution has always been flawless and said reason is why I ve swiped too many a card on alcohol alone. FYI 1 the restaurant s front door is situated within the shopping complex s ground floor... NOT INSIDE just not on an exterior wall that s visibly seen from the street parking lot 2 if there s a wait fancy cozying yourself up at the bar located to the left upon entering 3 SUNDAY BUFFET for 30 4 first timers beware Ballantyne Village s ever full parking lot at any hour past 4 PM... if need be a garage is available. Rating specifics i.e. 1 5 low high ... Overall recommendation 4.25 Food taste and quality 5 Portion size 3.75 Price 2.75 Atmosphere 5 General service 4 Waitstaff 4.5 Location 5
LOVE THIS STORE!!! Super friendly owners make you feel like family. Great clothes too!
This is the best brunch in town! Live jazz music and a fresh selection of very different brunch items such as oysters and fresh fish! You still get the usual brunch stuff but with a lot more healthy varieties. Also it s not bad to have brunch with a view of the beautiful golf course and waterfall you do not even feel like you are in Vegas!
If you are from Europe and live in Vegas it s a must place I love that you can find everything in here a specific item that you can find only out of the country
Came in for happy hour and all was great. Service was excellent and we will becoming back. Manager came to table and explained their discount card program which we took him up on. Food and prices were good and close to home.
I went there today cause I saw they have shaved ice. It s something I have not even seen in Toronto before. It s definitely something new and fresh in the city. I tried only the green tea with red bean on the menu but a lot of the things in there sounded interesting enough to come back again. Service was a bit funny. The girls seemed a bit inexperienced and they came twice asking us if we ordered. One thing that s a bit deceiving is the name. It s strange to call it cafeteria when there s no coffee.
Cute store! Lots of candy and high quality children s toys. They also have many unique gifts. A bit on the pricey side but a fun stop while we waited for lunch.
I eat here about once every 2 weeks. I love this place. I ve had most things on the menu and food is great. I m not sure what s with these negative comments with the food. I m guessing these are picky eaters. If there s a problem they always are willing to fix it. You ca not get better food than this for the price. Guaranteed to pay double anywhere else. Very excited for Football this place has great drink specials and tons of TVs . See you soon.
YUM! YUM! YUMMY!!! Ordered on Uber eats the driving distance was correct from the time I placed the order...it took like about 40minutes. Food portion was super big I could not finish it...but it s worth the prize. The one star is for the onions...I m not a fan of onions but it was in my order...definitely a to go place to eat!
y x awesome food awesome atmosphere good coffee Albeit I found it a bit pricey for the amount of coffee you actually get 4 for smaller than a tall at Starbucks .. but any coffee shop that s not Starbucks already gets 3 stars. The coffee is good although the mocha was a bit diluted but not the best I ve had The Roots Cafe is awesome . The best part of this place is the feel. It s a real coffee house there are young folk all around even late at night people are walkn by. If I lived near by I d be a poor man with a stomach full of coffee. Oh and the food is great. The dude grows herbs in the garden and in the middle of preparing the food steps out and grabs some herbs and puts it in your kebab. Tastes great. Another of Cleveland s hidden gem
Just went back for cut and color. Adriana totally hooked me up! Went from platinum blond to a deep vibrant red and she got the color spot on!! She is so sweet and easy to be around it felt like spending the morning with a friend. Reasonably priced Excellent service relaxed atmosphere and I got exactly what I asked for. Such a great change from paying too much for salon trauma! I will definitely be going back to her on a regular basis! So glad I found her!!! If you go there and you really should ask for Adriana and tell her I sent you!! She will treat you right!!
Delicious!!! Flavourful! Filling without that lethargic feeling after. Super friendly service! I m tempted to go back again the next day!
I ve been looking for a new go to nail salon for a while now. I found this nail salon on Instagram and I instantly fell in love. The day I wanted to get my nails done they were able to schedule me an appointment the same day at a time that was convenient for me. My experience was pretty good. I like my nails nice and simple Lil Kim was my girl. I ll be definitely going back!
It has been several years since i ve last worked out at this LVAC location. I just happened to be on this side of town and had my gym bag in the car so I figured why not swing by and see how it is after the remodeling. Not sure when they gave this location a make over but it definitely looks much better than I remember. Front desk customer service was good I had a few questions about my account and they were answered with no issues. I ve had too many problems in the past so I was hesitant but they did what they needed this time which is why I am back as a member. The workout equipment has been updated and I was happy to not deal with the large crowd that normally is here for the afterwork rush hour. Enjoyed my workout with no complaints so next time I m back on this side of town I will stop by again!
First time my friends and I tried this. We really wanted a good burger but nothing was around. We seen this place and gave it a try. We ordered the different delicious options they had and once we got the food it was amazing and tasted really fresh. We re from the Bay Area and asked if they had one in the Bay. They are only Local in Vegas but will definitely go here again if we are ever in the area. Highly recommend!
Updated to include that Nate s now serves French Fries and takes Credit Cards. Plus if you like Spinach Pies Nates are excellent flavorful dough perfectly baked with a rich spinach filling. Most restaurants today want to be cutting edge and trendy but there is a place for restaurants that buck that trend places that have not changed over the years and go about their business serving good food simply and at reasonable prices Nate s Deli and Restaurant is a a local favorite for just these reasons. This is a place that serves really good Greek and American food. When I need some good Middle Eastern food cheap it tops the list. Nestled just down the street from the West Side Market at 1932 West 25th Street Nate s is underwhelming from the outside looking a bit run down from the front. If you park in the parking lot in back and enter through the kitchen you get a chance to see how clean they keep things. Once inside you have a shotgun of a restaurant with booths on one side and tables closely spaced together on the other there are a couple of small tables in the front display windows. While very clean and attempts have been made to warm up Nate s it still feels a bit crowded and dull especially because the few colors that have been used are a very muted. But going to Nate s is not about decor its about food. Although the menu features a full deli side I go to Nate s for the Middle Eastern side of the menu most times getting the same thing a falafel roll sandwich and a half order of baba ganoush. The falafel is a bit simpler than most just falafel balls rolled with lettuce tomato and tahini in a pita. What makes it work is that the falafel are excellent well spiced and lightly fried and then well balanced with the other ingredients. By using a large pita and rolling the sandwich you do not have the problem of some falafels were the pita gets soggy and overstuffed. The baba ganoush is also very good with a smooth texture and a nice balance between the roasted eggplant the tahinin and the lemon. Served simply with a topping of olive oil parsley and a little paprika and two large pitas to scoop into it you could not ask for much more. But of course at Nate s there is more since you get a side dish of pepperoncinis and pickled radishes to munch along with your food. The pickled radishes are the real treat with their bright pink color mild flavor and just the right amount of crunch. Nate s service is very fast and the food is consistently good with prices very affordable. A couple other things to know about Nate s they are only open till 5 30pm on weekdays 4 30pm on Saturdays and closed on Sundays. Also take note of the little number on your table when you are done you go to the register and give them the number and they will have the check. Nate s has been there seemingly forever with good reason they serve very good Middle Eastern food at low prices and you can get in and out very quickly.
Best donut shop I have found in AZ. They have a ham and jalapeno and cheese croissant that is to die for. So lucky this place is so close.
We ve had a restaurant.com coupon laying around for a long long time so we decided to try this place before we went to the Space Oddity show at the Hilton. I heard that this was pretty old school so we were excited to try it. We got there at 6pm and the place was absolutely dead. There was maybe one party of elderly ladies there eating the early bird dinner specials that was it. It was so empty that I immediately thought it was part of a Gordon Ramsay Kitchen Nightmares show. So then we look at the menu and we realize our 25 certificate for 35 worth of food does not go far at all because every entree is more expensive than 35. And they would not let us use it for any of the dinner specials. So not being absolutely enormously hungry I let my hubby choose the entree and I just get the Salad Bar which we find out is this freak of nature lazy susan make your own salad experience which was very weird. Thankfully all the lettuce and the sides were insanely fresh and I got pretty stuffed eating it. My husband got the Chicken Marsala which annoyed me because I normally do not like Marsala sauce and I knew I would not be sneaking a taste off his plate. However I tried it anyhow and it was pretty decent. Chicken was cooked perfectly sauce was decent but I m not a fan of the flavor of Marsala wine. So we ended up getting out of the Tillerman used our certificate and paid like 24.00. I ca not really recommend using restaurant.com certificates here unless they came in a larger denomination like 50 as for a normal meal you wo not make a big dent with their high prices. My husband really wants to try the steak however and wants to come back again to try the specials without the certificate.
Great atmosphere for hanging out with friends and family. Nice selection of sweet treats to accompany your fresh drink. The staff is nice willing to answer any questions you may have. Great selection of flavors to choose from. I personally had their Halo Halo with original honey boba. To my surprise the flavor was spot on. Love that they added fruity pebbles to the drink for an added texture flavor. This place never disappoints! My go to Boba Tea place in Arizona!
Having lived in San Francisco for many years and experiencing authentic Vietnamese cuisine in several restaurants there PHO HA NAM is now the best authentic Vietnamese restaurant in NE Ohio. Their Pho is outstanding fresh flavorful and generous portions. Their summer rolls are perfecto always made fresh with the peanut sauce consistently thick and tasty. Their Vietnamese sandwich Banh Mi is large and awesome. The family staff is very friendly and the restaurant is clean! And regarding price very very affordable. Compared to the popular and to me vastly over rated Superior Pho on Superior PHO HA NAM is the more authentic and quality focused Vietnamese restaurant in NE Ohio. Check it out you wo not be disappointed! Share
Everyone i dealt with was friendly and patient. It was an easy and low pressure process.
Went to the Oreck Store and was pleasantly surprised! The service is great and Eddie did a fantastic job. Not only are the knowledgeable but very friendly. My wife and sister in law bought two Vacuums and various other items. My sister in law is from Houston and she said the Oreck Store in Houston. Was not pleasant the owner was extremely pushy and not a good experience so she walked out. We will definitely recommend this Oreck Dealer to everyone.
Good food! So far closest to flavours from back home moderate spice levels which was a bonus for my daughter. Will go back.
Such a good experience! Jen made me feel at ease about the process. She took the time to measure out and perfect my eye brows before even beginning the micro blade process. A lot of people I talked to thought that you get your eyebrows shaved off and get a tattoo on your eyebrows... totally false. You keep your eye brow hairs and it s like you add to them to fill in make fuller and make darker if needed. It looks like you own hair and you keep your hair as well. And this is the best place to get them done at!!
I brought my girlfriend to celebrate our one year and we loved it! First of all we did not come here to look for the best food in Montreal but instead for the experience and we loves both category. We both ordered the steak and it was juicy and delicious! The waiter was great always smiling and took care of us like royalties D The view was amazing! Also right across the restaurant you can go to the open air terrasse and the view was even better than inside the restaurant. Overall the food service view and ambiance make this place great for special occasions!
This is one of my favorite lunch spots in the hood. It s quick and you get a ton of food. The cilantro jalapeo sauce is good on errythang.
Had a great experience here! I told Jeff exactly what I wanted for my access cab Tacoma. He recommended the 8 JBL subwoofer for the small cab I have. They installed it a few months ago and it is still working perfectly. Everything looks clean and professionally done the wiring the Velcro that holds the sub in place and they made it easily removable so that I can use the back seat that it currently occupies. I then decided I wanted a police scanner so I had them install the Escort Passport. This product works great and their installation is once again flawless they hard wired it to the battery for me free of charge. All of the guys who work there are awesome and super easy to talk to. Jeff was very knowledgeable throughout every question I had. I recommend this place to everyone who wants quality work done on their car.
Great fish.great prices. Cooked just right.beer and wine also.a must try for lunch or diner.you wo not be sorry you tried it.
I went in this afternoon to buy my first suit. My line of work I can get away with jeans and a polo however I need to fly back east to my corporate office for a week and men are required to be in a suit. So I walked in and was greeted by Chad. He was very patient and took the necessary time with me. Now I m sure the sales people are commissioned yet Chad was not pushy and seemed like he would spend the whole day with me if needed. I walked in thinking I would just be getting fitted and I walked out with two suits. I will definitely be back to purchase additional items from Chad.
The veggie and lamb curries were both so delicious with some garlic naan! Perfectly spiced. It is a nice atmosphere and the service was excellent.
Honestly the best customer service I ve had in a long time. I had purchased a gift card but no longer needed it. Linda was more than patient with me even when I had send the gift card back to the wrong address. I really appreciated how responsive and professional this team was and I hope to return and eat there soon.
A very BIG mall! It was my first day in NC and I wanted to go to a quick mall to buy myself a shirt I had no idea this mall was so big and high end. I just wanted a Forever21 haha. All of the stores I entered into the customer service associates were all very pleasant.
A cozy little gem of sushi restaurant in a strip mall. Felt comfy from the moment my hubby and I walked through the door and sat at table on a Monday night. Nice selection of sushi named in the menu reasonable prices very fresh fish great quality quick and attentive service and super tasty! Just had the basic scallop sashimi volcano roll and shrimp with crab in soy paper roll. We enjoyed our meal immensely. Great selection of sake available as well. We will be back and be sitting at the bar.
Awesome ... Beef brisket ridiculous! pork belly awesome the ribs are soooo tender ... Great sides great service ... Visit NOW!!! Ribs come to Cleveland
This mall is working on it! I ve noticed a few renovations happening and it s making the place more attractive to shoppers! Some stores are moving and some are moving in! Hey I realized Cinnabon is back!! Yess! There really is not much I ca not say it s missing here... oh yes I can.. WET SEAL and AGACI !! Cmon guys!!
Tried the Greek fries and Lebanese tacos both were delicious. We also had the Reyna salad which was better than expected. The potions looked small but after trying out the dishes we were all full and had leftovers. They did not have the seafood dishes when we came which was a bummer. For drinks we had sangria mojito and 3 beers. Surprisingly for 4 ppl all the food and drinks came to under 200 which is pretty good!
Was a really great place to stay. The staff is completely accommodating for whatever you might need. Very spacious rooms clean and wonderful large kitchen. Will definitely stay again.
I was excited to finally try these guys out on their opening day. I love the decor inside and finding a spot to park was not hard at all. There s a lot just around the corner that can be used. My only complaint is 3 for a doughnut is really high. I paid 6 for 2 sprinkle doughnuts for my kids this morning...
My 7 year old son is home schooled and this place is an amazing option for mom to have a little me time and for him to be a kid and have some fun! Pricing is reasonable and the staff is very friendly. I want to say we have been here 3 or 4 times now. We will definitely be back. I love their flexibility and late night hours!
Jasmine and Timmy have been taking care of my manicure and pedicure needs for over 4 years. Love them!
Came here to eat as I walked the strip after work. I teach here and forgot the strip prices were HORRID. Asked the hostess if they had high protein options and was assured I could order what I wanted without the bun. I ordered a chicken breast and a turkey burger patty. Both were good but the chicken was FIRE!!! Moist and portioned at abt 4 5 oz. Glad I was able to enjoy eating out without feeling left out. Its busy on a Thursday but we goy seated immediately inside. Verdict? Coming back if not for the Donnie posters alone.
Using this Law Firm was a truly wonderful experience. They were kind from the administrative staff to the attorneys! I d highly recommend this group for professionalism and courtesy as well as getting back to you as soon as you need help. If you need an attorney always consider Oswalt Law Office Tempe AZ. ...... Bonnie
I stopped in for a drink and light meal before heading to the airport. Chose the place based on proximity to my training hotel and Yelp ratings and was not disappointed! The restaurant was changing over but the bar was open. The bartenders were attentive and worked well as a team. I never felt rushed even with the change over. I ordered the rosemary Manhattan. It was the best drink of my life. Seriously. Expertly made. I was given a bread basket with olives and two olive tapenades. Tasty but a bit over salted. I wanted something with flavor but not too heavy so I got the beef carpaccio. Very well prepared and perfect for what I was looking for before my flight!
AMAZING!!!! Staff the doctor everyone was wonderful. Thank you soooo much for EVERYTHING! We are from out of town and would Highly recommend them!
O. M. G. I think these are the best donuts I ve ever had! They taste so homemade and fresh. My favorite is the long john with vanilla stuffing. Oh yeah you get to choose your donuts AND choose the filling and watch them stuff them! It s a very cute Instagram worthy shop and they have specialty OMG donuts too like Reese s cup coconut strawberry shortcake brownie maple bacon etc. You have got to try these donuts!
What took me so long to return is what I keep asking myself after visiting the place on New Year s day. I had a tasty trout dish and a butter tart for dessert. The tart was not only huge but probably one of the best tasting tarts I have had in a long time. It had a flaky crust and filling that was just the right amount of gooey.
A fresh bagel from here is like heaven if heaven was a ring shaped carb heavy bread product. I do not recommend Montreal bagels as the base of a sandwich they are best eaten as is or split open with some schmear and eaten open faced. That s it. If you keep the bagels for more than a day then toast them. Keep it simple mkay?
Have enjoyed several lunches and dinners do not know why it s not rated better maybe it s the particular crowd I ll be heading back very soon
I recently had Fab and his team make a cake for my little girl s birthday. The theme was Dora the Explorer and they did an excellent job of recreating all the characters from the show. The cake was moist and very flavourful. We had a white chocolate and raspberry filling. I would highly recommend them again and I ca not wait for the next family function so we can get another one of their cakes.
I was looking to book a massage on short notice 1 2 days in advance and I could not get in at my usual place. Naturally I turned to Yelp to get a suggestion for a good alternative! Inner balance has really good reviews is close to my house and is less expensive than my usual place so I was excited to try it out. I booked an Indian Head Massage and a 30 minute sauna. The appointment started with the head massage. I was seated in a comfortable chair and the massage covered my shoulders neck head and face. It was so relaxing! The sauna was great too. It s a small single person sauna inside the massage room so you can feel comfortable sauna ing schvitzing?? in the nude. Overall the experience at Inner Balance was great and I ll definitely be going back. It s not the same experience as a spa with shower sauna steam whirlpool facilities included in the change room but the price is right and the massage is good quality. If anyone is looking for a spa without extra bells and whistles give this place a try! Things to know to make your visit even better They have approx 10 stalls for free customer parking behind the building. Wear something comfortable head massage is done fully clothed . Drink a lot of water before the sauna so that you do not get de hydrated from all the sweating. Be prepared to stay 15 minutes after your appointment time to shower after the sauna. Bring your own shampoo conditioner and body wash.
We loved the Angry Crab Shack. The service was great. Everyone is so nice and peppy! Then comes the amazing food. We had the mussels and the crab legs in the trifecta sauce...oh my yummy goodness. We also had the clam strips which were clammy and delicious! Be prepared to get messy but do not worry you get a bib and there s a communal wash area to wash away all that yummy goodness from your hands. We will be going back!
I mean this place just oozes comradery and good will. On Sunday s they offer free brunch which is always a hit. There are hanging swings in the outdoor garden and they have a lovely patio area that promotes community and mingling. Any day the sun is out I love to sit on their hanging swing with some friends and enjoy a pina colada. They source plenty of beer from all of Charlotte s top breweries and have plenty of other knick knacks ranging from authentic art for sale to gourmet snacks. They are located right behind smelly cat so I feel sometimes they can be missed but are truly one of NoDa s gems.
I have now been to this place a couple times and not had a bad experience. You cannot beat 40 for an hourlong massage. And it s a FANTASTIC massage you d expect a lot less with that price tag. Clean facility and friendly staff. It s a neighborhood gem.
I ve been fulfilling all my Ossington pho needs at The Other Pho place for a while now because I know what to expect there. No more! One visit and I m a Pho Tien Thanh convert. The service was great a lovely young fellow greeted me at the door and helped me to a comfortable table away from the door. For the rest of my visit he was attentive friendly AND understood the steps of service which are not limited as many pho places think to take order and drop off food . And the pho was excellent. My little plate of pho accessories came with all the usuals plus a hot red chili and a delicious leaf I was not familiar with. The broth was flavourful and full bodied and the rare beef was actually red when it was served. Amazing. Decor was meh but I expect that from pho joints. At least there was no television drone or crappy radio station playing. And as all that love is not enough my small pho was actually cheaper than The Other Pho place. Pho heaven.
I ve been coming to this place for a few years now and the place has great N.Y. style pizza at great prices. Its like 7 or 8 for a large or you can get 2 slices and a drink for less than 5. I ve also had their meatball sub and a few other sandwiches and they have all been delicious. My kid loves the plain cheese pizza its definitely his favorite we both love the thin crispy fold able crust. I have to try the ribs next time because we always get the pizza because its so good.
just had food delivered it was great... thats some great salsa!!! I had street tacos and a GIANT chimi that i will probably eat for two days!!
This place makes me feel absolutely ridiculous for going to El Carnicero Barrio or Momocho for tacos. La Plaza s are the only tacos I ve had in Cleveland that are heavy on flavor and light on pretense. I had the al pastor and chorizo tacos from El Carnicero a week ago and I had the same from La Plaza today and it honestly made me laugh. El Carnicero and by proxy Momocho does not even come close. These restaurants like many in Cleveland simply gild marginal food with micro greens and bullshit so they can charge the lemming like Cleveland foodies as much as they please. If you re not a foodie groupie moron and you want a good taco come to La Plaza. Get some chicarrones and tamales while you re there.
I have lived all around the world and never eaten so good sea food. Simply heaven. Cleanest bathrooms I ve ever seen. It s like stepping into a living room of a multimillionaire. Italian waitress who really is from Italy. Fantastic hidden gem. Typically I do not write reviews but I had to after being there. Moved me. You want to impress your girl take her there.
Gelato gelato and more gelato! When I was in Vegas in August I came to Jean Philippe Patisserie almost every night. Instead of doing a nightcap ritual at a bar I did a gelato cap at Jean Philippe! I truly made it my goal to try almost every flavor of gelato. But I ended up finding some favorites including the stracciata or something like that it s vanilla with their world famous chocolate and the mint chocolate chip! What s more if you get just a scoop of it it s actually reasonable for Vegas standards 3 bucks and some change. I made a mistake the first night and got a milkshake since I m a milkshake fan that was nine bucks! They have crepes and pastries too. I might try those out but I m seriously in love with their gelato.
Just wanted to update. This place is still pretty awesome. They ve added more drinks to their menu but the food is just as good. Last week I found myself craving their food when I was in Vegas. I picked this place over Vegas buffets! There s nothing like a good bowl of soup noodles to warm you right up.
Wicked spoon Oh how you make me so happy... This buffet is not like any other typical buffet... single servings prepared for you the dessert bar is huge an island on its own. .. Oh and thai tea ice cream YES! Oh the shrimp cocktail!!! Oh the shrimp wheat ball!!! I can go on and on but I wo not ... You have to come and check it out for yourself... And Maryann Thank you for such great service A See you again next time wicked spoon
One of the best Mexican restaurants I have been to. The food is fantastic terrific flavours and great portions. Large variety to choose from. Took my daughter there for a belated 16th bday. We had beef and steak Chimichangas for our main and the portions were huge. Came with perfectly cooked rice diced tomato salsa and a fresh bean dip with fresh home made tortilla chips. For desert my daughter had Churros with chocolate sauce and a coconut whipped cream best she said she has ever had I was too full but kids have a bottomless pit when it comes to eating Will come back with the rest of my family when time permits. Highly recommended. Great Service
I came here after looking at the mixed reviews not knowing what to expect. I got bio gel extensions and shellac on top for 50 great price the service was very very quick almost rushed but she did a really good job. Better than most places ! She did a good job shaping the nails but the polish was a little hasty . Would def return again though end result was worth it
I had suffered an injury with an ankle for over seven year keeping me pretty much at home for years. The injury that was never diagnosed until I had visited Dr. Jeppeson at Impression Foot and Ankle for a second opinion. My specialist felt there was indeed a problem but he could not find it. Dr. Jeppeson quickly diagnosed a vertically split tendon from an MRI taken moths before. I found Dr. Jeppeson and his entire staff were extremely friendly and very professional. No long waits in an overcrowded office. Appointments were treated in a timely fashion. I had seen several other specialists over the years that did not take me seriously enough to look into my issue. He is trying every way to find how to best treat my issue. It s such a relief to know I finally feel validated! I highly recommend them!
I am not one to usually write a review on anything but in this instance I just had too. This place is amazing and the entire staff is so friendly and welcoming. As this is a new business for at least the past 2 days they offered free haircuts. Now I am very skeptical of getting my hair done at all let alone by a new business and free. Well I was very impressed for the first time in years I love my hair and will be a frequent visitor! I went in on Friday and not only did they give me an amazing cut they told me to bring my children back for their free cuts as well. I did and my ever so picky teenager loved her hair as well. Yup I think we have found a new home well done and welcome to the community!
Was in the mood for Persian food and this place certainly delivers the best I ve ever tried. The place is so elegantly decorated without being too much. Staff are really nice and attentive. Food overall is delicious and so flavourful.. so many different things put together are so inspiring to my palate I ca not wait to go again! Had the Darbar kabob with rice and some appetizer plate to start. Worth going back for for sure.
We really enjoyed our wine and appetizers on Timo s back patio. It was the night of the Sunnyslope Art Walk and they were slammed with people. After a reasonable wait we had a very helpful server great bottle of wine Snapdragon Pinot Noir and appetizers try the warm fig and prosciutto so good! . We will definitely be back to support this gem in our neighborhood...
Wonderful dinner show! I saw my first dinner battle when I was 16 in Chicago. This had the same ba zing to it! Great show...dinner was good half baked chicken wonderfully cooked potato veggies... tomato soup which for me to not like tomato soup cuz it s normally plain this was good flavored! . We sat in the dragon section which was right in the middle. great views and the performances were good.
I love the staff at cigar king. The staff is very knowledgeable and helpful when recommending cigars to try. I appreciate that they know details about the cigars and take the time to educate you on what type of tobacco is used. The staff also takes time to make you feel comfortable and at home. The soap in the bathroom smells delicious as well and they actually sell shaving products cleansing products and more. Cigar King also has a great selection of watches and sun glasses. I actually try to keep my husband away from this section because I worry he ll come home with a new watch. Whenever I am in the store they allow me to try on the different watches and their selection is fantastic.
Great place to get a quality burger. Good efficient service. Not many places with good food around the Macedonia area I highly recommend this place. There are veg. options on the menu I believe it was a black bean burger which I did not try but if it s half as good as the beef burger it s worth the trip!
I think this is my new favorite brunch places to go to now! The energy of the restaurant brings people in such as their DJ this older lady which I m assuming was the manager dancing by the door totally cute! and service was great! I ordered their coconut toast recommended by the waiter but it was okay I m just picky when it comes to coconut. I m not a big fan of coconut flakes sprinkled on my toast. Their mimosa flight was unique. I would definitely recommend this place to locals around the valley for breakfast and brunch
I absolutely love Dr. Peck and her staff. From my first visit every experience has been pleasant including when I had to have fillings filled . What I like most is that Dr. Peck actually takes the time to get to know you as a patient and explains everything to you whether it be looking at X rays or telling you what she s is doing while examining your mouth. Her staff is also friendly and professional. After having a horrible experience with another dentist in the area who told me I had not one not two but 13 cavities finding Dr. Peck was a blessing. And for the record there were only two cavities nothing to brag about but still. I regained my trust in a REAL dentist who is not looking to fill her pocket book but keep my oral health in check!
Excellent AYCE Sushi. We sat at the bar and a waitress took our orders. Had Uni with a quail egg. Yummy. Sweet shrimp was excellent too. The mackerel was very good as was the salmon skin cut roll. For Desert it s pistachio almond ice cream. Everything is really good here. They play nice music too. Nice experience tonight.
I am very fortunate to have found Dr. Bowen Chan. He detected that I had a tumour and got me a MRI within days. His patient and calm demeanor has made this terrible experience a bit more bearable. The staff are very courteous and the clinic is very clean and organized. If you do not have family Dr I highly recommend Dr. Chan.
Good beers. I am a fan of non pastuerized beers which are more rare than one would think. This place has a couple of bottle conditioned ales which I love! The standard in Bottle conditioned ales is the Chimay Blue Label. But it is so damn expensive I ca not drink it all the time. However this beer called Brother Thelonius is outstanding. It may even be a better than Chimay Blue Label. Perhaps someday I will try the two side by side. Love the beer selection!
I find this place to be really great. I ve been using it for about 8 months now. I visited and had my dogs try out a few other facilities in Vegas before choosing this one. The Henderson pet resort is much cleaner and nicer than the other facilities I looked at and I find the staff there to all be extremely pleasant. They re always smiling and seem to be in a good mood. I use this resort a lot for our two Aussie s to have fun playing at daycare and boarding as well when we ca not take them with us. We recently returned from a two week trip to Europe and every day while we were over there I was able to watch them playing on the web cams. Even when we were in the Alps with little service the cameras always worked. I called to check in on them and any time I do they always give me an update and are happy to answer any questions. It can be a bit expensive especially with 2 dogs but the pricing is straight forward and there are not any surprises. I also find it to be pretty similar to other facilities. It s worth the cost for peace of mind! I d definitely recommend this place.
We went for breakfast on a thursday had a few minutes wait but not bad. Kelly our waitress was great. She was running her butt off waiting tables and tending bar but we never were neglected. Coffee was great. Portions were as said before HUGE. I had the chicken and waffles which were great. I could of used more syrup and or the sauce drizzled around the edge of the plate. My husband had the tractor diver combo with french toast. It came with warm bananas and walnuts but they were easily pushed to the side if thats not your cup of tea. We will definately go again next time we are in Vegas.
I enjoy seeing movies at Suncoast because they have great stadium seating with alternating row with rocking seats and a great sound system. They have a parking garage on the end of the casino that makes it pretty easy to get in to the theater without having to travel all the way through the casino. The downside is that when you come in to see a movie you usually come out smelling like smoke. Over all I really like that they show more of the art house style films than most of the other theaters in town do not . The ticket takers are also nice and I am pretty sure that most of them have some sort of disability....I really appreciate a company that hires without discrimination.
Nacho Daddy Downtown has officially taking the 1 spot in my most favorite locations! I have now dined at all of the ones around town but this one by far takes the cake. My family was visiting from out of town and I decided to book a reservation online since it was the weekend and with this location being downtown I anticipated it to be packed. Boy was I right! It pays to be proactive in these kind of situations... When we arrived our party of 6 was greeted by the friendly hostess outside and from there seated right away! Shortly after are awesome server came over I believe his name was Erick but he spelled it with an A.. like Aerick or something? Anyways he was really pleasant to have on this dining experience. Super attentive funny and just all around the perfect server. For drinks we started off with a few margaritas and I used the Yelp check in margarita option with an upgraded tequila.. second round with with a top shelf Cadillac margarita and it was the bomb! Made Just how I like it! Food was delicious we ordered Chicken Enchiladas Tender chicken wrapped up in two thick corn tortillas smothered in red or green enchilada sauce Monterey jack cheddar cheese and sour cream. Smothered Burrito Flour tortilla stuffed with your favorite protein refried beans Mexican rice Monterrey jack and cheddar cheese smothered in your choice of red or green enchilada sauce. Served with sour cream guacamole salsa pico de gallo and house made Chips. Mix and Match Any 2 Fajitas Filet Mignon and Grilled Shrimp. Served with fajita peppers and onions cherry tomato pico de gallo sour cream and guacamole with a side of Mexican rice and refried beans flamed tableside. Choice of flour or corn tortillas and Daddy s salsa. Nacho Daddy For The Win!!!
They will have a new regular customer. This place is way better than Nando s. They have daily specials. We had the chicken wraps yuca and fries. The chicken is delicious and cooked just right. Try the yuca! The fries are just like Costco fries. The two guys who served us were very nice. I think the price is very reasonable.
I have come to the part of this story where I like going to certain places. This is a certain place I will be end up going to for a while. It is close. It is nice. Its was you want a medium sized bar to be with its sultry dim lighting and vocaloid beats. I once saw some dancing and I like that. I like it a lot. Keep it up. R
The great little sushi gem on the dobson and guadalupe block! Small place big on food! Owned and operated by a husband and wife team that serve up some fresh fish and amazing platters also! The teriyaki and katsu plates are excellent portions bursting with flavor. Im not very into sushi rolls and crazy americanized creations but have ordered some with friends and they are very delicious. My favorites are the sashimi and poke bowls. Sashimi is always super fresh offering many unique seasonal catches including yellowtail bluefin and one of my favorites right now salmon belly! Ohhhh the best salmon belly I ve ever had. Cut perfectly taste so clean and marbled. Nice hot tea also and a small family atmosphere keep me coming back for more. Make sure to tell Jay see you tomorrow hahaha he loves that!
Delightful food in a magical setting. I suggest going at night when the lights and candles are flickering. Eat outside. The food is fantastic. The only thing we did not like was the shiitake mushrooms. They were too smokey. Worth the money.
Super cool coffee shop in the heart of the Mexican War Streets area! The coffee and tea here is very good the staff are friendly and prices are good. Commonplace has a really nice atmosphere it s very chill a lovely bright open space with windows on two sides and a few chairs outside. I love how they have renovated the space but have also managed to maintain a lot of the buildings original features. In addition to the great beverages they sell cookies and doughnuts.
Most creative dishes I ve tried in toronto in a very long time. Frog legs raging and tuna were to die for. Would love to go back and try every other dish on the menu.
I love this place. The food was good as was the service. With that said the only downfall is that I could see this place being downright horrible for business meetings and being horribly congested during lunch get it and go!
This was probably my favorite Middle Easter Mediterranean food grocery store that we found during our time in Vegas. The prices were good comparable to the bigger Middle Eastern places we have in LA. I loved that they had some of the things I was craving for because otherwise I would ve had to go pretty much our whole trip without my favorite things. The store was pretty clean for the most part and they had a good variety in terms of products for the size of the store. The workers are friendly and willing to help you find out what s good and in terms of branding they had pretty much all the big brands that you wanted for your products and a select few products had smaller brands that I had yet to come across. All in all it s a pretty good place to shop if your looking for some of the Middle Eastern Mediterranean foods!
I like the lunch buffet. The owner is a nice genuine person who interacts with guest.
The pizza was great and the space was perfect for my one and three year old. We celebrated my daughter s birthday there and she had a blast and felt very special.
Really loved their food it took about 10 minutes for my eyes to adjust since it s extremely dark inside but it goes with the ambiance. I do prefer more lighting just because you never know if there is a hair in your food. The quality is nice servers were attentive and polite the entrance was fun but the restrooms are under kept. It s worth going for the experience and the dishes we tried were very tasty I would not come here all the time but perhaps often.
10 for the Brisket sampler which includes sliced brisket baked beans coleslaw and jalapeno cornbread. Surprisingly the brisket was pretty good considering it came out of a truck! The cornbread was nice and moist baked beans and slaw were OK. I like that Urban Smoke prepares their brisket sliced and not pulled because there is a lot more skill involved and you ca not really hide behind your sauce. I do hope more Toronto food trucks have this kind of quality. I posted a pic of the Brisket sampler.
UberEATS. I ordered from a nearby hotel and watched my order from processing to delivered within 30 mins. Excellent value and taste pretty good. It s not like a Hawaiian plate lunch but it ll do when you re traveling and need to get your Asian rice. I ordered from here twice during my week out in Charlotte. Be sure to ask for soy sauce and chopsticks in the UberEATS app.
One of THE best poutines Montreal has to offer! I ordered the traditional with bacon and onions. DELICIOUS!! Fries are perfect not soggy the gravy ai not heavy or over salty and the cheese curds pieces are huge and tasty! Caramelized onions are the best I ve ever had and the chunks of bacon was amazing! All this for under 10! I recommend to all!
The price is right and the food is dynamite. The fact that Charlotte has a good sushi place downtown was exciting for me. They have lots of fresh fish and they even deliver. If you like sushi definitely check this place out.
Every Tuesday when I go to play D and D I ll stop in to get a slice or two and I ve always enjoyed it. I especially recommend getting the Chicago stuffed pizza which I ca not get enough of. When I m next door playing at Pegasus Games there are always deliveries from Pizza Pit from the very friendly staff who do not charge extra for the delivery itself. Our gaming society and Pizza Pit share a very cohesive relationship pizza is something that to me seems almost essential for when I m doing a campaign and it s great for groups when they have a big party. It seems like being next door to each other makes Pizza Pit s business quite profitable and an ideal location. Thank you guys keep doing what you re doing!
Cupcakes are trendy but these delicious little treats are the real thing. Each flavour has something a little different. The moist banana cake has a succulent square of fudge wedged on top the carrot cake sports delicate strands of caramelized carrot woven into a cloud of cream cheese icing and my favourite is the lemon tart which features an injection of lemon right in the middle and light and fluffy meringue on top. Coffee and cupcake deals are on offer and the cute atmosphere definitely invites a late afternoon rendez vous.
Chinese Mexican and Jamaican! Trifecta. Definitely get points for originality..... plus it was on the food network on Man vs Food . I like the Red Jade chicken with pork fried rice mixed with refried beans! It was delicious! I have to bump this up a star since I m pretty much addicted to this place. The jade red chicken pork fried rice and refried beans is a great trifecta and I usually mix it up for the 2nd entree either pork carnitas jerk chicken or any of the other many great items they have here.
Ive decided to upgrade my review from 4 to 5 stars. I go to this pub at least once a week to grab a bite and a pint. As always there is a great selection of beer on tap with a couple of rotating taps. The food is the some of best pub food ive had for a sports bar. The dishes are creative and full of flavor. They also do an all you can eat hotdog buffet for big events like the grey cup. Im looking forward to the super bowl for there next hot dog buffet! My favorite dish here has to be the meat loaf. I know what your thinking...meatloaf at a sports bar??? Trust me its better then my mothers hope she doesnt read this . All in all this is my go to place to hang out with friends eat good food and to catch the big game. TIP this place has gotten a lot busier lately. A reservation will guarentee you a spot and is reccomended for a big game.
It s a very cozy place with great food tasty drinks fun atmosphere and good music. I went there on a Wednesday night and it was packed and vibrant. My friend and I ordered the squash poutine which was amazing the torch mackerel and the tempura prawns which were very tasty and filling. For drinks I tried the cocktail with sake it was delicious and fresh. I definitely recommend this place
The Skinny even though this is the smallest selection compared to the other Whole Foods it has the best in store specials and samples. The service is generally better with friendlier cashiers. Even though the West Charleston location is closer to my home I will trek it out here to shop at this Whole Foods too. I usually do a package deal I hit Trader Joe s on Buffalo and this store in one go because they are just so close to one another. Why do I come here? Yes this place is tiny compared to the other Whole Foods. However I must say the in store specials are better at this store than at the Charleston location and are easier to find due to the size of the store. I have found their baking section has a different selection again smaller than their other counterpart. Their meat and seafood department is substantially smaller so I usually do not make my meat purchases here. I find it is easier to shop here I do not find myself roaming through the endless aisles looking for stuff. I really do appreciate the fact that I can get in and get out quickly without too much fuss. After perusing the deli section I think that theirs is nicer than the Charleston location even though it is smaller. Let s face it a lot of the time the Charleston location is so picked over. The Lake Mead deli area is clean and they have a different selection compared to what is available at the other store. So in short both locations appeal for different reasons.
I love this restaurant! It has a good menu different from other Pgh menus. We go here often and I usually get the Cobb salad its great. On Tuesday I tried the coconut shrimp tacos they were so good! The spicy shrimp appetizer is my favorite. The restaurant is pretty we have always had good servers. If you have to wait they have a lovely waiting area it is just always an enjoyable experience to dine here.
My friends recommended this barber shop and I am normally used to getting my haircut by the same barber since I was little so I was very nervous. After meeting Tom and getting my hair cut by him just one time I knew this is now the barber for me. He understands all of your instructions and he follows through 100 . Once he s done you will be glad that you came here to get your hair cut.
Favorite taco spot. The music the GUACAMOLE! The quality of tacos and the many different tacos that you get to choose from makes it all worth while. On Tuesday s of course you will get a louder crowd but it is still fun and the atmosphere is lively who does not love that when going out for Tacos y beer? We have brought many friends and family here and always recommend it to everyone who asks for a good spot because it is simply the best. Good vibe good food no complaints! My favorite tacos are Carne Asada Chorizo Baja fish El Pastor
Southern kitchen meets fancy urban industrial loft. Cozy yet loud and lively. Ca not really find better words to describe the decor but somehow it all works. We ordered the chicken watermelon and waffles the shrimp grits and the fried Oreos for dessert. To drink I got the bourbon lemonade and the boyfriend got an old fashioned. He s a bit of a snob when it comes to old fashioneds and this place not only met but exceeded his standards. Everything was delicious. The chicken the waffles the watermelon the shrimp and grits. All delicious. We cleaned off our plates. My least favorite thing was the fried Oreos but they still were not bad at all. It just means I ll have to try another dessert the next time I m here. As good as the food was the service was even better. From the hostess the waitress the manager and the bus boy the service here was absolutely on point. This place has easily become a favorite and I ll certainly be back the next time I come to Vegas.
Great full service hotel overall in CLT. Stayed there more than 20 times. The location is not savory but inside is good. Restaurant is pretty good for food and drinks gym is reasonably good. Staff is friendly and the concierge room is good for bfast super nice girl that runs the concierge AM. Also the option for gold members to have a full service free bfast. Easy access to CLT off 77
The margaritas were great salsa and chips were yummy shredded beef tacos and tamale were tasty however the enchiladas were a bit smothered in cheese.. could not really taste them. Four stars because I have not been to a good Mexican restaurant in a while... live in the east coast ... plus the margaritas were really good. Ha!
I love this place. They have the best breakfast ever. Everything is so good. I am a sucker for sweets. I could eat here every morning. I am so glad they finally opened a location closer to me. Love Love LOVE!
Bellagio have always been one of the better buffet especially famous for their prime rib. Just got out of lunch buffet today very disappointed. I felt totally ripped off at 38 per person with the selection and quality of food they have now. First the prime rib is half the size of what it used to be plus it s over cooked and super tough. King crab snow crab caviar salmon tuna sushi all no where to be found today. The pork ribs and fish are all dryer out and under seasoned. The remaining selection is all breakfast stuff like pancakes waffle bacon and eggs. That s what you call holiday gourmet lunch buffet? Bellagio come on your buffet is not what it used to be I rather go back to Aria next door. Update 9 2018 The manager at the Bellagio Buffet have us come back to try the buffet again. They have improved a lot on the quality of food served for their weekend gourmet dinner. One of the props will be they have hot king crabs now instead of people need to get in line to have the chef heat it up one by one which takes a bit of time. They did a great job on all the fish dishes and the prime rib this time I visited.
3.5 5. Stopped in before a movie for a few drinks and appetizers today Sunday afternoon . It was pricy but we knew that in advance. I might have given five stars but we listened to several female bartenders complain over... and over... and over again about what a bad day they had at work. We get it it was busy. Please be more mindful of what your patrons are listening to. The side of the bar we were on was empty there certainly was not a wait for the restaurant. It was a bummer to listen to them complain. They were VERY nice to us food was amazing the mood was just a bummer. We ll think twice before coming back with so many other nearby options. No weekend happy hour.
If you live in Las Vegas there s a never ending debate of Total Wine vs Lee s Discount Liquor. While I appreciate Mr. Lee s quirky billboards the employees at some of the locations are plain scary and the down home tear it down put it up appearance of his stores leave much to be desired. The win for Lee s is number of locations. With this new store in Centennial shopping center Total Wine barely made it to three. However this third location dotted a map in uncharted territory of North Western Las Vegas and I m in! The polished uniformed corporate experience competitive prices flyers and coupons in my mailbox I do not know what incentive I have at this point to go anywhere else. I have never tasted wine in my 38 years nor smoked a cigar so I ca not comment but I dearly love beer and seasonal sections as well as craft brews warm my heart to it s yeast loving core. New store delivers on all accounts greeting at the door smiling accommodating employees I m a total winer from here on. Welcome to the neighborhood!
Wow. I m really shocked at some of the reviews here. This place is great. I got the burger and it was delicious.
Went there to try their lunch special the other day and it was worth it! Not only do they have EEGEES which would make me go just for that but the pizza was really good too! Got the 5 lunch special and the slice was HUGE. Good sauce and a funny atmosphere. I will definitely be back!!
Lovely and tasteful selection of fish. Unfortunately the place is really small and cannot take larger parties unless you go at an off peak time. I went around 6 and there was a two seater table available to us.
My husband daughter and I visited this location on a busy Friday night. We were told that the wait was about 15 mins but honestly it was busy so we expects to wait some. After about 30 mins my husband teased the manager saying he was starving etc. THIS manager was so AWESOME he asked us what our fav appetizer was and he sent it to our table on him! I love this place MARC ANTHONY mgr is FANTASTIC and knows how to make his customers feel appreciated! Thanku Brixx and Thanku MARC!!
Amazing service and on top of that they have vegan dishes on their menu. Super friendly staff very attentive and on top of things. Jason Duran was the manager when we dined and he was friendly and very welcoming. I m definitely coming back. Oh if possible try the Tiger drink ... So yummy!!!
AMAZING customer service! Store manager Kyle was very informative and professional also very handsome . The service was quick and they do not waste your time trying to talk you into a repair that is not necessary. I highly recommend this location.
Great place for lunch with healthy options to eat and snacks to go. Very friendly staff
My favorite farmer s market in the valley area by far! My favorite thing about this market is that everything is spread out nicely. A lot of other ones are kind of crammed but this is a great open area. Lines never seem too long of me because there are a lot of booths too! Plus the people there are just super nice haha both the people working and people attending. Another great thing is all of the parking. I have never had any trouble finding parking for this farmer s market before. I have discovered so many new and great things through the Gilbert market! My favorite is Uprooted Kitchen a vegetarian food truck. Also The Florette a truck selling flower arrangements is a new amazing addition. Love this farmer s market is especially fun during this time of year and I am excited to continue coming here!
Our family has been here since 2009. They call us the family. They welcome us and know our names. Ryan goes and above and beyond and always has a glass of wine and knows our orders. She provides our demanding 5 year old with pizza dough and talks to our 13 year old about middle school. Those small things mean a lot and her service makes us repeat customers. The food is always fresh and if we request extra crispy pizza they come out and verify it is to our standards. This is the place we call our neighborhood dinner place where we get fresh food and friendly service! We love this place and recommend this to anyone in the neighborhood.
Hands down Monta has the best Japanese ramen in Las Vegas. I ve tried my fair share of ramen places in Los Angeles and Vegas and it s safe to say Monta beats everybody out of the park. The noodles are perfectly cooked every single time. The broth is perfectly filled with flavor but not too heavy at the same time. I love the thin noodles. I also love all their fried rice cooked to order and their gyoza appetizer. I m not a huge fan of the 2 new ramen specials but Monta never fails.
Definitely a family favorite! Anytime I take my family out to dinner I pick this place. The environment is so inviting and the servers are always so sweet. Also the food is great quality and priced perfectly. I HIGHLY recommend!
Place is awesome. Super fresh menu is easy to understand and the customer service is awesome and friendly. You can get a customized order or order signature dishes. Really good and tasty.
A solid spot for burrito s! All the staple items with fresh ingredients and great offers... Tuesday and Thursday!
Good to have a little taste of Hawaii in Las Vegas. The sticky rice was perfect. The prices were better then Hawaii lol and the taste was just as good. I ca not wait to try more local favorites when I have the fix.
This show is fantastic! It is hilarious! I have not laughed that hard in a long time! You wo not be disappointed choosing to see this show during your Vegas trip! Book it! Trust me!
A little disapointed. Husband got a Mixta Carmelo and I got a California Burrito. He liked his a lot. Mine was too salty and a little chewy. And I can take down a bag of chips. Yeah we re white people from Iowa and West Virginia. But we ve purposely stayed away from huge chains and tried many mexican places in our 3 years here. Very willing to try other items from here.
This place has the best margaritas we tried 5 different ones! Verano de Jalisco was our favorite. Amazing! The Queso Fundido with chorizo pepitas and truffle honey was to die for. Service was awesome. Great place to hang out and have drinks and appetizers with friends.
It seems Primanti purists dislike suburban locations because of the increased menu options and space but as a mom of twins it s one of the reasons I like this location. The restaurant is split into the bar side and restaurant side. Both sides have TVs and similar seating but the bar side tends to be louder. They do have high chairs and kids menus available which is a huge plus in my book these days. The menu has the reasonably prices traditional Primanti sandwiches. You can also add things like egg or double meat. The menu also has wings various appetizers salads pizzas and sandwiches. There are daily specials as well. I m a wing lover and Sunday is 50 cent wings! Service was friendly although a bit slow and all of our food was as promised on the menu and quite tasty. Overall a nice experience.
This is my favorite store in the country. Its kind of the feeling you get when you go into a huge candy shop when your a kid. They have all the top equipment at the best prices. The people who own and run these stores are pioneers to the sport and not just some corporation that doesnt care. OTM gives back to the sport and that is important to me as a consumer. Whether you are looking for some cool t shirts or some new training equipment this is the place to be. Anybody who trains and lives or vacations in vegas should check this place out. Best regards PASS THE GUARD Pete The Greek
Coming from Philadelphia it was a struggle to find good Chinese food in Las Vegas. I am sooo glad yelp helped me find Liang s. This place is now one of my go to s and although everything menu sounds amazing it s hard to deviate from our favorites! You ca not go wrong with the beef roll the best soup dumplings in Vegas and eggplant with Sichuan garlic sauce. If you can only get one dish order the beef roll cilantro thin slices of beef and an amazing freshly made wrap! If you love Chinese food check this place out.
Very friendly and helpful. Awesome stuff. I love this Trader Joe s wish it was the inner harbor.
I ve been a member of the yoga studio for more than six months and for this period have taken all the classes offered many multiple times. Before selecting a yoga studio I went to a number of different ones in the city but finally decided on Santosha. This is what won it for me. From the first class I was very impressed with the high level of professionalism of the instructors their knowledge friendliness and positive attitude. This first impression not only lasted for a long time but was also frequently reinforced throughout many of the fun sessions that followed. Along with wonderful staff I really enjoy the atmosphere in the studio. The high ceiling wood floor great music selection decoration lighting make me feel I am no longer in the city but at an exotic place. This helps me to forget about everything else at least for the moment and allows me to concentrate of my practice. The studio also has a great variety of classes. Although my preferred style is Ashtanga I ve tried Moksha Kripalu hot flow restorative yin yang power yoga to get an idea of what each style has to offer. After having tried them I still like Ashtanga best but I also love having the option to engage in something different every once in a while. Class sizes can vary greatly I ve been to a session when there was an instructor and two other people and in sessions so full that mats were touching very very rarely Most of the time however the class size is between 10 to 15 people so one has plenty of room in each cardinal direction The studio is located in the heart of Mission. There are plenty of coffee shops and stores around so if I am early for a practice I can always find something to do. The only downside is that free parking is not easily available. I ve parked in the covered parkade that is attached to the studio parking is only 2 and on the street where parking fees depend on the time of the day free after 6pm . The nice people from Santosha have created a map of the street parking in the area which can guide you in your quest of finding cheap or free parking. If you are choosing a yoga studio it s definitely worth giving it a try.
Always consistent always delicious fast friendly service. Yes at times there is a line however very worth the wait. Grab a coffee from the coffee place next store while you wait. Looking forward to their new location next store and many delicious breakfasts to share!
Best Margaritas ever. Really fresh ingredients. The guacamole and chips were really fresh. Only warning I will give is that the food is spicier than expected. Good thing I love spicy.
Super delicious food! Love the olives they bring you when you sit down loved the salad loved the bread with honey butter loved the spaghetti and meat sauce loved the lemoncello shot with a cookie they bring you after you re meal. Seriously such a nice experience from start to finish. Not a cheap place for sure but so worth the treat! They give you lots too so I look at it like an investment in my next couple of meals great service too super friendly!
I flew to Vegas this past Friday Aug. 15th at noonish on JetBlue from Long Beach. Best decision ever. The airport is easy to navigate the TSA line was not too long the food and drink choices are awesome. Make to wear socks to cross over the TSA lines tho.....i m glad I did! So the JetBlue checking in process was really easy gave the representative my California ID and in seconds he printed my boarding pass. The flight was at 12 48PM and they started boarding at 12 15PM. Everything went smooth and the JetBlue reps were pleasant and helpful. I did not check in any bags... finally made the traveling light dream a reality!
Mongolian BBQ...On the NW corner of Thomas and 15th AvenueLove this place! ...If you go here get the Stir Fry in the front!...I love to add my own ingredients into my bowl which they take from you and stir it all up with the sauce of your choice. Very hearty lots of food. Always hot and fresh! Very friendly!
My dog Ripley recently passed away at the West Park Animal Hospital. The attending vet Jessica Murphy along with the entire staff showed great compassion and caring. It was a very emotional event for me and my family and I could not have asked for more support than I was given. Dr. Murphy even sent a sympathy card. Bottom line very compassionate and caring I offer my highest recommendation!
Amazing repertoire of genre and musical instruments. Dancing music that brings the house down! Loved every moment of it. Love the string!
I drive by this antique store everyday on my way home from work. After reading the reviews I decided to take my wife and kid to try it out. It was amazing! I got the Arizonan and the Chili dog. Both were excellent and was sad I could not finish it because I was so full. But I took it home and the owner even gave me some extra chili in there. We have issues getting my 14 month old to eat sometimes but he scarfed down most of his lil willy. My wife thought hers was excellent too. She said it s one of the best hot dogs she s had and she s from Chicago. I definitely recommend this place. The owner even came out and talked to us a little and made sure everything we had was perfect. I will definitely be going here again.
We have boarded our dogs for 30 years at Cherokee Kennel because it is the best boarding facility we have found. Kim Halverson and Rick are accommodating and give our dogs the same quality of care that they get at home. Our dogs love to go there! Thank you Kim Rick and your whole staff.
The latest storm and 70 mph winds ripped my metal storage shed off 3 sides of the foundation. Hanging onto 1 it blew up and down and items were blown out from under. I called CHHJ the next morning. Sensing my anxiety Scott worked magic with their schedule and sent Chris and 2 Andrews to demo it and haul away the next day. Fast courteous and efficient they are wonderful! Highly recommend this crew!
Best barbecue I ve ever had! The staff are super friendly and helpful. Prices are really good too. We wanted everything so we got the brisket spare ribs and spicy Italian sandwich..soo full but totally worth it. We shared the sandwich and a couple desserts with our friend. It s awesome this place is just up the street from our house..we will definitely be back!! Thanks for the delicious food!
Loved the escape room. You have to solve 4 puzzles in an hour to get out. It was fun but difficult. We had 4 people but I think it would be better with 6 8. I would definitely go back. Ben and Gavin were working and stayed in the room with us and can provide clues if you find a magnifying glass.
The view and the service were the best I have had in a long time. Really knowledgeable and attentive waiters. My favorite part of the experience were the appetizers. You need to get the dates with chorizo and bacon it was so amazing. I am a pizza hunter so we had pizza as appetizer and it was so fresh and delicious. I want to try all the pizzas! The nachos are delicious and very good to share with a big table although you may not want to share with more than 4 people because you will want it all for you . The dishes were good although I wish I would have ordered a meat dish and not fish. I had the ahi tuna and it was not so flavorful. Everybody else had the salmon which I tried and thought was good. If you want to stay low budget and you still want the experience I would recommend to go and get appetizers and enjoy the view. I was full after all those amazing appetizers that we had but I thought it was totally worth the calories. Maybe next time I do not get any appetizers and give their meat plates a try. I cannot wait to try their Cleveland restaurant!
Young lady was very nice I ve ate here many times and I really enjoy their food. Service is great!
Honestly I do not know where some if the negative reviews are coming from. I guess a really busy business will tick off a few. I ve been buying and having my bikes services here for years and have utilized their trade in program for several bikes. For example I purchased my daughter s bike here and when she outgrew it I got a nice trade in value to put towards the new bike. The staff always listens to my needs when I am looking for a new bike and never tries to oversell me. They have always met or exceeded any promised deadlines on any repairs The brands they carry and stock is great and if they need to order something they will most definitely offer that so no no trying just to get stuff off their floor that wo not work for you. You can test out anything you want with no pressure. The hours and really convenient. Pro Bikes is the only place I will go for bike needs.
HOTEL Another great stay at Rio! Check in was a breeze and I was even offered a 10 food beverage credit per day if I opted out of housekeeping. The front desk clerk was great and hooked me up with room 2015 a top floor renovated room in the Ipanema Tower with incredible strip views. It pays to be Diamond and you do not have to pay a ton to become Diamond. PM me for details . CASINO Good energy and great spread of table games including 5 blackjack all day everyday that I was there at least . The dealers could be a little more friendly and inviting but overall solid. Sports book is large and comfortable with a full bar and video poker if you do not feel like sitting in the main area. VALET In town on business I used valet several times and each contact was fast and friendly.
YUMMY YUMMY IN MY TUMMY Pancakes! Best pancakes EVER! They have this Breakfast special that was for about 8 and you get 2 VERY Large VERY Fluffy and VERY delicious pancakes along with eggs and links bacon... I will forever have breakfast here when I m in Vegas!
The owners were really nice. Jeff meticulously took his time applying my gel polish. I am a stickler for edge to edge coverage sealed tips zero run off on the cuticle. Jeff did a fabulous job. While my nails grew the gel didnt budge for 3 weeks. This is a definite go to if you like getting a quality job. Call and make an appointment before you head over.
We got into town late morning yesterday Sat. of Labor Day weekend and drove to Mr. Mamas in the hopes of trying it. We found the place when we spotted the large crowd in front of it. So we figured we ll try this Egg Works we ve now been to 3 Egg Works Egg and I locations as it s really close to our new house we bought in Summerlin. The service like the other 2 locations is great. So nice to see people who actually like their jobs or at least very good at faking it if they re not from the hostess to the waitress and the cashier she was a hoot . I tried the chicken fried steak skillet and holy poop it was AWESOME!!! My husband ordered eggs and bacon and after tasting mine said I should have ordered that. We look forward to becoming regulars here soon based on the wonderful service and the really really good and very reasonably priced food.
I travel for work around the country and internationally and I consider myself a foodie. Thanks to Yelp I found Arawan and I am glad that I did. I had Crab fried rice and one of the best Ever Tom Yum soup. If you are a true Thai food aficionado and you are in Vegas then visit to Arawan is a must.
I had the smoked Tri Tip and The husband had the 10 oz. sirloin which looked more like 16 oz. They come out about 10 cooked on a blazing hot lava stone and you cook it the rest of the way to the way you like it. I cooked mine about 90 seconds on each side and it was perfect medium. You get a trip to the salad bar a small loaf of bread and one item from the hot bar. Salad was delicious. Try the curried rice salad when you go. Service was good. They have plenty of people working there and they explain everything well. Very reasonably priced for all you get. There was a Groupon offered but sold out by the time we tried to get it. We will definitely go back when we want a good steak and I do not want to cook at home.
Great SIMPLE Pizza similar to Brooklyn NY Pizza. An excellent veal sandwich the size of my head. Visiting Toronto Western Hospital and had time for lunch 12 15 minute walk from Dundas Bathurst on a residential street in Little Italy. We forgot to hit a bank machine and when we first popped in the staff directed us to an ATM at the bar across the road. We just went to College Street a block North and there was a CIBC another block West. So we came back and ordered veal sandwich and a pizza slice with a couple of Brio Chinottos one of my favourite pops that s hard to get in North Bay. Pizza was already made so that and the Brios were up right away. Huge slice of pepperoni done NYC or Brooklyn style. Nice sauce just enough cheese nice amount of pepperoni. An amazing simple slice which is the way pizza should be. Veal Sandwich delivered to our table in a paper bag was not sure what to expect. Opened it up and it was on a kaiser roll the size of my head. What I liked about this sandwich is it was not sitting around on a steam table...the veal was freshly fried and hot. A lot of meat with a nice tomato sauce and I ordered hot which meant hot banana peppers on the bottom under the meat. Excellent sandwich. If you want a quick no fuss lunch this little out of the way place is a great spot.
Stumbled upon this gem on our way to Hoover Dam. Breakfast all day delicious food and decent prices. What else could you want?
Gorgeous building and the place is decorated so cute! I had my consultation with Melissa who was ever so pleasant. I decided to freeze off my love handles I do not have much fat but enough to grab the procedure took about an hour and at first it s cold then it feels like someone is grabbing your fat really hard then after a few mins it goes numb. Melissa made sure I was comfy and she offered an iPad or a movie to watch while I wait. They offer water beer or champagne lol!! Ca not wait to post my results
Smiles from the moment we walked in great energy from the employees AMAZING food. I was not able to catch the name of our waitress but she was delightful. Very sweet and personable. The restaurant itself is beautifully decorated with a laid back feel. A bit of a drive from me but it is very worth it!
When I sat down to write this review I was really surprised to see only 3 stars overall for this GC location. I agree with the rating for the Guitar Center on Las Vegas Blvd but the one in Summerlin is TOPS! I ve been a Guitar Center customer since the 80 s. I have always gotten treated well pre and post buyout . Trevor is my go to guy on the sales floor. He s very professional but in a cool down to earth way. He knows his equipment and is an all around great face for the store! Von is my guitar tech 4 life! Not only is he a GREAT guitar tech he s always open to answering questions and discussing gear components for upgrades but does it without making you feel stupid. LOVE this store! You guys ROCK!!!
ok i had the buffet which did this restaurant no justice! We had dinner Sunday night and it was amazing! Indian food is my new favorite cuisine. We had the tandoori platter with lamb and chicken and a veg curry entree saffron rice onion kulcha bread and they have Taj Mahal beer. Every thing was phenomenal. Must go here! Dessert was the cheese ball yummy!
I actually enjoyed the 12.95 entrees. Serving is huge. So youll get your money s worth. The only downside is this branch is bussssy. But yeah overall good service great timing of food good food reasonable prices. Try the roscato wine. I loooove that.
Best place to get yourself in shape. The coaches are fantastic and the programming is like nothing else I ve experienced at other facilities. The best part of RISE is the sense of community everyone is genuinely there to help you not just achieve your fitness goal but exceed it. If you are looking for a place you will eventually call a second home RISE is where it s at.
The power was fading in half our house and we called out NV Energy they had to turn the electric off because a lug was bad in the panel and the house was in danger of burning to the ground. The house is old and the lug was hard to find but the owners of 24 7 Electrical Services helped us locate a new lug for the panel. Instead of charging us 2 400 for a new panel we paid 100 for the lug and they installed it for 125. These are great people who wo not rip you off. Highly recommend this company.
This place deserves recognition for doing things a little bit differently. It s a little hole in the wall in the middle of nowhere so you might not expect much walking in. I do not know how many times I have to say this but do not judge a book by its cover. It looks like a family owned and run place eastern european russian or something I do not exactly know but that s not important. What is important is their unique menu and wide variety of choices. I actually found myself a little bit overwhelmed when I looked at all the choices many of them healthy some of them not this is a pizza place after all . They do all the unhealthy stuff that you re used to eating and craving at a pizza place but if you need to check out something a little lighter you ll be right at home. They offer a wide variety of platters salads wraps quesadillas and of course pizzas. Many things on their menu are vegetarian vegan organic or otherwise health friendly but not all of it of course. The first time I went here I tried 1 of their signature dishes the chicken chop. It was brown rice chopped chicken and plenty of fresh vegetables served over some field greens and looked kind of like a salad mixed with a chicken rice bowl. Big old portions and quality ingredients. I could not complain cuz it tasted pretty good too. I ve also had their mini chicken pizza served with mozzarella cheese pesto and diced tomatoes on wheat dough. A tasty and surprisingly filling treat well complimented by the side of onion rings I tried that day. Business seems modest for this place and I do not know if they will survive. I think it would be a shame if they went under because they bring something different to the table in a city saturated with greasy and unhealthy vices. I really recommend you give them a shot because they at least deserve an a for effort.
Went on a Saturday night and read good reviews on the service here surprisingly when we walked in we were not greeted for a good 5mins and then attempted to get someone s attention for another 5mins until we finally walked up to the sushi counter and tried to flag someone down to seat us There were many empty tables . Food and service after this was great. We tried 3 rolls for 2 people and was definitely filling. Their rolls selection was unique and the torches tuna was our favourite. Would like to visit again to try the rest of this menu
The pork bahn mi is fantastic crispy egg rolls and the lemongrass beef stir fry with vermicelli noodles. ..very tasty! A huge compliment coming from an Asian.
This place is great..it s clean and the food is amazing ...the best coconut shrimp I have ever had.. my boyfriend had the taco sampler and it was delicious..
I just had a second massage with Brianna. Very impressed. The massage really is deep tissue. My back is feeling much better after her work. What s more she listens. Usually when you get a massage you tell the therapist what you want and they do not really do it. Brianna by contrast works the areas you ask for in just the way you ask and need.
I wanted to update my review as a lot of things have changed for Kristy. Please check out my previous review to get the full picture! If you are new to the area new to waxing or just seeking a new esthetician you ve found her! Her other reviews may be old but it s only because she is so consistent. She was able to communicate via text so I sent her a message and she promptly replied. We were able to set everything up via text which is very convenient for me. Kristy has been working a full time job and using her off time to perform her amazing services. Well on July 1 she will be a full time esthetician! This is great news for anyone who wanted to work with Kristy but their schedules did not line up. Additionally Kristy has moved to a more convenient location on Eastern and St. Rose by Lowe s. It is still close to Henderson but is easier to reach for people like me who live elsewhere. The new salon is completely adorable with a quaint Tuscan feel. Her room is much bigger than where she was before and the decor is both sexy and chic. One of the great things is that Kristy seeks out value and quality in her locations which is great news for us. We do not have to worry about exorbitant pricing or big chain attitudes. You feel right at home and truly taken care of. When we started the wax I could tell immediately that I was in good hands. She prepped the area with quality products and used small to medium sized strips of hard wax to remove the hair. It is Kristy s use of smaller strips that allows her to lessen your pain while maintaining good time. She sets aside a full 30 minutes for Brazilian waxes which is an adequate amount of time even for inexperienced or first time waxes. The chains typically have a quota to meet and time limits in place that can ruin any experience 15 minutes is not always enough time! For me to say This is the best wax experience I ve ever had ever really does mean a lot after almost 15 years with 6 different ladies. She has the perfect spirit for this job and her unique ambiguity will make you feel comfortable Kristy looks like she is in her 20s yet has a wise spirit and at the same time she makes you feel like you can talk about anything. If you are new to waxing this level of comfort will give you a much more positive experience. Her prices are reasonable almost to the point of being cheap. I do not see it staying that way for long her demand will increase tremendously as she continues building clients in this new location. The most unbelievable thing about all of this is that she is fairly new to waxing. I m not sure if she was just being humble or maybe even lying haha jk ... but really how can you be THIS GOOD? How can you provide almost painless waxes? I guess this just happens when passion meets opportunity. Okay enough gushing. Just go to Kristy and find out for yourself!
We tried this when it was still pretty new and it was packed! I love how they decorate the place and love the staff who are friendly and fast! The food though is not really that extraordinary to set it part from other breakfast spots in the area and would not justify the higher price point. But then again this could be a nice place for that nice start to a special day because the place is nicely decorated and a bit fancy.
This place is amazing and sparklingly clean. The prices are reasonable and like other reviews say their cinnamon rolls are incredible. The quiche Lorraine was the best I ve ever had nice and light not too heavy at all. The menu is simple but each offering is perfectly executed service was quick and pleasant. This will be in our regular breakfast spot rotation!
I came with two girlfriends after shopping. One friend is a regular and she raves about this place so it s time I check it out. We went to the Scottsdale location. It was loud. Music blaring and lots of TVs everywhere with the Diamondbacks game on which I enjoy . But it was a little hard to hear over the music and people trying to talk over it. For starters we shared a Mac n cheese dish with bacon and jalapeos and....peas?! What s up with that?! My friend picked them out for me when I whined about how icky peas are lol. But it was still very tasty and I know how to order it next time. So we get our burgers one friend had the Open Pit and the other had Ring of Fire. I had the Steakhouse something with truffle oil on a pretzel bun. Ah maz ing. There was trouble with the Ring of Fire my friend ordered it well done and it came out more undercooked than she could tolerate. Our server Erin was great! She apologized and promptly returned it. When the second one came out it still was undercooked but not as bad. A manager type came out and said he would comp her burger AND her beer. Wow! That is service. It was not necessary and we made no scene about it. They fixed the burger and my friend enjoyed it but the gesture showed incredible commitment to customer satisfaction. Impressive. I cannot wait for the central Phoenix location to open!!!
Great location decent prices and great customer service. I stay here all the time. Nothing extremely fancy it s just right!
this pho place is very good. The first time I came here I came here with a friend and ordered number 452. This was the vermicel and was the best pho I had. Worth a try
Went there the other night and have the steak Diane an Asian pear martini and some kind of sweet corn cake appetizer. There food and service is usually very good and their menu covers pretty much any taste. There s no need to mention the cheese cake it s excellent.
We visited Oaks n Acorns on a rainy spring afternoon after a long walk in the stroller. We were ready for some food and room to stretch our legs. Oaks did not disappoint. On the menu at this inviting play caf are sandwiches soups pizzas hot beverages and baby portions. When you arrive leave the stroller outside on the sidewalk. Bring a lock or just babywear. The front entrance offers coat racks and boot mats you are asked to leave shoes at the door . The entrance with cafe counter opens to a bright space with tables for eating and creative play areas for little ones to enjoy. Because of the no shoe policy the floor are relatively clean for little crawlers. We chose to pay six dollars for a drop in playtime for our first visit. We ran up a tab paying for our sandwich and play fee at the end of our visit. The staff were welcoming and friendly eager to go over and above to help us out! Downstairs in addition to washrooms and changing area is one of two program rooms. Be sure to check out the schedule of programming offered. We ve tried the Lil Explorers class which offers crawlers or early walkers a chance to engage with semi structured play music bubbles parachute painting and more!
Wonderful food and that place is busy but never crowded like other locations. Nan has a shape of a sandal and is huge and very tasty. I ve tried most kebobs and my favorite is Sultani Kabob a combination of chunks of filet Mignon and lean ground beef. Rice is perfect too. It s always freshly prepared. Decor is very nice perhaps similar to other locations. It features a famous and my favorite picture of an Afghan girl taken by Steve McCurry google Sharbat Gula . This location is fairly new in The Great Punjab Business Centre. One can go Indian grocery or fabric shopping while in that area. The Centre is large but not very frequented by locals Bamiyan Kabob seems to be the busiest of all in the area.
OK so maybe my barbarian talk review was lost on many readers so I have decided to edit my initial review of Fogo. Needless to say this place will bring out the inner meat eating barbarian in all of us. I have been to the Fogo de Chao in Philadelphia and the one in Scottsdale numerous times both locations offer the freshest items and both have their signature wait staff who bring the meat on the fly when your card is green. If you re bringing new initiates advise them to come prepared. That being said this place is not a buffet . It is a bit classier than that and as I mentioned you will be getting quality items from both the salad bar and the main course with excellent service all around. Regardless if you get your money s worth it is an experience everyone should enjoy at least once. The Philadelphia location is right in center city and the AZ location is in yuppy Scottsdale. However like Jason V. mentioned there were definitely more family tables at the AZ location than the one in Philly. No judging here either but I agree that Fogo is not the place to bring infants and toddlers.
Yesssss!!!!!!!! Come and see all the brands colors sizes!!!! The best in Vegas!!! Right on Sahara easy to find. Cheap prices and sale rack!! Shoes too!!
Ahmed Kristen BMW Toronto TOP NOTCH A experience. We went into this dealership with our hackles up expecting to be hard sold pressured to commit or ignored completely. We received the total opposite in every way dealing with Ahmed and Kristen from the moment we walked in. Ahmed was incredibly informative with zero pressure and actually ended up giving us promotions and incentives that we did not even know about after much research VOLUNTARILY. He saved us over 7.5K....more than four thousand more than we had found online and through hours of research and calling around. After the initial model we test drove had higher payments than we were looking for with the options we wanted Ahmed suggested looking at the 3 Series X Drive line due to the incentives and promotions currently available for that model. Within a day and a half we had multiple options to choose from spec sheets photos and pricing. Each option had MORE than we wanted for significantly LESS MONEY than our initial budget. He was incredibly responsive at all hours of the day and night for every little question we had. The total opposite of what we had expected and the total opposite of what we had encountered at every other dealership . We were given an incredibly favourable credit for our non BWM trade in and delivery of the vehicle in two days. Kristen spent an hour and a half on the day of delivery with a big red bow on the car when it was presented to us! walking us through all of the paperwork and then walking us through every option in the car setting up our phones bluetooth and driver preferences. We re incredibly over the moon with our lease finding out there were additional upgrades on the vehicle we did not think were included even and to top it all off were presented with a gift certificate as a thank you to buy some additional swag at the BMW Lifestyle store. A totally positive under promise over deliver experience from start to finish. We wo not hesitate to recommend this team to any and everyone looking. 1000 the best car experience we ve had ever.
In a simple words better than chipotle. Fresh air.. And their food is fresh... Good ambience .. Staffs are friendly ... Very near to Walmart ... A great place to have dinner .
Several reasons I love Freedom Park 1 It has something for everyone playgrounds beaucoup de sports fields lots of soccer goals for my husband well maintained lake and picnic facilities great jogging trail. 2 Even on crowded weekend days we ve always been able to find a place to spread out a blanket and chill out. 3 Everyone always seems to be having a good time.
I here pretty regularly and always have a lovely experience. The prices are gpod the service is great and the sushi is fresh and delicious!
This place is awesome the best steak I ve ever had anywhere ever. A couple members of our party were not allowed in because they wore shorts I guess they did not know because they were not told in advance. Of course the night we were there a certain VIP was there no names so that might be why it was strictly enforced??? I would never normally advocate 52 for a NY strip but in this place s case I ll make an exception.
I wish I could another 5 stars to my review from two years ago. The owner Annemarie is an angel genius Breakfast biscuits and breakfast sandwiches now. The gluten free vegan biscuits are better than anything ever in this lifetime. Vegan gluten free biscuit sandwich and bacon egg cheese biscuit sandwich. Going to Bloom makes my day. Maybe my week.
Annie s is awesome. We take our dog Daisy here on a weekly basis to get groomed. They do a great job and they are very attentive to special requests. Cutting her toenails makes her chew them so no more of that . She always comes home with a different bandana holiday season themed which is a nice touch. I recently took our puggle to get her nails trimmed trust me that is no easy feat . They did a great job and only charged me 5. I highly recommend Annie s to anyone in the neighborhood.
Really good mixed bbq platter especially pork. Great decor be sure and notice the ceiling in the entry.
They sell Kinder Bueno bars. If you have ever been to Italy you would know how awesome that is.
Have had a poor experience with other nail salons in the area so I went in expecting the worst. But it turned out great! They were all friendly quick and did top quality work! Definitely my new favorite nail salon in Queen Creek!
This amazing place is moving so get ready for a quick drive out to the burbs BUT there will now be seating and TONS of parking. They will be located near 16 and 485 near Mountain Island Lake. Same complex that has the Bull and Barrister. I talked to the owner the other night when I was driving by and he said it should be open in a few weeks fingers crossed it is open by April 2011 and there will be seating in the new location. Asked why he moved and he said the place they leased before was going to be torn down to make a parking lot for the vet that is right there! Sad for the people down there...happy for me. I live less than a mile from the new location. Hope they open soon. I am having wicked Crab Cake withdraw!!
Excellent job! I highly recommend them! Punctual like promised! Alex and the crew were professional and respectful! Made the move so much smoother!
I am so very grateful that I was referred to Ric s by my insurance agent. I got rear ended in my brand new car before I made my first payment. I was so worried about finding the right auto body shop to make my car look new since it was . Geico was great and allowed me to choose the auto body shop which made the search less stressful. It was overwhelming when I started researching since all the reviews for these auto body shops are all over the board. I m so glad I made that choice to go with Ric s they were great at communicating and did a phenomenal job on my vehicle! The car looks brand new again and was done in a very timely manner. The technician stayed in constant contact with me and was extremely knowledgeable and accommodating. After such wonderful service and great workmanship I will use Ric s for all my auto body work. Thank you Ric s auto body!
I was in Ohio for a few months from Orlando FL where I am spoiled with delicious Puerto Rican and Dominican food at all times . I thought there was no way I d find an other than Mexican specific bodega in Cleveland OH but thankfully I found this place. They had everything I wanted and more minus the sazon tropical and the guys were very nice. Make sure you bring cash though because if you do not spend at least 15 or 20 I ca not remember now you ca not use a debit card. This place is a gem!
Absolutely fantastic!!! The Cedar River Filet Grilled Octopus and Shrimp Pappardelle Pasta were SPECTACULAR!!! Very much enjoyed the fried Shishito Peppers and Rice Crispy Spicy Tuna delicious!! Cocktails were spot on and the wine list great settled on a Fantastic Belle Glos Pinot Noir!!! Our waiter Ryan was on point and very attentive!! Great evening!!!
I have been out to Eikonic on several occasions and I must say that the service is always so personal and professional! The barbers here are well trained not just in hair but also in skin care and shaving. There are quite a few services that they offer here I have gotten a haircut and a shave before both were great! The shave was superb this is one of the few barbershops that will shave you with an old school straight razor and they will do it well. I highly recommend this place.
Excellent restaurant old school Las Vegas just one problem and that is it depends on who s cooking to tell u how good it is. If they rite chef is cooking it s great but if he is not it s very average
It s nice to have a neighborhood plant nursery with a staff willing to help non native Arizonans new to gardening in the desert. Friday afternoon after a long work week and just 20 minutes before they were closing Suzanne helped me wind down by locating plants that I had been researching she gave design tips when I specifically asked and recommendations on what pairs well together. It s truly was a relaxing trip for me. Thanks! We will be back soon.
How can I keep forgetting to finish this review I started months ago. Lol Oh Even Stevens. How I love you. Seriously. I heard about this little gem from some fellow co workers. The smell of their lunch specifically the b.sprouts had me intrigued. They gave me a taste of one of their sprouts and I was mind blown. Granted I love me some sprouts. The fam and I decided to try ES out after we got done with mighty mud mania this year. We were not disappointed at all. Party tots Amazeballs and the husband hates...yes hates guac. but he loved these tots . Brussel sprouts bacon and sprouts. You ca not go wrong there!! C loves the Mac and cheese. My favorite sandwich the Bhan Mi. Ask for a side of gari thin sliced pickled ginger . They use a little of it in their pickled slaw but adding extra just bring this sandwich to a higher level of awesomeness. Do not forget the Yelp check in! Free cookie!
so far i got really good cuts for Ivan friendly people. kinda busy all the time but i usuall grt appointments on the same day
Such wonderful bodywork. 90 minutes for 45! The owner is very sweet as were both therapists. I recommend this place to everyone who loves reflexology massage.
Stopped in with a coworker and customer this evening. Dining lounge area was nicer than expected based upon visits to other BJs locations. Our server Belle was great. Friendly attitude and great service. Menu was slightly limited typical bar food but everything was good. Lighting was a bit dim for a buddies night out at the bar. Will definately return as long as the service remains great.
Love this place! The atmosphere is really cool and cozy and the drinks are wonderful. It s a nice quiet place to get work done or to visit with a friend. Plus if you re hungry Pizza M is in the same building!
Such a cool place to visit while you re in town. This place has so much good eye candy that it s ridiculous! Local butchers bakers candy makers farmers etc. make up the vendors and there s a nice cafe that serves up some mean grill type food for breakfast and lunch. It s worth a look and buy some real macaroons for later.
I am amazed atwhat Carrie and her team have done for my baby Samson ! I swear he hates when I come to pick him up cause of all of the love he gets while he is there. Could not be more satisfied with the service and the products they have in their store!
I d just like to add to my previous review now that we ve lived in town for almost a year. LaRocca s has the BEST pizza in town. We ve had Maria s and Pizza Pit too which are ok but we find ourselves ordering LaRocca s almost every week!
Review is strictly compared to other buffets that have similar types of food. I definitely like Dragon Legend more compared to their sister location Dragon Pearl and other buffets like Mandarin wasabi etc. They have an excellent selection of food for a great value of 29.99 for weekend dinner. They had a whole sushi bar with scallop sashimi salmon sashimi white tuna beef sashimi and a bunch of cool assorted rolls. They have all you can GET peking duck. The skin is crispy and the sauce is very sweet and delicious. They had these gigantic fried oysters which had too much batter on it. If you take some of the batter off it was good! They have deep fried frog legs which give a spicy kick. They had unlimited crab legs but it was pretty salty. I enjoyed the grilled area they had grilled pineapple which was good. Like Dragon Pearl they had a noodle bar where they make noodles from scratch. The fish broth mixed with the spicy broth was good. My only criticism is that they only gave one piece of bbq meat which is kinda stingey . They should give 3 4 pieces. Overall I really enjoyed this buffet for food selection quality and value. I only wished they comp birthdays like they do at Dragon Pearl!
Best vermicelli dishes in Cleveland at the moment. Not so much the Pho there really is not a proper place for that yet atleast you get more mint herb than all other places in Cleveland And they have Che bay mau i think if this sticks around it ll improve the more people go.
Now my favorite grocery store. People I used to work with always raved about this place. I just never took the time to drive there. Walked in there after shopping at TJ Maxx. Sure glad I did. LOVE their selection of ready to eat entrees and specialty grocery items. Staff is also friendly. Nelson at the Pizza area is a doll. Wanted some wings and they were gonna take some time to cook. Told him I would be back later. Returned just as they finished cleaning and getting ready to close their area. So sweet. He set some aside for me. Thank you Nelson!!!
The service here is incredible! You re given a warm welcome right upon walking in. Not only will you feel catered for but you ll also be having some yummy food! My mom and I ordered the breakfast sandwiches hers with ham and pepper jack while mine was with spinach and pepper jack. Both come with an egg as well. Mine was not runny at all as the menu had described it to be. I recommend trying the hazelnut latte if you like sweet coffee but they also offer sugar free version as well. Our server made sure everything was perfect for us making the experience much more homey. The way they ve designed the cafe is really adorable too. There are seats on the side that are super comfortable if you re planning on reading a book or getting some homework done. Overall it s a very cute place for brunch!
Very nice hole in the wall restaurant quiet and great atmosphere. Ordered a 10 personal pizza with sausage and pepperoni the food was delicious. Staff was very nice and friendly. It was my very first time coming to Francesco s and I will gladly return!
Yummy sushi. boston inside out roll is pretty classic tuna avacado rice and nori ca not really go wrong. wasabi flying fish roe is VERY wasabi I like my wasabi but this made me tear up. Accommodated a large group service was great drinks were good.
We had a phenomenal anniversary dinner at Fat Ox while visiting Scottsdale. The staff could not have been more attentive the food could not have been more delicious. Fantastic atmosphere and all around a great night. Special thanks to our server Billy who did all he could to make this a special and unique meal for us. Thank you to the Fat Ox team we will definitely be back!
We ve eaten at The Auld Dubliner several times when we ve been to Lake Las Vegas. We ve enjoyed it every time. The Chicken Boxty is soooo good! Our last visit was on a Friday night luckily we got a table before it was too crowded. Our drinks and food were served quickly. There was only one server which is odd for a Friday night especially since the place was packed before we were finished but she was running around doing the best she could. We were happy with our service.
Happy that I found this place !! Drinks and food was good has Lil karaoke and good music when I came but I came for the nicaraguense food and happy what I found I will for sure be coming back for my favorite plates
This was my first experience with a meineke shop and what a pleasure it was! As I look at a Walmart oil change sign for 44.88 I am reminded that I paid 26 at meineke for the same service. They were professional quick and even had my non stock air filter delivered in 20 minutes! I will be using meineke for my auto needs from now on. Highly recommend
Well I am not sure they serve thai food. But they have a really good Chinese Vietnamese menu and we ve never been deceived when we ate here with my family. I love their tom yum soup Canh chua viet . Their fried rice is OK ! The fried fish was really good with the fish sauce. Broccoli and beef OK ! Chicken wings probably made with fish sauce miam !!!! We are usually a big table so we share one of their combos. And they re pretty good combos !!! It s a bring your own wine. Good for families and big groups We were always more than 6 people when we are here The people who work there speaks Vietnamese !!
Best cuban food in town gotta try the ropa vieja meet service is great and place is spotless clean 5 dolares for a plate!!!! Loved it
Been a client for several years. Great staff and laser hair removal is very effective!
This place has been my work s go to place for catering during the day. They make it so easy to order the family packs and get all of the delicious toppings for our Taco Tuesday s. Their beans are so incredible and their steak has this unreal smokey flavor that cannot be mimicked. I d suggest that the shredded beef is something you try because it s made with something of the Gods. Gracias Backyard Tacos for the most unique taco in Mesa!
Writing a review about a Highline Car Care gives me z great pleasure. My sincere appreciation to the owner of the shop Wes his office manager Michael and the entire highly talented and broadly knowledgeable mechanic s TEAM. Thank you so much for your outstanding services and repair work that you have provided fixing a water pump leak on our Porshe German made SUV. Your digitalized diagnostics system is absolutely superior and the entire follow up process is truly one of a kind! The time of repair was incredibly fast and we picked up our car being shined and sparky in top of the repair. AMAZING! I m pleased to give you a 5 Stars and happy to recommend your business to car owners Do not look any further when your vehicle needed to be repaired or required high quality maintenance Highline Car Care is an ultimate destination and their team under owner s leadership is outstanding! Thank you for your experience and quality work very much!
We ordered a large TV online for a great price. We decided to do in store pick up. Not only was the TV ready to go but the guy helping us with our order helped us get it into the car. My previous experiences at Walmart have not been great. I highly suggest online shopping and then doing in store pickup! So smooth easy and quick.
The flavours here are on point! I love that they offer non traditional gelato flavours at Kekou. There s creamy and non creamy gelato options available. For the price it s totally worth it because 1 scoop of gelato is HUGE it s filled right up to the brim in a perfectly cute round scoop. I had a scoop of soursop non cream and it was wonderful! It s got a lychee pineappley flavour which is super refreshing even on a cold winter day! . Also tried the Vietnamese coffee flavour it tasted exactlyyyyy like Viet coffee! This location has a decent amount of seats. There s a couple tables at the front and several more tables at the back of the store. As others have mentioned you ll have to make a purchase first before you are able to sample their flavours. But regardless you ll definitely want to buy at least 1 scoop while you re here anyways. YUM. They also accept credit card here too fyi.
Great place to train and learn. This gym is a family environment and you get out what you put in.
Started off with a shower curtain rod shower hooks over the door hooks and toilet paper holder. Second trip ceiling fan pull magazine holder wire mesh bin wicker basket and 2 matching bath rugs. Third trip large blanket bag vanity mirror and a four tier shelving storage rack. Looking forward to future trips I ve got my eye on cushions for the patio chairs on our balcony. What can I say I M OBESSED WITH HOME GOODS AND ORGANIZED STORAGE!
I feel so lucky to have the Seed Shack so close to my home. I have visited several times and have been impressed with everything I ve ordered. All of of the dishes are so flavorful creative healthy and delicious. That combination is rare! Some of my favorites are the beet burger with sweet potato fries jackfruit pita with lentils and cauliflower chickpea tacos. Also the ambiance and decor is great and the owner Jade is just the sweetest. It does not matter if you re an omnivore vegetarian or vegan because I think anyone would enjoy their experience at Seed Shack.
Yakisoba is great even though is not excellent still recommended!! Feels like home. Misosilu tastes good as well!
This was my second time here to view the beautiful gardens displays. I highly recommend stoping here even if you have been here before its always changing. My first time was in March and it was decorated all for spring this time September it was all decked out with fall colors and pumpkins. I absolutely loved there was a tigers display... if you do not know I am a huge lover of all cats big and small. This is completely a FREE family friendly activity located just past the lobby.
We loves this place beats Barrio any day. When you walk in you might not be impressed but wait until you try the food
I always order the Fish and Chips Edamame and or Brussel Sprouts! The food and service is always good . Besides the fact that you can bring your four legged friend to join you for lunch or dinner is always a plus
First of all best popcorn chicken on the planet and secondly the staff are really friendly helpful to newcomers and fun plus there is always good ambient music playing and aye there s the chicken. Modern and open yet highly functional interior with large family style tables Mon is a great experience overall.
Stumbled up on it just to have a beer and ended up ordering one of the best burgers i ve ever had. I bet the drinks are excellent as well because I saw the bartender prepping for the night she was squeezing fresh limes and lemons as a bartender in the past that is a sign of quality.
Wonderful experience great service and exceptional food. Only reason I did not give 5 stars is it is geared towards tourists like everything is in Vegas. We went for a special dinner to celebrate a special event... it just lacked the wow and over the top I was hoping for
I like this Dunkin Donuts. . I ve been through the drive through and the service is fast and convenient. The staff is friendly and very helpful. I ve also ordered inside and have had only pleasant experiences. The restaurant itself is clean and I like the updated video menu.
RP Gas Piping provided prompt excellent service with courteous staff both in the office and in the field. When the job was finished the front landscaping was left as found the workers taking great care to not damage anything. I would highly recommend them for any of your gas piping needs!
We came here last year for winter break and since then we were dying to come back! Every crawfish place did not compare to the one in Vegas . Their fish is so fresh and the flavor seasoning was flawless. The coconuts were so fresh and juicy. The fried alligator tasted like a soft and less chewy version of calamari. Aside from the great food we had an amazing waiter named billy. He offered great suggestions like the baked oyster and he was so funny. He had great dance moves and taste in music lol. He was funny and made sure we had a great time. He also was great at his job and made this amazing experience perfect.
I was referred there by a friend Dan the owner is such a straight up good guy. Gives you a great job and a far price. I found a place I can trust to bring my work truck. and wife s car. Turns out there are still honest guys out there with honor and respect. Thanks Dan for all your help.
Viva el pollo my friends! Viva is located in the charming little section of Elizabeth nearby Earl s Grocery. There are two parking lots one right across the street and one that is a little further down the street. I met my best friend right after work a little after 5 00 on a Thursday and had no trouble finding a park. When you walk in you will be welcomed with the mighty aroma of Peruvian spices wafting off of the bounty of rotisserie chickens. It s walk up order at the counter style. There are paper menus around the restaurant so you can grab one to look over while you wait if there s a line or a large menu right above the registers. Since I had been looking forward to my Viva visit I had already spent a good amount of time reading their menu online so I came in prepared and ready to order the quinoa stuffed avocados with pulled chicken and a sangria to drink. Once you order you re given a number and sent off to choose your own table. Since it was a nice evening we grabbed a table on their patio which is enclosed with an array of potted and hanging plants. No sooner than a couple of minutes of us sitting down our food was brought out to us. I could tell from my first DELICIOUS bite of the avocado that this dish was going to be quite filling. The avocados are topped with tomatoes and their house made sauces. It is literally a complete meal even though it may not look like it. The sangria is amazing and something that I could happily drink a pitcher of without blinking an eye. It s served with orange and apple slices that are extra delicious after you ve slurped down the sangria and they ve soaked up the juice Even though there s no typical waiter waitress service there are employees who come out to check in on your satisfaction and bring out anything else you may need to accompany your meal. Every single employee I encountered was extremely courteous and helpful. Viva is Peruvian inspired not completely authentic Peruvian food so do not come here with the latter in mind. What s most important is that the food and drinks are made with fresh ingredients served efficiently and delicioiusly. I happily volunteer as tribute to try every single Viva menu item between now and the end of the Summer.
Best gym downtown! I love that everyone is so friendly and inviting every time I go in . The front desk staff is always so sweet love being greeted by cierra in the AM and Kim in the afternoon. customer service is everything!
A very nice place in the extreme east plateau. We had the burger and the fish and chips off the limited afternoon menu. The burger was quite good maybe lacking a distinct flavor or character but with nicely seasoned beef cooked absolutely perfectly between medium and medium rare. The fish was very lightly breaded with a very light flavor. The tartar sauce was tasty with an accent of dill. This is of course also a brew pub and I sampled a couple of their beers. The Saison Mixte was excellent a spicy white beer with a hint of sour. My girlfriend had the one cider on the menu and it was also very good not overly sweet with an appealing sour note. My girlfriend felt it was important to add that the music selection was terrible. I ll add that while that s true at least it was at a low enough volume to ignore.
Got a great Bicycle Times BLT here! Comes with avocado and egg. There were a lot of different options and they have vegetarian dishes as well. For the BLT you can have fries the house salad or a corn bean salad. I believe there is an upcharge for the salad which is 1. You can also get onion rings for an upcharge. When you walk in it is kind of confusing because the bar is in front and the restaurant area is in the back but there is no sign telling you to choose your own seat to make sure you guys do not awkwardly stand there...which is what we did while we tried to figure it out. Overall service was good and our waitress was very friendly. I definitely recommend coming here with a group of friends because it s a fun restaurant environment.
Was able to replace my iPhone screen within the hour. Easy and just pleasant to work with! There s even a yelp check in coupon for 10 off. Highly recommend.
A great place for cold beer and burgers !! Great food and service. The burgers are what they do best however you must try the mac and cheese as well!! Yum!!
really like this place! for 3 years never found something bad. Only chiken teryaki not that good as it was before. But sushi and everything else taste good
If you re looking for an entirely different and wonderful experience than the frustrating car buying experience we are all used to then step inside Great Lakes Honda! The moment you enter inside you can tell the dynamic is different there. The staff are all very pleasant and well presentable. The dealership is well maintained. I ve worked in the car business for a couple years now and you do not often find a collective group of sales people who really work together for a positive end result competitiveness aside but at a Great Lakes you see the camaraderie and in my opinion a team that can respect each other and work together succeed much greater and everyone is happier creating a top notch environment. I can only attribute a great staff as I have seen the owner interact with his employees and customers and it s just very impressive to see the level of detail and sincerity that is given to everyone. It s great to see someone leading by example. If you want a truly exceptional experience I would highly recommend this unique dealership!
Cruise Carts are great... the guys and gals driving are the perfect ambassadors for our brand Savvy Co. Real Estate. We are glad to be a part of this people movement!!
This is my go to when in Vegas. Great customer service accurate times when you call to make an appointment and they do great gels pedicures and acrylics.
This is probably one of the best Italian restaurants in Vegas !!! The food is soo good. I always get the burrata and the Italian grinder is amazing !! I 100 recommend this place !!
My absolute favorite place to buy wings!!!! I always get the HOT yes they are hot but they are BOMB!! 12wings with fries for 10 ca not beat that. Customer service has always been good except once but I forgave them because my wings were good lol.
Being from Colorado we re used to seeing cupcake shops everywhere so it was a nice surprise when we ran into the Cupcakery in the Monte Carlo shops. The prices were not cheap I think they were about 3.75 each and the lady behind me in line got a stern talking to from her husband that no way was she spending 4 on a cupcake. But we thought the prices were about on average with Colorado and the typical Vegas inflation. The clerk was very helpful and I got a chocolate cupcake and a strawberry shortcake. They were so sweet and just hit the spot perfectly.
I ve been to Las Vegas a countless amount of times yet I have not visited and ordered something from Fat Tuesday at all. I ve known of this chain of bars around Las Vegas due to their tall plastic beverages. Anyways since I was here in Vegas I thought I might as well give this place a try. I stayed at the Bally s Hotel and there were 3 different Fat Tuesdays within a 2 mile radius nearby. When I went the line was pretty long since i went around 9pm. I ended up getting a strawberry daquiri in a yard dog cup. I m definitely keeping the cup because it s a souvenir in my opinion. Anyways the strawberry daquiri was very sweet and tasty. It was basically an alcoholic slushie which was amazing. I ended up getting a crazy asian glow all around my face after this it was that strong and yummy at the same time. I m not really a guy that enjoys drinking alcohol but I had to give this place a try. I would come here for the drinks and cups. This place is extremely fair when it comes to pricing. The yard dog which I believe was 32oz for just 15. That is a very good price for an amazing drink.
Love this place the people especially Jody the hilarious bartender and all of Jeff s people. Food wise his pot roast is amazing steaks are delish hush puppies say no more. Cool vibe and happy atmosphere round it out. For lunch great hamburger or the huge chopped salad and again those hush puppies. It s nice to see a locally owned place stand out amongst the vast array of chain restaurants.
Cute and casual lunch option. LOCATION Just outside the Scottsdale Mall SERVICE You order at the counter are given a number and seat yourself. Drinks are self serve as well at their awesome digital Coca Cola soda dispenser FOOD Chicken salad sandwich Fabulously fresh. It same consistency as tuna salad which kind of throws you off Pasta salad Fresh and refreshing without being overly dressed Beef roll ups Ate these 3 hours later and they were still super tasty. The meat is very tender Greek salad dressing Simple yet delish with olive oil and red wine vinegar. There is a bottle on every table so that you can help yourself
Hippy hippy joy joy! The two hippies made me happy. How? In the midst of moving my wife from Phoenix to San Francisco and packing up boxes and boxes of stuff she took me here for lunch. I had a chili dog that was hot messy and awesomely tasty. The toasted bun was an added plus. Along with that was a bag of the greasiest yummiest fries in the world. Were they soggy? Well yeah but that s one of the things that made them so good. This is one of those rare places where you wish your stomach was twice as big so you could just keep eating. There was no soda machine or fountain but these guys had the class to offer RC and Shasta sodas from their refrigerator and that taste just topped off an already fantastic meal with something more. Oh and by the way the whole shebang was 5! There ai not much to this place there are padded stools a bar to eat on lots and lots of hippy decor and a kitchen that s always sending out smoke and delicious smells. This place is ultra yum. Forget about the fast food places Two Hippies pwns them all. Better food more of it and cheaper too. Stop thinking about it turn off your mind relax and float downstream. It is believing.
Just what I want when I eat seafood! Great fish and chips good scallops Nice staff Fair prices
Kiyo is a great addition to the neighbourhood. It s a small restaurant with a solid menu and the quality of their food is top notch. Their presentation and attention to detail is wonderful. The staff are so nice and friendly. We have eaten in the restaurant and taken out several times and have been consistently pleased. Highly recommend giving them a try.
What a lovely surprise! I had the Carne Asada and my husband had a shrimp and chorizo burrito. After our first visit we talked about their food for weeks just could not get it out of our minds. On our return visit I was worried that I might have built it up so much in my mind that the reality could not compare. Happily for me it did. It was even better than I remembered!
The food here is unbelievable as are the cocktails! It definitely has nice ambiance as well my only complaint is that they make a big deal about splitting bills for parties.. it s too time consuming is what I was told. Your customers are not worth your time..? Left a bad taste in my mouth...
Sooo happy w my Spring Air mattress w adjustable base. Christina was very helpful and made my decision very easy. I like how it s not a corporate business where they pretty much haggle you to buy something... I also purchased the 10 year warranty for the base cause it also vibrates. Chances are it ll ware out the way I use it! I suggest if anyone gets an adjustable base you get the warranty also! Thank you again!
I am so greatful to have found this place. It has been our go to place for sushi for years. Although this restaurant is small okay very small its food is delicious. Having been to Japan a couple of times I would say that this sushi is one of the best I ve had in Toronto. I ca not bring myself to eat anywhere else in Toronto other than Yuzu! . Their fish is fresh and not sludgy. Their Japango roll is very tasty even though I m not much of a roll person msyelf . My husband loves their sashimi don diced fish on rice and orders it without fail comes with a homemade hot sauce . I ve also had their omakase a few times and I m always so full that I end up rolling myself out. It s amazing to taste different Japanese dishes outside of the standard sushi sashimi. They do a delicious black cod as well as a yummy seafood soup that comes in a teapot that you pour into a little teacup to drink.
A great addition to the neighborhood! It was hard to find good coffee near U of T until now Fantastic coffee! Lots of options drip espresso pour over you name it.
I usually hit them up a few times a year when I m in the area. Lunch special traditional gyro and their Greek seasoned fries are bomb. I always order extra tzatziki on the side because I like it a lot. My friends like the pomegranate chicken. But I ve never had anything other than the traditional gyro because I do not have to.
Highlights lowlights 1 great food! 2 friendly service 3 lots of gluten free options Everly blew our expectations out of the water! I knew Everly was California Fresh which I took to mean lots of grilled fish and salads. Boy was I wrong! The menu is loaded with great salads hot appetizers pasta and other entrees. We visited during the Summer 2017 restaurant week and the event menu was really impressive with California wine pairings. We decided not to do the restaurant week menu because there were a few things on the main menu that we just had to try. Almost everything on the menu can be modified to be gluten free and not just the usuals like salads and meat! I m talking g free bread people! We did the brussel sprouts appetizer the strawberry and asparagus salad the steak and this amazing street corn and bread entree. The food was incredible! We ate until we were completely stuffed. Outdoor seating is available and our service was friendly. We ca not wait to get back!
I had eyelash envy while browsing Instagram so I decided to do it. Being a natural girl I was worried about the ingredients in the glue and I knew that I did not want formeldahyde in my eyes so I choose Humble Bee Lash. Dulcinea was so sweet and very good at what she does. My eyelashes turned out amazing and I have received so many compliments.
Lola s shrimp and Gouda grits with ragu is still on my last meal menu.
I just received my order. Pizza mac n cheese loaded baked potatoe kettle Chicago strawberry cheesecake and confetti o.m.g i am excited and cannot wait to try them all out! They look so good and thank you too Laurie for helping me with the shipping too. She is great
Simply outstanding. I ca not think of anything negative to say about Mizu. I have been there probably two dozen times and never had a bad experience. I ve always had great service and food. Leah is an outstanding waitress and a personal favorite. The menu is extensive and the variety is amazing. The sushi is unbelievably fresh and high quality. Tuesdays and Wednesdays are great days to visit with all day happy hour which means half priced sushi rolls. You can even order them as take out for that special. The price points are competitive in general and I have purchased several of their restaurant.com gift cards. When I m not having a regular maki roll one of my favorite sushi bar signature rolls is the Crouching Tiger ! How do you say delectable? Five kinds of sashimi tuna salmon white fish yellow tail and eel blanked over a spicy tuna avocado and tempura flakes roll. Tempura flake with eel sauce spicy mayo green onion and masago on top! Giddee up!
This is a place you must try if your In Vegas . Every time I come to Vegas we get excellent service the oyster so fresh. We came today sat at the bar and Reymundo and his team very friendly. Made us the best soup! Place is clean. I mean I do not have nothing bad to say about this place every time we come . It s very great to eat in a place where they make you feel at home.
Very good food both packaged and fresh. Deli selection limited but good. Excellent value. They make a pretty good croissant. I still have not tried the bread but it looks and smells good!
Food is just perfect...tasty..excellent service chef answered all question with intelligent food answers...I will be back again...Me And My girl like this place...
This is a late review.. just saw there already was one.. I use to hang out there alot for awhile last football season..They were offer me comps all the time..I heard the spa was amazing.. after I got just crushed .I thought I would get some comps and got 500 spa comp....It was the worst Mani pedi...ever. it took forver...most expensive.. then I went in for the facial..Omg it was awsome!! Got a face brush and some products...awesome.
I love the Ocean Club !!! Especially the bar. . If you want a Great dinning experience . . you should order from the bar . . .to sit and watch live entertainment while you dine is an aweome experience. . .Your bartenders at OC treat you like a good friend so your comfortable ..If you have a party of 4 or less definately sit at the bar for a WONDERFULL dinning experience. . The bartenders are REAL and fun!!!
I love the small tapa dishes here! we were there as a party of 7 so we got to try so many different dishes. To start off the service was very warm and welcoming. Both the red and white sangrias are sooo good! I also recommend the empanadas with the chicken or the veggie the apple and manchego salad was aaamazing!!!The only one I am not a huge fan of was the chicken skewers it was a bit dry. We put in 2 orders of the mixed paellas of course we definitely did not finish it so we took it to go. We were staying at an Airbnb after the 7 of us came back from partying tipsy tired and starving late at night ... we just heat up the paellas in the microwave and they are the perfect comfort food before going to bed!!
We have eaten at this restaurant twice both times for brunch. I am vegan. My husband is not. The menu is not really vegan friendly but the staff are eager to please so they put something together for me that worked. Very flavorful combinations! We like the urban vibe. It is a little tricky to find parking on event weekends and we had to wait both times for a table. However that is the price you pay for good food and a cool place to have brunch. Staff are very friendly and efficient.
This place has a really good bunch of employees and a huge assortment of liquids for any taste. I would recommend coming here if you ve ever been unsure of what to dabble in... They even have a nice menu you can sift through. I can easily spend 30 minutes trying a bunch of different flavours before finally buying what I like.
Sake Rok is a restaurant you wo not forget. They have a unique atmosphere and unique food! Whenever I go there I have to get the drink called Asking For Trouble . The sushi is impeccable especially the yellowtail that they have. I would also suggest getting the edamame and peppers they serve. This place is great and not to mention the MC is hilarious. I would give it 10 stars if I could.
Great little breakfast spot out in the warm Arizona morning air. The coffee is strong and the food is fantastic. The service was excellent and in the immortal words of Arnold I ll be back !
My fianc and I love this bar! The staff is friendly and takes the time to remember your name. The staff is very knowledgeable about the beer and they have never recommended something I did not like. Love love this place.
Just drove down to Concord from Winston Salem to see my kids. My son and I came to Fresh off the grill to eat. They have a great menu to choose from. I tried the new Tex Mex Burger. The burger was great. Everything on the burger went well together. The pico de gallo was amazing. The chipotle sauce paired up well along side pepper jack cheese. If you great food at a great price and friendly staff you need to come and try it out.
This is one of our families favorite restaurants in the entire area!!! We have dinner at Blu several times a month and are always treated so well. The sushi is so fresh and delicious Jenny the owner will not allow substandard food to be served. We have never had a bad experience and have been dining there since they opened. There are also many gluten free options for those of you looking! Perfect place for friends to meet and families to gather.
Vegas baby! Came here last night to see Avicci but I have been here a couple times before. I ve always really recommended this club. It was so busy last night and even being on a guest list the girls had to wait I would say about 30 45 minutes to get in. I think the boys in our group did not have to wait nearly that long but they all bought tickets. I was expecting a wait because avicci is one of the biggest DJs in the world but that sucked! I moved on from my complaining the moment I walked inside to see all the gorgeousness and they handed me 2 free drink tickets so awesome of them! Like most people say this place is visually the BEST to experience in Las Vegas. It is indoor outdoor by pools with palm trees and cute outdoor lights everywhere. This is a place I think you can enjoy a conversation unless you are on the main dance floor. Sometimes you just want to look around and say WOW! People were friendly and we walked in and were waved over to some bottle service. The crowd at this place is always consistently great and people just want to have fun. Thanks XS ca not wait to come back! Love it!
Parking can be difficult at lunch time but worth the extra effort. Wide choice of salads sandwiches and homemade specialty breads. The Sonoma salad with mangos goat cheese and poppy seed dressing makes an excellent selection along with a generous freshly toasted BLT on thick whole grain bread. Easily enough to share and eat on the patio. Wide selection of specialty sauces and wines.
Melodie and her staff are always so knowledgeable and helpful when it comes to questions about the products. I appreciate the warm welcome to the store every time I come in. They all want to help and assist In getting the products we need for our clients and salons. The store is always clean and have the products in stock. This is a must go to place for all licensed professionals in this part of the valley and we are lucky to have a store in our area! Go support our Cosmo Prof friends!!
came here the other night just to kill time while waiting for my friend to go for dinner and I was left quite amazed by the amount of selection at this LCBO. either the LCBO as a whole has brought in a lot of new items or this location is stocking items that my local location is not stocking. regardless this location is under the old LCBO design is overdue for a makeover or at the very least just some new lighting. bonus points for the back area where they carved out a piece of the wall as a shelf look for it the staff are friendly and the location is pretty clean. my only complaint is the parking situation angled hill parking with people zooming in and out and bicycles and pedestrians and yeah. lots to pay attention to. parking is on site not a massive amount but enough to find a spot or two open. transit options are the 505 Dundas streetcar bus or the 29 Dufferin 63 ossington with a huge walk. come and check it out!
I planned poorly and my leaf almost ran out of juice. I stopped in at the Tempe Power Nissan dealership. The guy walked me to the charger. Now I m eating a free doughnut watching tv. I think they even have wifi so I m going to study. I may move in.
Amazing customer service and delicious popcorn chicken and wings . Just a great place to eat and get the most amazing DRINKS !!!!!!
Ruth s is very consistent. The corn fed beef is sweet and different from the steaks you ll get elsewhere in Calgary. We like it a lot. The service is always attentive but not intrusuve. We miss Adrian and hope he gets well soon!
Got a free margarita with check in. Got a huge plate of chicken nachos that were very good. Server was vert friendly and attentive.
If I could give this 100 stars I would ! I did the club crawl on 5 5 17 and had an amazing time on the bus. The dj on the bus played better music then what they were playing in the clubs lol. Everything from the unlimited drinks to the dj and everything we did throughout the night was amazing and will definitely book club tour Vegas again on my next trip to Vegas!
My favorite go to place. Found them when I first moved here and was over hungry and starving Order a bunch of menu items way more than I could eat but all were great My favorites are the Perfect Pear Grilled Cheese and Perfect Pear Salad My favorite is the Priest location in Tempe Always great service and get the changes I need made to my order
LOVE this place. Have now taken my Lexus in two different times for body work and each time has been the BEST job I could expect and for much less than anywhere else. This last time was after someone sideswiped my parked car leaving a mess of blue paint and drove off. Brightons replaced the side strips buffed off the numerous scratches and touched up all the other mars. THEN they detailed the whole car. It s beautiful again! Both owner Mark and Kelly take a lot of pride in their service and each time they ve had the car ready when promised. I highly recommend Brighton for ALL car repair and body
Service was a little slow but dinner was excellent even though it s a chain. Always love the bread and olive oil.
Ordered delivery here through a 3rd party service. Unfortunately during delivery the pizza was ruined. We let the 3rd party service know who informed the restaurant. The restaurant went above and beyond by hand delivering a new pizza in the same night. It was delicious and well presented. Will recommend very impressed with the food and service!
Looks like a hole in the wall but I got a better Bio Seaweed Gel refill here than in some of the jazzier downtown places! Lee or Li spent an hour on my refill really paying attention to detail shaped my nails to perfection and did not even charge me for the additional manicure because she said I did not really have any cuticles. The refill came to 40 the manicure would have been an additional 5 but she waived it . They re open till a bit later too so if you need your nails done 8 pm onwards this might be the place to go to! I m definitely going back for a refill in 2 weeks!
This review is about piercings. I called ahead to see if I could make an appointment for piercings. They take walk ins and when I went it was not busy at all. They recommend that you make a consultation with a tattoo artist if you are getting a tattoo. They have you fill out the release form and copy your i.d. Make sure you have it with you! They only let one person go back with you to get work done. I had two friends so they let both of them come back with me. I thought that was really kind of them. I do not think my artist is listed on the website but she was very very patient with me. I tend to be very squeamish and get nervous when it comes to needles and other painful things. She did two practice rounds where she took me through all of the steps. This was very helpful to me because I knew exactly what was going to happen and how to cope with the pain big breathes! . She was also thorough on her explanation of how to clean the piercings. My only complaint would be that they had a limited supply of earrings to choose from. They were waiting on the shipment when I went in. I would suggest calling in and asking about their selection since you will be wearing that certain piercing for awhile. I walked out and certainly did not have any regrets.
Oh.My.God. Ah mazing! Avenue B is.. amazing. Being in Pittsburgh for the past 6 years I would say that Avenue B is by far the best and most inventive meal I ve had in the steel city besides Umi of course Located on Centre Avenue the location is a bit strange and in the middle of nowhere ok Giant Eagle but who cares but the food is so good! I ve been there for brunch and dinner on a few occasions and I would have to say that the dishes I got were perfect. For my most recent meal I got the gorgonzola flatbread and the sweet potato pot pie. Sounds pretty ordinary right? WRONG! The flatbread was warm and was sweet and tart from the pears and blue cheese while the pot pie was so comforting yet decadent and flavorful. It was the perfect meal! I would most definitely recommend Avenue B for a great but expensive date! Make sure to make reservations ahead of time they are booked any day of the week!
Came back because I have fallen in love with this place and will come every time I am in Vegas. I had the quiche lorraine this time and WOW!!!!!! Ohhhh so amazing!! The Hubby had the blue berry waffle pancake ca not remember but I do remember it being amazing!! Soooooo blueberry eeeee and made well. They offered to send us with coffee to go!! They are the best!!
Their ramen is one if the best! Their Tantanmen is amazing and the egg is perfectly cooked.
Run of the mill mc Donald came here for breaks during school at auburn career center.
I ordered online the first time and it was easy and painless. I went out on my lunch break and picked up my food which was ready when I got there. Salad was great and I could not resist ordering fries they were great too! The second time was after work and I went there to get a salad for dinner. Very good salad no complaints. I was the only one there at the time.
I was dealing with the classic AC problem where one person was piping hot and 5 other people were freezing cold all at the same time in the same office. Since I was in the minority and I pay the bills I chose to throw in the towel and to take the high road. I found Lincoln Air through the Mitsubishi mini split air conditioning website and sent over a quick email asking a few technical questions and for someone to give me an idea on how much a single mini split unit including install would cost. I received a reply to my email within half an hour and we coordinated for Garrett to come by and work out a quote. Garrett showed up on time and swiftly got to work. He was done at the office within 15 minutes and emailed me a quote by the end of the day. The price was right and we agreed to do the install about a week later. The agreement was 50 up front and 50 after install. Install day came and Garrett and his guys showed up on time and prepared. They were done with the whole installation within 4 hours. They cleaned after themselves and even vacuumed around the install location. Honestly I would not have known they were even there except for a quietly humming mini split piping out freezing cold air. Two weeks after install happy happy happy in my own personal meat locker 5 stars all around!!!!
An interesting new froyo place in Coventry...which I would be willing to go back to! After surviving horrible horrible Menchies my experience with a super gritty froyo..bleh I was a bit apprehensive to try a new froyo place. I mean it s pretty hard to compare next to Yogurtland and Pinkberry but we do not have those in CLE...and....I still was willing to give Piccadilly a try as I had heard great things about the place. It s a bright place decorated with yellows whites and fun little seats with small fresh flowers in mason jars. All their froyo is either organic or vegan which the vegan ones are made with coconut milk . I went with the organic plain tart yesss! a real tart! and the vegan coconut. They have some good toppings along the side and all the fruit is FRESH. Not only fresh but it s from West Side Market. In fact everything in there is from a local place. YES! . And yes my asian friends they had MOCHI. OH THANK GOODNESS it s ABOUT TIME. They had mochi and the boba pearls which I ve never liked but they re there. They had some interesting other things to put on your froyo like dark chocolate sea salt caramels or dark chocolate raspberries to organic animal crackers. P It has a cool vibe to the place and reminds me of a froyo shop I would see in a modern college town like Ann Arbor. It was 57 cents per oz which is reasonable and I enjoyed hanging out there. Oh and when I asked the cashier about what piccadilly was she stated it was some circus in London? Nonetheless I recommend piccadilly. Do not go for that fake Menchies stuff and stop at Piccadilly s instead!
Kudos to Elite Pet Care in Scottsdale. Sarah is a wonderful care giver who will treat your pet like her very own. She walks trains house sits and will take rover on an all day dogie adventure. Imagine your best pal going for a trip to the dog park over to the doggie bakery for a snack then off to get a new toy... or even pop by the groomer and get your pooch a trim. She will even manage your dogie s by scheduling vet visits grooming appointments regular walks and socialization with other pets. Thanks for all you do Sarah!
The food is unforgettable but unfortunately so is the bill. Sicilian themed with fresh ingredients in an intimate setting all prepared in an open kitchen. Ask before you order a special or you might be stunned when you are handed the check. But if you love food and money is no object this is your place. A great place for Valentine s day or a special anniversary splurge with the emphasis on the word splurge .
Food is pretty good here love the scallops even though I m not a big scallop fan! The surprise dessert was LV cheesecake so good! The only thing that can improve is the service. It was so slow and took forever for the waitress to order for you!
Delicious food that is completely satisfying. Very well cooked and tasty you could be full from appetisers alone ! So my advice to you is first order your appetisers like hummus kibbie grape leaves and Baba with the mouthwatering pita bread that they make coupled with a drink of your choice smoothie or mint and then see if you can fit an entree or main dish afterwards.
I have been using AMS at my commercial building since 2002. They are on time quick but attention to detail with a noticeable clean up job of debris leaves etc. I have also used them to do a complete landscape plan for one of my homes in the past. They even replaced a tree that died over the winter. If you are shopping around you will find that AMS is on the more expensive side however in Arizona you really do get what you pay for in terms of landscaping and maintenance.
The food was delicious! The service was not so great. I came for a light lunch around 2 pm on a Tuesday and it was very crowded so the waitstaff was busy. They were friendly and did their best but the service was not up to par. Food was very good though and they were accommodating of dietary needs.
The Keg gets it right in so many ways after Houston s this is probably my favorite steakhouse which is nuts it being a chain and all. The ambiance is calming and romantic dim lighting with a giant fire and professionally clad waiters it s almost always booming yet never all that loud. I ve had a lot of their menu over the years and still have not found something I did not like. Their prime ribs are incredible. Get it rare and just let all that wonderful juice run down your chin... they also have huge potatoes plus some great appetizers like the tempura asparagus scallops and bacon and escargot. The only thing really lacking here is the beer selection just the basics around The Keg. But with dynamite service dishes you ll be licking clean and an atmosphere that ll put you in the mood The Keg earns an easy four stars.
First time here and I was delighted to walk into a cozy warm shop. The service is beyond amazing and I immediately felt welcome immediately. Had the Moroccan Lentil soup a definite favorite! I will be back and highly recommend this gem!!!!
Love the decorations and interior modern and chic. There s a long line and it took 30 mins for us to be seated. Should have called to make a reservation... Apart from the 30 mins wait the food and services are amazing!!! Each person has their own pot and I had the spicy beef which is pretty good. It comes with a bowl of rice. The portion is a bit too much I can only finish 70 . Their dessert looks delicious but I m too full to give a try. Would definitely come back and try their other stuffs. Overall experience is enjoyable!
Took our cars for a State inspection and new tires on our Mini Cooper very nice guys and the new tires alignment has made such a difference
Great little hide away great food and desserts clean they also do take outs! Owners are amazing! Stop in grab something for lunch or take home to the family but do not pass on the home baked goodies! Support Small Business Merry Christmas!
I had never been to Disney before so when I became overwhelmed trying to figure out how to plan the perfect honeymoon my sister in law recommended contacting Janet Dieso at Marvelous Mouse Travels. That was probably the best advice during the wedding planning I received! Janet is a sanity and life saver! As a Disney regular Janet is well versed in the ins and outs of all of the parks and the resorts. She was readily available via phone messenger and email to answer my plethora of Disney Newbie questions and is local to where I live so we were able to meet in person to complete the planning as well! When she found out that not only was it our honeymoon but my first time Disney trip as well she ensured that we would get the best of both experiences during our stay. And that we did! Following her tips and suggestions we were able to find ways to cool off during the heat avoid most of the crowds have quieter dining experiences find the quiet pools be part of the food and wine festival got to be Jr.Directors at Indiana Jones and we did not even need to use our pre booked fast passes! Best Trip EVER!
This place is sexy as you can get!! Great selection of latex leather nightlife fashions! And they have sizes that fit real people! The owners are the coolest people you ll meet in Las Vegas!
I was a lucky gal this year for my birthday. My boyfriend wanted to treat me to a romantic birthday dinner at any restaurant I wished to try so without any hesitation I chose Olives! Their reviews looked immaculate the view looked amazing and the food...just look at the food! It was an absolute must for me. View 4 5 the outdoor patio balcony has the ultimate seats so make sure to try your luck and get their early before 5pm . It s first come first served on the patio regardless of reservations. If you come a minute late you might get stuck with the back seats on the patio which are not as amazing as the seats right at the edge of the balcony the view at the edge is unobstructed from those large umbrellas and super up close and personal with the Bellagio fountains. Service 4 5 When we walked up to the host stand the woman was busy talking to another employee maybe a manger? But they did not acknowledge us at all to let us know that they will be a moment. A couple minutes later when they were done talking she asked us if we had reservations I said yes and gave her my name. I thought that our first impression of their staff and that whole ordeal was disorganized and amateur. After we were seated the service that we received from our waitress Michelle M. was pleasant and gracious. It appeared that she had read our reservation notes because she even wished me a happy birthday which was a sweet gesture. Our water was refilled immediately and frequently with the blink of an eye our bread basket was refilled right when we requested it and also our tapenade and olives were replaced with a fresh batch alongside it. They even doggy bagged the rest of our delicious uneaten bread from our basket and provided us with a new set of the amazing tapenade to take home. At the very end of our meal our waitress Michelle surprised me with a complimentary plate of 3 cream puffs filled with mousse. The plate was drizzled with chocolate some berries with a message in chocolate that said happy birthday and also 1 lit candle. It was a lovely gesture and we appreciated it so much! Ambiance 5 5 I am in love with the intimate lighting and decor inside of the restaurant. The environment was dimly lit mysterious stylish and sexy. Definitely special occasion it up at this place! Food 5 5 There was extreme precision and care in the execution and plating of our dishes. The presentation was absolutely gorgeous and vibrant! Both of our dishes were prepared expertly seasoned to perfection and incorporated top notch flavor. 1. Complimentary bread basket with black olive tapenade green olive tapenade and a variety of olives were all incredible. Each and every kind of bread was perfect alone or with the tapenade. I favored the bread that had some pops of sweetness to it and the Parmesan crisp. 2. Crazy Mushroom Pappardelle with king trumpet shiitake oyster and crimini mushrooms english peas piquillo peppers parmesan cream truffle essence and lemony pea shoots 34 The presentation was exquisite. Was it delicious? Absolutely! The dish was flawless. It was luscious and creamy the pappardelle was cooked al dente had a hearty abundance of mushrooms had an overall great mushroom flavor. 3. Atlantic Salmon cooked medium well with creamy beet risotto sauted vegetables curry beurre blanc roasted fennel and arugula 36 This dish was stunning to look at and they did not disappoint in execution. The salmon was cooked perfectly moist buttery and expertly seasoned. The risotto was slightly sweet very rich and paired perfectly with the salmon. The vegetables were all beautiful cooked with care and added an amazing texture to the dish. I was a fan of this dish! Value 4 5 Honestly you have to remind yourself that you are paying high strip prices and for also being inside of the Bellagio with a view like that you ll be paying top dollar for ambiance. Total was 80.53 for 2 dinner entrees and 1 4.50 coke including tax. The portions were great and they were very generous with the bread refills and the tapenade. Yet was the mushroom pappardelle worth 34? I do not think so. Maybe if they knocked it a few down to 25... 28 even then it would be right on the money. There was not any protein besides the mushrooms to make that dish that pricey. But we still enjoyed every last bit of it.
George and Andrea are wonderful. This was the first time our dog has been away from us for more than 8 hours since we brought him home so it was very hard on us. I love their no Cage policy. This is a great place for social dogs. My fianc picked him up after 3 nights at K 9 Kountry and said he looked great and happy. This is definitely my go to spot if I ever need to board my dog whether it be for an hour or a week.. He ate fresh cooked meals and treats his entire stay. Thank you George and Andrea for taking care of our puppy.
I have been waiting for a healthy fast food place in my area for such a long time. I went here for the first time this morning and ended up going back again for dinner. They have acai bowls which no one else in the area has so I ll probably be back from breakfast. OPEN ONE UP IN GRAYHAWK I love this place!!!
Surprised to see this place nearly empty. Creative menu with a nice mix of food and drinks. We noshed on several appetizers with each one living up to the expectation. Shishito peppers dates sprouts and olives were all fantastic with the sprouts and dates standing out. The shrimp lettuce cups were crisp and fresh and a light ish dinner. Their drink menu is pretty varied and they have a wide selection of beers on tap and more in bottles and cans. The atmosphere is a little loud and could be much louder if full but clean and modern. It seems like the place is too big for itself right now and it needs to grow into it. We ll be back.
A bit off the strip but they run shuttles every hour. The pool area was immaculate and had plenty of tables and chairs. Great BBQ area for guests to use. Our room was clean and had everything we needed in our mini kitchen. Nice continental breakfast included. Price was beyond reasonable for all that you get! Fitness room with sauna was great way to start the day. Had a wonderful stay.
Great night out. Logan not only knows the menu cold but delivers the meat HOT!!!!! Thanks Logan!
I had the opportunity to try this when going through Cleveland on a trip and waited 20 mins to sit before trying the food. It is a nice casual place with a large menu we tried breadsticks regular pizza tony soprano and a clevelander pizza. The breadsticks and regular pizza were good. The tony soprano was unique with the pasta on he sandwich and the spaghetti was quite tasty but the all star was the clevelander. This is all the benefits of a Chicago style pizza without all the extra crust. I am sorry for the lack of picture but if you like Chicago style you will love this pie. It is a unique pizza that I have not had Berger and find myself craving it now a few days afterward. This is a great pizza place to go better than any pizza in little Italy.
Great bomb ass food for everyone omni s and da herbi s a like lol my server really gave me good pointers and luckily he was a vegan. I had the Hippie wrap as sandwhich and hummus and added artichokes with hasbrowns. And actually dead as I write this
Just called in to ask some questions about a chip I have in my windshield. Unfortunately I attempted a home repair so the chip cannot be filled. The gentleman on the phone provided me with a quote for replacement and was very friendly and professional. When the chip spreads which in inevitable I will definitely be calling SAfePro for the replacement. In a world where service and friendliness are rare this gentleman took the time and earned a customer.
There are many pro s for this restaurant. Here goes. Location Right across Mtro Cote Sainte Catherine Easily reachable by Highway near Decarie Highway Parking is easy to find and free on Victoria Street Food Pho Delicious and unique. You may think that all Pho taste the same but I m very pleased with their soup bowls. Generous quantity prepared to perfection soup was boiling hot every time I order a great bowl of pho. Have not tried their Bun Vermicelli and Com Rice yet. I will re review this in the future. About the restaurant Family owned business with professional service Can get very busy in lunch times that does not bother me because it tells me that this place is popular and is great. Price range is exceptionally affordable. Anyhow this deserves a 4.75 star and 5 is closest to it so I give it a five. Definitely will be returning in the future.
Amazing little chicken spot tucked away in uptown charlotte. Try the plantains. Try the chicken. Do not forget the green pepper sauce. I went back twice in the span of two days when visiting. And I left feeling healthy both times. Wash it down with the mint lemonade. Mmmmm.
There are very few people or outfits I would trust my Brittany with Vanessa and Sit. Stay is one of them and I recommend them without reservation. She cares as much as any owner and is full service and fantastic.
I m a fan love their style and deals they have available but their socks man not the best of luck..I ve had 3 different pairs tear a hole in the bottom and at 13 a pair I m returning these. Joseph Abboud jeans though are some of the most comfortable jeans I ve ever worn.
Ca not ask for a better way to get your drink fix! Then add something salty with their not too buttery popcorn and a delectable cookie Call me a popaholic
As far as Metros go this one is my favorite. It s fairly clean very spacious and the best part it s 24 hours! It s a central location for people in St Lawrence market and is usually pretty stocked full of sale items. The Good 1. Location. Very central location for people living downtown beautiful area of the city. 2. Hours. Open 24 7 it s rare for this location to be closed although you should definitely check out their holiday hours before heading out . 3. Spacious. It s very rare you have a grocery store that is spacious enough for me not to get cranky even when it s super busy there is room to breathe. The Bad 1. Registers. Major lack of cashier at this location and they are laid out extremely weird and impractical. 2. Outdated. Like all other Metros it s very outdated in general. Recommendation come here if you live in the area and hit up the sales they re usually great.
Usually come here for waxing but decided to try them for nails. Other salons have made me bleed but not Kat. She did a great job and I was in and out in an hour with no appointment at noon on a Saturday. They do a great job waxing to
I m normally not a big fan of going to franchise brand restaurants but I was pleasantly surprised on my Sunday visit to this Milestone location. The place was pretty full when we arrived and the decor is quite nice. To begin with my friend noticed that there was a CAA preferred dining sticker in the front of the entrance and when we asked about it they actually said that if you have a CAA card you get a free appetizer! YAY!!! We opted for the recommended goat cheese plate and it was delicious. I mean who does not like arugula roasted onions goat cheese and focaccia? For our mains we ordered the beef bolognese and chicken asiago pasta. They were quite good considering I did not expect something SUPER spectacular. To top it off our waitress was super friendly and we had a great dining experience overall.
Beautiful facility and great place to play and watch tennis!
I wish there was one closer to where I live. My kids and I love their food. They have salads sandwiches soup and dessert. Love this place!!
The customer service here does lack as you can expect to be waiting to check out for awhile. It s very rare that you can be in and out. However the store is open 24 hours a day and that is the reason why I am a fan !
I delivered my second baby here and it was a wonderful experience at this hospital. I would recommend Gateway to anyone who s having a baby. Everyone from triage labor and delivery postpartum to lactation was nothing short of wonderful. I hope the people who work in this department do not go unacknowdeged. They are hard working caring kind and very good at their jobs.
I was looking for a good Korean restaurant in Toronto and I found it here! I love how they have floor seating in one area of the restaurant it s very beautiful. As for food I got bibimbap dumplings and a seafood pancake which were all excellent. Also extra points for he amazing KPOP! I ca not wait to take my family back here as well as my friends!
It s Costco. How could it not be awesome? You can get everything here from life to death! Outdoor indoor recreation food crafts etcetcetc. I love that it s always organized for self serve shopping. Food samples are always a bonus especially since we all tend to get hungry when going grocery shopping. My parents tend to get prescriptions here as well which is great! Good prices and it takes a while to fill the prescription so we just end up shopping around! And they have a mini food court so you can have a hot dog or a nice pizza while you wait. I love the soft serve. Best part of dinner is coming here to get a giant soft serve cone!! Delicious! Staff are amazing. Years of coming to Costco and I have yet to meet a cashier who is rude. If you are lucky you ll get Deanna a particularly friendly staff that I ve seen a few times. She s nice and really really friendly no matter how stressed she is. I hope her supervisors know just how wonderful she makes our Costco visits.
Ambience Very calming authentic. Pleasant jazz music. Reminds me of Japan! Food Good coffee. Had traditional breakfast. Good food no complaints.
Delicious and unique place. It feels like your are in Montreal. A cool place in the middle of uptown
New owners and chef and tastes just like it used too. Very good food and service. You should come here
Dr. Greenberg is amazing! The most thorough eye exam i ve ever had! I went from using readers and having terrible vision near and far to only using my contacts even for small print. I am 47 and my vision has not been this great since my 30 s!
Lucas was great! He found us the best and coolest technology and made sure it was all set up on our phones and iPads. Everything is so awesome! We can control the thermostats door locks and lights! He was so helpful with everything and even stayed late to make sure everything was good to go. Highly recommend! Thanks Lucas!!
This is one of the best if not the only place to try every rum from the Caribbean in the valley. They have highly skilled bartenders and a rotating cocktail menu. I d recommend one of their classics like a rum old fashion or dark and stormy. They also have more exotic drinks like a trade wind swizzle. If the rum alone is not enough to consider this spot as a must try the food is fantastic as well. I recommend the jerk chicken most of all. Go in say hello to Dwayne and enjoy yourself.
This company was awesome. Starting from the professionalism of Michael and his outstanding customer service to the awesome work that Miguel and Maria performed in my home. I expect a company to deliver exactly what is said in a contract. Walk on Me flooring did exactly that. Workmanship was superior to all. I watched Miguel and Maria make precision cuts that other companies would just use several pieces to patch a corner. I was really impressed to see Maria laying my laminate flooring like a seasoned contractor. This company is exactly what I look for in a company upfront honest on time professional and unmatched skills in laying laminate flooring. I also had this company lay carpet for me in my bedrooms and again the workmanship and professionalism was the same. The carpet guy did a awesome job. What a phenomenal company. I highly recommend this company walk on me flooring. What a breathe of fresh air to know that there are companies like this that still exist.
Good food and friendly service. Easy on the pocket. It is a small place but big on flavors and quality. Really good breads and pastries.
The BEST I have tried for a while. Their house fried rice is so addictive! Drunken noodles are to die for and the wonton soup had the right amount of spices and vegetable consistancy. Price is a steal for all the great flavors their food has to offer not to mention their out of this world customer service not like other places in town where they lack in that department . Will come here often after they let us know about their karaoke and poetry nights! YOU GUYS ARE GREAT!
They Recently Built a booth for us for trade shows and events.. They did a really nice job getting it ready with graphics functionality and portability... Thanks Eric for your attention to detail based on a concept in my mind !!!
We ve been residents here for the past 3 years and we ca not say enough about this property. The maintenance is fantastic about service requests and keep the grounds looking great. Jenni and Tatiana in the office are really friendly and always willing to help when we need something. We really love the annual Christmas party and the bbq in the summer! Great job keep up the good work!
Our company hosted a large group event in Charlotte and Asheville over a long weekend and we had several transportation needs ranging from numerous point to point sedan transfers charter buses and executive vans. We were absolutely thrilled with CLT Express Limousine. They handled our heavy workload with the utmost professionalism willingness and great attention to detail. They extremely communicative and accommodating and quick to respond to questions or changes of plan. We expected each of our guests to be treated as elite travelers and CLT did just that. We could not be more happy with their service and I would highly recommend them to anyone looking for reliable premier transportation.
This is a nice place to eat. Right across from the metro is very convenient. The green curry is slightly spicy delicious creamy hot. The mango salad was.. a mango salad. I mean I do not really like mango salads only because I think it s a weird concept but it was still good. The spring roll was all right but not mind blowing. I only took off one star mostly because the portions are very small for the price. I took a second bowl of rice and they charged me 2 for it and it was barely an actual BOWL of rice like what I was expecting. I would say maybe about 8 spoonfuls of rice? Ridiculous. I ll go back next time and get the Pad Thai. That looked plentiful. Maybe to them I looked too skinny to eat a real portion of food but they should not judge on appearances.
We enjoy the healthy food with tasty options. We also appreciate the WiFi access with electricity. The facility was clean and the staff was very pleasant to work with.
Fun spot for a friendly competition or to celebrate someones birthday. We attended a birthday party here and it was pretty fun. Big laser tag arena alot larger than some others we have been too. They also have a viewing deck above so you can watch the game. It only allows you to see the start of the arena so you cant see the whole arena or game when they are running around. I was a bit confused because they said each game is 15 min but we were able to finish two games including the entry suit up exit and re suit up all in 30 min. Maybe they include the entry intro rule time and suit up as part of the game. Kinda felt jipped but the kids had fun so whatever s. They have a very small arcade area and from what I saw 2 birthday rooms so call ahead if you want to have a party there. Friendly employees was a plus.
I went to Montreal over a year before writing this for a week long birthday vacation with my boyfriend. Growing up in the Midwest United States I spent most of my life deprived of mountainous regions. Before we even arrived to the city I was determined to climb my first mountain Mont Royal. After experiencing a few days of the city we made the venture from our hotel in Longueuil to the park after a brief stop for meat pies at Tourtiere Australienne! YUM!! . Never one to follow conventional wisdom or previously marked trails for that matter I the trail guide for the day decided to bush wack our way up the side of the mountain. About half way up without a trail in sight we realize that we ve gotten ourselves into a bit of a situation. Above us was steep crumbly dirt that was still wet from the rain from the last couple days. Below us was a slightly less steep drop but jagged rocks broken glass bottles the few trees we d been using to pull ourselves up and just as much crumbly ground. With no choice at that point but to continue on we scaled the side of the mountain by digging into the dirt until we finally found a path to continue on to. From the grounds around Chalet du Mont Royal you can see the whole city spread out in all of it s glory below you. We arrived just before dusk so we had the immediate transition from the sunny scenery to the rosy glow lending its light to the vista below. We found our way in the quickly departing light to the Croix du Mont Royal the peak of the mountain and while I was busy taking pictures of the cross at night my boyfriend was rummaging through his bag. I turned around to see what he thought of the view as he was getting down on his knee with a small box in his hand. He asked if I would climb more mountains with him then he asked me to marry him! The Parc du Mont Royal and its namesake mountain will always hold a special place in my heart but even if you do not have the same sentimental experience it s still a great place to see!
We LOVE LOVE LOVE Tahiti Village and come here as often as we can. Hard to believe it has been 10 YEARS since I became an owner. They had not even finished building then back when they had Alan Thicke doing the slightly cheesy radio ads for couples wanting to rekindle their romance and fleets of buses driving all over town! We have visited every year for conferences family reunions fun with friends or just to get away from it all and we are never disappointed. The staff are all amazing and every single one seems to care that we have a good time! The time goes so quickly when there are great discounted shows to go to lots of special deals and fun things to do courtesy of the management and there is always the incredible LAZY RIVER and white sand beach!... not to mention the luxurious huge Jacuzzi tub and the therapeutic steam shower! So much fun we re just staying on property all day again and that is the ultimate compliment in VEGAS BABY!!!
So despite the crappy service that we received from our waitress going to contribute it to being holiday season and her having to work an entire section to herself this is the best buffet that I ve had in Vegas and I ve been to a lot of them. We sat in the more garden like dining area where we were surrounded by planters full of beautiful plants so it made it feel as if we were dining in a cafe rather than a stuffy restaurant. And the food is just to die for that you forget that it s massed produced buffet food. Even though we were there for lunchtime it was far superior to the Bellagio buffet dinner. Some of the highlights included the bowl of ramen noodles and the hand scooped ice cream for dessert.
Visited on Boxing Day. The server was helpful. Our favorite was char su bo pork bun . We started with two. It was addictive enough that we ordered two more. We also had two noodle dishes. The egg and flat rice noodles were savory. Overall it was definitely a happy place to have lunch.
Omg! This place is amazing!! I get something different every time and it just gets better. The customer service is also outstanding. I ve been back 3 times already in one week. Highly recommend it. I ve never had to wait but I have had friends that have waited over an hour but if anything it s worth it.
This restaurant is such a great gem in downtown Pittsburgh. The delivery is good but it s even better when you dine in. Make sure you get an eggroll and homemade plum sauce they are the best in the entire world and I ve never had anything like it anywhere else. The chicken and broccoli sesame chicken and garlic chicken are my go to and are all extra delicious. As others have said lunch service is fast so you can get in and out on your lunch break. We also get delivery quite often and it s always good and accurate and they are friendly on the phone. Definitely give it a try!
I accidentally locked myself out of a room in the house that I just could not find a way back into credit card bobby pins...nothing worked.The service was nice someone in the office kept calling to make sure a technician called me and was helpful the locksmith was a little later than I expected he said 15 minutes but that turned into 40 mins ...but opened the door in about 30 seconds and only charged 50...less than I was expecting. The person in the office called to make sure I was helped. Overall not a terrible experience even though I was in a horrible mood for locking myself out!!! Thanks!
Food was delicious. This space used to be a Baja Fresh totally blows them out of the water. I would recommend this place to anyone and I do. COME HERE!! IT S GREAT FOOD!!
Delicous looking pastries and pleasant atmosphere. Its a great alternative to have. I m not the biggest sweet fan and definately not sold on all the crap that goes into vegan foods and sweets but if one must indulge then this ai not a bad way to go. I love the location and how nice they keep it. Its so much nicer thant he original Green.
OKAY! Just had my tat done by Devin. I came in a few Sunday s ago and showed him what I wanted. I paid my 60 deposit and scheduled my appt. I texted him a few days before to make sure we had a drawing of what I wanted. He was responsive and told me we could go over more detail during my appt. So I came today and he was extremely patient with me listening to my wants and desires for this tattoo. He even did research on the Filipino flag for me to make sure he captured every aspect. I have to say this place was extremely professional and excellent decor it really felt warm. I mean the bathroom is sweet definitely not the regular tat shop experience! So I ve had other tats and I ve NEVER been more pleased. His detail is exceptional and I m a brown skin girly and the color is beautiful. Thanks Devin you did a remarkable job! I m so very happy! I definitely recommend Living Canvas!
I worked at The Breadfruit a few years back so I have the insider s scoop. After working in many restaurants I can honestly say theirs is the cleanest kitchen I ve seen. Dwayne and Danielle are good people that actually care about the product they serve. They buy veggies from the farmers market!! We once had a field trip to visit and volunteer on a local farm that they buy their chicken and eggs from. The food may not be for everyone although I loved it but you should at least stop in for a drink. Dwayne is a true mixologist his drinks are amazing. He s from Jamaica and uses a lot of unique ingredients in the cocktails. My favorite was their Pina Colada with fresh pineapple and coconut milk. The atmosphere is relaxing with reggae music playing. Check it out!
Red Water is an absolutely beautiful restaurant where I definitely recommend people to check it out. After I walked and drove past a number of Red Water locations I have been wanting to go to it for sometime. The only thing that held me back in going was the apprehension that it would be like so many other restaurant franchises cough cough Metropolitan Moxies Earls who cater to the public through the use of atmosphere and decor rather than through the avenue of creating good food. It just happened so that my boyfriend s birthday was fast approaching. Being in the position where I had no idea what to get him and did not have the time to buy presents it was a perfect opportunity to take him out to Red Water and get that stupid steak dinner that he would so jokingly hint about. The northwest location in Calgary is like a hidden gem amongst a pile of rocks with it s fanciness it looks a little out of place in a shopping plaza of older businesses. Walking in you ll notice right away Red Water s open layout where tables are nicely spaced apart on the floor as u shaped booths line the wall. With a darker colour scheme splashes of red and off whites colour the room to give an intimate and comfortable feeling. Although I would not say Red Water is an upscale restaurant it definitely caters to a dressier and more mature crowd when I mean mature I mean not being annoying idiots in a restaurant . Although it is not necessary to get dressed up it is within the stated dress code. Unlike other restaurant chains Red Water executed in giving great service as well as great food. The waitress we got that night was extremely professional and knowledgeable of the menu. My boyfriend and I both ordered wine and upon it being poured the waitress did ask if we wanted a taste test to ensure that it was right to our palette. With dinner I was not disappointed where Red Water lives up to its rustic grille and steakhouse title I ordered a scallop and shrimp dish while the birthday boy ordered a steak...both dishes were cooked to perfection with great tasting sides and sauces. Unlike most steakhouses like the Keg where they serve a dish 90 meat and 10 sides Red Water served a good balance of portions with beautiful presentation. Like what other people have said the menu offers great choices in mixing traditional classic dishes with a modern and inventive twist in flavour. For those that are vegetarian or have a gluten free diet do not shy away from this restaurant where they have a few choices to choose from. The cost of items is quite reasonable but not exactly cheap ranging from the 14 to 40 mark of the main course meals do be prepared to spend a little more. The bill for the two of us was around 88.00 however it was definitely worth the price in both service and food. Although this wo not become my go to place I will definitely be back in the near future.
The bartender and kitchen manager were awesome this afternoon for taking great care of my son. He is undergoing treatment for leukemia at UH Rainbow and has not had much appetite but a steak sounded good to him. We are anxious to get him to eat anything so this was a good thing. I was disappointed to find out that the steak was no longer on the menu. The bartender went to talk to the kitchen manager to see what he could do. The manager came out introduced himself and said that he would take care of my son. He went back and prepared a delicious steak and side dish for my son. When he brought the food out he asked for my son s name so that he could pray for him and then said that he was taking care of the bill for me. The kindness caring and generosity of the staff was beyond compare. Thank you!
I went in to remove a lipoma on the back of my thigh. While small it bothered me and made me self conscious when I wore shorts. Dr. Handler was very patient and thorough and explained the process procedure to me in detail. He also advised me of the disadvantages of taking out the lipoma because it could possibly leave a small scar but the ultimate decision was up to me and he allowed me time to decide. I ultimately went through with the procedure and I am quite happy with the results. The scar I believe will be about .5 in length way less obvious than the lipoma. The procedure lasted less than 15 minutes he was cautious and his nurse was wonderful. I have my confidence in wearing shorts again and I am so happy. So glad I went through with it! Definitely a pleasant experience highly recommended!
We came here with my in laws when they came to town. It was featured on Diner s Drive ins and Dives and they play the episode inside the place. Here you wait in line as you make your way up to the person taking orders. When you walk in be sure to grab a menu and you can peruse it while you wait in line. Once you get to the front there is a place to put your menu and you simply order your meal. You will be given a buzzer to alert you when your food is ready. The ingredients are very fresh and the food is good. This is also a very kid friendly place and noisy because of all the children. You can sit inside or outside on park benches. A very casual low key place with decent breakfast of lunch food. Visited April 2012
Lovely little boutique gym. Clean with a good assortment of equipment machines and classes. I had a very friendly welcome which was great and made me excited to get back into a fitness routine after a 6 month break. Private bathrooms are spotless very comfortable to shower after a workout.
The fruit is always so fresh in their bowls!! Good combinations and toppings. I wish they offered cacao nibs but they do not . Sometimes the granola is hard to detect. The 5th star is removed because the acai is always still frozen in their bowls. I m not a fan of that but otherwise good stuff. I ve tried the plaza midwood and southpark locations and both were good.
My first time at this salon and as you all know it s a little un nerving going to a new salon. Jenny was my stylist and she too is new to Divine Hair Design. I had hair past my shoulder and wanted it all gone so Together we decided on the services I needed cut partial highlights and style. I could not be happier with Jenny and her skill. I absolute LOVE my new do. I would recommend Jenny and already have a follow up appointment to maintain this gorgeous hair cut.
The food is very very good very tasty highly recommend going. We went as a group for the buffet lunch and all the dishes were well made. The Tandoori chicken moist which is a surprise from other buffets I ve been to where it s been dry throughout. Goat curry money dish! was well spiced fall off the bones type of dish. If you have ever wanted to try goat curry this is the place. Nan fresh and good. Butter chicken one of the better ones I ve tasted. Not so much of a buttery cream texture to the sauce more of a kick to it very nice. Lentils burns so good to the belly. For desert rice pudding KIR sorry if I have the spelling wrong . Another MONEY DISH. Not so sweet you feel your teeth falling out at other places I ve been to nicely sweet everyone at our table cleaned off their dishes. Other items Decor very upscale very classy. Nice chairs tables wrap around seating at the front. Service excellent service eager and pleasant staff. Music a little bit loud should turn it down a bit. I will derfinitely return or oder to go great restaurant!
I have been coming here for years! The fried tacos are awesome and the margaritas are pretty good! I definitely do not come here because its fancy or anything but I believe its a step up from Filibertos Filly B s ! The service is always great! I recommend this if you want real mexican food that is not overpriced!
Love it!!! But I try not to come here if I plans afterward cuz I never know how my stomach will react to the assault. For those of you interested there actually is a trick to this place. Someone taught it to me and now I m passing it on to you. Save the meat till last! If you ve only paid for one bowl and want to make the most out of it you know that the veggies start to tumble off the side when it gets full. Do your loose tumbly veg first fill the voids with the smaller stuff like corn and peas. Do not be afraid to smash things down as you load on more veg. Then when you ve got a good mound going and you think it ca not hold any more go back to the meat. Drape those thin moist slices of meat over your bowl like blankets. The meat will stick so you can layer on as much as you want! You ll end up with more of a mountain than a bowl. Combine that with 2 cups of sauce mix in your whole bowl of rice at the table and you ve easily got 2 very filling meals. Fry up your leftovers in a skillet for round 2 a few days later! Sure the unlimited is only a few bucks more but you ca not take leftovers home! The surprise hit for me is the meatballs. They re so tender and work very well in a stir fry. Oh and the lettuce wraps are awesome! Way better than the thick floury tortillas.
I had been craving Indian food for a while now and when Karen W. suggested this spot for our lunch I was immediately onboard. It faces Broadway Road east of McClintock with ample parking. I walked inside and was greeted and even told that my friend had already arrived and been seated. I d never been here before but the tables are setup with silverware and water and the plates are at the beginning of the buffet. They also have mango lassi and chai which was an unexpected but pleasant perk. The mango lassi was thick and sweet and I enjoyed it but would like to try it with a stronger tart mango flavor. I started with getting both the white basmati rice and the biryani and then surveyed the choices of dishes. There was good variety and a lot of veggie options to accommodate vegetarians. I tried basically everything including the chicken tikka masala spiced chicken and chicken drumsticks. They had the classics like paneer palak aloo curry daal pakora etc. Salad was available but it was your basic iceberg tomato cucumber combo so I passed. Hot garlic naan was brought to our table once we got our plates as well. I liked the pakora paneer cheese and the palak spinach surprisingly since I prefer spinach raw. But it had a bit of heat to it which leads to my one main complaint about this place. I would ve liked to see spicier selections as everything was pretty mild. Maybe so that it can cater to more folks but mama likes her heat. They had mint yogurt and tamarind sauce which are soothing and a pickle sauce I did not try. The dessert selection was nice I tried gulab jamun I bit into it and was surprised that it was hot! carrot halwa and the round sugary circles. They also had some sort of yogurt which I did not try. Nandini was a lot of food at a great value. I really appreciated that the drinks were included in the buffet and that the owner manager let me wrap up the leftover naan to take home. I would definitely come back and inquire about modifying the spice level on my plate.
I was desperate to try this place. It s has a tiny front and is easily missed because of the towering parking garage next to it. So anyway I was desperate to try this place and I made it 30 minutes before closing. Dear Gwen M. I do not know who your host was but when we walked in we asked if it was all right to order since they were so close to closing. The host was warm and welcomed us in. I ordered a black bean burger that was the best veggie burger I ve ever had. There was some sort of roux sauce on the side that was equally phenomenal. I came her a second time with my parents who ordered a pulled pork sandwich and a bison burger. Neither of these were so great. They were a bit gamey. But I ll never forget you my black bean.
A fan of the original THBH on Camelback I was thrilled to see one opening very close to home. Not only is this a great addition to the neighborhood but it will bring the addition of several inches to my waistline. The owner of this branch Cindy was working the register and could not have been nicer. And a 3 pack of tacos for 5.00 was a deal I could not pass up. Carne Asada Chicken and Fish were my choices. These are all well sized tacos making this more than a meal at a great price. All 3 were tasty and I look forward to getting back soon to try their wide variety of hot dogs. I never thought I d be so happy to see hippies move into the neighborhood.
DELICIOUS! I dined in restaurant for the first time yesterday. The food took a little long to come out but granted it was super busy. I ordered the soft shell crab and it was to die for. I d definitely recommend this place!
The Root Cafe is an interesting place. My Fiance recently started working here as a Barista hopefully this does not skew my review. Root is a Cafe but its nothing like you re used to. Food I hope you re not a carnivore... else you ll be wondering Where s the beef!? Root only serves Vegetarian options. Do not worry though! I am not a Vegetarian and I LOVE Root s food. These are not your bland tastes like grass type Vegetarian options. Each and every entree that I have thoroughly enjoyed at Root is both delicious and nutritious. They have Gluten Free options that are available in most cases for no additional up charge i think they re all free just not 100 on that . They also have specials almost every day! I really enjoyed the Reuben that used mushrooms instead of Tempeh. That was fantastic. Tempeh Reuben My current favorite sandwiches. On rye this sandwich is better than any other reuben I have had. If you re a reuben fan just try it! Culture My fiances favorite sandwich. I am not really a fan of Pesto but this unique sandwich is quite delicious. Hoffman Bicycle Pizza Kind of like a culture pizza. Delicious unique filling. String Theory calzone SO. Much. CHEESE. Sweet potatoe fries w aoili These are fantastic. The sauce really makes them! Burruto Fantastic! Very filling... Drinks Fantastic coffee choices. I believe all are fair trade and local. They do carry Rising Star Cleveland s premier roaster. Right now I am enjoying some of the Costa Rica coffee. Their Barista s know how to properly pull espresso. Do not try to compare Root to Bux and their burnt beans. Atmosphere There are so many regular customers that if you too are a regular you can really feel like you are family. At times it can be difficult to find a seat. Most customers are kind and will share their table with you. They have paper signs by the espresso machine that you can put out to signify to other customers that they do not mind if you share the table. There are multiple power outlets for laptops and they provide free wifi. They play music loud enough that it doesnt feel creepy but soft enough that you can still have a conversation with your friends. Tuesday Open Mic Night Thursday Raw Food Night 5 9pm Cons Sometimes it is hard to find a seat. Ask the employee s for help though. They can usually get you a seat. Food can take a while to make but its fresh and made to order so... this really isnt a con? Just relax and wait for your food! They run out of Kombucha quite regularly. You re probably not going to Root just for a Kombucha though. Drinking their coffee will make it difficult to go to the big name coffee places that just dont have comparable quality.
this place only has 2 reviews? there were so many people in and out of here when i was there today! although not to stereotype but most of them did not look like to computer savvy yelper type.. i recently got a new bike off craigslist and needed to make some adjustments. firstly my tires needed air and seat needed to be lower and one of the guys there kindly pumped my tires and adjusted my seat. my bike is a road bike with drop handles and i had been thinking about flipping it over and cutting the bars to make them bullhorns. i was going to get all the parts and do this myself but who knew when i would actually get around to it plus i do not really have any tools so i was referred to jeff who is the road bike guy. when i came in he was balancing on his single speed road bike chatting with someone. this was the guy to talk to! he said no problem! let me go take this bar off and see where we can cut it. he mentioned something about how it was sort of his hobby turning road bikes into single speeds and so he took some time to explain that whole process to me. long story short he took off the original levers and handlebar tape cleaned up the adhesive cut the bars into bullhorns put on the new levers which required some customization bc they were a bit big and also installed the new bike seat that i had decided to pick up while i was walking around waiting for the rest of the work to get done. side story another guy who worked there told me i should go get a chili dog and there was a great place for a chili dog down the street. i decided to go out for a stroll not for a chili dog tho bc i am vegetarian and actually ended up finding a place with vegetarian chili that was right next door! awesome! anyway all in all i walked out spending more on upgrades than i had planned to but i got a discount on an open package item and the other items were very competitively priced. i was so happy with all the work and that they were not going to charge me for the labor for the over two hours i was there getting everything adjusted !! this is my new favorite place. like the other reviewer said they were so friendly and knowledgeable and not trying to sell you a bunch of crap you do not need. i will have to go back to get some adjustments to the levers i think and i ll probably pick up a couple more things while i m there toe clips are on the list!
Man Maria had a better quote then USAA and Military is suppose to be better. She has my business. I have told everyone about her!
We stopped by for a quick lunch recently at this hidden gem it s located in a strip mall behind a Discount Tire and Circle K . We like to support local businesses and I m glad we gave them a try. The owner and staff were very friendly and accommodating. But to the food This is real deal BBQ. My husband ordered ribs which were very tender and juicy...fell off the bone in fact. I had the chicken tacos so good! The chicken was also tender not dry at all. We enjoyed the variety of BBQ sauces too...you can pick your own traditional spicy sweet from containers that are set out on a counter space which makes it easy and accessible for refills. It s very clean and modern inside with a cool AZ vibe and has a small bar with two TV s...we notice these things lol. Great iced tea too! We will be back.
My first time trying out CrossFit and I was nervous... Joe the owner made me feel welcomed. It was the first time I did a REAL workout. I ll never go back to a regular gym because it is boring and I was never pushed. At Crossfit Culmination I had that feeling of not wanting to give up and to keep pushing. Finally I found a legitimate place to be truly fit.
Best pizza me and my family have ever ate the owner really made us feel welcomed and the experience was amazing a little piece of Brooklyn in Vegas we even made it on his wall of americas most wanted the garlic knots were the bomb
Just had my first Killer Burger the Jose Mendoza and it will not be my last! Juicy full of flavor and the bun is the best. Finally a great Burger joint! Great service too.
Excellent service! I received a postcard in the mail for a free cleaning. I not only had a thorough cleaning but the x rays were also included. There was no high pressure sales pitch and no unnecessary recommendations for dental treatment. Everyone was professional friendly and caring. The dental plan offered is a very good deal if you do not have insurance. I highly recommend Smile for Life Dentistry.
This restaurant is my weekend Dim Sum on the fly kind of place they have fresh variety and tasty Dim Sum. They also have regular Chinese food. Great service moderately priced. They have ample parking wheelchair access. This is a good size restaurant and and nicely managed. I strongly recommend this restaurant.
My business cards were printed here it was great! I messed up my business card formatting in a Ms document and when I meet with the owner of Alexandria Printing Services he was able to handle my mistake and without getting frustrated and his prices are ok he is a nice person he always work hard to make sure you are satisfied thanks
Really great place for poke bowls. I always do the DIY bowl where you can mix and match any ingredient you like. Some of the extras do cost a bit seaweed salad and avocados are 1 each which tend to add up but overall they make great bowls for relatively inexpensive prices. Also when you go to pay they let you spin a wheel that can net you cool things like another bowl for 1 2 off and 15 or 30 on your current order.
I just got back from an Arizona spring training vacation and one of the highlights was definitely the Desert Botanical Gardens. We came really close to skipping on a visit altogether because it was 5 00pm but decided to give it a shot...it was worth it! I was a little disappointed that the Butterfly Pavillion had closed for the day at 5 00pm and several walking areas were being used for weddings receptions who could blame these people?? but still got to see a lot of beautiful desert plants and wildlife. We managed to get in for free not sure if it was because of the time of the day or all the people just walking in for the weddings though which totally made the park that much more fun. I am not sure I would have gotten as much enjoyment out of it if I d had to pay 5 to get in... The little desert rat sqirrels and rabbits were totally fun to try to find hiding in the many different plants and burrows. I felt like a little kid ooh ing and ah ing at the different varieties of cacti and desert wildflowers and have to give this place the ultimate rating . If you re ever in Arizona please give this place a try it s very well put together and a beautiful site to see.
I saw someone rating this place as being better than Kem Coba so I had to try. In my humble opinion this place is a solid 4 stars for me but I would not compare it to Kem Coba Boc Bec delivers DIFFERENT flavours. It s like comparing apples and oranges very personal and different. I appreciate and love the fact that this place offers different types of ice cream other than your usual cookies and cream . When you go there you must try Maple Taffy and Kulfi Indian ice cream if you are a little adventurous you wo not be disappointed in these flavours. PS. I drove 50mins to try this ice cream.
Had the Midwest Monster. Loved it. They put the sides in these small aluminum cups and I thought it would not be enough. These small aluminum cups use Mary Poppins purse technology as my side of BBQ beans kept on giving.
Dr. Mitchell combines adjustments with massage and physical therapy. If you re looking for a chiropractor that knows his stuff you found him!
Great group of people and outstanding bedbug program. I feel like the management really cares about the customers and listens. The technicians I have met have been incredible and I can tell they are happy. Very professional group.
Absolutely love this place!This is my second time and already have another appointment in the near future!
Sherri has helped answer my complicated business questions I wish I talked to her years ago. She s nice and gets right down to business I would definitely recommend her. A
Went there last night for dinner. I had the Shrip Mango Curry wonderfully sweet and spicy. It was a special item and not a regular menu item but I wish it was! He splurged and got the Crispy Duck so worth it just melts in your mouth and the sauce served with it complemented it beautifully. I m not a huge fan of their Tom Yum Gai Soup I like Siam Terrace s version better but the Pinky in a Blanket appetizer was really good. The place is clean staff is friendly and they make a mean Thai Iced tea I d reccomend it.
Dr Fakhouri is the best primary care Doctor! New location is ok. Nice comfortable office.
My favorite spot in Vegas if not the world! The staff here is always so friendly attentive and funny and I love the ambiance. It s cool dark and has the best decor. Their drinks are fabulous. What more can you ask for? I proudly display all their mugs in my home and look forward to every trip.
New Years hangover means Chinese delivery. Even better that you can order online! We live on the other side of downtown and the food arrived as ordered in just about 30 minutes! Maybe even a little less? General Tsos tofu with an order of lo mein. you can pick the level of spicy ness and I thought the medium was on the tamer side. Maybe need to order the hot next time... but really no complaints from us. We ll be ordering again soon!
The SouthSide is a wonderful place to hang out and people watch! Although a thunderstorm temporarily closed the patio area this past Saturday it did not take long once the storms past for the patio to be up and running. The patio is surrounded on two sides by brick walls and the other two sides by pine tress so it gives it a true courtyard effect. I noticed that it has a fireplace outside in the patio and I m sure it s a cozy place to sit in the fall. The food is also as good as it gets. A place not to be missed while in Tremont!!! p.s. Jill the manager is the bomb!!!!
This small casual place is very clean and organized. You order at the front counter seat yourself and bus your table when you re done. I ordered the grilled chicken quesadilla. The tortilla was soft with slightly crispy edges. The chicken which had a strong charbroiled taste was mixed into avocado and sour cream making a soft and moist filling. I quite liked it! The chips were average but good. And the guacamole was fresh and not overly spicy. Since it s close to CSN I ll definitely come back between classes for a quick lunch.
This place is good. Like your doctor and everyone else s doctor hates it but secretly they eat it frequently good. We order for delivery here frequently since I work down the street and I have never been disappointed. I always get a cheeseburger simple enough and it s so amazing but the onion rings and malts are what make this place my favorite of all favorites for amazing unhealthy binge lunches. Get a side of onion rings and a vanilla Oreo malt and you can die happy from a massive heart attack but happy nonetheless .
Very nice ppl working. I didnt like the sandwich bread but the meat was awesome! Overall a nice Experience.
Delicious food. Great service. Pizza was fantastic. Homemade pasta was delicious. Sauces were perfectly paired.
I really love my new pull out couch and storage ottoman. I ve gotten compliments on it from my guests saying how comfortable it was.
Great customer service. Very helpful. Dropped my phone off went shopping and it was ready when I was done. Did not realize they could fix so much without having to replace my phone at affordable prices too .
They have all sorts of chinese pastries for cheap Custard tarts 3 stars 3 for 1 cheap but the custard had no taste. Banama rice cake 4 stars forgot how much this was but it was cheap. It was soft and and had a nice strong banana flavor to it. Cash only. I think this is one of the cheaper bakeries in chinatown.
When I moved from NY to California my first thought was where I was going to get pizza and bagels. That was where I was introduced to Blaze. Then I moved to Las Vegas and had to say goodbye. As soon as I moved here low and behold Blaze is opening in Summerlin!!! Happy happy joy joy! Finally got to get my pizza. I love the build your own option. I get a ton of veggies on my pizza and it is delicious. The restaurant is is bright and modern but the brightest star are the employees who work there. Friendly and conscientious making sure we were enjoying our meal. We definitely were. Give Blaze a try and build you favorite pizza. We ca not wait to go back Still looking for bagels and bialys!
Thank you Olga and Carla! Amazing pet groomers. Friendly affordable pet loving business. 8 12 16 today I took my German Shepherd puppy to get her 1st professional groom. She is a high energy puppy but they managed to make her so pretty and cut her nails I love this place! They took care of my 2 crazy cats too!
Had an amazing lunch for 9 of us... they were nice and quick. The food portions were huge and tasty!!! We all enjoyed it and that was a lot of different taste buds to satisfy... the oldest person was 85 and the youngest was 7...
This place is excellent! Great patio seating and if it s a hot day seating in the patio I recommend seating there at night time. Food is good and service is excellent. Food selection is plenty even if you are vegetarian pescatarian carnivore whatever over acting wanna be healthy not really you are... there is a food item here for you. Okay... ambiance haaaa good vibe. And there are plenty of wine and cocktails to choose from too. You can burn everything you eat afterwards by walking around the shops in the area. I recommend this place. Happy Italian eating nom noms!
This place is awesome! Super fresh ingredients great menu I love the Lebanon. Also staff is very friendly. Highly recommended.
I am from New Jersey and New York area pretty good Chinese food on the East Coast this is one of the best Chinese food I ve had here in Arizona
Love this place!! Great happy hour great sushi and fun atmosphere. It s even better that they have the best bartenders Sam and Megan! they are always on top of their game attentive to guests and are very knowledgeable about the menu and drinks.
Love this place! They do a great job but since It s Only 3 of them sometimes the wait is long so make sure to make an apt.
Time to write an accurate review after 5 meals here... Jake s does not look like much from the outside but the quality of food and service has been very consistent and keeps us coming back! We have enjoyed everything we have ordered venison quesadilla firecracker shrimp shrimp po boy fried flounder can get it blackened too! BBQ and etoufee. I do not understand some of the negative reviews the parking area is fine although not paved and spacious enough and there is no froo froo California fare here. They regularly have specials each we ordered has been great and when in doubt just request what Guy Fieri ordered. The prices are reasonable and the portions are generous.
I love this place soo much i almost dont want to tell anyone about it...lol such elegance abd class...soo sexy
Everyone at Shayna s is so friendly and amazing! Van is absolutely fabulous! If you want a great gel mani and pedi ask for her!
These guys saved me a lot of stress! I called this company last minute after another moving company did not show. The guys were courteous professional very helpful enthusiastic and friendly. They were quick. There ended up being some dirt that got on the bottom of my new bed but the amazing thing is the owner is getting a professional cleaner to come in next week and clean it. I m impressed at how much they cared and how quick they were to rectify the situation. I highly recommend these movers!
We stayed here 3 nights and frankly for the price we expected basic. Well what we got was quiet is not that just vital for sleeping the pool and hot tub are great the breakfast is just crazy amazing with omelette station great coffee juice water berries granola ...omg yummy and free ...yes free !!! But the staff are amazing happy helpful and even 3pm checkout so we could play golf the last day with no stress. Its good and local for walking to super restaurants old town and the river walk. Honestly you cannot beat this for the price
Wow! The food was extraordinary with a location and overall experience befitting of the name. We ate lunch AND dinner here on the same day.. With all those great choices in the area this place really captured us. We were planning our return trip before we even left that evening. I would say the food trends towards western European and French in particular. Try the charceuterie try it all! And do not forget a cappuccino they were top notch.
Awesome new restaurant with fine dining food but neighborhood prices! Naiomi brought out top notch service. Definitely going to recommend to my friends. Half price wine on Tuesday say whattttt!!!!!
I love this place! The sweetness of the acia paired with the texture and flavor of the granola are perfect. The flavors are interesting and delicious. My kids love to come here too. My favorite is strawberry passion. I also love the original BlackBerry and tropical is a favorite.
Went for lunch oh my. Talk about a hidden gem! It s a tiny little place tucked away into the North side looks like it was in a house at one point or another. I m super disappointed that I did not get to see sit on the patio it was raining on the afternoon that we went. Regardless we walked in 5 minutes before they closed in between lunch and dinner we had no idea eek! But we were seated and served with no complaints. We ordered the Fresh Spring Rolls or Summer Rolls as an appetizer yum! the sauce was a bit different than what I m used to less peanut more soy and a little more liquidy but still excellent. The veggies inside were fresh and crispy. For my meal I had the Pad See Ew with chicken... whaaaat! So simple. There was nothing extraordinary about this dish except that it was well made with quality ingredients. YUM. What made me give this place 5 stars is the price that we paid for lunch my plate was HUGE delicious and 7. Blew. My. Mind. I ll be returning on my next trip to Pittsburgh!
Edited after getting a whole pizza for take out. It was the Chicken Carbonara and it was magical. The veggies tasted fresh sliced the bacon was crispy and there were big chunks of chicken. It was one of the best pizzas I ve had. Not super cheap for a pizza at about 18 but so so good. So some of the best pizzas are the specialty ones on the menu and not just the ready made ones under the heat lamps. So now I say 5 stars for the pizza 3 for the empanadas. The pizza is for my money the best of its kind on campus and certainly the best within an easy walk from the quad. The prices per slice seemed a little high until I went to Sbarro and got a much more disappointing slice for more money. I wo not do that again. Here they usually have the traditional pizzas cheese sausage pepperoni but the standouts are their more unusual toppings. My other favorite is the hungry goat which has tomato basil mushrooms and goat cheese. A little bit of hot sauce from the counter and you have the perfect greasy mid day snack. There are other interesting options that seem to rotate a potato pizza a mushroom pizza a Mexican themed pizza and the supreme are the ones I remember from last time. I ve also seen apple butter pizza and the barbecue meats which is good stuff. The pizza slices are about 10 inches long and 4.5 wide. It s a more floppy chewy pizza. The cheeses and toppings vary and it s usually a little greasy though of course it depends on what type you get. When you order it goes in the oven to warm up. The empanadas are okay but leave me more hungry than the pizza. I am not that great a fan of empanadas though. I did not notice a huge difference between the different fillings. I have not tried the dessert ones but I am told they are good. Convenient and consistently pretty good.
I have had nothing but positive experiences from this shop. Came in last night with a tire emergency about 15 mins after closing. Geoff opened the door for me and stayed late until the job was done right. I wo not use another shop unless I absolutely have to. If you ve dealt with mechanics in the Vegas area you ve probably encountered a few that operated using unscrupulous practices. Not here. I recommend them to everyone.
So happy to have been referred to Arrowhead Pooper Scoopers. Most people think why ca not you just pick up your own dog s poop?! Well sure I can BUT if there s someone else who s willing to do it AND do it well at a VERY reasonable price ....then WHY NOT?! The lines of communication are AWESOME and the result of their work is amazing! Thank you for making our backyard safe for our babies to run through w o a care!
Cool ambiance and the quiche was really good! The coffee cake was a little dry. My mom and I went and got 2 quiches coffee cake and coffee and it was 13. Very reasonable!
J and L is my favorite local fruit and veggie stand! They have all the basics tomatoes potatoes greens eggplant oranges mangoes grapes etc at prices much lower than at places like Whole Foods. Last week I bought all of my ingredients for food for the week I made eggplant and okra curries and it cost me 30! Such a good deal! Not to mention that the people who work here are super friendly and always welcome me back when I am there. That s something you do not find at bigger stores. The only downside is that they are a seasonal market and are closed during the winter months.
I ve been coming here for years for a reason. Fast friendly great value and I ve never been disappointed. They put a lot of time and effort into their menu and it shows. Faves include the spicy burger chicken delight and on the rare occasions they put it up on the Specials board the meatball sandwich.
Such a fun experience for my sons birthday! They were very friendly prompt professional and knowledgable of all of the animals. I will definitely use them again! Thanks for a wonderful time!
Hi I m steve p. My Second purchase was even better then the first. And they sent me a small picture in 3 piece as gift. My experience was pleasant. I would definitely recommend. I had a sales guy and Michelle followed up with me. I m so happy. Looks amazing. Thanks to all God bless
Breakfast for Champions! Work ordered a whole bunch of baked stuff from here for a breakfast meeting and we were amazed at the quality of food. Cinamon roll warm soft and just the right amount of sweetness. Muffins moist soft and bursting flavors in my mouth. Definitely a great gourmet spot will be trying lunch here soon!
The Funny Bus takes you thru Uptown while getting a show. It s an open bus which adds to the charm. It was lots of fun and everyone was ready for fun. Kevin our host was a hoot and funny. I definitely recommend this you will love it and it s different from any other venue.
We were reffered to Chamberlain by our dentist. My daughter had her consultation and there was no talk of pulling teeth or rushing the process in any way. In fact they let me know that once my daughter lost the last few teeth she may not need braces. To hear that from an orthodontist was amazing! It is nice to know they are helping when help is needed and do not want to do any unnecessary work just to make money. I was extremely pleased with the visit the office was beautiful as well .
This place is a great place to get an authentic fix for Mexican food. We came here for my husbands birthday and he really loved the food. He ordered a steak plate I forgot what it was called but he said the meat was so juicy. The tortillas were freshly made and was delicious. The complimentary chips and salsa is a plus but the thing that I enjoyed the most was actually the desserts! We ordered a tres leches cake and a cheesecake. To our surprise they also brought out another dessert complimentary for his bday called a sopapillas? Have not had it before but it s pretty much another version of a churro except in a triangular donut form. It was soooooo good. Probably the best tres leches cake I ve ever had. The staff was super friendly and very nice. I would definitely go back again with the rest of my family to try out.
Amulet restaurant and banquet hall is a popular place for special events food is top notch and the atmosphere very festive. I ve seen many birthdays and russian style parties take place here its common for weddings too and so far every one I ve talked to has been very satisfied with this place. I am considering it for my own birthday party in a few months! I posted pics which I took just before a birthday party was about to take place the cold appetizers were already on the table but the other foods were not out just yet. The centerpieces are provided by the florist and not included by the restaurant. Hope the pics help food presentation is amazing too!!!
The best in PHX. My favorite place to go to get food and eat a dope ass meal is here. Let me start off by saying that I fudging love salsa and this place has a salsa bar... case closed. You might have to wait like 30 45 mins but it s well worth it in the end. Trust me.
Dr. Haslett did my surgery and I ve feel 100 times better!! Wait is a bit long sometimes but well worth it. She listens and genuinely cares about her patients.
I have a busy day today so I stopped at Kneaders to pick up my breakfast and lunch. I chose one of their smoothies for breakfast and yummmmmy the pink pina colada is the bomb. It ll be done within a minute. I ca not wait to try the club sandwich. Is it lunch yet?!
WOW. what a outlet store. The girls are amazing here. I have shopped here for years and a little over the past year they have been amazing. Right now they have 30 off all bras and clothes. bras are 9.09 and 6.99. cant ask for better clothes is 6.99 and panties 10 30 and 10 20 also black white and nude panties 10 10. there is sooo much selection and you are allowed to try the bras on
From day 1 getting a quote from Shannon to the install with Michael and Robert things were smooth. The folks at Black Mountain AC are professional courteous honest and efficient! I would definitely recommend them vs other companies in the area. I did my research as my AC went down at the end of the summer so I was able to get several quotes.
Just had the best facial at the Aveda institute by Grace Luby! I got a 90 minute facial that included a foot and hand message it was heavenly. She even did my makeup after. My skin looks and feels incredible! I will make this a monthly routine.
Both my daughter and I have had our iPhones repaired here! Great fast affordable and friendly service! Hopefully I wo not need to go back but if I do I know it will be fast and friendly service! Thank you!!!!
Owner Hannah is very friendly kind and professional. All my girlfriends go to her and her staff to get their hair done. My boyfriend gets his hair done by Mr. Lee and he has worked wonders to his hair. The only downside is that wait time can be brutally long so make your reservations in advance!
I do not get why this place is not busier there are barely any customers when I come in here which is about once a week. Maybe cos it s tucked away in a shopping center? I dunno. But I do know that the food is great. Same premise as Chipotle but more options such as shrimp fish tacos brown rice and just as tasty which makes me tend to go here more often than Chipotle which is just down the street . Easy parking plenty of indoor and outdoor seating friendly service. Prices are in line with Chipotle s. Try the chipotle ranch dressing YUM!
Amazing food and amazing service perhaps a little uptight and stuffy but I guess that would only bother you if you wanted it to. very pricy but the food is excellent Had a whole fish and a tomato salad. both amongst the best dishes I ve ever had.
Vegetarian friendly even though the online menu suggests otherwise. The miso soup and salad were great. I had the avocado roll the vegan roll and a third one also vegetarian... ca not remember . Service was great. My only issue was that it was a bit pricy.
This is our first time here first timers from Honolulu holy shit this is some damn good food. Small and home place with good people great staff and most importantly cooks that can cook. Tara our waitress funny and professional. We will be back
Fantastic food and people! The vibe and energy is awesome which makes for excellent food!! Thank you
hard to find tasty and reasonal priced food. This one is one of them. i ordered stuffed. Taste great quick free water and friendly people.
Looking for delicious beer laid back setting food truck food and good music? Triple C is your place! We have been coming here for years as it is one of our favorite breweries in Charlotte. They always have a food truck on site and live music check their social media . Comfortable seating inside with some TVs as well as a bunch of picnic tables outside. 3C IPA is my ABSOLUTE favorite in CLT. Last but not least they always have complementary pretzels and spicy mustard. I know this sounds simple but it always hits the spot while enjoying the great beer! If you have not been Triple C is a must visit!
Chris was very upfront and honest with me. He also saved us 50 over a quote we got on the phone from a competitor. Give APCO a try when you get invaded by ants spiders scorpions or lizards.
We visit this location often for quick grocery shopping great service at Starbucks and the Monday night pizza special! The pizza is wood fired and really great.
A whole in the wall bar but good clientele and cheap drinks only down fall is they dont take cards.
Best Korean fried chicken in town. So crispy on the outside and tender inside. The skin is like the top layer of crme brulee. The fries are amazing too. Not too packed yet so that was good. No wait. The waitress was really nice too. And free popcorn! P
Just got back from Las Vegas. Wooohooo! D Cosmo is in its winter hibernation mode like a big Russian bear. Meaning everything is still the same except you can feel the overall relaxed atmosphere after the big holidays. The only thing I want to suggest to cosmo is to pay a little more attention to details. I know its hard when 80k people come and go over the weekend however I feel like the hotel itself looks and feels different summer time or maybe I was just too sober this time to notice the little details that were an eye sore. hehe Or the hotel is better staffed during summer time....IDK By details I mean cleanliness of the entrance door to the room and scuff marks all over the freaking place...you can feel that you are a number instead of feeling like a guest. I was a bit put off when I arrived and saw black finger print stains on the entrance door like CSI just finished up collecting evidence from the crime scene LOL Does it really matter? No but that s what I mean by little details... Furthermore I like seeing Police presence the hotel. It was good to see Sheriffs cruising around the Casino floor and by Marquee. Their presence alone does get rid of a lot of unnecessary drama. Lastly I love this hotel and I will continue staying here and recommending it to everyone. Just please make sure you hustle cosmo. I hustle to have to spend at your establishment and you please do the same in return Please tip well and you will get hooked up everywhere! D Cheers!
Oh my goodness Total Wine I love you! Prices are unbeatable and there is almost too much wine to choose from. But they manage to make their abundance of inventory manageable with their superb organizational skills. Hats off to you Total Wine you do things right. The staff is great! They are super approachable and seem to know quite a bit about the inventory. So far I have been very happy with all of their suggestions. Buyers beware though they are super strict about carding. I had my ID and my husband did not and they would not sell to us. He had to leave and I had to walk back in and go through the checkout alone. Next time you need a drink stop by Total Wine with your ID pause for a moment to observe the winey wonderfulness and ask their staff to pick something delicious for you my bet you will love it.
This is a great place for lunch the prices servings and flavor are a 3 4. We recently went for dinner and got one of the special meals that includes an assortment of different items it actually was better than lunch! Portions are huge we bought stuff home for later! The hot and sour soup is quite good we got 2 entrees appetizer and rice...best was the broccoli beef ask them to do it spicy...
The gluten free macarons are incredible as are the brownie drops! Employees are super knowledgable about its gluten free choices and conscientious about cross contamination. My cashier specifically asked if my order was due to a gluten free diet and then pointed out that the bakery recently started making gluten free cakes and showed me where they were.
This is the closest sushi place to my house and since I crave sushi constantly I ve been frequenting it quite a bit lately. It s small the servers are all really friendly the sushi is good. It s not the best sushi place in Cleveland but it s a fantastic place to go when you want some creative rolls. I ve tried quite a few of the larger rolls and every time that I think that I ve found a favorite I try something new and it becomes my new favorite. They have great specials too.
So they opened this new place on Coventry called Piccadilly Artisan Yogurt and I stopped by recently to check it out. With this era of frozen yogurt chains like one that starts with an M that s all over the place I thought this might be another. Turns out this is a small independent place run by some nice folks who are trying to put an even healthier spin on the frozen yogurt idea. All the yogurt at Piccadilly is organic with no preservatives or artificial anything according to Lea a nice young lady who works there. Not only that but they have a couple of vegan alternatives coconut and blueberry at last check that they offer for those who REALLY want to get their Vegan on. In addition they have a TON of toppings most of which are local from the West Side Market and are widely varied from fruits nuts and such to brownie bits and even tapioca pearls of varying colors The atmosphere is nice and comfy and kitschy with furniture that s...well very interesting As far as price goes there about comparable with that other frozen yogurt chain but I think the stuff here is BETTER. in my opinion The only thing which may cause a hitch is parking as the closest place to do so is the Coventry garage but it s no too bad. Their hours are decent and the food and service are great Thanks Lea So if you want to pick a winner PICCADILLY!
Here for brunch w my teenager. The grilled veggie omelet was large and tasty. The huevos rancheros was good but a little lacking...and while the cornbread is featured here it was odd w the huevos. Service was friendly and responsive. This place deserves a place on my regular list even though I m an east sider.
My husband and I went here this morning expecting it to be like so many other places we ve ate at for breakfast just so so. Wow were we surprised! This is an awesome little jewel of a place. Very friendly staff with extremely tasty food. I ordered 2 eggs bacon country potatoes and blueberry pancakes. Everything was perfect no salt pepper or hot sauce was required. My husband ordered corned beef hash. He was very pleased. Said it was some of the best he d had. Which is definitely a compliment coming from him! Lol! We will be returning soon to try another tasty dish!!
Pretty good Chinese food and they are always supper quick when we do take out. They make all their sauces in house the spicy mustard is our favorite. All the people who work there are really nice too. It s nice to have quick good food close to our hotel.
Amazing wings at this place! Poutines are really good and great for sharing. The wing dressing options are awesome and you could find any flavour your heart desires. Prices are very reasonable here and the quality of wings is awesome! Great food and service.
Today I went to JCP to finds some things for myt son but as usual I ended up shgopping for myself too. I tired on a variety of tops and finally picked out two that fit nicely. When I went to check out the customer service agent Tami called me over to her register and commented how cute one of my tops was. When she saw my taste she offered to show me a couple other tops that I might like. When we walked over to look at them it turned out that she chose tops I had already looked at but they did not have in my size. She offered to go online and order them in my size. She even gave me a discount that I probably would have missed if I did it myself. I was really happy wiotht e service I received today.
Love this place! My go to every time for Car Wash! Colin and Tyrese always know the best customer service and how to take care of my car after it s been through a complete disaster never disappointed thank you guys
This place is a must for really delicious food a great selection of beers and an atmosphere of relaxed fun and conversation. We felt like we were back in the best part of the midwest for great food great folks and really fair prices. We went here our daughter s treat for a Valentine dinner and to celebrate two family birthdays. The service and staff was as wonderful as the food!! The Chef who has an amazing south bronx accent that is right out of the movies gave us a delicious house specialty dessert to celebrate. This was our first time here but it certainly wo not be the last. Go enjoy the food the light footprint on your wallet and the great atmosphere!! Thanks Sausagefest!!
We have been going to Santorini for years but had not been in about two years. This summer you ca not keep us away. We have been three times in a month. The food is some of the best Greek food in the city and is right up there with restaurants on the Danforth and even in Santorini!! The restaurant is beautifully decorated and the patio is very pleasant.
Went here on a date with my fianc and started off with 2 glasses of wine which were a bit over priced at 7 per glass. Ordered the mussels which were excellent and were huge pieces. I could have eaten these as a meal alone. We got the crab stuffed salmon and the chicken with pasta. Both meals were cooked well and were delicious. Service was excellent and the atmosphere was nice and quiet. Only reason I would not give 5 stars is that the main meals were not excellent but they were just good meals. I would recommend it to others
Was tasty and the wait staff was very nice! My food was cold but they reheated it up nicely. Free refills on coffee and cute decor. The place was full of people and the location is in a warehouse pretty much. I see why they come back!
Lemme tell y all something right now. Check my profile. Yelp Elite 10 Yelp Elite 11. What this means to you is I aint no bitch. I eat good food mother fackers. GOOD FOOD. Rocket Burger did not disappoint. I ve got 2 words for you. Rocket sauce. I m not going to act like I know whats in I do not. I do know that Rocket sauce rocks the body that rocks the party. I dont even care whats in it. I only know that it is good and thats all I need. I was extremely disappointed to find they had no Dublin DeePee. Which is a staple in any specialty soda shop. Too many rules and restrictions it seems. Its pretty easy to make an average burger but something completely different to make a great one. ROCKET BURGER MAKES A GREAT BURGER. I put my 2 count them 2 Yelp Elite Badges on the line here and declare that the In and Outs and 5 Guys of the world better watch their back. Its obvious the guys running rocket burger are developing a rabid following by just being cool dudes serving high level food. NONE CAN DEFEND! ps This review is pretty much a 5 star. I ve just started being more stingy with my Stars.
This place is so much fun when the piano guys know what they are doing good job Matt and Chris!
Lenny Boy is quickly becoming one of my favorite Charlotte breweries. I ve been here more since they ve moved locations but I m a bit nostalgic to their smaller venue. It was cozy. But the kambucha and beer is still great! And there s plenty to try and to keep me coming back.
I highly recommend their seared jumbo scallops with spinach and mushrooms. It s very rich and sumptuous. It does not come with very many scallops but I still have trouble finishing it all.
I do not agree with the low star rating on here. I took my truck here because I needed to pass a smog and they let me know all the things I needed to take care of but let me know which were smog related and which were not. I felt like these were very honest guys. I will be going here for everything from now on
1. Absolutely amazing food. One of the best burgers I ve ever had!!! 2. Incredibly low prices for the amount of amazing food you get 3. They offer lettuce wraps which is awesome because I have celiacs. 4. Incredible customer service!! 5. My boyfriend had a probably with his burger and the manager Elijah went above and beyond to resolve the situation apologized. And even issued a refund. 6. I would recommend this place to any and everyone. Thank you again to the manager and the staff will recommend this place to all of my friends and family!!!! Will be back soon !!
Huge quantities of quality food for for the right price. Top notch service! I suggest the souvlaki or their kebab style meat. Perfect every time.
Fun and unique food but ultimately nothing special. Service was average and some of the plates were meh overrated. I was with a large group and we tried the majority of the menu. Nothing was overly memorable. Still a quality place and I would go back.
Looking for a place for breakfast this is a great value and pretty good food. The hostess whom sat us seemed to not want to be at work that day but our server made up for it. Had the steak and eggs and eggs Benny both were delicious and made as requested.
Used the Skip the Counter option which helped a great deal to avoid the long lines at the counter. The hardest part was picking which vehicle to choose and there were many to choose from. It was certainly a very pleasurable experience from this rental car company and location.
This restaurant is a jewel. Tues. All you can eat Snow Crab Legs..wonderful. Large portions excellent service. First place I have seen Shrimp Louie on the menu since moving up north.
family owned and operated lost my keys Saturday called yesterday he came out today right on time definitely will use again if I lose the keys again.
Convenient and reliable photography shop located close to the Bloor and Yonge Street intersection. I stopped by this location to take immigration related photographs for a PR Card Renewal and Grant of Citizenship application. Fees were reasonable 10.99 for a set of two photographs and the photographer was very knowledgeable of the specific photo sizes required for both applications. The entire process took no more than 30 minutes and I was off on my way. Was very pleased with the end product and informed photographer that I most likely will be returning later in the year to take photographs for my passport renewal.
Schumacher showed me how a person should be treated. I took my Mercedes in for a B service. The staff also repaired my windshield which was way above what a B service included. Tina was very pleasant also. I purchased my vehicle here and I will definitely buy another vehicle here again. Cynthia Washington happy customer.
I love this salon and highly recommend Cece. I started going to her many years ago after botching my own coloring and have not stopped going to her since. The Salon is beautiful being newly renovated and provides great services for reasonable prices.
Went after CES and hit the range for a couple hours for insanely good price. Spent 20 for 2 evenings of range fun. Nice staff nice regulars nice auto tee machine 2nd floor mats are fun. Local regular Adam is a total pro. Excellent teacher. Hit him up if you want to fix your shots in one session affordably. He s there almost everyday! I ll be back next time I m in Vegas and do not want to lose a few hundred at the tables
What s to say about Dangerous Dan s Diner? How about this place is better than McDonald s and then some! I always order take out from here yes they do deliver! and when I do I order the basic burger with large onion rings. This place does not disappoint on the burger or the rings both are big and taste great. I do not care if they season the meat or not it s a big burger and that s enough for me. I have not ordered any of the other stuff on the menu but the next time I think that I will order maybe the Greek Burger or any of the sandwiches just for variety. The take out order guy is rude but I ve learned to live with it as the food and the decor is great. Come here or order from here and you ll never order pizza ever again I know that I wo not .
For most people buying a new home and moving can be stressful. Doing that and moving 1500 miles from your lifelong home base creates a whole new catagory in that regard. After many many years of motorcycle trips to the Southwest my wife and I started our 5 year plan on relocating and retiring to this area a couple of years ago. 5 year plans are great. However real life has a way of making them need to be adapted to new realities. Such was the situation we found ourselves in two years ago. Realizing that at a point time becomes more valuable than money we reassessed our strategy and the 5 year plan became the new revised 2 year plan. Now just how do you go about relocating to an area half a continent away where you have none of the benefit of the connections a lifetime of living in one area brings you? This is where it became interesting. reviewing homes on various sites I found a few I wanted to learn more about. Alas after a few homes were viewed on any of the sites I was left with the option of signing up or moving on to another site. I knew what that meant here comes the sales call. Well I really wanted to continue on with my search so I signed up the call came from Stew. What followed was the most amazing purchasing experience I ve ever been part of in my 56 years either as a seller or a buyer of anything. The voice on the other end of the phone Stew s was the surprise of my lifetime. We made an immediate connection and I was completely put at ease with his reassurance that there was no pressure and that he was used to helping people make these major life changes Stew told me this was what he specialized in because he had found he was great at it. Understatement of the millenium as far as I m concerned. Stew spent hours learning about my wife and I and what we were hoping to achieve. Next he set us up on a home search portal allowing us to see any properties in the areas we had determined would be of interest to us. Tricky stuff as we did not really know Stew just helped us determine that by LISTENING to us. A few months passed and soon we realized it was becoming now or maybe never to chase our dream home as the market was changing again. We flew in to meet Stew and we had come to feel it was almost to good to be true in regards to the personal connection we had formed. Reality proved better than fantasy as we spent two days visiting various areas and crazy as it may sound I felt like I had known Stew all my life. We returned home confident we were on the right track with our choice of Realtor now what? Can you really commit to a house over the internet on the word of someone no matter how much of a connection we felt or do we have to fly down everytime something looks right ? Houses were moving so fast at that point that was not even realistic. We decided to go with our instincts. Some potential houses came and went and with every one Stew went out and gave us a complete video tour of each property as well as his personal feelings as to the properites suitability for our goals along with his own personal findings about the property and area. Stew kept looking for us and in a short time found the home of our dreams so we made the commitment long distance to buy. Stew sent us a video of the home so we could see what we were buying. It was a great video that allowed us to feel the home. A month later before closing we came down to do our personal inspection and what we found was the house he had located for us was far more than the video or his descriptions could have ever provided to us. In short if anything he downplayed what a wonderful property it was. We signed the papers. I would also be remiss in not giving special thanks to his wife Angie Keene for working out our financing. Making a 5 year plan into a 2 year plan created some obsticles that she was a wizzard in helping us work through. Thank you Angie. Of course that is not the end. In the three months before we could move in appliances needed to arrive pools and property needed to be maintained. Guess who took care of all that? Stew Today I m proud to call Stew my best friend. Anyone looking for as low stress an experience in buying a house as could be hoped for much less doing it while being several states away could not do better in picking a Realtor than Stew in my opinion. Thanks Stew you ARE the MAN!!!
I would rather give them a 3.5 but looks like it will have to be 4. Because they are better than 3. There is no such thing as a dive bar in Beachwood. That being said it sucks to have to drive out of the zone if you are so inclined to take your favorite client out for a couple drinks and want to catch the game. So thank you Hiroshi for bringing a pub to the Wood. You have lots of beer lots of wine and are very reasonably priced. A very extensive menu for a Pub concept with sandwhiches for the i wanna watch the game and nifty appetizers plus sushi for the i wanna be seen people. My fave client and I went to check it out and were quite happy. I had many screens to watch Boston NY fight over the ball. Garnett thank YOU for sticking it to NY. So even though we were both in work clothes its still a nice place to drink and have a few whatevers without feeling uncomfortable as in overdressed . The all male happy hour crowd? well is that really a problem? does it affect my quality of pub experience? Because it is bbq sushi concept there is a nice ambient aroma of smoke from a wood fire that permeates the room. We tried some stuff from the pub menu. The hummos was great and the risotto fritters were fabulous. The charred tomato sauce was something i could eat and eat! I told the bartender I wanted more but she thought i was kidding. A great bottle of Burgess 2006 Cab for 30. Are you kidding me? Can I live here?? Hiroshi if you are reading this ORDER MORE. because we drank your last bottle!! I will be back soon and telling all my clients that there IS a place to go caz in Beachwood. No haters here!
I happened to be in there area tonight and was looking for a sushi place for take out. Although I ve driven by this place a few times to be honest the look of the outside never intrigued me to try it out. Got the food home and immediately kicked myself for never trying it earlier. The food was amazing! I ordered 3 rolls Black Dragon Rainbow and the Volcano Roll. All of the food was so fresh and the Volcano roll is definitely my new favorite. I also found their pricing very reasonable and the portions larger than I had expected. Even though the restaurant is not in my area I will be making the drive whenever I m craving sushi. It s definitely worth it.
I come to this Walmart quite a bit. Best to come early during the week. It can get crowded on weekends. Buy the Great Value brand items as much as possible. You will save even more money than usual. This place is already pretty cheap compared to Vons Smiths and Albertsons.
This visit was one of those bittersweet ends. An end to what has always been a memorable experience. I remember discovering this place almost 9 years ago and since that discovery it honestly has been one of my favorite restaurants. The news of its closing saddended me a bit but I understand going out while still on top. They had a good run and I look forward to the new morimoto. Dinner here the other night was like always exceptional. Service of course like every other visit was top notch. Ed our server was pleasant suggestive friendly and even a little funny here and there. Service is a big deal in this industry and Ed has perfected that skill with his own added pizazz. I really hope I continue to see him even when Morimotos starts to create their legacy here in Vegas. Hamachi jalapeo and kapachi sashimi never fails to satisfy. The shishito peppers were a bit different this time it came with an added sauce drizzled on top. I always loved the shishito peppers how it came before but change is not always bad. Best oyster tasting...still my favorite is the yuzu truffle. Cod was amazing softest fish I ve ever had with so much flavor. Scallops cooked in uni butter still makes my mouth water. All in all it was nothing short of a perfect dinner. I will miss you Shibuya!!!
One hit and one miss so far. Unfortunately the miss was not handled like the big boys do meaning comping disaster meal
Do not need to post a photo the ones already here are the same. Ordered through Skip The Dishes. Meal arrived warm courier was friendly clean and handled the food carefully. Packaged well so no spillage in the bag. The buns were fresh and squishy so ask to have the sauce on the side for delivery they are happy to accomodate. The meat is tender with no gristle and had a light crisp breading. The tomato sauce is home made it s not tomato paste but flavourful stewed tomatoes and it s wonderful. There are no seeds or peels in it but there are small chunks of tomato. Portions are generous and satisfying. The food is not salty or greasy it s just right. The milk is a large carton not in a plastic bottle. Very happy that we ve found another place with good food prepared well.
I needed a change in my workout. The gym and their classes were not cutting it for me. Sweatzone is not the most convenient gym for me but after day 1 I was hooked which easily justified the drive. Unique moves that definitely will make you feel sore the next day and have yet to experience the same boring regimen you often do at a gym. I ve been attending classes with Trey in which he has been very professional and accommodating.
While in Madison and working with locals I kept hearing about how Jade Garden had THE BEST EVAAARR Chinese food in Madison. My experiences with Madison Chinese food consisted of A8 Asian Kitchen and dare I mention it the Yummy. Of these I concur Jade Garden had the best Chinese to offer. What a pathetic statement that is. Now it is very very good do not get me wrong. And I highly enjoyed it. I once dragged a friend with me down Park St all the way 2 blocks from the capital in January took the bus to the restaurant and then decided to walk back in the foot deep snow bad decision . I digress. Their lunch buffet is quite good the delivery a bit pricier. But once again it blew away most things offered by the other three and no need to feel like you ll die afterwards. Still... if this is the best in Madison... another reason I m glad I moved out.
When a discussion about food allergy friendly breakfast establishments was started one of our Parents Of Allergic Kids members said We eat at zada Jane s all the time. My TN PN son eats eggs grits biscuit and sausage. We have been eating their for about 8 years. It is always wonderful to find restaurants that takes food allergies seriously. Thank you from PAK!
This was such a fun experience!!!! Courtnee our host and Lambo were great! My friends and I truly had a blast turning up with Turnt Up Tours! Will definitely do it again when I come back to Vegas it s so worth it.
Fast friendly and efficient service! Changed my worn out broken door handle quick! Great job Carmon!
I had my eyebrows done 3D look today. I was so satisfied with my results. Mimi is the best permanent make up artist in Las Vegas. I was so scared to my brows but now I m so happy with the hair 3Dhair stroke look.
Great place to go for a walk or bike ride.
I m extremely happy with the service that I received from Modern Family from the beginning to the end the process was very smooth informative I did not have to ask no questions they answered everything that I could have thought to ask also they took a really good exam the glasses that I received I can see so clearly now it s amazing it s been a good 13 years since I ve actually been able to see out of both eyes without squinting or having to get up really close but after I receive my glasses I can see a hundred percent no more headaches and I thank them so so much so if you re looking for an eye doctor do not look no more this is the place to come I promise you you will not regret the service you receive from these ladies from the receptionist to the one that checks your exam until the doctor thank you ladies so so much
Alright I definetly got my fix! Let me start with service it was great! Tyler I assume the guy behind the cash register was pretty welcoming he gave us extra cups for the kids restaurant is clean they have paper table covers for kids and big kids to doddle oh and game boards too! OK let s get to the food part... we got the WET FRIES and got demolished! Did I mention that the fries are swimming on a delicious gravy and topped with long stretchy cheese! Yes I definitely recommend this. We got the free garlic knots from yelp it was really good too. It has that crunchy top and soft middle. My husband ordered the veggie stromboli with chicken he liked it ok he was not crazy about it but he liked the fresh red peppers and mushrooms. Then I got the lasagne which took a little bit longer to get to our table. I m almost full when I got it. So I asked them to put it in a to go box. I tried a little maybe I was too full I did not really care for it too much. Over all I like this place and will come back to try other stuff in their menu.
Great little yogurt shop tucked away in a strip mall off north scottsdale road I know that does not narrow it down haha . We tried this place after reading the positive reviews and it definitely lived up to the hype! Reasonably priced with plenty of flavor options. I tried the pumpkin and chocolate chip cookie with nutella on top. Nutella pretty much the best thing ever. So nutella yogurt is a winning combination. More yogurt places really need to offer it. My parents said the devil s food cake was pretty delicious. There were plenty of toppings to choose from including yogurt covered pretzels which you do not see everyday. If you check in on yelp you can get 20 percent off! Brought our order to less than 9 bucks for three decently sized yogurts. Definitely the best quality for the price I ve seen in Scottsdale.
Very nice and professional grooming salon. I actually had them groom my guinea pig which sounds strange but she needed a little help... I did not even know if they d cater to a Guinea but they did and were very professional too! I m happy and when I get more pets that need grooming I will definitely go back to this place.
First time at Skimos. Cute little urban joint. Tried their honey vanilla coffee. First sip AMAZING. Second and third sip even better such a deep and rich flavor. Overall chocolatey tones of the coffee with the slight sweetness of the honey really balances well. Will definitely be coming back to try their other drinks. Friendly inviting staff!
Mike Biggs did my tattoo which is a half sleeve piece. It is probably going to be about 10 hours of work to complete it. Studio 21 is very professional and comfortable atmosphere for a tattoo. There was an elderly couple there getting their first tattoo when I was there which was kind of cute. Go through the artist porfolios and pick someone who you think will best represent what you want done.
Once again a home run!! This time I brought my daughter and dog!!!!! Where else can you get delicious food and beer and take your kids and dog??? One of my favorite places to relax get amazing service and the BEST food!!!! This place is ALWAYS a home run!!
A friend of mine recommended D s as he said it s he and his girlfriend s go to chill spot to enjoy a nice cold beer. I m so glad I finally stopped by because this place is definitely a new favorite of mine. D s is a little divey but has a charming simplicity being that the menu is centralized around hot dogs and beer and it does not get much better than that! I started with a Bronx Summer Pale Ale while my boyfriend and I waited on another guest. Their list of beers was decently sized and decently priced. I think my beer was somewhere around 6 which is standard in the city. This place scored major points for having veg friendly options including their veggie dogs which was what I opted for Big Ben style. It was a close call between the Big Ben and the Hot Valentine but the Big Ben won me over with toppings that included a hefty portion of slaw cheese sauce fries and grilled onions that I added. The Hot Valentine will be my choice next time and that one has sweet potato fries and sriracha slaw as toppings. Every topping was generously portioned on my dog and it tasted even more wonderful than it looked in that fluffy poppy seed bun. The daily specials at D s are something to consider and the one my boyfriend seemed to be most excited about was the 5 burger night on Sundays from 5 to close. I m not much of a burger eater but this is a good deal. On another day Wednesday if I m not mistaken they have any style hot dog with fries for 6. Other specials include wings pizza kielbasa brats hot sausages etc on different nights of the week. All of them sound like they re worth trying! On the topic of specials they also feature a monthly special style of hot dog. This month was a Yankee dog with baked beans potato chips and I think cheese on top. Baked beans on hot dogs is an amazing creation and my boyfriend even mentioned coming back monthly to make sure we try their special dog. Only thing I would make note of is that it can be pricy to build your own 6 pack at around 4 or more per beer but they have a massive selection of beers in the beer cave. To any friends that are looking for a solid cheat meal or even just a good tasty treat that wo not break the bank come to D s and they ve got you covered! I m definitely looking forward to coming back.
I do not eat many fast food burgers. I was in the mood for one and was told to try Habit Burger. I went for the Santa Barbara burger. 2 patties avocado cheese lettuce and tomatoes. Comes with grilled onions which I can not eat. The sourdough bread it comes on is grilled nicely. This for me was probably the tastiest fast food burger s I ve ever eaten. The marriage of the cheese and avocado with the meat was outstanding. Very moist and juicy. Habit Burger will be my go to fast food burger joint.
We were a party of 5 having a late lunch. Still had to wait about 20 minutes. Generous portions of good food was had by all. Caution burgers prepared medium are too red safer to go with a medium well. Other than that everyone enjoyed their entree selections which included bento boxes burgers and sushi. 5 bloody Mary s were a hit.
Have been coming here for a year and a half. Very friendly staff. Most say though that Amy is the absolute best!!! She does best pedicure I ve had since moving here 2 1 2 years ago and does meticulous always perfect gel nails.
I had three different go rounds with the MGM Grand Spa and I continue to be a happy camper. The first service I received years ago was the Turkish Hammam ritual which continues to set the bar for ultimate indulgent experience. In all the years I ve been spa ing in general I only remember the names to two therapists and one of them is Taylor who Turkish Hammam d me. That service entailed exfoliation via coffee grinds enervating! a mindblwing scalp massage during a cozy wrap and sweeping massage relax go to it! . The latest service I booked is the Dreaming Ritual the signature ritual at MGM and by signature they mean most expensive. While the Turkish Hammam clocked in at 100 mins the Dreaming Ritual gives you a full 2 hours of bliss. Strange though while it was amazing as well for some reason it did not out do my halcyon memories of the Turkish Hammam. So I do not think I ll be booking that again because honestly 310 plus the 20 gratuity they automatically tack on to treatments is just as Simon Cowell would say indulgent and not in a good fiscally responsible way.
Excellent coffee and food! They use thoughtful and fresh ingredients! Great breakfast sandwich and pressed sandwiches.
BOTTOM LINE Best homemade dumplings in Downtown Toronto . . . and now with a newer larger and kitschy er venue! Cost 10 20 head tax and tip included Atmosphere Decor It went from a hole in the wall basement gem to a much larger unit with crimson red walls and kitschy romanticized paintings of the orient. So bad it s good. Best part their framed fan notes thankfully made the transition too! Ordered 1. Steamed juicy pork bun Best item on the menu though not the best siu leung bao I ve had. Still delicious and a must order. I m generally a fan of most of their steamed dumpling offerings. 2. Pan fried pork and bak choi dumpling Skin thickness just right with the right amount of char for extra taste. 3. Boiled dumplings any I know they re boiled but I found them too soggy the skin too thick and the taste a bit bland. Could be just a personal preference though. 4. Beef onion roll Best non dumpling item on the menu but a bit too salty just wipe some of the sauce off . Would recommend sharing because it s a pretty large portion for one person. 5. Green onion pancake Not so good. Too doughy and bland. 6. Pork and vegetable steamed buns Not so good. Even though they were supposedly freshly made the bun was stale and chewy instead of fresh and fluffy. Service Bare bones and functional. No complaints. Can get very busy and food can take a while to come but you know it s freshly made! Conclusion Delicious and affordable homemade style dumplings that s best shared with a group of friends. Good to see these guys are still retaining the quality of their food since expanding to a larger and more convenient location.
I have been going to this salon for 6 years! Always a great experience! Everyone is so helpful and kind. They are all trained professionals and I never worry. Tom can do any haircut. He is a perfectionist!!! Such an artist! I will never go anywhere else! It is not close to my house at all but I do not care. The drive is totally worth the perfect service! I get asked all the time where I get my hair done! Love them! You will too!
This little restaurant is hidden away in a area in Scarborough not known for Korean fare. I always order bulgogi at every Korean restaurant but decided to order the pork bone soup and turbot fish as well this time. They were both very delicious. All dishes come with the purple rice and it pairs very well with them. The side dishes are the best I ve ever had. The kimchi here is perfect. And they are can be refilled for free! It s a small restaurant so expect to wait during the busy times. They only have a handful of tables. It s run by a small family so food will take longer than usual if they re busy. Overall this is my go to Korean restaurant whenever I m in Scarborough.
Had a blast!!! Kind of small considering the talent they bring in but great crowd. Bars are only as good as the people that attend and this one attracts good people from all over the country. Be sure to visit on a weekend.
Cheap.. goes about anywhere.. I fly with them all the time.. crappy the way you have to board but good part you typically get the seat you want .. regulations and safety is one thing. But rude. Is another. Today when the flight attendant walked by while checking seat belts before take off I politely asked if she could throw my cup filled with OJ away.. she rudely turns to me ands says... ahhh not now ummmmmmm no. In a very snotty rude way. Before taxing she came back to get it and explained the safety regulations why she did not . But she could ve said it a bit nicer. Sometimes the flight attendants seriously are rude. Unfriendly and have a stick up their butts.
A great park for little league baseball practice. The park has two great baseball diamonds that are perfectly light at night. Great seating for parents as well. The park also features a large grass area where a football team typically practices in the evening. I have visited many times and have never had a problem with the quality of people who frequent the park. It is always clean and well kept. I highly recommend for baseball practice or a job.
Most of their smoothies contain dairy and at some venues they wo not make substitutions but here you can tell them exactly what you want and do not want and they ll do it with a smile. Perfect.
It s always my favorite Chinese place to order from I m pretty sure the owner knows me well and he makes it just right as soon as he hears my phone number now that s love
We have been with Mark Sherman CPA for a couple of years now. He helped review previous years of our corporate tax returns and really instructed us how to do things better and more accurately. I also used him for my personal tax return this last year as I wanted the pro s to do it since I had all new expenses with purchasing a new home and I wanted to make sure it was done right. I work closely throughout the year with his top notch office manager Samantha who has also been so friendly and helpful! We love working with the staff at Mark Sherman s office and we hope everyone would make Mark Sherman their CPA!
I am SO glad I gave craft kitchen another chance after initially eating here in 2015. My first experience here the restaurant had everything going for it...except flavor in the food. It was bland. Then come 2017. They got their game together and the flavors are out of this world! I m still drooling and daydreaming about their apple cobbler pancakes. Craft kitchen offers brunch on the weekends in addition to bottomless mimosas for 16. you read that right. Bottomless. Mimosas. With. Brunch. Need I say more. if you are looking for a private room for a special event they have one available to reserve. Must try brunch spot.
After much consideration my girlfriend and I decided it was time to bring someone in to help us keep up with our busy lives. I searched and searched the web and was so disappointed with all of the reviews I was finding until I found JNS. I emailed them and got an immediate response. Nancy the owner personally came to my home to give a fair estimate. When she told me everything they do and then told me the price I was shocked it was so inexpensive compared to all of these other companies. Today was our first cleaning and needless to say... they blew me away. The staff was on time professional extremely courteous polite and did an amazing job. They brought all of their own stuff including a vacuum! so I just had to let them in and left. I ca not say enough good things about all of them including the owner who has been extremely flexible and patient with my schedule. Most of all we have a cat and they were extra cautious. Bottom line do not look anywhere else. This place has a 5 star rating for a reason.
ive been wanting to go here since i read the article in the local paper. it was better then i was actually thinking it would be high quality my waitress was amazing and very nice. i got the burger with prime rib it was amazing. it is def out there in the country but that actually makes it even better. i will be back soon.
As much as I visit Crisp it s a wonder why I did not update my review sooner. This place has become by go to lunch spot on days when I work from home and even sometimes when I have to stop home for lunch. I ve still never had a sandwich here but always stick to the salads. The salads are tossed to order. You can select from one of their options on the menu or create your own. The staff is great here. Even on their craziest of days which is between 11 30 am and 1pm the staff is friendly and willing to get your order taken care of. My only criticism is that when you get your order to go there is little space to sit stand and wait. I am usually crammed next to the drink station.
25 for a Ruben is a lot. But you get a lot of sandwich. More than one person can eat. We shared it between 4 people and with fries it was enough. Half sandwich combo is a good deal and cheese cakes look fantastic. Will go again.
Goodness I still feel guilty I could not finish all that Soon Tofu... I got the Kimchi Soon Tofu which came BUBBLING HOT with forbidden rice and tons of veggie fixings and shared some of the JapChae I hope I remembered that name right Noodles and these DELICIOUS ricecakes in sauce that I ca not for the life of my recall the name of. But those ricecakes were amazing. I m definitely coming back if only for that. the noodles and tofu were excellent as well but served super hot hope you have time to let it cool lest you scald yourself and when you have the option of how spicy you want it do NOT be arrogant like me and assume you can take the spiciest possible level. Not even my daily sriracha guzzling prepared me for the spice in the tofu! The staff were great they even overheard me mentioning that I did not want meat and asked if they should remove the fishcakes that were in the ricecake dish. I thought that was really considerate! I hope to come back and not overestimate how much heat I can handle next time!
One of my fantasies is chocolate. I can eat chocolate with chocolate. I love their fondu with fruits with hazelnut and milk chocolate. Tired their cheesecake served in a jar and was super yummy. I also tried their brownie but I am not a big fan of brownies in general. My friend who was with me loved their brownies. I am a regular client there o go every couple of weeks or so. I need to watch out my weight too hehe.
We dined here tonight after searching Google for good Mexican fare in Las Vegas. I ordered the Chicken Mole and it was absolutely delicious. Flavourful hot and plated to perfection. The chips came with green and red salsas and we were told they pride themselves on homemade salsa. They offered us a hotter version as well which was a nice touch. Thank you for an amazing dinner. We will be back before we leave Vegas. Our meals were nothing short of perfect.
I m very happy with my pearly whites Amy did an Amazing job. Thank you for doing a great job.
Yum! My family and I came here because we had 45 minutes to wait for a table at Ichiza. I never enjoy waiting for dinner but I m glad we had to that night because we discovered this little gem. We choose at least 5 different desserts and loved them all. From the almond cookies to the honey bread delicious. I highly recommend you try it out.
I got really excited when I found out they opened a restaurant here. When I used to live in L.A this was my favorite food truck. The food was great the place was very clean which is really good. I ordered the rice bowl combo with sisig and a side of lumpia and my gf got the sisig burrito combo with a side of tocino taco all of them were really good not to greasy. The only thing I kinda did not like is that they re still stuck with the food truck serving size other than that everything was great.
I like these smaller Harkins because the parking lot and lines are easier to deal with. The service here is always friendly and if it s busy they will open more concession stands to accommodate everyone. On multiple occasions they ve given me the fresh hot popcorn that s falling out of popper I love it! Now I want to go watch a movie!
My husband and I have had the pleasure of dining at Marche Bacchus on several occasions and without exception we have had the meal of our lives and have been treated as VIP guests every time. The ambiance is exceptional whether on the patio overlooking the tranquil lake or inside the beautiful dining room. The wait staff is professional and sees to your every need. The food is the best to be had in Las Vegas and that is saying a lot. I am particularly partial to the braised short ribs I dream of them and my husband loves the filet which is the best in town. I realize that caviar is not on everyone s bucket list but if you have not tried it with a glass of champagne you are really missing out! Wine at every price point is available for purchase in the adjacent wine shop and even if you are a wine novice the wait staff most of whom are working on or have achieved one of the sommelier levels can make an educated recommendation never making you feel uncomfortable in the process. If you have not tried Marche Bacchus please make an effort to join them for lunch or dinner my favorite . Oh yes and do not forget to try their desserts. They are not to be missed especially with a glass of dessert wine perhaps a port? . This is not the place for the woohoo crowd but a place for a quiet civilized dinner.
My sis in law had recommended this place for my first Shabu ever. It was a great experience. came here 3 times already. Lunch price is great but dinner had the lobster. Been craving it over and over. Staff was polite and attentive food was good and place is clean. My only suggestion is for the price they should include either a soft drink or regular tea. Otherwise awesome.
I worked for Alarys in 2013 2014 a wonderful caring and compassionate company as a staffer my partner Lashanda who is still there and I did our best to match caregivers and patients. It was the best job I ever had to leave I did not return after the birth of my child in 05 14. I am happy to see their new Yelp page and show a little support Hope for continued successes and glad you are still providing amazing services for those in need of in home services
the best pizza in Pittsburgh for sure.. I have always had great service when I go.. looking forward to going back
I really fell in love with this restaurant immediately when I walked in. It is located in a cute neighborhood in squirrel hill and the environment of the restaurant was very warm and inviting. I came here for restaurant week and got the shrimp bisque for an appetizer pasta bolognese for entree and tiramisu for dessert. The soup was a great presentation and was very good. The shrimp was cooked to perfection. The pasta bolognese was also delicious and you can tell it was made from scratch. The tiramisu was a good size and did not disappoint. It is a little on the pricey side but well worth the money. The only complaint I had was the waiter took a little too long introducing the items on the menu and the specials. Like I was literally sitting there for 5 minutes listening to him go in detail about each of the food items which was a little much. But again that is not a huge deal. I had a great meal and a good time. Definitely would recommend this to anyone looking for a good meal.
I really have to laugh at all the less than stellar reviews here. It s kinda funny how many people WRITE Yelp reviews but do not bother to actually READ Yelp reviews BEFORE they eat somewhere. What kind of window lickers are these people? Come on folks! There really are no surprises at Randy s!!! YES Randy s is cash only. It s no secret it says so on the door on the menu and at the cash register. The fact that YOU failed to notice it is YOUR problem and I m sure it s done for good reasons. Whether or not you understand it it is what it is. Deal with it or go somewhere else sheesh. Quit crying already all you lousy whiners. YES Randy s is a favorite hang out for the older crowd. Get over it. It s decent food at a decent price served quickly and with a smile. And yet you re offended that it attracts codgers ? Really? You went there what does that say about you? NO I would not ever recommend Randy s for their tacos but quite honestly if you go into a Mom and Pop Diner in Scottsdale and order TACOS supposedly because you felt rushed and did not know what else to order?!? it is very clearly your own fault. Quit blaming other people for your own shortcomings. Next time try the Cheeseburger with fries and coleslaw. Better yet go for breakfast and order just about anything...except Tacos.
I ve been back to Sens three or four times since my original review and I ve got to say this place has risen above It s just good for Phoenix in my not so humble opinion. Here are the top three reasons why Sens is a kick ass experience every time The drinks are just good. My glass of Sauvignon Blanc hit the spot with my spicy meal the saketini with fruit flavors was good without being too sweet and the Spicy Mama never failts to disappoint. The food really hits the spot especially after drinking. We went there on Christmas Day after a very extended brunch and on Saturday night after happy hour and everything tasted just right savory spicy hearty. Just the kind of flavors you need to soak up the booze . I will say though that the 2 price tag for the scoop of rice is a bit excessive. With all that great sauce there really should be more rice for the price yes that rhymes . The server we ve had pretty much every time is very energetic and makes you feel like you re having a fun dining experience. She could be a bit more attentive once the meal s in progress but I like her vibe. And if you needed a fourth reason to love Sens they just unveiled a brand new indoor outdoor bar getting rid of the little private room they had before as well as an outdoor area with loungey furniture. The bar is gorgeous with custom tilework and the whole look is just really sleek. Plus they moved the DJ outside which is a huge improvement over having him stuck in the corner by the hostess stand.
There is not really a rage room in this metropolitan area. So the next best thing to do is grab a few instruments with some friends and make some noise for a few hours to exorcise whatever demons rage within. This here SER Soundworks rehearsal studios is a great place to do that. Very good rates especially on the weekends. Decent amps and PA ca not speak for the drums because I do not know what to do with those things anyway but you gotta bring your own sticks and cymbals other than the hi hat. Bummer if you re one of those Neil Peart wankers needing a gazillion drums because they just provide a really basic kit. Microphones also provided as long as you check in your ID at the front desk while you use them. Pretty easy to find on the north side of Corporate place about six buildings down from Arizona avenue. You might have to drop breadcrumbs for some of the more challenged folks in your group to find it though I had to stand on Corporate place and wave to our drummer because um... well drummers... Anyway awesome place. Your mileage may vary.
I was in Vegas this week and had to stop at Jean Philippe s. Once again it was amazing. This location is wayy better than the one at Aria. Aria employees are rude.
Been meaning to try this place out for a couple months. My dog of choice is going to be a Chicago dog whenever one is available they have them here. The food was great and the price was right. My only complaint is that I did not try this place sooner. I rarely eat out at lunch but I am definitely coming here many more times in the future. You want a good Chicago dog this is the place to get it.
Aline our server was AMAZING! Great atmosphere the food was superb. I really really recommend Byblos! You will not be disappointed.
I stayed at this hotel for two nights in August 2014. The hotel is located downtown near many restaurants and attractions. The hotel staff is great. My colleague and I arrived to the hotel Monday morning at approximately 9 45. Not only were we able to check in at that time of the morning but the front desk attendant asked that we help ourselves to breakfast. I thought that was incredibly nice and thoughtful. The rooms are well cleaned and maintained and extremely spacious. I would definitely stay here again!
I was so happy to find this place on my way to a meeting for work. I m never on this side of town but was dying for a smoothie. They have great options lots of free add ins and a few sized to choose from. The prices are comparable to other smoothie options. The service was great and my smoothie was ready quickly. If it were up to me I d obliterate all Henderson Tropical Smoothie locations and replace them with this! The one bad thing was when I arrived at the meeting and took the smoothie out of my cup holder it started pouring all over me and my car. There was a gash at the bottom of the Styrofoam cup and the drink was leaking all over. I called the store and told them what happened and they issued me a refund when I went back at lunchtime. awesome customer service. The parking lot was packed around 1140am. It was hard to get a spot anywhere near the store. I ll return if I happen to be in this area.
Green Carpet Cleaning Inc. is definitely well worth the money. Fantastic job! Our carpet is getting old and had numerous mighty spots as well as rust from table legs. The service guy was able to remove 99 percent of the stains. Definitely the carpet will last us quite a while longer before I need to replace it. This specialist knew what he was doing and worked really hard to make it look good. A BIG thank you!
I was in dire need of a hair makeover. So I decided to give Downtown Beauty a chance. My hairstylist Leslee did an amazing job! I put all my trust in her hands and let me tell you when I returned back to work I got nothing but compliments and coworkers asking me where I got my hair done. She layered my hair and put in highlights. I could not be any happier! Everybody was very friendly. I highly recommend this salon! This is the place to be for your beauty needs!
Luxor is the most unique shaped hotel in Vegas..the casino is decent the inside is amazing. The hotel service is awesome. The food here does its job so I ca not complain there. I enjoy the pool a lot too. Definitely a good price to stay on the strip. Oh and the elevators really do go sideways. Haha.
Quel endroit charmant! Le mobilier vintage les petits sandwichs au concombre les scones et leur confiture maison si savoureuse... Un moment parfait que celui pass l un dimanche aprs midi. Imaginez vous maintenant assis prs de la fentre une pluie fine tombant sur la ville et votre livre prfr comme invit. Faites du Parloir VOTRE endroit celui o vous irez vous rfugier pour chapper aux habitudes et vous crer un scnario dont vous serez la vedette tellement on s y sent inspir.
This place is very nice. The atmosphere is dark and relaxing. Goodfor a date or a night out. Food is delicious and reasonably priced. The portions Jette are good size to. You can just about split a pasta and salad. Servers are also very friendly and attentive. I would go back for sure.
I visited this place once because I was taking a cruise and needed to start a base tan. The office manager was very nice knowledgeable and quick to answer all of my questions. She gave me a tour of all the beds and explained important tanning facts and information on all the different beds and tanning levels. The quality of the tan was very good. I m knocking off a star because even though the tanning office was clean staff was knowledgeable the highest level tanning bed that was supposed to have misting and music capabilities did not work. So it gave me a great tan but made the 12 min very boring. Since these features did not work and the price is higher than most tanning salons I would not pay for this bed again until these features are fixed to make it the truly luxury experience you pay for. This was the lay down platinum UVA only bed.
Incredible service great ambiance and even more amazing food. The bruschetta was perfect every time I bit into it. The Asian tacos were near perfection light and fun to eat. The beef cheeks were so tender and the sauce was perfect combo. Tony did a superb job with recommendations and excellent service. Everything was timed perfectly when it was served. Thank you
I have been told that this place is really good. Even walking by this place always seems packed with guests. And after reading a bunch of the reviews I thought going here was a must. Placed a reservation. Reservations are for indoor seating I believe. If you want to sit outside you have to actually go there and be put on a list and wait. I ordered the corned beef hash with mushrooms. Absolutely delicious. The poached egg may not be much but it really added some flavor when you poke at the yolk. Hashbrowns? Wow. Not your typical diner hashbrowns. There was also a build your own Bloody Mary bar. I thought that was pretty cool.
I tried it for the very first time tonight and instantly fell in love! Delicious! The turkey tips are out of this world!!!!
So glad I came across someone liking Jessie Rae s on Facebook! I had the Jessie Rae sandwich and it was amazing! Loved the combination of BBQ chips coleslaw and pork.. and the bread is so good..I easily ate the whole thing. The sauces are all great as well. We were lucky to get a table but now know how awesome it is and can always take it to go!
Delicious! Great variety of breakfast dishes. From different benedicts to a variety of scrambles and omelets. Also non egg dishes like french toast and burgers and sandwiches. Have the country potatoes they re seasoned and cut into perfect bite sizes. Well worth the 20 minute wait
Oh Melt. You are so cute. You with your tattoo motif your Christmas kitsch above the bar. How did you ever think of making vinyl album covers into menus? That is so cute. Where you transcend cute is with your menu though. I consider myself a grilled cheese afficionado and your original take on an American classic is superb. I could not eat everything on my plate when I visited you but your grilled cheese with portabello mushroom and carmelized onions tasted just dandy when I ate it cold the next day. Scrum! Even better was your tomato soup. Like a mild salsa meets gazpacho. So chunky and spicy. Could. Not. Get. Enough. The waiter you sent us was attentive to me but not to my hubby and bro who got the shaft on drink re fills. But that was not enough to slight me for whenever I m in the town of my birth you know I ll be melting at the opportunity to see you once more.
Clarissa is amazing! I went to AHC on a whim and I m so happy that I did. I ve been seeing her for about a year and every time I visit she is very professional friendly and does an incredibly thorough job. I do not have much hair so most hair salons just rush through but Clarissa really takes her time and is a total perfectionist which is a good thing when it comes to hair ! She gives great advice on how to take care of your hair at home and you can tell she wants her clients to leave happy which I always do! My hair has never looked and felt better thanks to her. Clarissa is a high end salon hair stylist but at a much more affordable price. I wo not go anywhere else!
I had a bad leak that turned into a terrible leak. Spencer was able to come out very quickly for the initial diagnosis. He and Jason fixed both problems with good work excellent knowledge and friendly faces. I would definitely use them again
This is a carnivores paradise meat meat and a side meat! Had a steak sandwich which was surprising an overwhelming portion size for even a cave man like myself.
I had been asking the Mr if we could come here for quite a while. During a foray into the adjacent Dippin Dots I saw people filing into this joint and thought it was worth a yelpy lookup. It has deservedly acquired four and a half stars from the yelp community and here s why Education They take the time to explain the meat entree offerings in a way that does not demean but offers insight into which you might prefer. You can also see the skewers of meat right in front of you in a visually enticing cooler. They also have detailed explanations of all those tongue twisting Mediterranean food descriptors e.g. shawarma fatoush tabbouleh... Variety Please note that vegetarians can actually grow both fat and happy here. From a simple hummus to lumps of perfectly crispy falafel or perhaps baba ganoush eat your fill. As I did not sample the meat options we all know why I had to depend on the Mr s refined palate which suggests that the chicken skewers are the way to go. They also serve Lebanese beer and wine. Cheers! Atmosphere It s Mediterranean quick casual. FINALLY. You do not have to go somewhere promising Friday night belly dancing in order to partake in this savory fresh fare. I whose belly will remain shirted am delighted about the atmosphere. Nothing at all fancy here. Simple plates self serve soda tea fountain friendly staff who recognized us when we returned only two days after our initial visit . Food Delicious. An excellent choice for a Ballantyne area lunch or quick dinner that wo not leave you feeling bloated and ready for a nap. Great value as well. I ll probably not order falafel anywhere else because my poor spoiled taste buds would likely revolt. All in all this spot is definitely worth a visit. If you live in the area it s an added bonus. No frills just great Mediterranean food. Enjoy!
Dan was exceptional. He was there with me from start to finish even though I was at work when he came to get my vehicle. He done everything he says he was going to do at a reasonable price!! Highly recommended and I will reuse them!!!!!
Just stopped in for a quick bite and had a great tasting ham and cheddar sandwich with avocado. Also enjoyed a small kale salad. Clean restaurant comfortable seats and friendly service. Very nice and will return to try one of their larger salads.
Thank you Yelp! Without your reviews we would never have found this place. My wife and I were recently in Vegas and visiting the Pinball Hall of Fame. After a little while of playing we realized we were hungry and needed to eat. We knew that later in the evening we would be having a big meal so we thought a sandwich would be good. We remembered that Capriotti s had received good reviews so we figured what the heck. Fellow Yelpers you did not let us down. It took a few minutes to find this place since it is tucked in the corner of a shopping mall but it s worth the time to find it. When we got in we were greeted by a super friendly staff. We decided to split a large sandwich. After placing our order the staff started to prepare it right away. In a few minutes we picked up our sandwich and started to eat. WOW! It was good. They do not skimp on the meat or cheese I believe we had an Italian Sub. The bread was this awesome soft roll. Man it was good. The sandwich and a couple of drinks was something like 10. That was a heck of a bargain especially when you consider the taste quality and quantity of food we received. Will we be back? You bet we will. It s only 5 minutes from the Pinball Hall of Fame and it s a great place to eat! Thanks Yelp!
This could be the best cleaner in all of arizona. They can get any spot out. I had a shirt that had a spot from a year ago they got it out. I had another shirt that a different cleaner gave back to me with a spot and they got it out. really decent prices also.
OSS follows its natural energy the five stars does not mean its the best restaurant rather it is a great example of the style. Simple fun relaxed. Creative brat combos at a reasonable price with some nice variety but not to excess. Beer taps are limited but good esp. Karben 4 . Decor playful Steampunk vibe. The bun is too big but it is fresh and they re working on it. We live in walking distance and hit it up one a month for lunch. Perfect nap fuel.
Service was a bit slow tonight but food as usual was spot on!..everything pizza arancino carbonera parm....try it!
Great place! When I saw the bath tub in my hotel room I knew exactly what I wanted to get! BATH BOMBS. I wandered around Venetian Gondolas and arrived at this wonderful store. The employees are kind and helpful. They show you examples of what most of the bath bombs would look like in water and which is good. Their bath bombs are amazing smells nice and perfect shape sphere ! Buy their cylinder box you can put small or big bath bombs 20. You can fill it with 6 bath bombs I bought 3 big and 3 small . CAUTION the big and small bath bombs have different smells!!! There are soap bars that I did not discover about until I bought a turtle soap bar! I thought it was a weird bath bomb that contains a rubber turtle in it
Vents and Air ducts cleaned. Check Lance did a great job and was very professional.
First off this place gets points for not only having a gluten free menu but the food was delicious! We ordered the artichoke heart salad and the macadamia nut crusted mahi mahi. It was cooked perfectly and extremely tasty. I highly recommend the hot chocolate souffl it literally just melts in your mouth! And it s gluten free! The crme brulee is good but crme brulee is always good.
This was our first visit to Sweet Poke and I am so glad that we have a poke place that is so good on this side of town. I called to place an order for pick up but was told that you have to place the order online but was assured that it was quick and easy. I ordered the Ahi Lovers burrito and added yum yum sauce and my husband had the Salmon Shaka bowl. The order. Was ready in 5 minutes. The Ahi lover Burrito was bursting with poke and spicy tuna! The flavors were so nice together and the yum yum sauce just made it perfect. The Salmon Shaka bowl had chunks of fresh salmon and a ton of crab and that was also delicious but I am sold on the Ahi lover! The fish is fresh and the chunks of fish is not skimpy by any means. This is definitely going to be my go to poke spot!
Love love love The Foundry. The classes they offer are awesome and the teachers are so knowledgeable nice and encouraging.
Went here for the first time as a surprise this past weekend. The reason for not having a 5 stars was because of the initial check in process. Everything unfortunately went really slow but that may be because it was our first time there and they had to enter in all of our information. We got there 10 min before our reservation waited in line for 15min and still had to watch the video. Needless to say it took about an hour until we were ready to begin shooting. Maybe a wait is to be expected on a Friday night but a little inconvenient We had a reservation for a party so we had lanes in a more private room. The staff there was very helpful especially for one of the women in the group who had not experienced shooting before. Their ammo prices are a little high but that is to be expected you pay for convenience. I would suggest you bring in your own ammo to avoid paying for it at the range. Gun rental prices are not too bad and worth it if you are there to try one out. I would recommend going here as the range staff is friendly and helpful. I did not shop in the retail portion so the review is solely on the range and check in process. Would recommend giving this place a try but try to go early to hopefully avoid the crowd.
It s been a few years since I ve dined at Fix and I do not know why I waited so long to return. For the food lobster tacos even better than they sound. Hot rock supremely fun and absolutely delicious. Chicken wings the perfect sauce with the perfect bite of chicken. The sliders honestly the best I ve ever had. The staff Robert was every thing you d hope to find in a fine dining venue. Polished but approachable and also quite funny. His entire staff was attentive without hovering or being intrusive. They seamlessly swapped out share plates and utensils throughout the dining experience and made sure we had everything we needed. Whether you re looking for a dinner for a special occasion going out with friends or dining at the bar it s really tough to go wrong with Fix.
First let me say I have been to many salons And Square Colour Salon and Spa impressed me! Great atmosphere! The staff are very helpful! And overall a great experience! I have to give a special shoutout Natasha Napoli! She took me as a walk in today and was very professional!! I have longer curly hair most stylists struggle to cut my hair satisfactory and she gave me a fantastic haircut. She was very personable and paid attention to detail. Thank you Natasha!! If you need a great haircut go see Natasha Napoli Square Colour Salon and Spa!!!
Went here Friday night for dinner with a few friends. The service and food were outstanding. We had the croquetas for an appetizer. They were fried perfectly. I have been wanting to try this place for a while and I am glad I did. We had the tres leches flr dessert and it is some of the best I have ever had. Great flavor and light. Love this place!
Great place to Eat! Friendly staff and an Awesome selection of Food to choose from. Highly recommended if you want a good meal at an affordable price.
This is my favorite frame shop! I ve used them repeatedly to frames wedding invitations and artwork. Most recently we ve brought two pieces in to frame and Brandon has been just amazing to deal with! He offers fantastic creative support and truly appears interested in making sure you are 100 happy with not just the framing but your entire experience as a customer. I highly recommend them! I ll post pictures once we get the latest projects back!
I had a fish taco and carne asada taco both plain because that s how I roll . The Carne Asada taco was excellent. I put on the salsa that came with it and it upped the game. Hot and flavorful. NIce! The best fish tacos ever made can be found on our Mexican boarder in Nogales. But I m now bringing to question that previously held belief of mine. This fish taco was awesome! Although it only got one small strip of deep fried fish it was hot crispy and delicious. Welcome to 5th Street v2! So far so great.
Une petite place ou bruncher en comit restreint! La petite terrasse de derrire est agrable et frache lors des chaudes journes d t! Il s agit d un restaurant australien mais ce n est pas compliqu deviner....puisque la deco de la salle s en inspire! Vous aurez le choix entre plusieurs boissons du flat white typiquement australien au Chai latte ma passion... en passant par le trs original lucky charms caf glac... Le choix de brunch est restreint mais tous les produits sont frais et plutt healthy et donnent envie de tout goter! Nous avons expriment le smashed avocado et le toastie! Tous deux trs goteux et mme de remplir tous les estomacs vides! Les prix affichs sur le menu sont taxes incluses mais petit bmol pour les locaux.....ils ne prennent pas la carte de Credit!
Outstanding experience! We did the sampler and loved everything. I m not a big meat eater but the ribs were to die for. Definitely recommend here to friends. The service was great and the proprietors were extremely nice and friendly.
We got the daytime admission which is a pretty good deal. You can definitely save money by buying it online. Our admission was 19.95 a person. The view is awesome and the pods go slow enough so you do not feel antsy or dizzy. What a fun and touristy experience that everyone must try. D The walk toward the High Roller is nice too because of the shops along the way there and because of the nice view of the wheel.
Amazing Thai food. After a long trip from Houston Texas we decided to stop by for dinner. Friendly service and great food I ca not ask for anything more. I ordered the tum yum noodles soup love it. My wife and sons ordered the crab and pineapple fried rice dishes amazing!!
Silver State School credit union bank teller Latoya every time we come into that branch inside the Albertson store she is so pleasant informative. One could not ask for a better employee.
To not bore you with my evening too much. The Chandler NYPD Pizza is one of our favorite going out to eat spots. The service is excellent the servers treat you very well. The food is always top notch. The owner even stops by to say hi. Which is amazing because most companies could not care less if they re doing a good job as long as they have your . I definitely recommend this eatery.
Came here for the Cocktail Jam Weekend and was nominated by Yelp woohoo! This was my first ever experience coming to the Cocktail Jam. We were allowed 10 samples of cocktails for the night. There was a huge variety to choose from with different liquors! I enjoyed the live music and the exotic cocktails. The event was very well put together and organized. This experience made it so exciting that I would come back again once the next Cocktail Jam rolls around.
Went for lunch this weekend and very impressed. Had the traditional gyro and my friend had the chicken skewers and a veggie skewer. The meats were incredibly tasty and it was reasonably priced. Will definitely be back.
I would highly recommend this place! Little pricey but very satisfactor. Has many soft drinks and a few juices even carrot juice! Very good miso soup. Great scenery and its in a casino so you can gamble after a nice meal. Bamboo and some other plants growing too. An amazing private room with walls made of layers of smooth rocks and glass. Serves a good selection of beer wine and sake rice wine .
A great autumn afternoon awaits. The apples are first rate and easy to pick. They have wonderful cider. And the pumpkins are less than anywhere in Cleveland. Take the kids and have a great day. It is impossible not to.
Listen. Making people laugh is not easy. These folks do it without regard for what is or is not politically correct. Are you easily offended? If so you should move on and find something safer. If not you re in for a treat. While the theater may be the smallest I ve ever been to it s cozy and you can tell that the performers put a lot of work into making it as funny as possible. For about the price of a movie you can see a sketch comedy show that might just make you pee your pants. Couple of tips 1.bring something to drink concessions are not offered and 2. if your rear gets sore easily bring a stadium cushion as the chairs there just are not comfy.
The Mission is in a class of it own...sexy ambiance flavorful food and a staff that s knowledgable and experienced. The table side made to order guacamole is a delicious staple. Everything on the menu is worth trying.
Great businessmen who are experts in the jewelry world and great at working with customers! Great prices and perfect pieces! I highly recommend doing any and all jewelry business with them do NOT make a diamond decision without first meeting with them!! Easy appointment system to book your appointment and you get one on one treatment where they meet all of your needs!
Great selecton of cacti especially smaller sized ones that are not native to Arizona. They had some amazing stuff that is best for afternoon shade only and wow did I find some colorful examples. They have the standard range of Saguaro Ocotillo Cholla and more... but their more rare and interesting stuff is hard to beat as far as selection goes. I thought their prices were very reasonable for the valley. Easy to find location on AZ avenue just south of the loop 202 and it s on the east side of the road. Limited parking though. English speaking employees was a plus as well.
Blood orange lemonade. Get it. You need it in your life. I am in love with these fast casual pizza concepts in town. You can add as many toppings as you want and it s still the same price here it s around eight bucks. They make the dough in house every day and also have a gluten free crust. I always get the spicy sauce a mix of cheeses turkey meatballs and then decide the other toppings based on my mood that day. I recommend not going way overboard and adding too many. There s 40 to choose from so choose wisely. I also recommend eating your pizza there right after it comes out of the oven. It only takes a few minutes to bake. For me I usually can make two meals out of a pizza. Or I could just as easily crush the entire thing in one sitting. Parking several of the reviews here say there s no parking. If you ca not find a street spot or do not want to pay a meter Blaze does offer free parking at the Camden Gallery garage for up to two hours. Misc the workers always have smiles on their faces. I ve met the owner here both him and his wife are both super nice. The outside tables are great for people watching. Get a s more pie for dessert and make sure to get it toasted in the oven. Seriously though blood orange lemonade. You re welcome.
Love this store... Wonderful staff... Great prices... Unusual finds! We can spend hours in there and still not see everything!
Maj is wonderful. I love what she did to my hair. I had a color and cut. It came exactly how I wanted it. Maj has a great eye in knowing what color and cut would compliment your face. The salon itself is bright clean and welcoming. I highly recommend Maj and her salon. Stop by and you wo not be disappointed.
Dr Arteaga and his staff are great. He is very thorough with our dogs every time we bring them in. He really seems to care about our dogs.
I am very pleased with the blinds I ordered from Blinds Chalet. I got a roman shade and a set of panels for a patio slider. I did need to call twice to confirm some details. This is a product that takes some attention to detail and a thought process. It s not like ordering a standard shade from Home Depot. But the extra time on the ordering side was worth it. Everything fits perfectly and looks fantastic. The quality of workmanship is very good. Others have mentioned failure of mechanisms or what not after a year. Well my advice is to order replacement parts now. That s what I have always done with all blinds I have ever ordered and is cheap insurance. I ca not speak for the durability because I ve only had mine installed for a couple weeks. But they are the product I ordered they cam all in one piece i.e. no damage in shipping and they are as expected in terms of color trim and quality. And I felt customer service was very good. A total of 3 conversations after ordering online but time well spent and the people were very courteous and helpful. I will definitely order from them again!
Good salad good weather and throw in people watching in Market Square...great lunch!
Stopped here while I was driving home. I ordered the meatball marinara sub on whole wheat. The meatball marinara was the same as any other subway place I have been too so it did not disappoint. The sub was not too toasted either. However I did want an order of chicken noodle soup but they were all out so I had to settle for broccoli and cheese soup. The soup was okay. It was a bit too creamy for me.
This is the true meaning of New Jewish Cuisine. Taking traditional recipes and stepping them up to the 21st century without trying to invent the wheel. The Matzo ball soup is incredible it is very different than the ones at regular delis they smoke the bones prior to cooking it giving a very rich flavour. The chopped liver is smooth and manages to be light. The baked goods are remarkable and if you are lucky enough to get there on Friday Get the Challah! The chef Jeffrey Finkelstein went back to his roots after working at prominent kitchens around the world. His love to his nana s food became a joy to the food community in Montreal.
I ve never had Vietnamese food before and really wanted to try the pho. We got goong hom saba for an app and it was fabulous! Then I got the pho with shrimp crab and fish balls. This was something very different from what I would normally order but it was absolutely delicious! My husband got the Bun 28 and loved it. The service was great. I ca not wait to go back.
It was our first time here and we went for the Free Fried Chicken Friday Event. What a great way to bring us in to try some delicious fried chicken!! From the beginning the host was nice and greeted us with a smile. Once we got seated our waiter came to take our order and introduced the promotion. We were pleased with his great humor and energy while talking to us. We got the chicken and waffle and chicken with Mac and Cheese. Ohhhhh my goodness!!!! The seasoning on the chicken was spot on amazing! The salty seasoning with the sweet warm syrup and waffle could not be anymore perfect. It s a must have together! The Mac N Cheese was creamy and flavorful. I loved it!! We ordered a side of rice and gravy fried okra. The fried okra was perfectly fried. Not greasy at all and perfect amount of breading!! The manager went around to greet all of us. I love the energy and the friendly environment. Ca not wait to bring people here with us next time. Hope this post helped! Cheers to FRIED FRIDAYS!!!
Decor A unique spot in Beechmont that resembles a mix of indian cuisine and Chipotle style of delivery. This Indian fast food joint puts other eateries to shame with their modern design and clean concept. Their prep and kitchen areas are encased in glass which includes multiple tandoor ovens. I literally saw my naan from dough to oven to serving plate. Service The service staff are knowledgeable and friendly. The manager server actually made their way to each table and remembered what everyone had ordered. They seem to care about the experience. Food All the food for our party was hot and the naan was freshly made. I really appreciated their attention to vegan and vegetarian options. The heat and spices in their sauces and curries are good to introduce people to indian food. However my party felt that the heat could be increased and the salt should be decreased. Other than that everyone enjoyed their dishes. Overall fresh and fast indian at a reasonable price. I ll be coming back her often.
Magnificent waterfall and very quaint town with its own Chautauqua festival. We went to a lecture here on Cybersecurity and topped it off at the Paris Room Bistro which was exquisite.
Yum! Great little find just outside of the city....especially if you are Chicago dog fan
This Vegan is always looking for new and yummy things to eat drink and BeeGee Kitchen has given me something to look forward to on work days. Their zucchini skewers are flavorful delicious and quite inexpensive. I love to wash it down with an ice cold Coconut Milk Tea w Boba which is oddly not on their site menu . This Tea is an orally climactic experience. Service with a smile and a welcome back every time. Love this place!
Came here with my husband and some friends. The food was great and the service was also great. Our server was extremely nice and he remembered all of our orders with no problem. Did not even write anything down. He was super attentive as well. Will def be returning.
We went there last week. As my brother in law put it it is like eating in heaven? If I had the money I would go there every week. We all had the fixed dinner it is the best way to go. It comes with a starter with either Ceaser salad or scollops. I love scollips so that was a no brained I had the best scallops ever and that is saying Sent to him because I love seafood especially scallops and lobster. If I ever get to go back I have maybe the lobster risotto or something that did not have any seafood except for the scallops there and it was so good. Sent to him because I love seafood especially scallops and lobster. If I ever get to go back I have maybe the lobster risotto or something that did not have any seafood except for the scallops there and hour so good. If you re a fan of Hells kitchen I m sure you ve wondered what s the beef Wellington taste like oh my gosh it is so tender I could not eat all of it I had it the next day for breakfast and then dinner again so be sure to go here it s worth every penny. The sticky toffee putting was something that never had before I took it to our hotel to an 80th the next day. I met that cord to be warm made it taste better than it was still good even though it was cold and wet sitting in the fridge at the hotel . The prefix dinner which is a four course dinner and I ve described here is like 72 or 76 I am in a glass of wine to that so it was an additional 20 bucks or so but I did not want the whole thing if you get a paired wine is 125 hours. If you re in Vegas just pray you can get a reservation because we want to change the time for us and they were so booked a weekend so if you ever think you want to go then plan to head and took call for reservations before you go. The manager of the restaurant came to talk to us and was so nice he lives in stuffed up at all and then waitresses were so friendly and nice and the greeters you could not want for anything if you need something right there and give it yet and have to wait so do you go there. The manager even gave us his card upon our request his name is Fred Stone.
